The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
Crotch Violence;-;Don't attempt to play this before going to bed.
JD OwO;-;Don't open it before you go to bed. [10/10]
kDeviL;-;For those who are deciding whether or not to purchase civ 5, I will compile a small pros and cons list to help you out. Pros: - Greatest game on Planet. Cons: - Loss of Friends - Loss of Time - Loss of Job - Loss of Pet Fish (poor fish) - Loss of Sleep - Loss of Sex - Loss of Money for snacks - Loss of Money for Drinks - Loss of Money for pot - Well Known Gateway Drug to Crack - Ghandi - Probably Illegal somewhere - Have 350 Hours on Steam - Bought the game 3 weeks ago - Help Me..
Castel;-;Say goodbye to your life.
homegrown802;-;> build the Great Wall of Portugal > lose the nuclear arms race to Gandhi > bring the tenets of Judaism to every corner of Germany > construct the Great Pyramids of Honolulu > make Ethiopia the most well fed civilization in the world > share your Crabs with friends to make them happy 10/10, would give Crabs to Queen Isabella again.
Cally;-;havent spent enough time to give my full opinion, but its good
Maddy Caddy!;-;I'm allowed to discover the Internet before even inventing computers. Impecible. 10/10
Barrain;-;Um ... I guess it's okay. If I'm bored with nothing else to do, maybe I'll play once in a while. Oh, and it totally isn't addicting like everyone else says, I mean ... I can stop any time I want.
[AReV]Nomed;-;Civilization V is the thinking man's game. It doesn't require lightning reflexes, speed or precision, however it is probably one of the most complex games ever created. You're able to pick one of many civilizations to guide from 4000BC to the Present, allowing you to shape their culture, military and economic structure among others. You control everything, from where to build a city, how you allocate resources, scientific research, religion, espionage, tourism, corporations, and more. The game has an extremely intricate diplomacy system as well which allows for you to befriend or antagonize the other civilizations. There are multiple ways to win a game, allowing for multiple play-styles. As someone who has been playing the Civilization games for over 20 years, I strongly recommend Civilization V with all of its DLC. Civilization V has also made our list for the top 35 games of the generation. To see where it ranks, here's the video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DWIHmom_lP4 If you enjoyed this review, feel free to follow me as a Steam Curator: http://store.steampowered.com/curator/4886473/
Ethan the Drake;-;I'll write this review in a sec... just one more turn....
Harken XXI;-;CAN'T.....STOP.....PLAYING......ARRRGGGG!!!! Very addictive and deep! It has grown wonderfully over the years and has GREAT support from the Steam Workshop. Endless replayability! If you are new to the series, have no worries. Good ol' Sid will do you no wrong, as the tutorials will have you conquring Mongol Hordes and smacking down Washington's smarmyness in no time flat! Hours will fly by and your social life WILL suffer!! If you are a vetran of the series and have been holding out, check out the two expantion packs which add many interesting dynamics to gameplay easily making this the most exciting and in depth of the franchise. I've had several friends sit down at my screen and start a new game, dispite them groaning about it not being an action game or something like Candy Crush (We all know the types!). Needless to say, coming back and seeing how they were doing 3+ hours later and noticing that they havn't changed position on their chair, has always been a moment that makes me smile. I have spread the addiction!!! Huzzah! Do yourself a favor. Play this game.
Van Draeck;-;Gandhi declares war on Bismarck's German Empire. Soon after, Gandhi strikes Berlin, Hamburg, and Essen with Nuclear Missiles. The Ottomans, concerned with Gandhi's warmongering, denounce the Indian leader. They soon lose their capital. Bismarck, his economy and army in ruins, pleads for peace with the Indian Empire, but Gandhi will only stop with full annexation of the German Reich. An alliance of Poland, Gengis Khan's Mongolian Empire, and the Aztecs turn on Gandhi in hopes of stopping his rampage. Warsaw falls. Karakorum falls. Tenochtitlan falls. Gandhi reins supreme. The world is in his grasp. He is on the verge of doing what men, for thousands of years, have dreamed of: Conquering the world under one banner. But none of that matters, because the Babylonians have just won a space victory by launching a single little rocket into space. It makes too much sense. 10/10, but be warned: Gandhi will find you. Gandhi will kill you. And Gandhi Always Gets His Kill.
The15thWing;-;You know that feeling when you get up from a "Little" power nap, and realize you were sleeping for 8 hours? That's this game. But instead of getting rid of stress, it's full of it. In all reality, however. Sid Meier's Civilization V manages to feel like a board game. You start with 1 big piece, and you try to control the board, in sense. The game is rather welcome to new players. Almost everything is, or can be, automated. You might get confused for a bit, but soon you'll be Nuking Gandhi like a pro. But take heed, however. If you automate your Workers, which you'll find yourself doing the first couple games, they WILL build Farms everywhere. I have no idea if this is a fetish of some kind for them, but they do. This means first timers who want to automate should build a Tall Empire; To explain, a Tall Empire consists of few Cities, but each has a high Population. If you build too many Cities with too many Farms, your Population will make your City unhappy. Now, for a synopsis of the game; Sid Meier's Civilization V has many objects of importance. These are below. If you already know how the game plays, skip this section: [G] = Gold. Gold is your main income. Gold is used for Trades, bribing City-States, and the purchase of Units or Buildings. It can also be used to purchase Tiles. A good income leads to a good Empire. Fact: George Washington is the only Leader who affects the purchase of Tiles (At least in Vanilla). [F] = Food. Food increases how quickly your City grows. The more food, the faster. If you run out of food, your Citizens will starve until you have enough to sustain them. [C] = Culture. Culture is used to adopt Social Policies, and grow out your borders. Culture is given to you 1 per turn at the game's start, which is why Monuments and other such Buildings increase Culture. Some Social Policies ALSO give Culture, or other benefits. Once you reach a certain pre-ordained amount of Culture, you may choose a Policy. Remember, for every City you found, Culture Cost is increased by 15% before you're allowed to get a new Policy. You can also achieve a Victory by adopting 5 Social Policies to the end of their branches in Vanilla, or through Tourism in Brave New World. [H] = Happiness. Happiness is weird. First time players might see it as somewhat redundant at face value. The only thing it blatantly tells you is how close you are to a Golden Age, which increase [G] and [P] (Which I'll get to later). However, an UNHAPPY Empire grows at 1/4 it's normal speed, and a LIVID Empire grows even slower, weakens your units, and makes [P] plummet. Each City you found increases Unhappiness, and your Population does, too. If the people are unhappy, the Empire will fall. [P] = Production. This is the amount of, uh, "Build" you have per turn. In essence, it's how quickly you build your Units, Buildings, and Wonders. Production can be increased by the terrain around you, and by Buildings like the Workshop. The more Production, the better. [S] = Science. Science is the big thing of Civilization. Your Empire starts (At least in Vanilla) with Agriculture already Researched. This means you can build Farms. "But!", you cry at the silly reviewer on your screen, "If I only have Farms, what's all this stuff about Workshops!" Well hold your mouth, my, um, Civ-lings. Science is used to "Research." In a set number of turns, whatever you selected to Research is unlocked, and you get whatever bonuses come packed with it. This can be Units, Buildings, Wonders, Perks, Projects, or more. Science is one of the MOST IMPORTANT aspects of this game. Science can also unlock a Victory, but it's rather difficult. You must first unlock ALL SCIENCE PROJECTS, build the Apollo Program Wonder, and THEN build multiple Spaceship Parts. These Parts must then be moved to your Capital, and added to your Spaceship. Once you have all of them, you win! [C-S] = City-States. City-States are non-player Civilizations, which can't win the game. They have Units roughly around the Era of the most Futuristic Era of any player, and while they are only 1 City each, they can be bribed for Influence. Get ready for one of the most annoying factors of the game. Upon Bribing a City-State with 250 Gold, they become Friendly. Giving you various perks. HOWEVER, Bribing them once more makes them your Ally. They gift you all Resources they have, give you more perks, AND they declare war on enemies you're fighting, or that fight you. Since City-States are about twice as much as normal Civilizations in number, allying yourself with many makes you a mighty force. If you manage to build the United Nations Wonder, unlocked with Science very late in the game, you can initiate a vote for World Peace. In doing so, City-States allied with you vote for you. If you get the required number of votes, you win! [BB] = Barbarians. Barbarians spawn in small camps. They simply harass you. If you get onto an Encampment Tile, you remove it, AND get some Gold. Leaders like Suleiman and Bismarck can get Barbarians to join you, whereas Askia can get Triple Gold from these Camps. Holy god that was a lot. If you read it all, I applaud you. Now, Civilization V is a great game. It's fierce competition, fun, and overall an honestly fabulous title. If you're a fan of Turn Based Strategy and you don't own it, GET IT AS SOON AS POSSIBLE. It's an amazing work that deserves the money you pay. Not only that, but there's DLC that give Religon, and WAY more Leaders to choose from. Now, is the DLC worth your money? In my opinion; No. It provides more Leaders, but changes or adds Mechanics I'm not too fond of. I truly think the original is better. Civilization V captivates you into a suprisingly educational experience I didn't expect heading into it. You won't learn too much playing it, but the Civilopedia included in the game provides INCREDIBLY detailed backgrounds to Leaders, Buildings, Technology, City-States, and more. I urge you to buy this game even more now that Beyond Earth has come out, just so you can see what Civilization TRULY IS. The game's mechanics, art style, historical accuracy, and music blend together to form a game you'll spend weeks playing, again and again. Some people say it's only worth it with Expansions, but this game is fine just how it is, and in my humble opinion, is one of the finest games ever crafted. TL;DR Buy it now you terrible person.
Warlockwiz99;-;Civ 5 is the kind of game where you can try to be nice and befreind everyone, but you will get denounced. they will murder your people and pillage your cities. When you attempt to fight back you are labeled a warmonger, and obviously the only way to stop getting warmonger penalties is to slaughter all those that oppose you right? If you destroy 1 civ might as well destroy them all because they will not let you live that down. Also Ghandi Destroyer of worlds will wreck you if you don't give him all your uranium for him to build nukes to nuke you with. 10/10 would fight Ghandi Destroyer of Worlds again
basically cry;-;I made Germany beleive in Judaism. 10/10.
Swoodius Maximus;-;I lost my home, my job, and my wife and kids left me because of "just one more turn" 10/10
Rosario;-;Having not a great deal of experience with previous Civilization games, I was expecting myself to find this installment of the series hard to get the hang of, imagining myself spending hours trying to work out how to start up a civilization that will "stand the test of time". Instead, I found the game to be extremely helpful and newbie-friendly. Like other strategy games, you learn the basics then gradually build up a better understanding of the game and its mechanics, feeling more and more like a pro with every minute gone by. After about four hours playing I felt pretty confident, but even today I am learning things I never knew or had any comprehension of in the game. The simplicity which has been introduced to help newcomers coupled with the fact that the game maintains the same look and feel with older generations is a really positive thing that was pulled off very well. The game offers serious levels of depth due to the vast number of playable races, multiple methods to seek victory and the ability to play on completely randomly generated maps every game, with available templates to choose from if so desired. I have only played a handful of games right to the very end since they can last for many days, especially if each session isn't particularly long. Every game feels very different to the next, providing this title with a lot of replayability. The AI is sometimes criticised but I think that it is well done in this game with a large range of difficulty levels to choose from, ranging from literally zero experience to the grandmaster level. They can often be somewhat unpredictable but I personally see that as a good thing, I mean, what's the point in playing such an in-depth strategic game like Civilization V when you can anticipate what the AI will most likely do? Part of the magic of this game is that it immerses you into the position of a leader, facing situations where you have to make decisions on the spot with no idea what your opponent is going to do. Overall this is a great game worthy of your money, but I would advise waiting for it to come on sale as it frequently does, it isn't the newest game in the world either.
Rhine;-;It was 8pm, 5 minutes later its 2am 10/10
Fuku;-;got nuked by ghandi 10/10 realism
,T,;-;After opening my boarders to Ghandi, famously known as one of the most peaceful protesters in the world, he immediately pillaged my land, destroyed my army, and annexed my cities. 10/10
Johnny Matrix Osbourne;-;I'm not experienced player, but I like it.
Jesus;-;Played a game where everyone was Ghandi, a nuclear holocaust insued. 10/10
YaBoyHomie;-;ANON PLAYS CIVILIZATION V > Be Me > Just got Game > Mom says I have 30 minutes to play > She goes to sleep > Setup Game > Start it up > Pretty Fun > Meet Atilla > A little Later meet Ghandi > Both very friendly > Me and Ghandi= Friends, Me and Atilla= Enemies > Build three more cities > Playing as 'Murica > Start Developing > Attila attacks takes a city but I take it back > Around 1995, I am about to complete Spaceship > By now only me, Attila and Ghandi left! > Attila attacks Ghandi > Give Ghandi small city right before he gets destroyed > Attila declares war on me > Ghandi gives 7000 gold for 34 Uranium > Blindly accept > Attila has 2 cities of mine by now > See Ghandi has many Nukes and 2 Giant Death Robots > Makes peace with Attila and declares war on me > Basically takes all my cities except capital and third city > Finish last spaceship part > Get it to my capital > Attila takes third city > Capital has less than 10% health yet > Send spaceship part up and win > Why would Ghandi betray me > I gave him Uranium > Makes no sense > Then realize it is 4:30 and I played more than 6 hours straight > Mom wakes up and grounds me > I now have about 125 hours > I still don't know how to control the beast eating me to get to Civilization V > Learned Super Ghandi is a Warmongering Hypocrite > 10/10 Would Buy and Get Grounded for Again > Civilization V is Love, Civilization V is Life
PotatoKing;-;"Just one more turn." Oh, you thought you were gonna play for 15 minutes? Nope, you're playing for 15 hours.
zell;-;Great game. Dont trust Ghandi.
Darth Ozy;-;It's ok.
the alpacka dude;-;Gandhi approached me with gifts then nuked me. 11/10
Admiral Rumplebottom;-;Be warned: playing this game will make all your friends hate you and you will never go outside again. Don't try the multiplayer, you will become a genocidal maniac. Also Gandhi is really violent. 9/10
Kiang;-;This game looks pretty cool, but I haven't played it very much.
Brojobz;-;I learned some great life lessons from this game that I can apply to my own life. 1. Don't trust Ghandi 2. Uranium = thermonuclear war between the Aztecs and Germany 3. Everyone wants your crabs 4. Don't be distracted by Catherine's rack when discussing war reperations 5. Stealth bombers = <3
Gizmo;-;I dunno how I've dropped more than 2000 hours into this game, but it's well worth it. Different game every time.
CivFoX;-;Don't buy this game for saving your life.
Nate34567;-;Got bored at the airport at 1:30, decided to spend the 30 minute layover playing some Civ....... Next thing I know its 7:30, I missed my flight..... But I dont care, I stopped Ghandi.....
Inquisitioner;-;Only here will Kim Jong-un fight for democracy and Ghandi for world domination.
Twitch.tv/lainzero;-;My favorite part of history was when Ghandi built the Great wall in 4000 BC for his Jewish army. 10/10, helped me with history class.
Ayy LMAO;-;This game is highly addictive. Since getting this game I've lost my dog, my job, my hygiene and I'm getting evicted some time next month. However, I was able to secure a domination victory for 'Murica. So I've got that going for me, which is nice.
Sheezus();-;I don't know much about Indian history,but Gandhi is really a bch in this game.
Medichronalum;-;After every beaten map I tell myself that I won't play again. And every time it's a lie.
Sam [Down With Cis];-;I was playing Civ, and I only just realized how amazing this game is after playing it for so long. First... allow me to set the mood. The year was 1700-something. France, the only civilization who was even close to challenging my might as the leader of the powerful empire of Japan, was being landgrabby and attacking my allies, so I, being the superpower that I was as leader of Japan, decided to ride in and knock him down a few pegs (and by that I mean conquer five of his cities, isolate his capital from the rest of the world, annex three of the five cities we conquered, and give the other two to my nearby allies the Iroquois, who razed one.) Napoleon, of course, denounced me, but the rest of the world was like Japan saved our asses from your entitled ways, so you can go  yourself, shorty. Then I high-fived the Iroquois because Hiawatha and I were besties. Fast forward 100 turns and roughly 200 ingame years: Napoleons grabbing land again, but this time its the land of city-states around him, because I decimated his military so badly that he honestly wouldve killed himself going after any major civs. Being the superpower that I am, I immediately rush to the aid of these city-states, but I realize that I cant afford to risk war because the other civs would start to think I was just abusing my power. So I secretly provide the city-state Budapest, who is at this point in a state of permanent war with France, with two Mechanized Infantry - a solid two AGES ahead of Frances cannons and horsemen. Budapest successfully repels the French invasion, and becomes my ally. I do the same with the city-state of Stockholm when theyre attacked by Darius, who I previously attacked and captured one of the cities of because Darius was an irrational, entitled prick of a leader who had decided that everything to the west of his land (aka MY land) is rightfully his. Stockholm, to the east of Darius, successfully repels Dariuss invasion. But Stockholm doesnt stop there. Apparently, Dariuss military is so incredibly weak that one of his own cities falls to Stockholms new advanced technology. Stockholm razed the city. I just kind of smirked, at this point. Darius just got what was coming to him, so I thought to myself, "I'll go on my merry way, making more and more city-states my allies and protecting them from the menace of France - and each other. This system obviously works, and these city-states supply me with enough that maintaining my relationships with them is well worth it." Fast forward a few turns and roughly ten ingame years. My buddies the Iroquois publically denounce me, telling the entire world that Im not to be trusted. These were the guys who I not only saved from Napoleon, but gave two entire CITIES to. I was, of course, angry, but shrugged it off and kept going - I had a science victory to get to and couldn't let them get in my way, and if I were to teach them a lesson for their "irrational behavior", it would only solidify their claims in the eyes of the rest of the world. A science victory would require me to devote much more energy to the production of scientific advancements and certain buildings required to accomplish this goal than I would be able to afford if I had a war or two on my hands. Then I realized something - Budapest had been churning out things like SAMs, armored tanks, rocket artillery, things far beyond anyone's technological progress but my own, and giving most of it (but by no means all of it) to me, their ally and sworn protector. Of course I didnt realize the implications of this until Darius (remember Darius?) denounced me, too. I didnt think anything of it because that guy was always denouncing me, but then I remembered when Stockholm razed his city and something clicks - Im singlehandedly responsible for that, as well as the decimation of the French countryside by Budapests new military forces, which I also viewed as righteous retribution, in a sense. The French had been weakened so badly already, but Budapest was in a state of CONSTANT WAR with them. Even being passive and supplying them with resources and the occasional few pieces of gold was tearing France apart. Stockholms razing of Dariuss city was because of me. What I hadn't counted on was the Iroquois realizing that for themselves, let alone their negative reaction to it. I mean, I had been protecting the little guy, maybe even the good guy, the whole time! Stockholm... would've been wiped out if I had just stood by and watched... right? But Darius's military was, as I had proved, too weak to wipe out a colony of ants without foreign aid, and I had supplied their mortal enemies, Stockholm, with ing ARMORED TANKS. Stockholm also happened to be right near Hiawathas land, and was never *my* ally despite the units I gave them. In fact... They had been marauding near the outskirts of the Iroquois borders ever since I gave them the military technology they needed to defeat Dariuss invasion. I had singlehandedly thrown half the world into a state of complete and total chaos without even realizing it, and even believed that I was a savior and that I had done a good deed, ending with the complete and total ruination of not just half the world, but even the alliances I had built up over hundreds of ingame years of diplomacy, with all the other world leaders distrusting or blatantly loathing Japan. Just the fact that this is possible in this game at such a low, *casual* difficulty despite how simplistic the game appears on the surface is wonderful, and I didn't even MENTION the gameplay, the strategic depth, the multiplayer, the absolutely-ing-everything - I could go on and on about this game, every aspect is wonderful. I love it. I honestly can't bring myself to say anything bad about it - this is, without question, my favorite TBS game of all time. Ten out of ing ten, absolutely brilliant. edit: I wrote this forever ago (read: like a year) and as much as i'm cringing at my past self's writing I still agree with it, so that should tell you something about this game if you're still not convinced
brampage;-;I would not recommend this game once, I was in a loving relationship, but then I started playing this game... Now we nuke each other with carriers named "Love you though"...
Gadac;-;The only way to send poland into space. 10/10 would into space again
Don Ger;-;imagine you sit in a restaurant, an indian looking man is your waiter, he looks sorta weird, but very friendly. he talks to you as if you have known him for years. you ask for a hamburger and a beer. you sit peacefully in your chair. time passes quickly, and you see the indian waiter approaching your chair. you assume he will bring you your food and more friendly chit-chat. the indian man looks at you, but this time he says nothing. he puts your plate on your table in front of you. it's a a steaming, rancid piece of  you assume the indian man laid himself, it looks infected like the sewers of Calcutta. the glass is filled with stinking . "What the  is this? i asked for a burger!" you declare, . "YOU, SIR, ASKED FOR WAR!" the waiter screams. he then tosses your plate of stinking  into your face and pours the glass of urine all over you. then all the other people in the restaurant and all the staff all group around you and start beating the  out of you. you fall to the ground and peg for them to go away. none of them listen, they just keep kicking the life out of you, until you eventually slowly lose all senses and almost drown in a pool of your own blood. and you still go back to that restaurant every week. 10/10
Pumba70;-;It's alright
An Augmented Anus;-;Will trade you one of my sheeps for all of your gold, oil, coal, and one of your major cities. I will take any no as a war
Bill;-;one does not simply play a little bit of Civilization V
Clam Bake;-;-Best 2 Week Vacation I've Ever Taken -Helped Me Pass Math History Final -Only Reason I'm Still In College *Hits Next Turn* 9.7/10
Fancy Fish;-;SID MEIER'S CIVILISATION V - Just one more turn? || 9 || Score Comment Graphics 8 Visuals are simple but pleasing, good textures on the landscape tiles, nicely detailed units with lots of variety, good animations and an intuitive unobtrusive UI. Zooming in and out on units, cities and terrain allows you see all the little details while also giving you the ability to see the "big picture" strategic view. Graphics are vastly improved from previous games in the series. If I had one wish I guess it would be to have your cities and their buildings represented better visually. Cities grow and spread with population and advance with technology/era and have several different styles depending on the nation you select, and the building of wonders will add the wonder to the area surrounding your city but it would be great to have further customisation of your cities so you could really make them your own. The Civilopedia (like an in game wiki) is a little difficult to navigate and while informative could use some work. Audio 8 Game Music is relaxing and fitting, from the dawn of civilisation, the age of exploration or the grand age of empire building it just seems to work well and I very rarely feel the need to turn down the music volume (as I do with other games). The ambient sound is excellent, move your screen to a coastal area and you will hear the wash of the sea, select your boats and you will here the crack of oars or ring of their bell. The little touches and details like these really make the game a joy to play. Gameplay 9 Civilisation is a turn based 4X (eXplore, eXpand, eXploit, eXterminate) game, a game of grand strategy & micromanagement, a game where the objective is to grown your civilisation and eventually conquer all through Technology, Culture, Diplomacy and Military might. This is by no means a simple game, it takes time to truly learn and fully appreciate but once you get into a game your hooked. Civilisation is by far the most addictive game (maybe with the exception of certain MMORGP's) out there. The "just one more turn" is a running joke because you will often find yourself planning on playing just one more turn to build something or win a battle and then you will look to the clock and find several hours have past. The start of the game is exciting, turns move quickly and you see your planning quickly realised, mid game you must continue your expansion and put in place what you will need to win. The only place where I feel this game falls down is late in the game, by this point sometimes there will be a clear winner, technology advancement will slow and your empire will often be so massive and units so numerous that just taking your turn can take quite a lot of time. Overall though gameplay is outstanding. The AI can be a little quirky at times but for the most part is challenging and tactically sound. Relationships between civilisations are all based on their predisposition and events which occur throughout the game and can therefore be somewhat predictable. Story 8 The Story of history rewritten, the story of civilisation, so many details make up this game and so much background history on every aspect (via the civilopedia). The DLC add's on (amongst other things) quests which add to the story but in truth these add little to the game. The narrative is really what you make it, the interaction between the leaders of the other civilisations, all struggling for power, the alliances and conflicts mean there is very rarely a time of true peace or a dull moment. Replayability 10 Fully customisable random maps, different scenarios, different civilisations and leaders. Make your own maps and scenarios, full integrated into steam workshop with hundreds of brilliant mods. It all adds up to a different experience each time and near infinite replayability. Multiplayer 6 This is not an easy game to play multiplayer, the nature of the game means that you will all need a large amount of time to play a game through to completion, which may be problematic (especially with friends in different timezones or for people with connection issues). The most enjoyable aspect of multiplayer I found was the hotseat mode. In this mode you play locally and multiple players take the game in turns (like a boardgame), once again the time required to get near the end means you could be in for a very long (but very enjoyable) game. Overall 9 While some purists will prefer the earlier Civ games in the series, I feel that Civ 5 (and especially with the main DLCs) is a worthy successor. It has the right level of difficulty and depth, much improved visuals and solid gameplay which will make you wonder where the hours went. More reviews by Fancy Fish Agree / Disagree? Please leave me a comment
-W3E- Cliff Racer;-;Had nuclear war with Gandi lasting 400 years. War ended. I fired 5 nukes, he fired 18. Only things remaining on Earth was fallout and the unscathed city of Delhi. 10/10 would nuke again.
Pinta;-;Gandhi: "Why won't you lend our country some money as a prove we are friends?" Me: *Lends money* Gandhi, after two turns: *Declares a war* Me: "You built an army with my money? Seriously?" *rages* Gandhi pls I will nuke him eventually... 11/10 never trust Gandhi.
cessna92886;-;I've been playing for 36 hours straight. I don't remember if I've eaten. May or may not have pooped myself. But I'm taking that  Gandhi down before I get up from this chair again. That's good, right?
CALDAWGZ;-;Played as America and made them Jewish 13/10
SmileyFaceGuy;-;Submit your life to the all powerful next turn button. You will never go outside again.
Jimmypats;-;Gandhi is totally trustworthy and would never nuke you.
YamYam420;-;How can you not be overwhelmed by Civilization V? It's a perfect example of a series that's getting close to perfection,step by step. The new improvements are great and feel like they've been there all along. A must-buy for the fans and a great way for newcomers to finally get familiar with the series. A very relaxing game to play and with friends is the multiplayer a highlight!!!
Darth Marr;-;Me 9 PM last night "Oh, im bored. I might aswell continue on my Civ V campaign for a few minutes." 11 and a half hours later "Dear diary I have now played Civilization V for almost 12 hours straight, i fear if i don't take a break soon i will never quit. I will soon need water and food, but i cannot leave my seat. Im not sure for how much longer i can make it. I fear this might be my last note Good bye"
Iroulf;-;Ghandi nuked me for helping him 11/8 would gift him money again
Nebulous;-;An epic game where your goal is to press the "NEXT TURN" button over and over, every few seconds. Sometimes, as a special treat, you get to click other things!!
FuzzBot;-;Watched the trailer. Eh, full edition is 75% off, I'll try it. Started it up. Took a while. Started game. Pangea? HECK YEA! Large? No... HUGE! MONTEZUMA? I'll try him. Heh, his face is funny. Ok... first city... Tlalactoco? Or... Tlectoca? Or... Tle... Tal... ah forget it... Send warrior to explo- WO HO HO INCAS Really close... ... to me... Threat.......hmm Ah, peace. Hey dood. Enter next era. Poland and Greeks and Indians OH MY! ?!?!?!?!?!?!!?! HOW? Oh well. Byzantine? Hi der... perty... ladddddyyyyyyy..... Befriend Byzantine. Befriend Poland. HI VENICE!!!!!!!111 Hello Zulus. Hello Portugal. You're... kinda... ugly. And. creepy. Befriend Portugal. Enter next era. Hello Attila. Enter next era. Meet Korea. Meet Mayans. HOW MANY GONE PEEPLEZ IN DIS GAME Heh... and by... that... I mean... nvm... Enter next era. Eh... getting kinda bore- "SIR! A Polish spy has stolen Acoustics!" WHAT?!?!? ...wait, what? Hmm... Confront Poland. You suck. Badly. Poland apologizes. Poland gets mad at me for no reason what. So. Ever. "Poland has denounced you!" -.- >:( O.O >:) This is what I want. >:D Build huge army. Found the religion Dumbism. EVERYONE LOVES BEING DUMMMM Get back to my master plan. Realize that EVERYONE IS STILL IN THE RENAISSANCE ERA. And I'm in the Industrial Era. i am like so op Randomly declare war on Zulus. "A Hunnic spy has stolen the Printing Press!" I make the Incas like the dinos. EXTINCT :DDDDDDDDDDD Everyone hates me. Except... ...the lady. Byzantine, you're my forever girl! She turns on me and denounces me. <;( BETRAYAL *Violins play sad music* She doesn't even look at me anymore. I WILL PROVE MY POINT TO THE WORLD!!!!!!!!! Create Communism. Declare war on everyone. Utterly destroy: 1.) Zulus 2.) Venice 3.) Korea 4.) Poland 5.) Huns 6.) Greece 7.) India 8.) Maya Turn to Byzantine. "Please! I will be your slave!" "No... I can't... you had your chance." *Wails like a whale* I take pity on this poor creature. "One chance." "REALLY? *sniff sniff*" "Yes." She hops into my arms, and we ride into the sunset. And I rush all my NUKEZ to her last city and blow her to Mars. "BYZANTINE HAS WON THE SPACE VICTORY!!!!!!!!1" D:< See you in Civilization Beyond Earth then...*tear falls out of eye* Thank you for reading Shakespeare in the TLLALALALALALLAC City of the Aztecs. THE END 18/10, would destroy Incas with nukes again.
UnKnOwN;-;Still Addicted after 5 years of playing it. No need to make other games on my behalf
Harctor;-;I sent a nuclear bomb to Spain and the game crashed. -insert overused 10/10, 11/10, 420/10, 69/10 comment here-
Sir Faulty;-;Faulty's scorecard :- 1) Essential purchase 2) Recommended purchase 3) Recommended purchase during a sale 4) Not recommended unless heavily discounted 5) Not even recommended for Steam game collectors King for a day, a week, a month, a year, an era! The last Civilization game I played was Civilization III and whilst I can no longer really remember the finer details of the game outside what is the core Civilization experience, I have very fond memories of it. Having only had one PC in the family home at the time it was a constant tussle of bribes, threats and outright clashes with my younger brother as to who was going to get the chance to play. As any good Civ playing person would know, is not a "quick fix" kind of game. Hours would mysteriously vanish right before ones very own eyes so a battle lost here was a sore defeat for that day! I missed Civ IV, having taken a long break from gaming habouring the notion in my head that I had somehow outgrown playing computer games. Truth be told it was more along the lines of not really being able to afford a decent PC at the time (hey I had just started working and I needed to eat and pay rent). I do know, however, that there is an ardent Civ IV fan-base that proclaim IV is still the master game but I am not going to get into that debate since I have no point of reference having never actually played it. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=215698176 So how does Civilization V compare to its much older sibling? As far as my tastes and expectations for a game of this nature go - it surpasses them. Civilization V sees you guide a pre-historic civilization at the very dawn of man through to the modern era using war, diplomacy, culture, tourism and various technologies as they become available for your civilization to use (these are selected from skills trees that offers a variety of gameplay styles early on in the game depending on how you level your civilization). You will have access to a wealth of information regarding your progress such as Diplomacy and Espionage through to Trade Routes and City Production Output (just to name a very few). It can sometimes be a little overwhelming to the new comer as you try to grasp all the various little bits of information that enable a safe and successful passage through time for your chosen civilization. The game does include a tutorial in the beginning but it really is up to the player to decide what to do with the wealth of information he or she is presented with. Don't despair though - you do quickly get a hang of things and besides mistakes made are valuable lessons learn't for future civilizations. You can learn at a quicker rate by diving into a multiplayer session but expect to get your  handed to you since there are a great number of very good players out there but it's a really good way to learn. For the uninitiated, I suggest working from the easiest difficulty setting upwards to the more advanced in your attempts to become a better player and master the games intricacies. Whilst it would be easy to praise everything from the production values to the graphics engine (which supports DirectX II) to the soundtrack - we have come along in leaps and bounds since 2001 - what really makes the difference is the move to a hexagonal tile over the square tiles previously employed on the grid. This is a smart move and I am surprised to see it only show up in the games fifth iteration. It certainly goes well with the renewed combat system which no longer allows you to stack your armies on one single tile like you previously could. I also liked that they have now included the ability for a city to defend itself by simply firing onto an enemy within the correct tile radius. This means that your armies no longer have to babysit your cities and Capital and can now actually get out onto the front-lines of the war effort should you find yourself at war with one or more other civilizations (although it would still be a wise decision to keep some of your stronger units around your Capital city). http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=215698622 The game also introduces City States, which are computer controlled non-playable cities, that one can trade with or conquer depending on your proclivity. There is also an option to use diplomacy, however, in the base game this was a mighty gold coin sink since these City States at time of release where so fickle and demanding they could plunge you into bankruptcy before you knew what was actually happening and ruin a play-through. Thankfully this problem has been addressed in the subsequent standalone expansion packs, Gods and King's and A Brave New World. Speaking of the expansion packs they really are essential purchases ensuring that you are getting the maximum Civilization V experience. Not that the base game lacks anything at all that would make it feel incomplete - these expansions add new features such as Religion and Espionage as well as International Trade Routes and ability to form a World Congress in the modern age. I particularly like the inclusion of the World Congress, when formed, sees all leaders of the civilizations in game meeting to push through global proposals. The game becomes very much less predictable with this inclusion and much more exciting because there are now ten times more points of conflict that can arise. Want to place a heavy tax on militaristic civilizations crippling them from an upkeep perspective or see more of the arts flourish amongst all civilizations? There are a host of options that arise here that can drastically alter the end game. Tourism and Great Works by various artists are also introduced which opens up the game in exciting and wonderful new ways. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=215596438 There is also a very vibrant modding community with Civilization V having benefited from the Steam workshop inclusion. There is more than enough content available through this medium and the games official expansion packs and DLC which should see Civilization V reign comfortably for quite some time into the foreseeable future. If you enjoy grand strategy games, I wouldn't hesitate advising you pick up Civilization V. If price is an issue - I have noted that the game repeatedly goes on a big dip sale when the Steam holiday sales roll around so I would strongly urge you to pick it up then if you haven't already. Civilization V is a time sink of a game so don't be surprised to see yourself sitting in front of your computer all red and blurry-eyed as you watch the sun peak in the early morning sky. Civilization V is still one of my absolute favorite games in my games library and something I constantly keep installed. Firaxes have done an amazing job with this title and I heartily recommend it to any gamer with not only a passing interest in history or strategy but for anyone looking for quality and fun in equal measures. If you enjoyed reading this review please follow my curator group at:- Curator Rater
Regan;-;if this game was a potato, it would be a good potato
Gummy;-;Played for about half an hour. Got bored after that.
Nah;-;I played as George Washington and killed Gandhi and Genghis Khan. I was the last one to make the wheel they made fun of me. They died.
The Cactus Man;-;-Puts on Morgan Freeman voice- Now children, settle down, I'm going to tell you about our history. Many a millions of years ago, there were 6. Oda the peaceful. Bismark the rich. Siam the literate. Ghengis Kahn the powerful. Washington the productive. And Ghandi the *Cough* Peaceful. For many thousands of years they lived peacefully in harmony and tranquility, trading as they pleased. Then it changed. Ghandi had risen an army in secret. One far more powerful than should ever have been made. -Falls into the mind of Oda Nabunaga- The troops had moved out on the fields that day, on their way to fight the Indian threat. The war raged on for many a thousands of years when we made the push. We burned the Indian cities 'till they were but glass! We were victorious. The war was over. The world was safe. But then, crawling out of the ash and flame of a burned civilization was... One. More. City. Troops amassed outside it. It was an Indian city Gahndi wasn't gone... I saw the numbers above his city and was thinking "What is that...?" Then I heard the air raid sirens and saw the missles launch on what was the last day of my life. They hit every city. Burning them, irradiating them. As I sat there, in my throne room I had one last thought. One last memory that would carry me over. And it was... "Well played Ghandi...Well played."
whitefang667;-;Once I lead a full scale invasion of Asia by building one death robot out of Tokyo every turn because I was slighted by the UN. I regret nothing.
KAMAKAZI LIZARD;-;Ghandi killed me with a nuke 10/10
Sadwig;-;Yeah, yeah, i'll write a review about this one... Just... One more turn. That'll be the last one, I swear!
notWhole-Protein;-;this is how i have fun with this game step by step 1.conquer a city 2.raze the city 3.hear the people rumbling screaming crying 4.watch the city burn 5.feel it 6.double the feel 7.laugh 8.repeat
[SASS] DR.SMOKEY;-;>Gets Brave New World expansion >Selects Germany as civilization >Industrial Era has been discovered >Fully levels out autocracy >Declares war on England and France >Burns and pillages any city that has Judahism as it's religion. 10/10 Heil
Dr.Ghostrich;-;Be peaceful with everyone for over 3000 years, Declares war once and gets marked as a warmongering menace of the world and gets nuked by Gandhi. 10/10
FrozenEagle;-;Say goodbye to your social life and sleep.
Mr Carr;-;Hexagons.
7thru7;-;I have not played this game that much but it seems like there is potential.
Axl;-;This game is so much fun, it's like a time machine. Open it up, play for what feels like an hour, suddenly it's the next day and you're late for work!
Sentimental Oriental;-;A typical scenario every Civilization player will experience: I, the great General Washington, led my courageous troupe of Yanks to victory after victory - our Muskets were far more advanced then anything our foes could muster! Moments after wresting control of a pitiful city-state, I am alerted to the sudden appearance of a man - coated in war paint made of buffalo feces, clad in nothing more than a loincloth - who brandishes his bronze spear at me... And proceeds to launch a barrage of nuclear missiles at New York. 10/10 I failed History Class because of this game
Celtlphyr;-;Nuke my friend because he would not trade me copper. 10/10
oz;-;I played a 7 hour game. Next moment it's 5am. ---Next Day--- Wake up at 5pm. Eat. Play another game. It's 2am. Write review. Play more. This game ruined my life. Buy it now! 10/10!
MacWyn;-;Where Ghandi is a nuke-utilising tyrant, a 17th century ship of the line has a further viewing distance than a naval vessle of the 20th century, with its back-dated telescopes and even then, you can build a pyramid in the water. I'll have you know that because of this, im sold. GOTY 1000/10 A++ *Explosions*
Conor;-;If you're new to Civlization, this is where to start. Everything is simplified for the better, even if you're new to stradegy, it has a lot of difficulty settings. This is one of the best, most complete stradegy games once you buy its 2 expansion packs, Gods & Kings + Brave New World (Not needed but recommended) There are 5 different types of victory, they are Cultural, Domination, Space misson, 2055 and Diplomatic. They are all fun to go for. This is a stragey with some thinking involved and a lot of map/game options and great mods are on the workshop, so you could end up with hundreds and hundreds of hours eventually withnout noticing. Basically, you start in anicents times and settle your first city with nothing, you have to then guide your Cilization to stand `The test of time` right through to 'da future! Only ONE Civilization can be victorious. So aim for victory ahead of everyone else. There is Multiplayer but I prefer not to stick to that 'due to people not finishing games. A standared game can last litterly a full day. Recommended to anyone who hasn't played Civlization.
Surgical;-;Started playing at 3 pm, suddenly i realize its already 1 am.
Boatz;-;Good game, needs more Stalin.
Corey575757;-;10/10 realism arabia gets more oil from oil sources than anyone else you cant have the religion and science social policies at the same time also gandhi is a nuke happy warlord 10/10 historical accuracy
L0newolf42;-;I did all I could to be peaceful. I then got nuked by Gandhi. I'm not sure if that says something about me or the game. Anyways, yeah
Adrian Rokkyu;-;I should go to bed, lemme just finish one more turn... Ok, one more. Next turn will be last. Oh, nearly done with that building... What's that... Damn you, sunrise!
Sherk;-;Nuked by Ghandi 10/10 for realism
Lord Banana;-;Built Taj Mahal in Berlin, Statue of Liberty in Rome, started Medieval Era in 1400 B.C. and took over Russia. 25/10
RSn|Animus;-;"I'll just play a quick round of Civ V" 12 hours later Where did the sun go? :\
gaia.razus;-;Now I know why so many people talked about "One More Turn". This game somehow stimulate my reward center in my brain and making me addicted to it.
ZeroNight;-;What year is it!?!? How long have I been playing? Where did this beard come from?!?!
Miniapollo17;-;You should always trust Gandhi; if you ally him he basically gives you a free win.
Rhinodude;-;Perfect way to throw away countless hours of valuable time and have fun doing it :D
Frosty;-;> Found a Rune, > Workers Stand on Rune To Capture It, > They Turn Into a Battering Ram. Oh yeah! 10/10!
Lou Zephyr;-;The first time i tried Civ at a friends place: The smooth start, followed by a rush of adrenaline and a wave of pleasant warmth washing over my body. The mouse trembles between my fingers and drops to the floor with a tink, rolling away from my feet as my eyes pull back into my head. Thoughts bounce around the inside of my skull at a madmans pace. You alright, man? I hear somebody whispering behind me. They might as well be worlds away. For just an hour or two, I was God. And just like that, a cold snap of clarity whips across my consciousness and brings me back to the world of the living. My vision has not yet adjusted to the darkness of the room. A feeling of emptiness swallows me whole. I..I want more. Laughter echoes off the grimy stucco walls. Youll get another. Wait your turn, friend. I am standing, opening the door, walking out of the room, but my body remains in that chair. A shell of myself will always be in that chair. As I passed through the doorway and was assaulted by the bright light of an Austrian afternoon, my friends greeted a ghost and escorted him to their car. How was it man? Is it is crazy as they say? Are you going to try it again? Youre wild dude! I just stare off into the distance, and think about the sound that mouse made when it hit the ground. Tink. I wish I could go back there and pick it up. Civ, not even once.
dpunk;-;This game is one of a kind. Well, along with Civilizations 1, II, III, and IV. If you enjoyed other Civilizations games, it's highly likely you will enjoy this one as well. There are a few things that are notably different from other versions of Civilizations. The most obvious is the units per tile restrictions. In Civ 5, there is only allowed 1 unit type per tile, meaning only 1 combat unit can be on any tile. In some ways it's better, in some it's worse, but it does lend itself to strategy of positioning of your army being much more important than in earlier versions. Another is that cities, when attacked, take damage themselves instead of any unit defending. I believe it's related to the 1 unit type per tile, because it would be odd if you only had to kill one unit to take a city. These two differences from earlier versions does give the game a different feel from earlier versions, but it does still feel much more similar to Civilizations than it does to a game like Colonization/Civ4Col, although not that it would be a bad thing if it was similar to Colonization, another great Sid Meier game. Overall I highly recommend it to anyone considering, just make sure you have time to play because you will be hooked.
DalekSupremacy;-;What else to say than: "Just... One... More... Turn..." The legendary series/franchise/time-consuming-void, that is Civilization, continues to conquer the hearts of all us would-be world leaders who lacks the ambition, and are too lazy, to strive for power outside of the digital realm. To ascertain whether or not to play Civilization, there is really only one question you need ask yourself: "How many days off can i afford before getting fired?" If the answer is below five, you should probably leave now. I'm serious. Leave! Anyhow. If you have never before played Civilization, you owe it to yourself to try it. You will not regret it. (except for when you get fired, of course.) It is simply awe-inspiringly brilliant. An epic journey through history. Rewriting history.
the dark lord;-;i made a camel with horses
jbondguy007;-;Damn, it's getting late. I should probably go to bed... I'll just play a few more turns. Alright, one last turn. Ooh, just unlocked railroads. I'll just install a few before leaving... Alright, that's enough for today. One LAST turn and I'm going. *Fifty or so turns later* , Rome has declared war against me, better get some units moving to protect my borders. Okay, last turn. Hmm, I should probably heal my units before I forget. *A hundred turns or so later* ALRIGHT. LAST TURN. Oooh... Unlocked flight. Sweet! Okay, I'll just build some fighters, then I'm going to sleep. *Four hundred turns or so later* OH. MY. GOD. Just unlocked the nuke. I DEFINITELY gotta try it! :D
MrPigeon;-;Nuked India with a smile on my face 1,000,000/10
Bucktail;-;Ghandi shoved an atomic bomb up my butt Ghandiwillwreckyou/10
DJ Nibby Nib & the Fresh Wilbert;-;lost my job couldnt afford heroin played civ 5
aaeries;-;I love this game. The only drawback is that when I start playing, I lose twelve hours of my day without even realizing it.
[UoAW] The Communist Party;-;A Zulu tribe beat me in the space race 11/10 would play again
(TFG) Andy;-;havent played since the first CIV... man I am old. I give it a thumbs up! lots of fun! plus I love a game where you can say " MAN I CANT WAIT TILL GHANDI IS DEAD!" ...
Dank Prince of Persia;-;-Playing as Mother Russia -Conquered one whole continent -Napoleon conquering continent near me -Gahndi about to be wiped off the map -Feels bad for Ghandi -Send troops and nukes to help Ghandi -Nuke Paris -Ghandi denounces me -Ungratefull b*tch -turn troops around to Delhi -nukes Ghandi 4 times -Ghandi no more -Delhi is now Russia -20 turns later France becomes friend -Bribe all city-states and win UN vote Only good world is world without Ghandi 10/10 Would nuke Ghandi again
CvGBrotherhood of Nod;-;Nuked Japan while Germany watches, grabbing a hold of Rome as their precious ally turns into dust before their very eyes. Germany looks to Rome and asks them to push their Giant Death Robots towards my capital, dubbed "Temple Prime (obvious reference)". The robots march their way into a mountainous area where a wall of mountain protects several missile launcher platforms (MRLS basically) who launch a barrage at them. Rome pulls back the robots but then, what's this? An army of XCOM soldiers rip the poor robots to shreds. The robot survivor reported to Rome that Russia has taken over the middle-eastern regions and pushed toward Europe, with Rome being the meat shield of Germany. Caesar looks at his ally and goes "Wait, what?" and was suddenly silenced when a reign of nuclear warheads wipe out his only defending army. Cities tremble under Russian troops who then surround the German capital. Germany goes and askes if there can be peace. Catherine then gives out a "lol nope" then proceeds to demolish the capital with it's main army on the OTHER SIDE OF THE CONTINENT... Great game, nice AI, interesting terrain, awesome gameplay.
Champ4699;-;"Ghandi has completed the Manhattan Project" F_CK "Ghandi has demounced you!" F_CKFU_KFUC_ "Ghandi has declared war on you!" R.I.P. 5/5
BFG Zyddie;-;So finally nearly 600 hours in Civi V and finally I believe I can give it a fair review. So lets get the obv out of the way is Civi V good ? Yes otherwise I wouldnt have spent 600 hours in it and still booting it up now and then. Civi V lacks nothing on graphics or gameplay, it is top of the line and there it is 100s of mods for those who wishes to change their gameplay in anyway possible. Civi V is not as detailed or brutally hard as the former games in this installment, however that is a great thing in my eyes as it gets a lot of new players to test out the series that the rest of us have enjoyed for so many years. The DLC`s Gods & Kings and Brave New World adds a lot of the things we are use to from ealier series and is diffenetly worth getting for anyone who likes the more complex version of the Civi series, that beeing said the other DLC`s is mainly just new maps or new nations to play with and really only something you should pickup if you are a huge fan or on sale. So Civi is as it always have been, you start with a settler and one more unit and here you go form a nation that will stand the test of time. There is multiple ways to achive victory and it is important that you play to your nations strenghts and use your enemies weaknesses through the different time periods of our planet. This is classic Civi after all. Tho do not let it fool you, Civi is a game that takes a long time often 6+ hours pr map and often one nation is just gonna hate you more than anyone else, in my case it was Poland wich wanted to nuke and kill me no matter what, they did a good job sometimes too. All in all a great game and a great installment of the Civi series that brings a lot of new players and a lot of life into the series, so if you like complex games that takes time and patience then make sure you pick it up!
Carlbot;-;Too bad I'm not completely fluent in any other languages yet, because English certainly doesn't have the words to describe how epic this game is. I'm currently playing my bazillionth game, and I've played nearly 750 hours, but every game still feels like a brand new experience. The UI is probably the most user-friendly in any game ever, and the music is just plain awesome, plus every game is randomly generated. There's a demo; download it and you'll see what I mean. So when you DO get hooked, and you DO dish out 80 bucks for the Gold edition plus Brave New World (as you should!), don't get upset when you start failing your classes or missing work because you played all night and didn't even notice, because trust me, your time is better spent here.
Seahawk;-;Should be called Slave V. It's ok. You didn't need to do anything else today anyways.
plaster.;-;Got nuked by India, 10/10 Europe declared war on me on turn 6 for my capital being right next to theirs, 10/10 Every City In The ing Universe Demands Pearls, 10/10
Nobunaga, Fake VaIve Employee;-;My wife left me, I got fired, my dog hasn't been fed in weeks and all my other bills have gone unpaid for several months. Twice I have been questioned by the police after my mother filled in a missing persons report. 10/10 This game is addictive.
GriffonDefender;-;Fireaxis has managed to pull off a fantastic game here - Civilization V has a very in-depth play system that is easy to understand for beginners, and yet complex enough to keep even the most advanced user thinking. The turn-based system is quite fair, though a little bit does rely on luck if you're playing multiplayer (Who gets to host is 1st player, and thus gets "Priority" on wonders, so if both you and player 1 have 1 turn left on The Great Library, Player 1 will get it first), but I personally play a lot of singleplayer. The bot difficulty level increases at a high rate as you go up - 1 is basically playing against yourself, 2 may be challenging for someone learning the game, 3 is an ok difficulty, though still a bit easy, 4 is the equivalent of a moderately skilled human player, and 5 has the tactic of a skilled player, plus extra science/food/production, so I personally play on level 4. I won't go into details about levels 6-8, because I've never tried them, nor do I plan to in the near future. The UI is quite user-friendly - If there is an action that needs to be done, it will show up in the lower-right corner just above the minimap. There are 4 "advisors" that help new players understand what to build, and how it will benefit them, as well as whether or not to attack an enemy unit, and even who you may stand a chance against in a total war! Spies also add a new level of strategy to the game, as you must decide whether you will try to steal technology from other people, or if you will protect your own technology. Then you add spy promotions, in which Recruits will almost always be beaten by Agents, who will almost always be beaten by Special Agents. By changing spies around that have different promotions, you can achieve a different level of defense and offense in espionage. For example, if you want to steal from a country that has lots of tech, but you just want intrigue about another nation that has little tech, you can send your Special Agent over to the country that has lots of tech, and your Recruit to the other nation. Overall, this is a really fun game, the only drawback is it's price, but if it ever goes on sale, it is definitely worth picking up if you're into strategy games.
Ka Farsken!;-;Genre: Turn based Strategy Style: Digital board game The best strategy series ever made, and Civ V is the best version since Civ II. This game is highly addictive and in the end you will scream: just one more turn. One more turn. ONE MORE TURN!!! I'm a Civilization junkie..... https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WkHkINbrO7Y
20euros;-;Watch out for Ghandis Nukes
Tenacious Dean;-;Valuable months of my life have disappeared just because I had to play just.. One.. More.. Turn...
BonoBono;-;found a city signed a policy made some wonders and did some wander saw an american city so we set an embassy now they are my buddy thought i was doing well until the huns said oh well imma screw u up by denoucing so i nuked them but everyone started denoucing me so i nuked them all then america denouced me so i nuked them too then the huns army captured my capital so i nuked my capital then all of a sudden brazil won by culture........ !@#()(*(#(^%$(^%(&^# 10/10 nuke brazil first guys
owly-oop cockatoo '  ';-;whenever i play this i look at the clock and a day has passed. i have engraved a perfect sculpture of my  into my chair
Akiora;-;The narcotic-grade addiction this game instills in a player should be regulated and could be weaponized. Get your estate in order before you consider purchase.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;I'd appreciate it if you checked out my blog, where I do reviews, giveaways, and more: https://gandhigaming.wordpress.com/ *NOTE: This review includes the Brave New World add-on, it makes the game alot better. Trust me!* Alexander the Great (Greece) reviews the components needed to make the Spaceship. He notices that he needs the engine, but doesn't have the proper technology to obtain this piece for a Scientific victory. Angered at this, he asks his remaining friends for some research agreements to get the tech he needs to win. He gets two from his friends, Ramkhamhaeng (Did I spell that right? Anyway, Siam) and also Pedro II (Brazil) but it wouldn't go into effect for about 30 turns. Alex just groans and begins to switch up his productions and his science so he can aim toward getting that engine. Oda Nobunaga (Japan) then begins to take down Ramesses II's (Egypt) last city, which was his capital. Siam gets angered by seeing that Oda is taking down all of their allies, and attempts to charge at him. Japan was able to sweep his army and destroyed all of his cities with his deadly ability where wounded units still fight at full strength. Pedro II sends a Spy to Oda's capital to see where he will strike next: Him or Alex. Alex and Pedro set up some defenses and attempt to build a wall to defend themself from this unstoppable force. Oda decides to hit Pedro first, and slowly takes down all of his cities, one by one, and took down Rio de Janeiro. The Greek forces began to hold the enemy Marines and Paratroopers off. After a successful ambush by an XCOM Unit, Alexander had some time to finish up the engine technology. The next turn, Sparta and all of the other cities besides Athens were destroyed by Oda's unstoppable force. However, right when Oda was about to charge in and destroy Greece, both Research Agreements were used and got the technology needed. Alex quickly moved all his units away from Athens and used his remaining gold to purchase the engine. It was pricey, but he was able to attach it to the Spaceship. Japanese units were closing in fast, and the Greek soldiers started dying quickly, but right when the artillery was about to fire, they all see the glorius sight of a spaceship flying in the sky and going to space. Oda looks at the spaceship and starts yelling in defeat, knowing that he lost to Greece with a Scientific victory, right when they were about to get a Domination victory. In Civilization V, or Civ, those events are actually pretty common. It takes a little while to get used to, but once you get into it, it becomes very addictive to the point you haven't slept in days. Yep, days. My head is pretty rotten right now from playing this, but god, you NEED this game. If you got to purchase any game on Steam for free, make it this. Just buy it. You WILL love it, and I guarantee it. Even if the AI can be annoying... But yeah, just friggin BUY IT. Why are you still reading this!? Why haven't bought this game yet? Gandhi is going to NUKE YOU SO HARD, he could just- *whack* Hello, Gandhi here. You better buy this game or else I'm willing to nuke you and your cities. And your family. And your friends. And everyone you know. And just about everyone else on this planet. 11/10
[nBn] Beebs - It's Soldier Game;-;Just one more turn, then I'll write a review.
Ender;-;This game is SOO addicting. The problem with it, is there is no clock. You think, "It's 7PM...I'm just going to play a little bit" After a bit you think, man, what time is it? Andddd it's 4 am. =.=
industrial strength lubricant;-;ing great nuked the americans as the japanese hows it feel now s
Adequate Meatshield;-;Be careful of Ghandi. Never trade him your uranium. He will use to build nukes and destroy the world, just like the real Ghandi.
Echnaton;-;I've done the 1000 hour mark today, it is time for a review now: This game is just fantastic. The game is easy to learn, but in the end it will surprise you with its complexity. I must not only pay attention to how I set up my cities before the war begins to rare luxury resources. I have to take care of my religion and culture, while Wonders of the World built and new technologies are explored. Incidentally, my population is dissatisfied and my neighbor is spying me. In the end, it's time for the atomic bomb! In addition, there are numerous scenarios, each with their own requirements. In short: With my previous 1000 hours play time, I'm not done yet. Please don't forget to rate my review if it was helpful ;) Edit May'15: I am playing with mods from SteamWorkshop now and ... I am suprised! I am using circa 100 mods which add new wonders, new units, new buildings, new resources, new religions and reliefs and new techs. Sometimes I don't want to play this game but it's too much fun. I really like it - I think I will hit the 1500 hours mark soon.
Dangerous Saiga;-;Arguably, the best strategy game to ever come to Steam due to the amount of content and endless replay value... + In the verge of winning cultural victory until Gandhi, Napoleon, and Alexander the Great, declared war against me in the last minute. Got angry and ended up wiping out the entire planet with nuclear weapons and (unintentionally) dominated the world with military might. Don't f*ck with me. 10/10 + You may encounter Genghis Khan during your Civilization experience and he'll be your best friend even if your civilization doesn't have the great military strength. Also has a cool personality and usually got your back in the midst of trouble. #BestFriends4Life. 9.5/10 + Want to do a historical reenactment with your selected civilizations? Go ahead. It may be historically inaccurate but you ended up enjoying a lot more than you originally intended. 9/10 + Don't have any allies with other civilizations? You can gift a unit or send gold to city-states to become your friends and allies. At least, you're not lonely in a hostile world where everyone can backstab you like a sneaky b*tch (I'm looking at you Gandhi). Hey, it's a good thing when city-states will fight (and die) for you. 8.5/10 +There's something wrong when you have the Freedom Ideology and ended up dominating most of the planet by the Information Era. 8.5/10 + In the middle of war, you would most likely hear depressing orchestral soundtrack...and ended up making peace with your enemies. Not because that you lost interest in war or you feel bad for wiping out enemy units and annexing cities, it's because the soundtrack will make your heart cry. 10/10 + The best political simulator. Ever. 10/10 With endless replay value and unlimited ways to deal with your friends and foes in a hostile world, Civilization is still considered as the gamer's cocaine from many owners who own the franchise. Still don't have the game? Go get Civilization V or Genghis Khan and I will declare war against you.
flatluigi;-;One of the best strategy games I've ever played and it keeps getting better with each expansion. The Complete Edition is very much worth picking up, too - very few of the DLCs aren't worth going through.
Portal;-;69/10 Atom Bombed a City State 18 times didnt die
mzda_grl;-;This is one hell of a strategy game! I haven't been able to step away from it since I bought it a week ago.
BukLaoz;-;This game completly ruins friendships 11/10
Masamin;-;- Bismarck status: friendly - Bismarck offered open border and i accepted - Bismarck army went near my capital - Bismarck declared war Best game ever
Doge Matteo;-;It's not a bad game.
Magnitude;-;OH  IT'S 2 O'CLOCK I'D BETTER FINISH UP JUST ONE MORE TURN OH  IT'S 6 AM
SnealthyBankai;-;This game is...umm....what time is it again?
Momba;-;nuked gandhi in 1890 6/10 would rematch
Snoop Doge (   );-;It's 6pm... Just...one more...turn... Oh wait... It's 4am, still not finished, yea... Just one more turn
A.ALQAHTANI;-;China asked me for peace and they would give me gold every turn. 10 turns later the deal left and they attacked me. I killed all of China. 5 turns later I found Russia. I asked Russia for peace. Russia turned me down. I killed all of Russia. 50 turns later I found America. I asked America for 1 gold so I would be peaceful to them. They denied. I attacked America. 10/10 Would destroy full nations again. Don't play it before you go to bed.
Zayanz;-;I sat down and told myself I would play for 1 hour. *12 Hours Later* YEAH! GET NUKED RUSSIA! *Falls Asleep*
communism is a plague;-;"kill this guy" "ok" "you're a warmonger" pretty good
Stahpz;-;I tried to play against Ghandi on max difficulty. Now i dream him and his face every night. 10/10 Would be scarred for life again.
Thehunters97;-;Prepare to get nuked by Ghandi
[Goen 2 Ti5] Okosan;-;Just one more turn... Just one more turn... Just one more turn... Just one more turn... Just one more turn... Just one more turn... Just one more turn... And then you win, and have gone 3 days without eating or sleeping.
fritz.julie;-;Pros- One of the most amazing strategies games ever. Cons- Gandhi Gandhi Gandhi Gandhi and, you guessed it, no unit stacking All in all this game is pretty good. I do reccomend turning off Gandhi, because I don't think he had studied the cold war because he obviously doesn't know the consequences of nuclear warfare.
oR3CoGNiz3o;-;Civilization V is a great game. Whenever I play it, I can't seem to stop. There is that "just one more turn" thinking that keeps me playing turn after turn.
Foe;-;Hands down, the greatest turn-based strategy. They have upgraded all the best parts of Civ IV and fixed most of the glaring problems. With continued expansion support, the game consistently gets better with each release.
Tailkin;-;An absolute time-sucking game that will draw you in with it's siren song of "just one more turn." Before you know it, society has collapsed around you, and the only thing prying you away from the computer is a lack of power and doritos.
Alex.exe;-;Amazing strategy game. Civilization is one of the best games I've ever played if I want to go casual or have a little thinking. From trade routes to the welfare of your people. From allies with other civilization to building a utopia. And from building an army to starting wars- Wait, those start tears. You play as a random leader (Or pick a leader) with various units and skills and you try to build the perfect civilization or beat the other players (Other civilization) in a war until you are the last one alive. You have to worry about gold income, happiness of your people, and the welfare for the population to go up and a growing civilization. What I really like is the personality of each of the AI playes if you play solo (I think it can happen in multiplayer too). As for the victory, so far, you have to build a utopia (Adopt 5 full policy) or be the last civilization. And that means, you guessed it, war. It is also a game of trust if a civilization likes you or not (Or a player decides). Interesting facts: George Washington adopted communist in the year of 1400 AD. Napoleon Bonaparte was a huge a-hole around other civilizations and declares war after being on their good side. Askia Mohammad is friendly even if he is carrying a sword and has a burning kingdom behind him. Mohandas Gandhi has disposable nukes in his closet. Sources: This game
Dodger;-;Turns out the concept of copyright has existed since 4000BC, so have fun building the great pyramids one turn too late
OuttaTime;-;Great game. The pinnacle of turn based strategy games.
Origami Red Fox;-;This is a definite should-buy game for anyone. Even though this is a strategy game, I feel like anyone can get into this game and find enjoyment out of it. I highly recommend this game to anyone, even to first-time gamers and to people new to the strategy genre.
274907896804;-;Only scratched the surface in a few games but seems to be fun
noagenda77;-;5/5 But I still haven't figured out how to found my first city.
Mellanoob;-;This is the best game ever.
Samoth;-;Gandhi will find you. Gandhi will kill you. And Gandhi Always Gets His Kill.
Bendersnake;-;With BNW there's Veneto and not Italy 11/10 because indipendensa
pimpbdaddy;-;Civilization is known as one of the top turn-based strategy games on the market, and rightly so.
rami.rigger;-;"One More Turn".
thunderjman;-;THIS IS THE BEST GAME EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Larsovic69;-;Definitely worth buying, especially the complete edition.
Quold;-;One of the best strategy per turn games ever made with quality and complexity very complete, rather than a good game is the best game. Its difficulty could desperate because of all the ways of victory, civilizations variety, styles of playing and different strategies to follow. A game with infinite hours of playing, fun and complexity, making very hard to fall down in the rutinary. I recommend this game without any doubt. In the end, the best strategy game ever made, your money will be very good spent. Quold.
PinkiiGirl;-;Seriously, this game eats my life and I actually enjoy it. I'm doomed.
Uberlyuber;-;Step 1.) Buy this game Step 2.) Tell all your friends your about to lose your social life Step 3.) Tell your parents you hate them Step 4.) Play Civ V Seriously, if you play this game, be prepared to lose YOUR ****ING SOCIAL LIFE. GOD. YOU WILL NEVER EVER EVER EVER EVER EVER EVER GET OFF THIS GAME ONCE YOU START. i r8 8/8 :D --Uber
BananaAspic;-;helo mr people. me from slovakia.me liks dis game very very much. me wants u to play dis game too. dis gam is god. so plz mr people buy dis game. u not be disopojnted(but plz no kils mr nize yes). me play dis game much och u wil also do dat. mvh jaroslav kramberger slovakia no 1
AngryAsian;-;To anyone considering buying this game, please avert your attention to the list below: Those considering to buy this game must: - Have no social life, or if you don't fill such a requirement, be content with losing a social life. - Be content with failing tests and subsequently school. (Includes Colleges and Universities, you know, the stuff that gets you good paying jobs.) - Be willing to have their parents yell at them with a megaphone. - Be able to handle groundings and other forms of punishment. - Be content with losing friends. (Unless said friends have Civ 5) - Be willing to lose girlfriends and wives. (Unless, once again, said individuals play Civ 5, and if that's the case, keep them for life.) - Be content with losing your job. (You know, the stuff that gives you money) - Be content with the possibility of no sex. (YEAH, you read right.) If you don't fill ALL of the above requirements, please don't buy this game. It will ruin you. It will destroy you. It will age you. It will grab you like sweet black tar heroin and ride you like a dominatrix. And the scary thing is that no matter what, it will always keep you coming back for more.
CaptainJammerz;-;This game is far too amazing for words. -Start as Ethopia, thinking of a small, peaceful playthrough, as I dont get new cities well -50 turns later, Annex a city state for taking my horse tile -Greece tells me to stop expanding near him. -Greece tells me the whole world thinks my army is a joke -Annex Athens and raze his other level 1 settlement -Annex another city state, with an extra settlement, what started as aiming for a small civ, ends up in 4 settlements. -Starts war on Rome, annex two of his settlements, make peace. -Ghandi becomes world congress host with 13 delegates. -Cry in corner 11/10. "Just One More Turn"
Daniel The Gallade;-;Civ 5 is a game where you are the leader of a civilization, obviously. You can destroy your foes in a Domination Victory with your army, you can use education and science to win in a Science Victory, or maybe try for a different victory. Whether your more of a warmongering player or a peaceful player, Civ 5 is a great game to play with friends, family or maybe just randoms. You can make allies, enemies, or maybe just friends (that may or may not backstab you!) with other civilizations. You can explore the world and settle more cities to expand your civilization more, research technologies to unlock more features, make money by trading luxury resources and other stuff, and make wonders that will help your civilization in different ways. The game is also newb-friendly, as the guiders will help you grow your civilization through your first and upcoming journies. If you've played the previous Civ's, you're probably going to like Civ 5. The DLC "Brave New World" makes Civ 5 a whole lot better, such as it completely changes culture victories which makes it more interesting and fun overall to acomplish a Culture Victory. It adds more civilizations and wonders, and changes the way you make money by actually making you make trade routes with other civilizations or City-States to make money. However, the vanilla game without DLC is still pretty good. I, personally believe the game (and DLC) is worth the money. Overall, I rate this game 10/10.
Goatboy;-;WTF is wrong with this game? I even forgot that real life exists. This is worse than hardcore drugs.
skeetah;-;Perfect thing to waste whole your life.
Tarly;-;A few of many scenarios you will encounter whilst fighting aztecs with helicopters and tanks England has denounced you........ time to get nuked ! America has founded the religion islam beating zulu's to get space rockets and nuclear weapons Queen Victoria's 4000th birthday 10/10
CrayCrayFish;-;created a city as a military hold-out base in a secluded area surrounded by mountains with only 1 population in it for the entire game. 11/10 would not do that again
HenkDeVeroveraar;-;I hate this game.
2Cream1Sugar;-;This is the first turn-based strategy game I've ever played, so be aware that this review does not come from a connoisseur. At first, the game can be very intimidating. You have no real idea what to do, and you just go with the flow. You soon realize the mistake you've done, as you get crushed by your opponents. After a couple of games versus the AI, you start the comprehend the way you should go about playing, and the game starts shining. It's very fun to play alone (I've personally never played against another person) and there's no timer or anything forcing you to rush and make irrational decisions, so it's very relaxing. There's a lot of different countries you can play as, each one having different traits to bring to the table, making it refreshing to play over and over to try different play styles. Believe me, you might say " Just one more turn ", but we all know you're lying to yourself.
The U_d_rSc_re;-;I spent 28 hours, over four days building my empire. I spent every minute I could infront of the screen expanding and fconquering, trading and building, researching and discussing with other civilizations. Every second I was away from the computer this game was on my mind. When I closed my eyes I saw Ghengis Kahn fulfiling his destiny, trying to rule the world. I was fired from my job after attacking a customer that looked like Ghandi, screaming that he was the reason that my people were wearing blue jeans and listening to low quality music. I was driving down to dinner with my girlfriend, when we hit a rabbit, she broke down crying, hysterical, and urged me to get out of the car and help the slain animal, but all my mind could do is turn to her and say "A single death is a tragedy. A million deaths is a statistic". After four days I wasnt sleeping, only planning my next move, my eyes were red, my hair was falling out, and I couldn't stomach solid foods, only energy drinks. I lost to Washington of America, who got a scientific victory when I was one move away from taking over his capital city. Now I have no job, no friends, no girlfriend, and my family stopped talking to me, all because of four days I owned this game. All in all 10/10, would suggest to friends/SO/co-workers if I had any.
Patricia Polacco;-;this game gave me a boner
Deralian;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V sucks hour after hour of your day away, giving rise to plans of global conquest and thoughtful tactics. Of course, you could say the same of Civ games of the past, but what makes Civilization V a praiseworthy successor is how it changes up key elements of the franchise. The game's core values--expansion, exploitation, exploration, extermination--are as strong as ever. But the newer tactical combat and addition of city-states give strategy veterans new ways of tackling their goals, while a friendly interface and expansive Civilopedia help newcomers get up to speed relatively quickly. There are a few aspects of Civilization V that could have used a bit more attention, but even as is, this is yet another classic edition to a series that consistently rewards and renovates. If you have even the remotest interest in worldwide domination, you owe it to yourself to get lost in one of the most rewarding turn-based games in years. Advantages: + Hours of addictive turn-based glee + Fantastic new tactical combat system + Excellent interface makes it easy to keep track of every aspect of the game + Great automation features allow you to focus on the big picture + Lovely visuals and classical soundtrack Disadvantages: - Inconsistent, overly aggressive AI - Scattered annoyances, particularly in multiplayer
^1Organic^4Bananers ^7{60};-;One more turn... One more turn... One more turn... Just. One. More.
BootlegBeer -Klutz-;-;I mean, it's OK I guess.
grez_smith;-;I have perhaps played this game a bit too much, but every time I buy another game it never holds my interest as long as this game has.
Lord Grog;-;For some time many of us have wondered just who is Jack Schitt? We find ourselves at a loss when someone says, 'You don't know Jack Schitt'! Well, thanks to my genealogy efforts, you can now respond in an intellectual way. Jack Schitt is the only son of Awe Schitt. Awe Schitt, the fertilizer magnate, who married O. Schitt, the owner of Needeep N. Schitt, Inc. They had one son, Jack. In turn, Jack Schitt married Noe Schitt. The deeply religious couple produced six children: Holie Schitt, Gi va Schitt, Fulla Schitt, Bull Schitt, and the twins Deep Schitt and Dip Schitt. Against her parents' objections, Deep Schitt married Dumb Schitt, a high school dropout. After being married 15 years, Jack and Noe Schitt divorced. Noe Schitt later married Ted Sherlock, and because her kids were living with them, she wanted to keep her previous name. She was then known as Noe Schitt Sherlock. Meanwhile, Dip Schitt married Loda Schitt, and they produced a son with a rather nervous disposition named Chicken Schitt. Two of the other six children, Fulla Schitt and Giva Schitt, were inseparable throughout childhood and subsequently married the Happens brothers in a dual ceremony. The wedding announcement in the newspaper announced the Schitt-Happens nuptials. The Schitt-Happens children were Dawg, Byrd, and Horse. Bull Schitt, the prodigal son, left home to tour the world. He came home with his Italian wife; Piza Schitt
PimpingAndSexy;-;This game ruined my life. 11/10 would play again.
Glorious Zero;-;>Be the Netherlands >Use best Netherlands strat, POLDERSS!!!!1!!!! >Tries to be friends with everyone (science victory included) >Austria wants open borders >accept >Sends great prophets to my cities >, I have my own religion >use my prophets on my cities >austria won't stop sending prophets >Declare war >Kill all prophets >publicly denounced >all trade routes destroyed >Germany starts having war with me >Gets  by the armies of austria and germany >WW2 in a coat of WW1 Best world realism game out there 11/10
psych0tic;-;More addictive than the purest heroin, allows limited forward time travel, fulfils your darkest historical fantasies, incites hatred against Gandhi and ruins chances of meeting all forseeable deadlines. Truly a game for the ages.
kelpo;-;owned the entirety of the united states as Austria in the year 2000 10/10
DrZ;-;"Okay, one more round then I'll go to bed." then 6 hours later,"What, it's morning already?"
Shogun Chris;-;Notice how all reviewers have 100+ hours into the game. I think that explains how good the game is.
Age Co.;-;absolutes 10/10 would nuke friends again
[Mofo's]1337NuB5!;-;Endless hours of fun; each game feels different from the last. New honeycomb system means no more noobs using stack of death... good stuff, and a solid 5/5
missinglink42;-;Loved this game so much i bought it for a friend. He comes over with his computer and we play together. 6 hours later i must drag my intoxicated friend out of his chair and into bed while screaming " A UNIT NEEDS ORDERS". Not only addicting but suprisingly fun to play with friends. 12/4 cans of peanuts Your Friend and Worshiper of Lord Gaben, Missinglink42
Tequila Sunrise;-;Civilization V is one of the most interesting strategy games I've ever seen! This game gives you absolute freedom. You can build anything you want, you can conquer any country you want, you can buy everything and everybody (yeah) you want, you can explore new territories, you can create your own GREAT empire. Don't know how to start? Your councillors will give you some advice. Don't want to play it only by yourself? You can take your friends to play with you. Moreover, everything is accompanied by various sounds; figures are not static. And what I found really good is that you don't have to do boring quests like:"Build 10 factories and 5 farms", because you decide what to do by YOURSELF. I think that everyone, who like strategy games, should try this one. It worth every penny (btw, it isn't expensive at all).
Mr. Game & Watch;-;I hope you have nothing to do tomorrow morning.
joaopneves;-;What a surprise! I've never played Civ until three days ago. I still wondering why didn't I install the game and played it right away after my purchase. This is a great great game. Even if you're not a fan of strategy games or so you should play this Civ V.
Axe99;-;One of the best 4X turn-based strategy games yet made, deep and enjoyable, particularly with Gods and Kings and Brave New World expansions.
samiam699 <Fallout 4>;-;A game where you spend 10,000 turns and 10 days of your life trying to claim yourself the best civilization of them all... Just to get nuked by Gandhi. 10/10
Baron WolfSwag Von Gil;-;I love to nuke ghandi in this game bacause he is a warmonger  (Rhymes with punt)
Quacktar;-;Just...one...more...turn...
Fox;-;It's all fun and games until Gandi starts sending missionaries over. The next thing you know, he's knocking at your door with his false promises of friendship and his army of missionaries carrying nukes. You want to start that awesome new religion, Bejebus cHeist? Hindu Missionaries. Want to get rid of the Hinduism religion that's spreading throughout your cities? Hindu Missionaries. You want to spread Bejebus cHeist to Delhi? Hindu Missionaries with Nukes. Gandi don't mess around.
Freg;-;I would really like to point out three main features of this game: 1. Destroys your GPA 2. Reconfigured mods every time you go back to main menu 3. Crashes when good things are about to happen overall 6.9/10, would play again.
Vampire;-;Spend 3 days on a multiplayer game only with it to end with your allies nuking one another, having a decidedly adverse effect on your empire. Rinse and repeat. 10/10
Whiteswart;-;Ok. Where should I start? How I'm in love with history of humankind? Or how Sid Meier made a deity of history-based sandbox games? Nope, there are too little space for that. Do we need some comparisons, like with Paradox games or Total War series? Nah, they are distinct. Too many details, too narrative. Those games are awesome, no doubt, but not in an aerial way, like Civilization does. Main catch of this game is in its simplicity. Everybody can rule an empire there. Though, it's a sandbox, it has a different face for every player. You want to rage a war and hold the whole world under your color - do that. Or you want to be in peace with everybody? Oh, you can do that too, in dozens of variants. Dozens? I mean, thousands! The devil is in the details, you know. Civilization V - is a peak of long lasting walk. I liked first and second games, especially second, those fundamentalists are gorgeous. I'm still prefering third Civilization, when I'm going for domination victory. Fourth game feels like Win Vista to me... Overall, fifth Civ game - the most complex and balanced of all. Cultural achievments, market deals, political unions, and religion issue - all are far better than before. If I was supposed to play in one game for life, there are good chances that I'd picked that one. One thing I have to add - no matter what strategy you want to use: make a Louvre and Hermitage full of stuff, build a spaceship, or run the league of nations - you want an army. Your army. Every strong player could tell you that. History tells you that. Today news, like Ukranian story, telling you the very same. If you don't feed own army, soon you're gonna be feeding somebody else. Si vis pacem, para bellum. Peace, people. Make love, not war. Mark? 10/10 of course!
[fireflame988];-;You know how an Italian chef kisses his fingers and says something in Italian that translates to "A masterpiece" after tasting their own dish? That's how I feel about this game.
Spaceballs;-;You can nuke things
Caesar;-;BEST STRATEGY IN THE WORLD 9,1/10
Astrophysics Black Guy;-;Civilization 5, the realistic historical simulator, featuring famous moments such as the founding of Judaism in Germany, the construction of the Great Wall of Sweden, and the conquering of Poland by the Shoshone. 10/10.
Musical Nutt;-;I played 38 hours my first day.
[TG] Trippy Fox;-;Strategically planning out what to research, produce.. Where to attack or settle in. You pick the pace, map, civilization and everything. Multiplayer can be really fun, but if you invade a friend; they'll be  off for a while. Also, I would reccomend getting all the DLC with the game, once you play with the DLC, the default looks way too plain. "Press next turn already" -Every friend, ever.
gozz2000;-;One day while I was walking down a serene path I encountered a grave evil that I myself could not have possibly defeated alone. There they were, the great Khan and the great Ghandi marching side by side down a path towards my empire! I the great Paccal, of course, could not let this great transgression aside. So I talked to my great correspondent Frezdful calfrul and asked him for holy advice. He, by smoking a green plant and drinking the blood of sheep, had great premonitions and then told me only by sacrificing my relatives that I could defeat the great evil headed towards my empire. My unbreakable belief in my correspondent lead me to an awakened power deep within the bottom half of my body and there I was flaying my relatives and sacrificing them towards the great sun king. This, of course, manifested a great power within myself. I became ferrocia the great lizard king. I uttered a few words "feerotoa aoiasjiogjoiasj" and by doing those measly acts I increased my kingdom's science output to >9000 and construction to >9000 and built many troops over my 5 city large empire. Truly, it was something to behold.. . as I built an army of xcom and death robots to shatter the power my opponents held. They were at my mercy. And that is the story of me, the great gozz.
QuasarBaby doritos;-;Took over the world as Ghandi and nuked everyone. 8/8 m8
lomnicks;-;Can anyone tell me how I can tell when this game is over?!! I've been looking for the boss for a few years now and haven't seen hide nor hair of him. I'm about ready to give up on, but need a few thousand more hours to complete level V.
Ras;-;BUT MOM THIS IS HISTORY
[F2B] Ch405;-;My favorite part of history was when Ghandi built the Great wall in 4000 BC for his Jewish army. 10/10, helped me with history class.
Nuclear Child;-;I payed $7.50 (Steam os sale) and got more enjoyment out that than most $60 games. #Praiselordgaben
Overslop  Thailand;-;Lacks a little depth compared to its predecessor and the AI is beyond stupid in battle, but this game remains a fanstastic strategy title and a good introduction for newcomers to the series.
AdmiralWessels;-;9/10 Accurately shows how many world leaders live 5000 years
Sweet- Tea;-;There's something deeply wrong with Ghandi's AI, the fact that he nukes everyone when he gets the chance makes this the most accurate representation of historical events on steam.
[Doki] Visuals;-;Civilization V is a fantastic turn-based strategy. I've personally have been a fan of the series for a long time and this is by far the best one. There is many different modes to play and multiple ways to win and no two games are ever alike. There is also a ton of mods for this game! So check out the workshop. You will easily lose hours to this game and I can't keep track of how many times I say "Just one more turn" and never realize how late it is until after the fact. If you don't own this game already you are seriously missing out.
timmychompchomp;-;Great time consuming game. Hours of fun.
Duck Hunter;-;Ha ha, that Nelson Mandela guy and his nukes, too funny, too epic.
[Lemons] loopuleasa;-;Civilization: The bread and butter of turn-based strategy games. The absolute pinnacle of eye-needling, back-breaking thousand upon thousand of turns over the course of what I think are the longest "games" you'll ever play. The only game that's longer than a Civ marathon game is life itself. As a huge (pirate) player of Civ4 + expansions I must say I am pleasently surprised with Civ5. I though it was lacking the depth the fourth had, but in reality it's just overall better; (everything probably due to the fact that death stacks are no longer in the game) ------------------------------------------------------------- 9/10 Strategy - if you're a fan of anything that involves tactics, macro-managing, resource-management, general strategy you'll feel at home in this game. Everything is so smooth and straightforward you'll be dying to pass the test of time and try your best to emerge victorious as the greatest civilization. Skill roof is damn high and it's one of those games that's hard to master. Definitely a collosus of the strategy community. Cons: AI in the game is barely potty-trained. It just follows a given route most of the time and it's painstakingly predictable once you played a lot. ------------------------------------------------------------- 8/10 Multiplayer - Awarded a 7.5 because multiplayer, as a concept for this game,is impossible without dedication and a group of friends to meet-up around the clock at various points during a week to pick up on "the last save". It's hard to set up, but boy it's so much fun. Really worth going for multi. Singleplayer rocks a lot if you don't manage to find friends. Cons: Time consuming, difficult to maintain a game or find people who will. ------------------------------------------------------------- 10/10 Game Mechanics - Combat and tactics are just so satisfying compared to old Civ games. Tech advances are meaningful. Territorial management makes you feel like you own your civilization. Balance is properly set, with the exception of the "spawn roulette" that will obviously give random locations with random benefits and resources. Maps are great. Modding community went to space and there's a lot to be imported from their work. Learning curve can go through your regular linear graphs. Everything is intuitive and easy to learn. One game that has a whole lot of depth. Cons: Haven't found any negatives on the game mechanic side ------------------------------------------------------------- 9/10 UI and Graphic style - Everything is smooth as butter. The Devteam have done a great job with this game and everything is polished. Graphic style fits beautifully with the nature of the game and it doesn't distract you from the important part: the game itself. Cons: I would love to have more data and info instead of this minimalism, but that's just me ------------------------------------------------------------- DLCs aren't that great, the only real advantage for me would be the modding community, that usually moves fast towards modding the expansions. Cons: DLC/Expansions. They cost money and divide the community. ------------------------------------------------------------- Big fan of this game and the series. Few games have managed to make me wish for "one more turn" until the sun rose the second day and my clock showed me 7 AM, and this is one of those games. The great heir to the previous stellar game and I recommend it to anyone with any of the following: - time on his hands - great love for strategy - great love for turn-based games - some playful love of history - friends you can play with - money to spare (check discounts if possible) ~ ~ ~ ~ 9 / 10 ~ ~ ~ ~
LOVE IS BLUE;-;Ruined my life
asta;-;If you don't have this already, you're an idiot.
Superayman Jr.;-;Very great and fluid running game. enhance that experience by getting at least the major 2 addons as they offer vast amounts of new content for your money. If you love strategy games, this ones for you.
Kaiser Luke Von Stegeman;-;FANTASTIC! Addictive,brilliant!! everything from graphics to gameplay its great!!
nas;-;Playing with AI is fun. Playing with your buddies (local or online) is a thousand times better.
Frilloch;-;Time consuming and terribly addicting.
davehinkle;-;With an expert blend of tried-and-true concepts and more accessible modern gameplay conventions borrowed from Civilization Revolution, Sid Meier's Civilization V is easily one of the greatest strategy games ever made. Buy it, play it and gleefully lose sleep as you aspire to conquer the world. And then tell yourself, "just ... one ... more ... turn ..."
Steph.();-;I got this game because my friend told me this was kind of similar to the Sims 3 (I love this game :3). It is quite fun so far: my people are building houses, learning archery, and getting cute horses to visit their neighbours. However, my asian neighbour isn't really friendly; he always wants to fight with my people (I know he's asian, because he introduced himself, and he said he was mongolian, and i know it is in Asia). Come on, he is worse than a high school girl. >:C Anyway! I gave him a bit of gold and then we stopped fighting and became best friends (forever i hope hihihi ^_^); i wish i could have made my soldier hug him, like in the Sims 3, but i couldn't find this option. Oh well. Lots of adventures ahead of me: i'm so excited! =D
Senpai Serdar the Magnificen;-;This game is the best strategy game ever. Best soundtrack ever (i'f you choose the Ottomans/Middle Eastern you get 'music' from Omar Faruk Tekbilek, this guy has got alot of reward and is best at sufi 'music') https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Fiy--tPXd5E BEWARE this game is like drugs!
Mr.Bean;-;started between shaka and atilla. got killed on turn 50. best game ever
Darkness Eater;-;Made me go to Rehab. 11/10 EDIT: Suddenly, mods have stopped working for me. New Rating- 9/10(Until mods start working again).
peremptor;-;Civilization V wasn't played in a day... at least it's good for curing insomnia though! Edit: Truth be told the game can only appeal to gamers with a lot of patience the way the turn based gameplay unfolds, it's just too damn slow and boring. And its that much worse if you want to go aggresive with the grind that moving units around turn after turn is. After I beat it on deity I decided that was it for me. Never loading this one up again, I got other stuff to play.
RaTcHeT302;-;time to play for an hour oops LOOKS LIKE SEVEN HOURS HAVE PASSED FOR S SAKE just five more minutes
Aussiedroid;-;UPDATED 2014 Originally, I said in my review in 2011: "Pretty good, but lacking a lot of features from Civ IV, reminds me more of a remake of Civ II at its core. Still as super addictive as the rest of the franchise with a few new twists.... Lots of DLCs to waste your money on too!" Fast forward to 2014, with more than a few hundred hours played under my belt, the game is officially complete with multiple small DLCs & balance/fix patches plus the 2012 & 2013 feature expansions in Gods & Kings and Brave New World which have significantly changed the gameplay. There are now a massive number of civilizations to choose too, not to mention a massive number of tailored scenarios to challenge you! The major expansions particularly, have really rounded the game off nicely, reintroducing many of the earlier missed features from Civ IV. Introduced more new things like world congress, advanced trade routes, tourism & cultural 'Great Works' to complement previously missing features like Religion & Espionage. Along with this content there was also balancing out all civilization victory paths providing some unique gameplay options to explore. There remains a more simplified approach to all of this, streamlining many features meaning less micro management. This does make the game more accessible to newer players, but in some ways feels perhaps too simplified now. It would have been good to still have more advanced micro management for those that are up to the challenge. Although more simplified game design, you will find more things to keep you busy. More end game content for example to cover those dull periods where things become stagnent. Then there is off course the huge number of achievements to unlock, many of which offer a true challenge (and sometimes a bit of luck!). Overall, even 4 years on from my first game, it is a game I always end up going back to. That is rare in the current generation of disposable gaming. It is the most enjoyable & rewarding strategy game around bar none! Just one more turn....
VironBR;-;This review is in "English/Portuguese" English: What can i say abbout Civilization V? Well... i don't know, i think it is easier to think "what i CAN'T say" abbout civilization! This game is HUGE, it will grant you many hours of fun, and infinite replayability, i am not someone who actually focus on a game, but if i would, i surely would focus on Civilization! This game is brilliant! it is amazing! So much technologys to research, so many civlizations, so many things! Oh, and there is the mods! Infinite possibilities! Trust me, if you are a Strategy fan, BUY this game, it is a MUST HAVE! Portuguese: O que eu posso dizer de Civilization V? Bom... Eu no sei, eu acho que  mais fcil pensar em "O que eu NO posso falar de Civlization"! Is game  ENORME, vai te garantir muitas horas de diverso, e uma longevidade infinita, eu no sou algum que foca em um jogo apenas, mas se eu fosse focar em um jogo, com toda a certeza seria Civilization! Este jogo  brilhante!  maravilhoso! Tantas tecnologias para pesquisar, tantas civilizaes (incluindo o Brasil), tantas coisas! Oh, e tambm existem mods! Possibilidades infinitas! Confie em mim, se voc  um f de estratgia, COMPRE este jogo, este  um MUST!
UUUU;-;I nuked ghandi and everyone got mad
Shnow;-;This game is ok but im waiting for Sid Meier's Civilization Vl: The Return of Gandhi. In this game you are tricked into thinking Gandhi is a scrub but you find out that he is really just trying to kill you. I really want people to buy this game just so they can feel the wrath of Gandhi. 10/10 Gandhi is actually my great great great grandfather.
Headcrabs 'In A Bucket' Hitler;-;I had a family once. A life. Then i discovered Civilization 5. 'Come outside, daddy! It's snowing!', my child would say. 'In a minute, honey.', I'd reply, 'Monty is threatening me with war unless i meet his demands, and i can't look weak in front of Byzantine!'. Weeks passed. Centuries. My empire had grown large, powerful. I had it all in the palm of my hand. The Pyramids had rose before me. The secrets of the nuclear age were but a click before my command. My people were happy, lively. I had created not a kingdom, but an existence. But alas, all things must come to an end. The wife got sick of me not paying attention to her; The kids had already grown up and started going to school. I checked my hours on steam. '4102 hours on record? no..that can't be right!', i announced loudly. I arose from the chair, my sweat had partially ruined the leather seating at this point, and the smell made her gag. I begged, pleaded. 'Please, i love you! We all make mistakes! Take me back!..right after i finish this last turn!'. One turn. My army was in place for the final strike. All enemies, friends, allies would fall with this one swoop. All i needed was one final turn. It was my legacy, my life, my dedication..Or my family. In the end, looking back, i believe i made the right choice. Civ 5 is a hell of a good game, after all, and love comes and goes much easier than an alliance with Austria that doesn't end in a backstab.
xPzV;-;Civilization V is one of the best turn-based strategy games Ive ever had the pleasure of playing. Whether teaming up with my friends for some multiplayer, or simply losing a whole night of sleep to the games endlessly replayable single player, this is one game that any strategy enthusiast, or, hell anyone strat-curious should check out. Sure, I miss some of the deeper inter-civilization relations that the more defined religion and government setup brought in Civilization IV, but thats nothing anyone new to the series will even think twice about. With all the tips, advisers and tools in place, this is the first Civilization for PC that I feel is worth just about every persons time. Go forth and create, subdue, and exploit. Do as Firaxis has done, and bring Civilization to the masses.
Stolken;-;This is a pretty good game when you want to retell history so that the aztecs ed over the germans and then the united states joined forces with the Russian queen. Pretty good, I like hurting history books.
ownosourus;-;One of the best turn-based strategy games I've ever had the pleasure of playing. 2K Games have outdone themselves in making some massive changes without changing the core gameplay and alienating their fans.Improvements to the user interface and AI at all levels result in it being more approachable for newcomers without losing any of the strategic depth that long-time fans crave. It vastly improves combat, making the micro-level gameplay both more complex and entertaining. It trims all the fat, leaving only decision-making, strategic planning, and the sheer joy of crushing your enemies. Civ V is the pinnacle of the franchise to date.As a hardcore strategy gamer who is no stranger to planning out my empire's production dozens of turns in advance, I've already turned to Civ V for my world-conquering needs  but at the same time, if anything is going to rear a new generation of strategy gamers like the very first Civilization did for me, it's this.Civilization V is a fantastic entry in the series, which avoids the trap of getting stagnant thanks to some important novelties on combat system, interface and general design, designed to create a 4X of elegant and clean mechanics.
Max;-;Civilization V is great. I'd definitely recommend this game to everyone. Also, buy the expansions for more fun! Enjoy xD
CannedVan;-;This game has 10 out of 9 swags
Pellaeon;-;Civilization games keep getting better and better! Civilization V is the latest, and arguably the greatest in the series. Lots of leaders to pick from, and every expansion has added a lot of depth to the game. With several victory conditions and different civilizations with their own strengths and weaknesses to choose from, replayability is endless. Playing with friends in a FFA against AI's civs for hours at a time is also fun. Highly recommended if you're a turn-based strategy fan.
BeatMastaVee;-;If I a had a nickel for everytime I said "one more turn" I would have more than enough money to pay for the college I'm failing out of because of this game. 10/10 Would waste another 250 hours of my life.
theMadHatter;-;This game is just perfect, as a Total War veteran I was a bit put off by the lack of TW's real time combat. I thought that I'd loose interest in managing a single map, well I was wrong. This game is so amazing that even if they'd scrap the combat entirely I'd still love it. Being my first Civilization game I found it really easy to get into and enjoy, the expansions are great too, although I didn't have much time to play Brave New World yet. I wholeheartedly recommend this game to veteran strategy fans and newcomers to the genre alike.
jimpanrooney;-;They should replace history lessons with civilisation. You learn more history in this game than on a history lesson, so if you have a test in history don't study for it, play civ5. The best strategy and history game out there!
gief battlefront and fallout 4;-;Dwarved by the expectations of feature-hungry fans and a remarkably successful history, the Civilization series is one of the last bastions of traditional, turn-based 4X strategy games, perhaps acting as the sole major life support for an increasingly whittling genre. In retrospect, it is a game that initially failed on many fronts. Upon launch it was rightly heavily criticised for under-performing in many aspects that Civ 4 had proudly refined - trading, religion, and diplomacy, amongst others. However, with the addition of both expansions, "Brave New World" and "Gods and Kings", Civ 5 recovered most of the features it had lost or underdelivered on. Regardless, issues regarding bugs, illogical AI, poor performance, online connectivity issues and abusively priced DLC remain open wounds to this very day. Firaxis has now had 4 years to deal with at least some of the game's remaining problems, but have instead neglected them, preferring to focus on Civilization: Beyond Earth. Overlooking the aforementioned issues, however, will reveal a deep, rewarding, well paced game in which planning ahead is rewarded with the chance to steamroll enemy civilisations. Victories can be achieved either using culture, tourism, science, military force, or diplomacy, laying the groundwork for day-long matches that can twist and turn whilst simultaneously providing endless intrigue, machiavellian scheming and gargantuan military campaigns. Rushing to build the next World Wonder is often equally as thrilling as pillaging a hostile city's tiles whilst trading with allied civilisations for emergency gold supplies in order to purchase those last few bombers needed to take the heavily fortified city. Should you prefer to take a more Littlefinger-esque approach, spies can steal technology, manipulate voting and even provide political intrigue and military intelligence; embargoes can cripple trade-based economies; even international congress votes can be traded for luxuries, resoruces and cities. Allegiances are frequently earned and lost, ensuring the game is never predictable, and with the seemingly endless policies, technologies, units and ways to turn your initial settlers into a sprawling, international empire, Civilisation 5 provides plenty of replayability to be a staple of your gaming time for years. Just bare in mind that if you want to get the most out of the game, you will absolutely have to read its built-in wiki to make up for the needlessley steep learning curve and often infuriating lack of vital information.
Deadpool;-;''I will play a quick round of Civ'' After 16 hours:''where did the sun go?'' ez awzum brah 8.5/10 worth ur money
Element Zero;-;If you don't like going outside, you dislike having friends, and want to either be nuked by Ghandi and his legion of death robots or conquer the world as Ghandi, this is the game for you. If you want to rewrite history and lead Atilla and his Huns to religious dominance by founding Christianity as a peace-loving people, this is the game for you. If you want to find out what it'd be like if a civilization had discovered how to make rifles and tanks while everyone else on the planet is still waving pointy metal sticks at each other, this is the game for you. If none of these things apply to you, you're probably dead inside. And even then, this is still the game for you.
The Omniscient;-;im just gonna do a quick match -10 hours later- i cant feel my legs !!! 10/10 would chop off my legs
The Mountain That Rides;-;When I was a young lad attending school, a friend of mine approached me. He said "Hey do you play Civilization V?" Feeling insulted by the lower life form, I took a  on his chest, and began repeatedly punching him in the throat. As I did this, I came to the realization that I did not, in fact, play Civilization V. Seeking to correct this miscalculation, I walked to my house and purchased the game. After playing a few matches, I knew I was destined to be the Civilization V champion. What does this story mean, you ask? Well, it means that you may look at the screenshots of this game, and see some worthless crap, but if you purchase it you'll realize the true meaning of friendship. That  isn't meant to be plopped on someone's chest, but rather, in a toilet. So stop  on that gentlemen's torso. Put that  where it belongs, and purchase Civilization V. It's a pretty good game.
I hate the poor;-;Let me tell you a story of love, loss, and nuclear weaponry. I was young, the leader of the Roman Empire. This Empire stretched from Jerusalem, past Germany, and all the way down to Cape Town. . I had constructed the Great Wall, and I had over 30 ground units and 50 Naval Units. Needless to say, I was the most powerful player in the game. While exploring the rest of the Earth however, I met Catherine the Great, the leader of the Russian people. She was the most beautiful person I ever laid my eyes upon. Sadly, I couldn't understand her because she was, well, Russian. But I loved her, and I was determined to make this work. However, she got angry at me because I was too clingy. So I nuked her entire Empire. My dreams of a happy life had been lost, and I, Agustus Caeser, was angry with the world. Soon I went on a rampage, killing every unit, bombing every city, and conquering every Empire. Then my computer crashed. I forgot to save. I realized that I had been playing for forty five hours, and it was all for nothing. Within those forty five hours, I forgot to feed my dog. My mother (who was in the hospital) died. I missed the job interview for a job that would pay me $500,000 a year. Something flew through my window and layed eggs in my freezer. My house payment was due, and I skipped it. But then I realized: Doesn't Sid Meier's Civilization 5 have an auto save feature? And it turns out it auto saved right before my computer crashed. I went on about killing everyone, happily ever after. 10/10 like this if you cry everytime
kronotross;-;This is a game where you kick in the door to your cave and tell everyone to stop sucking their own  for a ing second so you can get some real  done, then you meet Genghis Khan or some other   and they ask for ALL YOUR ING WHALES WELL THEY'RE MY WHALES, GENGHIS, SO GET YOUR OWN ING WHALES. Once everyone pops their  out of their mouths and Genghis s off back home to build a thousand horses, you can tell your dudes to build  like ING ROADS and ING LIBRARIES and ING CIRCUSES and all other kinds of awesome  nobody had ever dreamed of before you. Then you tell them to build some in' thing like a giant statue of an awesome guy or balance some ing rocks together because everyone for the rest of ing time will remember that time that legendary king of men balanced some ing rocks together and just as you're about to unveil it SOME MOTHER ING  PIECE OF   ON THE OTHER SIDE OF THE ING WORLD FINISHES BALANCING SOME ING ROCKS TOGETHER AND EVERYONE REMEMBERS HIM FOREVER  YOU GHANDI. AND THEN YOU NUKE THE  OUT OF THOUSANDS OF YEARS IN THE FUTURE, NOW NOBODY HAS ANY ING ROCKS ARE YOU HAPPY, GHANDI? Eventually you will nuke the entire world or drown in horses and then you start a new game and eventually your brain tricks you into thinking you stopped playing and went back to work (but you never did, Robert, you're still playing Civ 5 right now WAKE UP WAKE UP WAKE UP WAK
Soviet Bear;-;Probably one of the best games that God has ever bestowed upon steam. Once you buy this, say goodbye to life,Your civ is you life now. I have played this for 15+ hours at a time just to fullfill the will of my favorite civ, the Austrian Empires. May Lord Gabens blessing be bestowed upon all civs. I give it 2/10 lennys jk 11/10 (   )
KryzBaconJerky;-;Current time: 9:00pm Me: "I think I'll just play this a little bit before bed, sweetie." Wife: "Ok I'll see you tomorrow." Me: "No! I promise it will be just a little while." Wife nods, retreating to the bedroom for the night to watch Netflix. I start a new game and begin playing. A few minutes later, I look at my clock to see if I should go to bed or not. Current time: 4:00am Me: "Ooops..."
JackTheChineseMonkey;-;Sid Meier's Civilzation V is great. Pros + Hundred hours of replayability + Great Mulitplayer game with friends + Good single player game also + Play from the ancient era to modern day + Several leaders + Great DLC Cons - Multiplayer can be buggy at times, making playing games difficult - Game is vastly improved with DLC, almost to a point of needing the DLC Overall I think this is a great game and you're missing out if you don't have it:)
Fecklesswaster;-;Sid Meier really is a crazy guy. he divided the world into hexagons to make this hexagon warfare simulator. peter molyneux must;ve rolled in his grave when he saw this. anyway, this is Civilization V which is a game where you have a city and then it expands and you steamroll other cities. it's more of a colonialism game but then only people who look back on colonialism fondly use the word "civilization". what bugs me here is that India's leader is Gandhi, so when i built loads of trebuchets and annexed Paris my brain literally exploded into tiny pieces because i couldnt comprehend it. either way, Gandhi's likeness is pretty well imagined here, much better than Ben Kingsley's weirdly long head. good hexagonal tessellation game
.:DD:. wormhog;-;If you are new to strategy games, I recommend this game. If you are not new to strategy games, I recommend this game. Basically, BUY THIS GAME AND STOP WASTING TIME!
Burdkailer;-;Next Turn..Next Turn..Yes , YES ! Just Another Turn , More Turns....... 100/10
Peeble;-;Just... One... More... Turn... Very fun, very addicting, very difficult, will take up all of your available free time.
Rafter14;-;Great game and responsible for many lost hours, highly reccommended.
Orbital [Panda];-;Don't start a game after lunch if you plan on sleeping that day. Five stars.
Aromatic Ooze;-;Top game
Dorsalis;-;Just incredible, this is my favorite game and would recommend it to anyone who likes strategy games
Darkanine;-;Play the game. Mod the game. Read guides on the game. Play the game some more. This has become one of my favorite games, if you love history or like strategy games (or both like me) than do yourself a favor and pick this game up! Pros +Good graphics, detailed leader-scenes. +Simple enough mechanics to grasp in a few hours, but complex enough to take a few hundred hours to master. I have nearly 600 hours and i'm still learning new stuff and mastering old stuff. +Good variety of (fairly balanced) civs. A lot of Civs have unique and fun play-styles like Venice only having 1 city but double trade routes, Polynesias incredible naval recon and warfare and Brazils amazing mod-game tourism output come to mind. +Good amount of history to learn, it's also made me look at other cultures (Hawaiian and plains-native americans) completely different and made me more interested in them. +Great mods, ever want to conquer North Korea as Beavis and Butthead? Or Patrick Star? You can do that! The modding community is not as awesome as Civ IVs but its still amazing. +Ximicacan! Ximicacan! Ximicacan! -Cons -Serious con: Vanilla Civ V isn't that great, the game becomes truly great with its expansion packs so try to buy the complete edition if you can! -Unit variety could use some major work. It just doesn't feel right using Polynesian trebuchets, Mayan Frigates and Zulu Crossbowmen etc. -Tech tree isn't quite as expansive as in Civ IV. -Some civs are just boring and uninteresting like America or Iroquois. -Game has made me neglect my other games...
Darkanine;-;Play the game. Mod the game. Read guides on the game. Play the game some more. This has become one of my favorite games, if you love history or like strategy games (or both like me) than do yourself a favor and pick this game up! Pros +Good graphics, detailed leader-scenes. +Simple enough mechanics to grasp in a few hours, but complex enough to take a few hundred hours to master. I have nearly 600 hours and i'm still learning new stuff and mastering old stuff. +Good variety of (fairly balanced) civs. A lot of Civs have unique and fun play-styles like Venice only having 1 city but double trade routes, Polynesias incredible naval recon and warfare and Brazils amazing mod-game tourism output come to mind. +Good amount of history to learn, it's also made me look at other cultures (Hawaiian and plains-native americans) completely different and made me more interested in them. +Great mods, ever want to conquer North Korea as Beavis and Butthead? Or Patrick Star? You can do that! The modding community is not as awesome as Civ IVs but its still amazing. +Ximicacan! Ximicacan! Ximicacan! -Cons -Serious con: Vanilla Civ V isn't that great, the game becomes truly great with its expansion packs so try to buy the complete edition if you can! -Unit variety could use some major work. It just doesn't feel right using Polynesian trebuchets, Mayan Frigates and Zulu Crossbowmen etc. -Tech tree isn't quite as expansive as in Civ IV. -Some civs are just boring and uninteresting like America or Iroquois. -Game has made me neglect my other games...
J McCoy;-;-> Alexander started hating me for being a friend to his enemies and then ended up denouncing me to the world -> After a few turns I had enough of his crap and took over every single city he owned -> A moment later I felt sort of "sorry" for him -> As a merciful ruler I gave him a tiny crappy city in the south pole of the world -> He was still flipping me off -> Destroyed his city and eliminated his units -> He was never seen or heard from ever again You could have just bought the game, but instead decided to waste your time on reading this unnecessary review. Thank you anyway :) 9/10 The best strategy game on steam.
El Kemosabe;-;This review is written from the perspective of someone playing with ALL DLC. Take control of one of the most successful nations in history as their most successful leader and lead your people to become the greatest nation the world has ever seen. Civ 5 is one of the most popular and well known turn-based strategy games available on Steam and it's there for a reason. With an unrivalled tech-tree, attention to detail and variety this game has something for all strategy fans. +Beautiful looking game +Complex Tech Tree +Challenging AI +Multiple paths to victory +Large variety of maps and game options, you'll never play the same game twice +Numerous Nations to choose from +Great modding community (especially for new maps) +Great fun with friends, but only at a similar skill level +Easy to learn, hard to master +/-A full match on normal difficulty takes upwards of five hours -Some Nations are clearly more powerful than others -It takes an incredibly long time to process computer turns when playing against a large number of nations in later stages of the game -Enemy Nations can very quickly overwhelm others and gain large amounts of land -The AI always have double standards especially when it comes to expanding borders on spying on one another Verdict: 9 An absolute must play for strategy fans. El K.
Tigris of Gaul;-;Definitely the most engaging strategy game I have ever played, but it is not for everyone. To start off with the cons: This game will take a couple hundred hours to learn to a decent level, and if you are considering buying it... do yourself a favor and buy at least the Brave New World DLC with it, or you will be missing about half of the game and will have to deal with an unnacceptably broken combat system. Also the multiplayer servers are extremely unreliable, it is very difficult to play out a full game with random players (if everyone in the game is your friend you can save the game regularly, and reinvite everyone when it crashes). Unlike most strategy games, Civilization V is much more than simply military confrontation/combat. Every player leads one of histories civilizations from the start of time, when military combat is limited to club warriors and ancient archers, and your empire consists of a single, small, undeveloped town, until the information era, by which time the players in the lead would have nuclear weaponry, modern armor, helicopter gunships, internet, and stealth fighters, and your civilization could have over a dozen cities, each up to 50 times larger than your original village. The success of your civilization depends not only on your battlefield prowess, although it is a necessary component, but in your ability to build your civilizations economy, science, and culture faster than your neighboring civilizations, and in keeping your civilizations population happy. A serious setback in any of these parameters will affect all of them, and will allow other civilizations in the game to bypass you, and eventually either destroy you or win peacefull through science, culture, or diplomacy. A major positive about the game, especially in singleplayer, is the diversity of the strategies you can use, with each particular civilzation usually suited only to one or two win conditions.
o0hairwitch0o;-;This is one of the few games that my fiance and I can play with our kids and know that not only will they learn strategy but they'll learn about the Art, Music, Engineering, Science etc with the game. Oh heck who am I kidding....my fiance and I are avid RPGers and we love the idea of conquering the world. :) Bottom line is it's really fun!!
sitruunatikkari13;-;The game has quite a few bugs but definitely one of my favourite games to play with friends.
break;-;Wanted to wait a while before writing a review...so let me start out by saying I highly recommend you add this game to your LIBRARY. This game does a great job of teaching you various ways of how to play the game. I won't spoil too much...but i will say keep an eye on your "real world" clock/time. You can lose 6 hours just casually playing this game...which i find a little troubling. If you are an adult with no children or house-mates...do remember to step away to eat and sleep. * Do try and remember these words *
Kelnahas;-;A Must have!!!
StableStahl;-;Probably one of the best games I've played. It has a lot of great mods to it, which lets me play as the Civilizations of my favorite TV shows/video games. At first I was a bit unsure on how good the game actually was, but after about an hour of playing it I got the hang of it and it has now become one of my favorite strategy games that I own. I do enjoy other strategy games, but I prefer this one the most. Now if you are thinking about getting this game, be warned that it is addicting. I have played hours upon hours of this game. After a while of playing you will say "One more turn. One more turn. One more turn." and eventually you'll get to about 100 or 200 extra turns. Is it just me there? Because that's what I do. But anyway, this is an amazing game and I suggest it to all my friends (one of my friends that doesn't enjoy strategy games too much even likes this one) and I suggest this to whoever is reading it. I give this game a 5/5.
Kamina;-;The best game out there if you want to feel like Hitler. 10/10 Great Hitler simulator.
maniac;-;If you've ever wondered what it would be like for the world to bow before the whip of Aztec tyranny then Sid Meier's Civilization V is for you.
Oatmeal Cookie;-;Addicting and fun. You can play countless hours without realising. Brave New World adds a ton of improvements. Never trust Gandhi.
nation164;-;I love this game. The amount of different senarios and possiblity is astounding and call for high replayability.
Bullet;-;Civilization, a series of computer games as synonymous with turn-based strategy as the old tabletop board game "Risk". I got to play the original Civilization in its hay-day on an old IBM using DOS to fire it up in wonder. The following seven nights were spent doing nothing but playing Civ, and Civilization 5 embodies nearly all of the same traits and innovations that made the original so great. I've spent a couple hundred hours last year in Civ5 with Gods & Kings and loved every minute. I recently purchased the newest expansion but haven't completely explored the additional game-mechanics much since even after this long, I'm still trying to master to base games mechanics and the religion that Gods and Kings introduced. But over-all, Civ5 is the turn-based strategy game to currently end all turn-based strategy games. If you've never played a Civilization game before, that's just fine, Civ5 can be a perfect introduction to turn-based strategy. Or if you've played all the previous games nearly to death like I have, this game will completely kick-down the door to almost everything you wanted from the other games. The hexagon tiles took a little bit of getting used to for me, but since its something I remember from the first big table-top games I ever played, I don't mind it at all and think it adds a bit of an old school feeling to the board. There are a few hang-ups in the animations / unit movements (aircraft orders need an over-haul because they drastically tie up your time in late game in comparison to any other unit) but other than that, graphically Civ5 is beautiful and the board features and resources are about as detailed and distinct as your computer can handle. The sound and music is immersive and high quality as you might expect from an A-list Sid Meier game. The interface and controls are almost perfect in my opinion. A couple data-charts are a little bit buried down through the menus, but I can't really complain about that since even "buried down" in the menus at worst only means 2 or 3 layers into readily accessible options anyway. So nothing is very far away. Testament to the games refined user interface, I think, would be the fact that many gamers have easily played Civ5 with a console-gaming style controller with the upcoming SteamBox "living-room PC." And that's definitely saying something substantial when talking about as complex a turn-based strategy game as Civ5. Ultimately, I'd say this would go on my Top 10 of all time. Definitely worth purchasing and supporting the developers who brought it to us.
LordofHunger;-;This game is great for replayability since every game is different, plus, Ghandi nuked me A++
Howar31;-;... Masterpiece! Just give me one more turn and I'll finish this review...
Opulent Omega;-;Economy was broke with science and culture stopped developing. Had to commit genocides to advance science and culture. 10/10 - Would genocide again.
Wildcat3605;-;Today i come with you to tell you about the very dangrous very evil Ghandi. Ghandi is a evil mastermind with a very aggressave nature. He will minipulate races to war he will nuke the world and not care if he dies in the prosess because he just wants you to die. If you see one of these nasty animal im sorry but you are to far gone. Do not try and make peace with this thing right when you think your safe he will do everything in his power to kill you and he will. Good luck with your citys young children and remember stay clear from Ghandi and do not interact with it or face the power of his mightyness. 11/10 Would nuke again. Goodbye,With much love to you and your people Wildcat.
Jetpacko;-;Lots of fun and challenge in one game. I had a great time with the basic game so I can only imagine how great this game is with dlc! My country was super badass and commoners loved me not to mention the annoying neigbring country kept trying to attack my border cities but failed every time! lol In the end there was no winner. Expect me.
Zoro-OF-MiLaN;-;Best Turn-Based Strategy Game of all time If you Start playing it you just can't stop turn it off this Game make really build a "Civilazation"
Swurps;-;The best turn based strategy game i've played in a while, but at first a little complicated.
Arnepus <3;-;I've never actually been attacked or hurt in any way by Gandhi.
Sir Jim Jam Slime;-;Love the game, just can't finish the reveiw yet. Im finishing off Ghandi with nukes.  15/10
scrubdrak666;-;10/10 gonna fail college because of it. worth.
Not A Threat;-;Like Skyrim but with hexagons.
Dabu;-;After an unplanned first play in a 8 hours, Dabu begins to realise that his journey to find true game may be coming to an end. This game fueled him with all things he looking from ideals, moral principles, religions (Dabuism is the BEST religion though), and political views, he soon discover a great deal about his feeling about this, and he know you should buy it. TWICE!!
MacCoy CTAC;-;Civilization V is a fantastic entry in the series, which avoids the trap of getting stagnant thanks to some important novelties on combat system, interface and general design, designed to create a 4X of elegant and clean mechanics.
Penguinz0;-;Sid Meiers's How many games can we start V
Mr. Needful;-;Between the original version, the Gods and Kings expansion, and now Brave new World, I've accumulated 500 hours of gameplay, and it doesn't look like that's stopping any time soon. By itself, Civ V is one of the best strategy games I've ever played; with the right mods (of which there are plenty), it becomes truly addictive. Generally, one of my biggest gripes with empire-building games is that your empire supports your military conquests. In CiV, your military supports your empire. I have maybe one game in ten where I'll initiate a war; most of the time, I'm way too busy creating the most dominant empire in the land. And it varies every time: right now I'm pushing a game where my religion covered half the globe; the game before that, my scientific accomplishments were second to none. Every game is different; if you play the same way every time, you're not going to get far. I can't emphasize enough how important it is to get both expansion packs. Gods and Kings was praised for adding the religion mechanic, but its primary benefit is a major revamp of the combat system and technology tree that makes both of them so much more neat and logical. Brave New World drastically alters both the culture and the diplomacy victories, and both are for the better, forcing you to put effort into those victories through the whole game. And get mods. I can't tell you which ones to get, but absolutely get some. As you play the game, you'll start to notice little things you wish it did differently. And 90% of the time, someone's already made a mod to fix that. I'm playing with over a dozen right now. Some make wonders more usable, some add more luxury resources or religions, one of them makes scouts usable past the medieval era and another removes the cap on XP you can get from barbarians, and a whole mess more. I've actually reached a point where I'm mixing and matching my mods based on what type of game I'm trying to run. This game will very likely become my #1 most played game, and pretty much the only thing that's going to stop me from accumulating 1,000 hours in it is Life. Put this game on your wishlist, pick up the expansion packs during steam sales, and get addicted.
lukeb4;-;A brilliant strategy game for those who want to sit down for half an hour or those that want to sit down for hours on end. Overall a really great game, great gameplay, great graphics, great everything. I would highly recommend this to anyone who is even remotely interested in strategy games.
Dingus Khan;-;Fantastic turn-based RPG. This game gets a ton of flak from traditional Civ fans, but the new interface creates a fresh new experience that you are just as likely to unwittingly spend hours playing. Modding community is terrific, and adds hundreds if not thousands of hours to this already immense game. Though I have 200+ hours logged, I have barely scratched the surface of content in this game.
reyrey;-;This is one of the best turn-based strategy games ever created. It's like chess on crack. 10/10
UNSC Marshy;-;Fun to play and fun to eat!
JUB JUB;-;With many games more and more emphasizing adrenaline-pumping action, playing a slower paced strategy game like Civilization can be refreshing. Indeed, Civilization V is the kind of game you can sit down, popcorn and soda in hand, and become completely engrossed in political crises, border tensions, and epic battles. While it may not train your reflexes or aiming abilities, you'll certainly find yourself performing insane feats of balance as you try to maintain your Civilization's military defense, culture, scientific advancement, religious development, and economic power. You'll find a game that is admittedly not immediately exciting, but which will involve the player in incredibly complex situations, never playing out the same way each time, always offering a new story. However, there are some valid criticisms worth considering. I will address two primary problems with the game that are connected to smaller issues others have brought up. Firstly, much depth and complexity present in Civilization IV has been stripped from the game, and it shows. In Civilization IV, leaders acted very often according to their historical personalities -- Gandhi would have an aversion to war, wheras Genghis Khan might be attracted to the possibility -- in Civ V, Gandhi will happily crush your entire country to seize your spice resources. The hostility and viciousness of the AI in Civ V, by contrast, detracts from the game's believability. Besides the hostility of the computer players, they are also gloriously stupid, they make insane trade offers, demand whole cities in wartime when they are losing, and capitulate in war when they have the advantage. As deep and involving as the game is, the AI manages to detract from the experience often enough to be worth mentioning. The second criticism worth considering is that too often it breaks the spell of depth and plays more like a strategy game. It IS a strategy game yes, but the game is also about civilization, and how complex and wonderfully intertesting human society can be, and sometimes the play to win mentality that is inherent in the game (especially it's AI) as well as many of the players can weaken the game's ability to absorb the player into the story of human civilization. Beyond these criticisms, the game presents itself well, the interface is much cleaner compared to previous iterations in the series, and the warfare much more interesting. In previous titles, units could be stacked on top of one another, so often the winning of wars came down to who had the most material power to build the biggest unit stacks. As a result of the removal of unit stacking, material power will help, but an ability to position units correctly and actually strategize will win you the battle even in the event you are outnumbered. Thus Civilization V may rightly boast of having the best combat and warfare the series has seen. However shallow the game can be at its' worst, it's intensely engaging and dramatic in the most positive sense at its' best -- every action that is simple or basic in one game is dramatically important in Civilization. For example, moving units close to another Civilization's borders, somewhat tedious and uninteresting at face value, raises the tension as you prepare for an epic war against their evil, imperialistic civilization. In the context of world civilizations, all actions become pronounced and important -- helping the game tell a story of warring global civilizations in crisis rather than simply telling the story of a competitive match between two players, each trying to win. That dramatic worldly context is what allows the game to tell such interesting new stories upon each playthrough and definitely what makes the game so incredibly addicting, involving, and engaging. Despite the admittedly valid criticisms, I couldn't possibly recommend this game more.
Zaggeta;-;For fans of the strategy genre, Civ 5 can probably be regarded as the Granddaddy of 4X. Pick a historical empire, build your civilisation in anyway you want and win in a variety of ways (from war to trade, to culture and science). Civ 5 is slow paced at the start but is one of the most engaging strategies on the market, with a simple interface meaning that you don't get bogged down by ugly text. Unlike many other strategies, Civ 5 seems simple - but is hard to master. And if you get bored, there are almost infinite number of user modifications available from the Workshop.
Qveni;-;This game is amazing. Pros: Graphics, gameplay, strategy!! Cons: By the time you look up from the screen half the day went by.
bruinb77;-;As an experienced Civ series player, Civ V had a rough start initially and was inferior to the expanded version of Civ IV. However, just as Civ IV progressed, so did Civ V through the years. This review reflects Civ V with the 2 expansions (Gods and Kings and Brave New World). Once again, we face the "Just one more turn" syndrome that this game has always provided. This 4x turn-based strategy game continues to evolve by enhancing the multiple victory conditions for the game. Many scenarios are available and the Steam Workshop for Civ now creates easily assessible mods for the game to increase replayability. The AI still makes strategic mistakes, but evens out a bit at the higher difficulty levels due to AI bonuses/player penalties, The end-game has greatly improved over previous iterations of the series due to the enhancements to diplomatic and cultural victory conditions. The replayability and replayability of Civ V is so good, that I will nitpick on a couple of areas for improvement (and mods are out that resovle this too). Those improvement areas are to make the different cultures even more unique (more unique looks between the cultures) and speeding up the preformance on huge maps. Otherwise, this Civ V with the DLCs is an excellent game that will take up just one more turn.
Diggen Pigeon;-;this game is a big bag of fun. its basicly like a board game, like chess or some other kind of board game. civ 5 is a strategy game and one of the best in my opinion and is deffenetly worth a buy [ps sorry if i spelled something wrong :P]
Yoke;-;The first Civ game I've played properly (tried demos and such with the older ones) Always been into stragedy and epic scale empire/war games, but always prefred the TotalWar series as it had the Turn-Based empire building and the Real-Time battles, I just assumed Civ games would bore me or I would miss the real battles to much, as like any of the big Turn based games (EuropaUniversals, CrusaderKings etc..) the battles in Civ's are just on the campaign map, and are the rock-paper-scissor unit V unit fights, always just imagined that as boring and would take away from the feeling of them being your units or being real flights. I was hella wrong. Theres a really nice feel and charm to watching your units fight it out, esp sending bombers to far away cities, or maybe a nuke. Sending some crossbowman to rain arrows down on bandits, or parachuting marines across Islands and so on.. The fights just taking place on the campaign maps also lets the game be extremely well polished as its just one genre/area to work on, unlike say the TotalWars which are real-time and turn-based in one, and leads to a jack of all trades but master of none, as we all know how janky the TW series is. Well Civ5 is the fecking master alright, Brilliant game and daftly addicting. Got it in Crimbo sale and I've not played much else since. Buy it, its in humble-bundle right now for silly cheap price. No excuses.
Bard;-;Great game but very adddictive.
HeyImJimmy5569;-;Great way to pass by weeks at a time.
Risk08;-;AMAZING. TOO GOOD TO EXPLAIN. FUDHKCEOIDJOEFNSIZLFKSUYBFHSFKUGADWYTFAUKYWGYDJBHSAVGDFTUWKFDGVASJDWTYFAKDGH
Mad'Tavi;-;Oh it's late ! Ok , one more turn and sleep time . Well... one more . And one more . That's it , final turn . This time for sure last turn . OK , i'm done , well... one more *4 hours later* -Help me ...
Based Willy;-;There are three dominant reasons why I recommend this game: 1. No micromanaging 50,000,000,000 things per turn later in the game, unlike other turn-based strategy games like Rome: Total War II. A lot of game mechanics are autonomous, making smooth turn-by-turn play. 2. Nicola Tesla is a Great Engineer in this game. He has done some great stuff for humanity, if you aren't aware. 3. There is a Game Of Thrones mod for this game. There are freakin' Game Of Thrones factions and characters in it. That is amazing. If you don't think it is amazing, go make love to your sister/brother/father/mother/aunt/uncle/nephew/etc. and then try to tell me with a straight face that it is not amazing.
Burn;-;The father of the 4X (eXplore, eXpand, eXploit and eXterminate) genre! Even to this day it's on of the top 10 most played games on Steam, rubbing shoulders with Skyrim and those popular online games. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=435265045
Cameron2135;-;Very Intresting (Totally only doing this for the badge)
[16e];-;Now, this is a story all about how My Game got flipped-turned upside down And I'd like to take a minute Just sit right there I'll tell you how I got nuked by a man , so unfair. In west America born and raised On the Earth map was where I spent most of my days Chillin' out maxin' relaxin' all dery And all shootin some b-barbs outside of the library When a Broken indian who was up to no good Started nuking around in my neighborhood I got in one little fight and my Advisor got scared She said 'You're makin' peace and giving up all your citys there.' I saved up for a nuke and when it came near Theit was really fresh and it had gandhi in the mirror If anything I could say that this nuke was OP But I thought 'Nah, forget it' - 'Yo, homes to Delhi!' I pulled up to the city in about 7 or 8 And I yelled to the Indian 'Yo homes smell ya later' I looked at my kingdom I was finally there To sit on my throne as the Prince of Civ 5
Donald Trump;-;I am disappointed that when you select Washington it isn't me.
Schwedy Balls;-;You know what free time is? WELL  WHAT YOU KNOW. YOU HAVE CIV 5 NOW.. ing noob. This game has taken more of my time than anything ever. This took so much time i could read the bible, AND THEN ING TRANSLATE IT TO YIDDISH. But, omg there is one thing. OMG there is no such feeling of satisfaction as when you rush all your troops, that you spent 5 years upgrading and making, and rushing one . One piece of  that makes hitler look like mother teresa. Thats right im talking about Gandhi. Oh that peaceful old indian ? whats your beef with him. IF U HAVE PLAYED CIV 5 U WILL KNOW. HE IS A BACKSTABBING , AND WHEN YOU FINALLY GET AROUND TO BURNING EVERY ONE OF HIS VILLAGES AND HE KEEPS SPAMMING YOU WITH PEACE INVOICES. THATS WHEN U KNOW. YOU HAVE ING WON LIFE. GO BUY A LOTTERY TICKET CUZ IF U MANAGE TO KILL THIS  BEFORE HE BACKSTABS YOU THEN U DESERVE TO GET YOUR  SUCKED BY MOSES.
jedi_timelord;-;This is the greatest game that has ever been made so that's cool. 10/10.
Higgsfamily09;-;Higgsfamily09 is a big fan of Civilization we got three four and five . This one has some problems but in all it a great game if you are new to the game get this one it is user friendley. Love all the new leaders and civilization this game has , the graphics are great. so do I recommend this game yes I do it is a great game fun to play the Multiplayer is easy to learn .
Berserker-Destroyer Of Worlds;-;say your gona play it for an hour play for 150
Wolf Drake;-;Say Goodbye To Tomorrow Have you ever had that feeling of "Wow, summer is nearly over?" or maybe "It's almost the end of the month already?" Prepare to have that feeling over and over again while playing the masterpiece of Civilization V. This is the kind of game that almost literally sucks you in and immerses you in it's gameplay. Few games have the ability to keep you so focused that you lose track of time completely. One beautiful aspect of Sid Meier's Civilization V is how the game presents win conditions. In many games today, you're only given one option to finish a job and that's usually the option of killing everything on the screen. That isn't the case with Civ V. While you can fight your way to the top, you can also get through the game using clever diplomacy. Maybe instead of diplomacy you'd rather develop your country's scientific endeavors to win the space race. You might be the kind of person who prefers art and culture, though, so you could also focus on that and become the most cultured civilization ever known. All of these options are completely valid for clearing the game. ...And you will be clearing the game quite often because the replay value is tremendous. I thankfully bought all of the DLC while it was on sale, but the DLC is some of the best I've seen. After going through the base game several times, the added content took all of the weaknesses of the original game and revamped them into wonderful strengths. Overall, Civilization V has incredible value and it's nearly guaranteed you'll be spending a few nights huddled near the glow of your monitor with a bowl of microwaved food.
razgriz017;-;Do NOT buy this game if you are impatience and does not have a lot of free time, this game is so addictive, 4 hrs just gone by, recommended for a long holiday gaming session, i'm totally hooked for this game, only work stopped me from playing this 24 hr
Luda Mrcina;-;One of the best if not THE BEST game in the world! Strongly recommended!
dudiU;-;Firstly and most importantly: I have never played a Civ game before. Secondly, the first time I sat down and played Civilization V, I played for almost 8 hours, consecutively. The game is THAT addictive, and I haven't had that kind of hook on a game for years. There are many ways to play and ultimately be the best civilization. The game might look unappealing and boring to some, but the game is really easy to understand, yet extremely deep at the same time. I'm mostly an FPS person, but this game is some of the most fun I've had playing a game, ever.
Ajmajike44;-;I absolutely love this game. If you like turn based strategy games, this is absolutely necessary to your virtual collection!
Neon.blu;-;I believe this game is great, but many would disagree... it's the marmite of gaming... up there with the well known Monopoly board game. It's massively time consuming, your friends will get angry if you keep asking them to play and you have to be a die-hard fan of this form of game to bear with it's tedious time consuming yet magnicificant piece of gaming masterpieces. But, it proves to me and many others as a shining beacon, of which pulls you away from the painful, dull and necessary work of life and into the gaping greatly lit tunnel of procrastination and determination. To those ready to Civ... I salute you.
Autopilot;-;I seriously CANNOT recommend this game enough. It's a strategy game, but not a normal one. This one is turn-based, and it does it extremely well. The game gives you that "just one more turn..." mentality and before you know it, you exit to desktop and 9 hours managed to pass by. I highly recommend it to anyone who owns a PC, as nobody should have trouble running it. Easily one of my most favorite games on Steam.
Higgsfamily09;-;Higgsfamily09 is a big fan of Civilization we got three four and five . This one has some problems but in all it a great game if you are new to the game get this one it is user friendley. Love all the new leaders and civilization this game has , the graphics are great. so do I recommend this game yes I do it is a great game fun to play the Multiplayer is easy to learn .
Tyrannosaurus Rekt;-;If this game were a potato, I would probably do things to that potato...
Storm Breaker;-;after playing for more hours than should be allowed i have to say i love this game.
ALic3 #Nan0;-;Played as Gandhi,ruled the world with nukes. So much for being a pacifist....
Marios;-;Due to the fact i haven't written any reviews for a long time, i feel it is about time i started again with this unanimously magnificent strategy title! What Civilization V constitues is the climax of a renowned series. To begin with ..it looks stunning and its world shines with beautiful and well designed environments. Futhermore when you start immersing yourself deeper inside its universe you will begin discovering more of its many virtues. Not only has this game one of the most sophisticated in-game mechanisms i have ever seen in a strategy title but also it can maintain your interest for years. Trying to offer a detailed insight into Civ V could easily make me write pages over pages though i don't want to become tiresome. Just keep in mind that this game needs patience in order to unfold all its features. On the whole i have no doubt that especially stategy friends are going to adore it!
Polish Dancer;-;Best Nuclear War Simulator out there. 9/11 would nuke again
Nic;-;I like this game a lot because it is cool. Buy it, yes.
Bloodi;-;Addicting.
CurryKingthe1st;-;Never trust ghandi in your game. That is all
ChocolateHeist;-;Its ok. 1111000/1111000
Ank;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a 4X turn-based strategy from 2K Games. Once you start playing this, you can't stop. Civilization V is just a good game. It has one more turn factor which makes you want to keep playing even when you already won. Sid Meier's Civilization V has very deep and challenging gameplay. You start from scratch with only a settler and a warrior, build your first capital city, then keep building up your nation/empire. From the dark age of 4000 BC, the dawn of human civilization to the modern globalization age of 2000 AD, you forge your empire from a single capital city and then expand and build more city, do research to strengthen your empire in all aspect, create military power for defense purpose or go on a global conquest, and manage your national economy, culture and diplomacy with other faction. Every unit can be leveled up just like an RPG games which make every unit is unique and count. You can even rename those unit when they level up to make them a little more personal. Choose your own path for your civilization, war, peace, culture, science, all will lead you to great victory. Sid Meier's Civilization V has good graphics quality overall. The maps are beautiful. Unit and city has quite good detail. The UI is also great, you can switch between tactical and world map view. This game is very great and addicting. Sometimes which is most of the times, even if you already won the game, you still continue playing it. I recommend this. Rating 9/10
Leo;-;got an A+ in world history thank u civ 5
Sean;-;The ability to rename Berlin to Snitzlestick and make it the holy city of Infectionism is incredible. - 10/10
Roeller;-;Ahhh Civ V... I've had you for about 6 months now, and in those 6 months I have gone bankrupt, gotten divorced, lost my job, lost my house, gained 60lbs and been diagnosed with diabetes, and its all because you make me play for 3 days straight. That being said, it has been the best 6 months of my life. 11/10, would Polder-Petra-Parthenon-Pachacuti again. *Disclaimer, I lost none of these things, and am a healthy human being. Buy the full edition though.
The Almighty Sandwich;-;5.PM Alright, lets play Civ 5!!! 9.AM The Next Day Just... one... more... flipping... turn...
Iroh;-;PC gamings equivalent of heroin.
ARTdrakon;-;Best strategy game existing.
AstuteClass;-;I'm finally getting around to playing this after yearning for so long. When it dropped in 2010, I couldn't play it on even medium settings as I tried out the demo. Well, being an all or nothing guy, I didn't want it until I had a PC capable of playing it at max. settings with no hiccups. That wasn't the only thing keeping me from the game, but the announcement of the new hexagonal grid and one military unit per tile rule, I was massively sceptical and honestly didn't think I would go for it. Well, after waiting 4 years and playing religiously for the past week after purchasing it, I can gladly say it's the best move the series has made. I cannot believe I never noticed how mundane stacking 20 units to a tile was, to easily vanquish the enemy without thought. Now, thinking and tactics come into play, and you have to know each unit's attributes, advantages and disadvantages, and suddenly the game series with extrordinary depth, just became that much deeper and more addictive. It's not without some faults, that even with the most recent patch after years of its release, still haven't been fixed. Like for instance, if you have no ground military unit in a city, good luck accessing your missiles and other air units. But these are minor and hardly take away from the yet another incredible addition (or should I say addiction?) to the franchise. 10/10, will rack up far more than the current 47 hours I've put into it, when all is said and done.
Demlwing;-;This game is the slowest and most painful rage(quit) that you'll ever experience in your life 10/10
SABINA;-;Favorite strategy game so far. Limitless options for conquest. Fully moddable.
Arcturian Auror;-;one of the greatest (strategy) games ever made... once you start, it's not easy to stop xp
TheIntimidatingPanda;-;This is the only game out there where it's O.K to dislike other nationalities for no particular reason, and where one more turn... WHAT?!?!?! I WAS GOING TO BUILD A CITY THERE!!!! Ok, Siam, prepare to feel the wrath of my legions right after I build some more ballistas...
Warden;-;There's no other game quite like it (even EU IV/CK). Has a lower learning curve in comparison, but it's still a sizable beast to conquer; there are lots of intricate mechanics and strategies you can find yourself learning hundreds of hours into the game. Oh, and it takes forever to finish a game even on Quick so if you're the impatient type, this game may not be for you unless you go Duel/Quick every game. MP is fun. AI becomes much too predictable, so introducing the unpredictability of human thinking into the equation naturally mixes things up. The team mechanics for Co-op are interesting at first, but besides sharing beakers for research, there really isn't much to it and you often end up fighting for things like wonders, land and city-states like any competitor would. Also, no achievements can be unlocked through MP (except the one...), which is mind-boggling. As someone who dislikes the AI, it is annoying having to jump back into SP to get the achievements I would otherwise have received through normal play. Balance wise, there are some aspects that could be improved; there are obviously superior wonders, civs, even resources (I'm looking at you, salt), as well as obviously inferior ones like Angkor Wat, Denmark and most of the plantation luxuries. Some units also have pretty crappy ugprade routes -- Pikeman, the most accessible and strongest Medieval melee unit suddenly becomes an at-best situational anti-cavalry Lancer, and the Crossbowman, also the most accessible and strongest Medieval ranged unit becomes a one range Gatling Gun. Range is huge in this game, so increasing the damage in compensation for the lost one tile of range is like cutting someone, then offering them a band-aid. Technical specifications wise, the graphics are a nice upgrade from IV (and for a game released in 2010, it's fair). Some of the music is pretty awesome, but they're easily forgettable and as I already listen to other music while I'm playing, turning off the music hasn't impacted me at all. All in all, a 9/10. I know most of my review has been negative, but anything not mentioned here, I generally endorse. These were some more pedantic gripes and very subjective, so as always, take everything with a massive mound of salt (those OP ers). P.S. Obligatory "One more turn..."
Suiren;-;Challenging with the focus not necessarily on war which is a nice change for a strategy game. Multiplayer can give you hours of fun.
FerrusPugnum;-;It is always fun to play but not alwaya easy to win!! The two major add ons make the game much more difficult and enjoyable. If on sale the game is a steal and will be for years to come even with new CIV's on the horizon,
yum.;-;The story of every Civ V player ever... Little Johnny (Age 12) has been playing Civilization V for the last three hours. 10:30 PM Little Johnny: " I'll go to bed after one more turn." 12:30 AM Little Johnny: "Just one more turn." 3:30 AM Little Johnny: " I'll go to bed after just one more turn." 7:00 AM Parents find Little Johnny dead, eyes glued to the screen and only two turns away from world domination. One more turn strikes again... 10/10
joaobigi;-;One of the best strategy games I've played in a long time... 10/10
Kappa;-;I paid 15$ and lost my soul. 10/10 would buy
anonym0;-;Conquer the world, outsmart the world, outculture the world....there are so many ways to play the game. Before I start I just wanted to say that it's a VERY slow game. It takes lots of hours to finish single games. This doesn't necessary mean anything bad, but a lot of people want quick paced games so just wanted to give a warning. You build your civilization from the bottom to the end, you make deals with your neighboring civs and conquer others or do whatever it takes to be the dominant civ. Build an empire! Pro: The god of replayability, tons of ways to play and win, beutiful graphics, decent AI with different personalities, gandhi Con: VERY time consuming, annoyingly slow loading screens If you are interested in the game, make sure to grab the DLCs/expansions aswell to make the game as fun as possible.
Nasarog;-;Finally, Civ 5 reaches it potential with the release of Brave New World (I had to play it for many hours to gauge it all). It is still missing one more expansion to finish fleshing the game out, but it's pretty good. I love the 1UPT mechanic, but despise the warmonger penalty. Overall I'm very satisfied with the game in this state. Plenty of fun scenarios if you buy the complete version of the game. Lots and lots of replayability at the higher difficult settings.
Feroco;-;Keeps me entertained for Hours. Sometimes I forget to eat.
Adolf Hitler was a naughty man;-;I love nuking aboriginals.
Gubsworth Gubington;-;Only in this game can Gahndi be named Gahndi the Conqerer
Fegledorf;-;I have no idea how to play this game At all, But I know one thing. This game is a masterpiece.
OptimusPixel;-;Ghandi with nukes. 10/10
SilentHawk9;-;Japan used music to make everyone wear their blue jean. 5/5 shilkworms recommend this game
Space Cadet;-;cuckold simulator my civilization was being fu*ked hard, and all i could do was watch
Classy Fella;-;10/10 can't stop hitting that next round button, addictive as
Fherrera #afk for while;-;its like skyrim with napoleon and washington
[kabrk] Woodbin;-;After playing vanilla, Gods and Kings and finally spending 50 hours on Brave New World, I can finally review this. I was VERY sceptical about CivV. After CivIV, I thought it couldn't be better, and when I first saw CivV, I decided to stick to IV. The vanilla game is....unfinished. There are features missing you'd find in other civ games in the base game, like religion. With Gods and Kings, the game finally becomes playable and is somewhat good. But after buying Brave New World, I can finally say this game is worth it. With all the features it gives you, CivV is a great 4x strategy game offering countless hours of fun. Damn, with all the DLCs and expansions, i can't even say which is better, IV or V. Compared to previous civilization games, I have to mention the new features like Social Policies and Ideologies and caravans, which are great and work really well. Civ V is also much easier to get into for new players than previous Civ games. City states are a new feature as well. Being friends with them brings you various benefits, but you can play the bad guy as well and annex the hell out of them. Religion is very well made. You practically make your own - select symbol, name it and select perks which give you various bonuses. You can also reform it later and add more perks. Despite my initial doubts, the change from squares to hexes helped the game to feel more vivid. Changes to war unit system (no more multiple military units on one field) make the war more strategical and you can actually change the balance of power in the late game (unlike in CivIV where war in late game meant stalemate no matter how much units you pumped in) . I love how the culture is remade. It not only expands your cities but you also buy social policies with it. And what's more, with BNW you also generate tourism which can culturally influence other civilizations and take them over. In short: if you like 4X strategies, get the complete edition of CivV. It's totally worth it. Pros: Looks good With BNW, it's a true successor of Civ series City states, social policies and all other new features are very well made and fit together very well It's so good it's a timesinker. Cons: AI turns take long to compute Could be better optimized (but no stuttering or lags, rather textures unloading and reloading etc.) Mods not working in multiplayer (although they should according to their description) It's so good it's a timesinker.
[BANK] GameAddictPenguin;-;Civilization V is the newest installment in the series and is perfect for someone new to it such as myself. From what I have seen, Civ5 seems much more suitable for newcomers, with a less overly complicated UI and overall gameplay. It's not too simple though as 70+ hours in, I'm still using new tactics by using new aspects of the game to reach my goal. This is THE BEST strategy game I have ever played and without potentially 100s of hours of content with dozens of civs, maps, randomization, mods and more, this is a game I would recommend for ANYONE, strategy fan or not. Easily a 10/10, a gem of a game.
Purple Monkey;-;Kiss your social life goodbye. You'll be telling everyone. "Nope, playing Civ" for the next year.
Donkey;-;Best get nuked by Ghandi simulator ever 10/10 will beat him next time
Lordzap;-;Sid Meier's and his team have out done themselves with Civ 5. They have successfully created a game that I believe to be one of the greatest strategy games of all time. From it's beautiful designed map to its incredible well layed out and detailed UI, the game is almost flawless. In Civ 5 you have a range of empires to pick from and options that allow you to change map layout, size and much more. Once you begin you will start with small city set 4000 years BC from here you build up that city and create others over time as they grow you will be jumping from technology to technology beginning with simple techs like pottery and ending in the future with a space race and giant machines. With little to complain about and so much to be positive about this game is a must have for fans of the strategy genre.
ooga_booga;-;Wasted 2 whole days playing it while keeping myself buzzed with brisk 7.8/10, too much water BRISK
[PLS] Mr.Frie Frie;-;China asked me for peace and they would give me gold every turn. 10 turns later the deal left and they attacked me. I killed all of China. 5 turns later I found Russia. I asked Russia for peace. Russia turned me down. I killed all of Russia. 50 turns later I found America. I asked America for 1 gold so I would be peaceful to them. They denied. I attacked America. 10/10 Would destroy full nations again.
SohirToZorio;-;Civilization 5, a game that made me feel irate and hate a lot of nations. This is a game about building a kingdom and acquiring fame, or in my case fear because I always ran in from the rear and torched the enemies buildings, where upon I was quickly botched and murdered while me mate john watched. It certainly requires tactics, which fills my gaping cassum of desires like a big bottle of cider. This type of gameplay is simple and soothing like a plane pilot before screaming mayday, at least at first before you're cursed and find yourself coerced into huge wars that go on longer than my drinking at any bars. With multiples nations that don't have much hesitation, one awkward gaze and you'll be bashed into a haze by five of the loons, when you're just armed with a pair of spoons. But with some mates in sight things became alright at least while they survive, sometimes they wouldn't be alive long. The blood thirsty nations flood you with all the troops they can spare in large scoops, all because you have the kingdom that is up roaring in applause, or you made the mistake to rake one of the smaller nations for their creations that everyone hated and requested to be berated anyhow. No such thing as peace, in this huge game of chess that you are at cease with 1 piece on the board of the many stored that are civilizations that resulted in nothing but huge cremations. If you make nice and not threaten anyone, but before you're beaten they'll practically speak some random squeak and before anything can be prepared, you see it pop up "WAR HAS BEEN DECLARED." But don't worry with technologies at hand, aided by the religious doxologies from downloadable content, that adds a congress that is not flawless. The leaders gang in times where I'd prefer them to hold a revolver to my head with a loud bang. Unless you're rich and not stuck looking like a dip switch, you have not many delegates from a few city states to aid you because you got in heated debates to embargo you or not. With friends of course in the end it is fun, just sometimes extremely laggy but seemly unnoticed when the turns take longer everyone gets stronger, each person having a massive army which makes the enemy become quite barmy, moving them all sometimes lasts until next fall, but we never cared because we shared each others help while hearing the enemy yelp, while the staffing got left to clean up the mess we were laughing and heading to the next target that'd inevitably have a bloody carpet. Otherwise can recommend.
Michael Rosen;-;This game is absolutley amazing! Every part of this game from the combat to the diplomacy feels polished and superb. I would recomend getting the $50 complete civ package because it adds many new features to the game and is worth every penny.
General Pie;-;Getting wrecked by Ghandi, 10/10
Svirt;-;This game have entertained me for many hours. Because of number of steam achievments you have always something to achieve and when you get bored you can always starts new harder game where you will be really busy to keep up with AI which you can beat in different ways - getting science, domination, cultural, time or diplomatical victory. Another really impressive thing is multiplayer option which thanks to turn-based game system is really interesting and well designed. Beat your friends and let's see who is tough dictator, good diplomat or sophisticated ruler. ARO! Civilization V 8/10 Gods and Kings 8/10 Brave new Wolrd 9/10
Dodak;-;Good strategy for long hours - New plot every game. You may choose the way to win and lead your civilization.
Ibitsu;-;Wow so good what a strategies so many cities to make, lots kinds of people, simply amaze in what to do in it like Vikings. so many ways to win like 5. slow to start but so addict. nice graphic. units cant stack like boxes, no staring contest ever again which are annoying. so much dimploatic relationship. So Empire Wow.
(SL) Swiftflight;-;Addicting...
Sir Umi-Chan of 's;-;Just... one...more...turn... $#*% its 3 Am.
Sesaero;-;One of the classic fps games of the 21st century. With the single player rivaling the outstanding storytelling and plot of Call of Duty: Ghosts, the experience provided by this game can be found no where else. The mutiplayer is a journey that you will never forget, from getting your first quickscope, to losing your virginity to some kids mom, you will never stop playing this game. To sum up this review, if this sounds like it's for you, then please, leave the internet now. 4.83906/5 lakes
Thrown;-;If you want to have sex with Queen Latifa this is the game for you. Not only can you command like 2 people at once you can also have sex with like 8 grandmas, and thats not including the ones with . I like this game because one time when I was a kid I was molested by my dad. This is the best star trek game out there!
c3;-;This game is remarkable. Get this instead of the garbage that is Beyond Earth. For those unfamiliar with this series, you pick a great civilization from history (Rome, China, Aztecs, England, ETC) and start with a single city. From there you will be playing for hours and hours (as games take a very long time, and it's fun as hell) exploring, making allies and enemies with the other civilizations, going to war, making more cities, managing resources to fuel your conquest, and racing against the other players in an attempt to win the game. Winning the game can be complex, as there are several ways to win. You can win by destroying the other civs through war, win scientifically by making it into space, culturally with social policies, or diplomatically with the united nations. The game is very dynamic, not a single playthrough is at all similiar with another, leading to great fun that never tires. The pros? Too many to list. The game is beautifully structured and well thought out. The cons? Buggy AI, but not really an issue. Point is, rather reading this wordy review you should be buying this game, with all the expansion packs. I cannot praise this game enough.
Shady;-;America was founded around 5000 BC. Germany built the Pentagon. Ethiopia built the Manhattan project. Russia has a Democracy. France nuked England. England built the Notre Dame. Stonehenge was buit by Demark (Vikings) Islam was founded in China! 9/10 Great strategy game. Actually teaches you about history as well as government and lets you rewrite history. But bots = stupid, and expanding = unhappiness? I'm sorry but that doesn't make much sense the only thing I can gather is population but other than that it's . You found a city and lose, on average, 4 happiness that makes zero sense. Although I guess our citizens are just up tight s who want to live in a crowded zone BUT THEY'RE  ABOUT THAT TOO! Good job. Anyhow back to the positives. For the price I bought the gold edition ($12.50) I would say this game is worth that. Now do I recommend buying this at $60? No, I recommend you buy it around $0-40. The game has great mechanics and very well polished. The Sid Meier's series almost never disappoints so if you're looking for a good strategy game, this is for you
Arual;-;Civilization V would be a very good game if it were not for the shoddy multiplayer and the money grubbing DLC practice. Firstly, the average multiplayer match freezes and crashes. Even if you have less than four players in your match, you will still crash frequently. Multiplayer is not designed well on this game, there are too many gamebreaking glitches to name of which can only be done in multiplayer games. This is because the developers did not pay much attention to polishing this portion of the game, since they seem to have been very busy releasing the 15 (!) pieces of DLC which were made for this game. This DLC has only divided the very tiny multiplayer community further because it can be hard to find a match of people who have the same DLC as you. The singleplayer is where this game shines, the developers obviously spent a huge amount of time polishing this portion of the game, and this is what gives it replay value. You can easily spend six hours on a single game of Civilization V and still want to play more. There are a few balance problems however these are relatively small. Overall Civilization V is my favorite game despite some of the game's shortcomings.
Dan;-;Just... Just one more turn...
*AlexWasHere*;-;+ Hours of addictive turn-based glee + Fantastic new tactical combat system + Excellent interface makes it easy to keep track of every aspect of the game + Great automation features allow you to focus on the big picture + Lovely visuals and classical soundtrack - A.I too aggresssive - Limited Policies - Might be too complex for some strategy fans
rayhawk;-;Firaxis games live and die by their expansions, amd Civ V is no exception. The base game feels dumbed-down to appeal to a mass-market boardgaming crowd, and the Gods and Kings expansion adds tacked-on variety but still no depth - systems have no meaningful interaction with each other, and any one decision or strategy feels as good as another, without any lasting consequence. The Brave New World DLC, on the other handm finally gives Civ V the depth you expect from a Civ game, with elegantly interacting system mechanics throughout and actions you take in the Stone Age still delivering payoffs thousands of years later. With Brave New World, Civ V turns from an unfocused and unengaging flop into a must-play strategy title.
Oregono;-;Do you like stategy games? Do you like board games? Well then look no further, friend. Welcome home. Civilization's 5th iteration is a great entry in this franchise and is addictive as it is fun. Prepare to loose many hours. Some may tell you this one is a weaker game than 4 or not worth playing without all the DLC. I am not really in that group. I had a lot of fun with the vanilla game. The expansions add depth to mid and late game stages and provide more options for victory, along with new civilizations (each which has its own perks). If you have even a mild itch for strategy games then press buy. Also note this game is VERY moddable - all supported by steam workshop. Which couldnt be easier to use.
Bagpuss;-;I want to start off by saying this is a fantastic game, but I think it is worth noting a few flaws to go alongside the many positives which this game has to offer, and reading this review will hopefully help you in deciding whether it worth picking up a copy. So first the pros: This game has an ability like no other game i've played apart from AoE 2 to make time fly, one moment it's 4pm and before you know it you're hunched over besides your computer and it's 11pm, and you still haven't done your maths paper for the day after. The background for music for each Civ is a nice addition, which allows for each Civ to feel unique beyond their colour scheme and unique building,Unit(s) and ability so as you play them the melody keeps things interesting. The gane looks great and is formatted nicely so everything is clean and easy to access, and you rarely feel overpowered by an overabundance of numbers. And now for some cons While at first and religion feels fresh and interesting, as the game advances it quickly becomes a chore even with its increased importance for any deity or cultural victory thanks to BNW. Relgion I found to be much more interesting online vs other human players, as they are likely to suffer from the same boredom you do and makes spreading your religion seem much more meaningful fun as a result. I found myself sometimes being frustrated with a lack of some of the diplomacy tools the Ai have, such as the ability to call you out if you have troops surronding their border, and I hope that for Civ 6 the ai is smarter so this artificial difficulty does not need to be added. My final issue with this game is the lack of balance you find in the policy trees, and games can become stale as you do the same optimal opening strategy over and over, now while you can go for a piety start it is rarely worth it unless you're trolling your friends online, or have some incredibly situational strategy. So all in all I think this is a great game for any pc gamer to pick up, and the flaws I mentioned only really become a issue when you've played as many hours as I have, so what are you waiting for go pick yourself up a copy now!
Exile;-;Honestly, Civ could very well be one of the best strategy games I've played (though I'm more a fan of the RTS type stuff, if I'm being completely honest). Picked this up randomly due to a friend talking about the previous one, and although the early game is a bit dull and repetitive, it's well worth the time invested. Multiplayer is amazing, giving you more than the stereotypical "kill your enemy by purchasing units" approach that C&C and Stronghold went with; however, that rush attack is still a really viable strategy for the warmongers like myself. ^.^ as much as I've fallen in love with Civ, its diverse victory conditions, and its generally good gameplay, it falls a bit flat for me at points. The graphics will sometimes bug out randomly, though rarely enough to "break" the game. Also, if you're playing offline against computers, you may as well go solely for domination or a quick cultural victory, as diplomacy is non-existent. AI will attack you after you give them trades, return units, and declare friendships, which takes away from the overall experience - so play either hotseat mode with a couple friends or find a few players in the community online to play with if you want to get the most out of it. Prepare for a long game, as Civ can last quite some time. The learning curve isn't so bad, but it's not a jump in and play game for sure - you really need to get the nuances down and read the tooltips that say what things can do (fortunately, the advisors aren't half bad at keeping you posted). All in all, worth the purchase, so go ahead, pick this game up, and see if your civilization can withstand the test of time. Pros: -Awesome gameplay; can win through multiple methods -Graphics are typically good (barring some random sporadic glitches) -Not a steep learning curve - you can get the basics in one or two games tops -Has a hotseat mode for a more "old-school" multiplayer approach (big deal if you have no internet, or want to play with people who don't own the game -Tons of options to change the game as you please (no barbarians, victory types, etc.) -Lot of modded content for those looking to spice the game up Cons: -AI is frustrating; other leaders will go from allied to at war in a matter of seconds for no real reason -Loading times can be long with multiple players -Graphics can bug out at times -Could use a little more variety across the board (just my opinion) -Montezuma. (Go play a round against him, and you'll get that.)
Ragnosos 11/07 - 24/07;-;this game is amazing, must buy for all PC gamers 9.5/10, very enjoyable, great for multiplayer
Stargazer;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a magnificent turned-based strategy game. You select a civilization, start a city, and build your empire in many ways. Unlike some strategy games, Civilization V can be won in more than one way. These victories are: Cultural, Scientific, Diplomatic, Time and Domination. With the several different types of victory, this in turn shapes how you play the game, giving way to some unique strategies. While the base game may not come with nearly as much content as it would with the two expansion packs, it's still sufficient enough to have lots of fun with. It would be in your BEST interest to get one, or both, of the expansion packs for Civilization V. They add much new content, ranging from civilizations to changing some aspects of gameplay (i.e traderoutes in Brave New World) I find myself playing for hours on end, even if I play the game on quick. There's no shortage of gameplay here, and you'll always be coming back for just that one extra turn. The modding community. It exists. It's great. Always an added bonus to any game: modding support, and a large modding community. As you may have noticed in the Tools section of the Steam Library, Civilization V comes with its own SDK (Source Development Kit) to assist you in making mods and maps. Maps are very simple to make, and modifying the games XML format files requires merely a text editor. XML is a fairly simple data storing language, and can be modified quite easily. If you decide to get more into modifying the game and get lost, there are many guides online to help you through your journey. I whole heartedly recommend getting Sid Meier's Civilization V for yourself, especially when on sale. It's a bargain you can't beat. ***There are some minor setbacks to the gameplay, such as experiencing slightly elongated waiting periods after pressing the next turn button during the late-game period. This may or may not be because of my older hardware (going on 7 years), and more often then not doesn't show up at all. ***I've not been experiencing any elongated waiting periods as of approximately July 2014. I currently run the game on maximum settings at 1920 x 1080 resolution.
Takahashi Wakana;-;I'll tell you what: DON'T BUY IT BECAUSE IT IS TOO AWESOME TO SPEND ALL YOUR ENTIRE LIFE PLAYING IT. The new BNW DLC add a lots of good content and made this Civ5 not only a military-grind game but a more strategic game. You can play it for fun in the prince difficulty and you can challenge yourself in high level difficulties. And it did made me felt challenging, and I cant memorized how much summer class I absented because of it (hahahahaha In a word, this is a very good game. All you need to care is thinking about how to control yourself to stop playing this damn thing.
Jarl Borg;-;Awesome strategy game, one of the best I've played so far. First, when I entered the game, I was quite confused with bunch of options, but after a while, things had more sense. The game was made perfectly, with no errors at all, for both, Singleplayer and Multiplayer. Battles, science, culture, wonders, religions, maps, characters, bonuses, expansions, all of them are harmonized magnificently. Playing with friends is exciting, 6 hours marathon escalates quickly. At the end, just one more info, I've been playing Civ5 for almost 7 months and even now, I feel no boredom while playing :) 10/10
EzraFitch;-;Just .... one.... more....turn....
Rock Soap;-;Civilised is hardly what this game is. When Ghandi finds nuclear weapons he becomes more war-crazy than any enemy ever written in the Metal Gear Universe!
Takahashi Wakana;-;I'll tell you what: DON'T BUY IT BECAUSE IT IS TOO AWESOME TO SPEND ALL YOUR ENTIRE LIFE PLAYING IT. The new BNW DLC add a lots of good content and made this Civ5 not only a military-grind game but a more strategic game. You can play it for fun in the prince difficulty and you can challenge yourself in high level difficulties. And it did made me felt challenging, and I cant memorized how much summer class I absented because of it (hahahahaha In a word, this is a very good game. All you need to care is thinking about how to control yourself to stop playing this damn thing.
Jarl Borg;-;Awesome strategy game, one of the best I've played so far. First, when I entered the game, I was quite confused with bunch of options, but after a while, things had more sense. The game was made perfectly, with no errors at all, for both, Singleplayer and Multiplayer. Battles, science, culture, wonders, religions, maps, characters, bonuses, expansions, all of them are harmonized magnificently. Playing with friends is exciting, 6 hours marathon escalates quickly. At the end, just one more info, I've been playing Civ5 for almost 7 months and even now, I feel no boredom while playing :) 10/10
Rome;-;Great single player. No one game is ever the same! #swag #hoes #rapetrain
~Thjttkriime;-;Just played through a quick game of civ V with brave new world. The late game  was alot better i was actually having fun post industrialization. I guess you could say sid meier finnally fixed this game. its fun now to play through a whole game. I reccomend getting this game and the 2 expansions. Also the dlc looks cool but i have yet to explore much of it as i set this game aside for a long while because it seemed unbalanced.
Zoto;-;Do not buy this game. Seriously. And that's not meant as a bad thing. Once you start playing this game it will just suck up all your free time. It is way too addicting. If you have lots of free time,this game is a must!
Little Caesars' Pepperoni Pizza;-;I'm two years old and I watch the Yogscast play this game. That obviously means this game is good.
EzraFitch;-;Just .... one.... more....turn....
NTs_Ultimate;-;Buy Complete Pack on sale = WORTH EVERY PENNY!
Clockwork Angel;-;Trusted Gandhi once... Now, every time I play the objective is to nuke Gandhi, before he nukes me. I'd say that's 60 hours well spent. 10/10
Iysava;-;Quick summary of the game: build a nation from the ancient era to the present day. WARNING, never play this game at night. You will keep telling yourself this, "just one more turn, and then I'll go to bed." Well that turn could turn into 20 turns and before you know it, 3 hrs have passed. Seriously, this is a brilliant game for anyone who likes Risk. Every playthrough is dynamic and awesome. Also, there is a wide variety of civilizations to choose from. Though each civilization is simile, they have different unique units that are a ton of fun to control. In addition, each civ leader speaks in their native language. Now thats some impressive research! Something that may be a problem is that even though now the AI (in Brave New world) has been tuned down a bit (they were too agressive in the earliar DLCs like Gods & Kings) and probably won't provoke you into unnescessary war , it feels they are too passive as no bot provokes you anymore except when you deliberately do so. When the main content gets boring, the comunity has done some great mods that keep the experience ongoing such as maybe a new civilization or a new map design like Middle Earth from Lord of the Rings. In conclusion, I recomend this game highly for anyone who is a big fan of history.
Greasy_Mike;-;Where to begin? Oh yes! Two words: ing Gandhi! I r8 8/8 m8 would carpet bomb Babylon for stealing my Great Library again. In other words m80s, this is the dankest game you'll ever play. If you don't buy this game, I'll slap your mum.
Wasseo;-;I built the Roman Empire it only took me a Day to conqure the world, from 6am-9pm, no food and i peed in a cup because  whoever said Rome wasnt built in a day.
Mangamuffins101;-;Have you ever sat down and thought how cool it would be to run an empire? well in this game you can!
Asuna-chan;-;So in the year 1506 a great man was born. A man whose shrewd negotiation and aggressive business making him the first multimillionaire in human history. He was born in the capital of the Greeceantium empire, Constantinipple. There he started with his roomate Stevios Woznackios and in their garage they created the first apple computer. Then several years later and after he made his multimillion dollar technological empire he was imployed by the Greeceintine government and "moved shop" to their vassal at the time, Mogadishu, and release his new line of "iPads" to the Somalian populous to improve relations between the Somalians and Greeceintines for an easier transition for annexation in the future. 10/10 would be historically accurate again
Jhogan98;-;This is how Tony Abbot got his primeminister training. 10/10
Hound;-;if there is one game on the market that lets you devastate indians on a grand scale, its this one 10/10 would nuke vijayanagara again rip in pepperoni gandhi
Aragottix;-;You can choose to play one of many civilizations to play, each with its own unique unit and building, you can make your own maps with World Builder, its simply awesome! Gameplay is easy to figure out, lots of fun with managing production, income, trade, and your military. Though there are some issues with multiplayer, like major lag and crashing and constant game sync screens... realy annoying.
sonk20;-;This game saved my life from having to revise for exams. 10/10
Ozymandible;-;I played for 956 hours. I guess I liked it.
ChAoTic_MaYhEm;-;In Sid Meier's Civilzation V you can play as one of the many historical nations of the world from both past, and present. From there you build, expand, make war, make deals, adopt policies, and research. Lastly maintaining your economy, and the overall happiness of your citizens. You can also play as a mod civilzation. Some like Sparta for example, Vlad the Impaler, The Three Kingdoms of Ancient China. And also play on player created maps ranging from the Elder Scrolls series to Game of Thrones. And also with online. You can play with your friends and/or other players. But be warn if you make any save during that match it is highly wise you know the people first. Last thing you want is an epic matching occuring and then suddenly the player no longer shows up after a day or two. There are many things to do in this game from customizing your match playstyle both online and on singleplayer. Plus testing your skills in scenario modes. Another cool thing as well is the animations in the dipolmatic menu when dealing with other leaders. Although if you don't have a hig rig PC it is wise to turn that off completely. And don't play for too long. In my personal experience with this game it is always wise to have the autosave saving at least around 3 turns you make. A slight problem with this game is the AI. Sometimes they make really odd choices, Like for example, instead of surrending. They fight it out till the end. Or if you take down HALF of their cities and embargo their civilzation from making trade. Instead of making peace and trying to find comproise they will still act like idiots and still wage war. Even on the lowest setting as i find out. Also be warn as well, if you play this game on higher diffculty, my advice? take your time, and plan everything out. If you don't plan very well you will be crushed. At this point it is wise to get ALL of the DLC since the majority of the mods rely on them. Other than that, I recommend this game.
Spartan;-;Had a 2,000 year war with Germany just cause they wanted my second city, and when they finally allowed me to negotiate peace everyone else started hating them. skip ahead 2,000 more years the second war with germany has begun, hopefully it will end it all - 10/10 would fight wars again
Rozlovsky;-;Its like a chicken
mostly nice;-;Throughly enjoying this one - I'ts not a total war game yet offers a new type of world domination approach. Main objective is to either out science your enemies, defeat on the battlefield, annex or raise thier cities or go diplomatic and ghandi the crap out of everyone with world peace. Building the effiel tower in Hastings, England & having nuclear subs sink ye olde Austrian pirate boats really will give you a feeling no other game can. Likewise, building nukes and dropping them on your enemies from carriers in the ocean, then moving your workers in to scrub the fallout brings new joy to your fingertips. The game is workshop compatible, and the mod community is thriving with new ones to keep you buzzing and the game fresh. That said there is an unholy number of maps, factions, leaders and civilizations to build, destroy, conquer and make your .
Skerzos;-;Very good game, reached Perfect with the Expansions. Must buy! Very addictive!
Mr. White;-;Civilization 5 is a great game, it is the first turn based strategy game that i have bought. I have had many hours of fun, either in singleplayer or in multiplayer, although the graphics for the game are not brilliant (good if you haven't spent lots of money on your PC) it still captures you into emersive game play. The game at first can seem complicated and hard but you quickly learn how to effectively play the game and win a game, this may not seem to be impressive f you haven't played Civilization 5, but trust me when you have played you will know what i mean. If you have a lot of time on your hands or even little this is a good game for you because you can alter the game speed to suit you, from the fastest been "quick" (they put a lot of effort into the name) and the slowest been "marathon" (seems they got someone more creative to think of that name). The me can take a long time on "standard" speed, but is does all depend on what difficulty you go for as Civilization 5 gives you a range of options like the other Civilizations depending on if you want to become leader of the world through violence and tyranny turning all the other "Civs" against you, a "domination victory". Then on the other hand you can be peaceful and gain friendship with the "civs", gaining a "technological victory" or a "cultural victory". These are just some of the "victory's" you can achieve. The "technological victory" is one of the hardest to achieve as basicaly it means be the first to get to "Alpha Centauri", which is another planet far far away, so of course this means building a space ship. The "domination victory" is very clear (through the word "domination") just control the capital of every other "Civ" in the game, as a warning though other "Civs" do not think very highly of someone who attacks other "Civs" so they will attack you (only if you attack a few of them). The "cultural victory" is one of the hardest victory's to get, this is because it takes a long time and you need to play as the right "Civ" that is got traits that gain them extra culture. A good "civ" to play as is "Napoleon" because he gains culture from "chateau's". The game has a lot of DLC's, but luckily for you if you are considering getting Civilization 5 they have stopped making DLC's and are making Cilization 6 (this may sound like Civ 6 is coming out soon but no one knows) so steam have made it so for 34.99 you get Civilization 5 and all 11 DLC's including "BNW" (Brave New World) and GAK (Gods And Kings). this is a very good deal considering individualy it cost 78.35, so it is better than half priceand the DLC's make the game SOOOO much better its worth every penny. For a game where there is so much you can do either in muliplayer or in singleplayer giving you many hours of fun it is worth getting, i HIGHLY reccomend this game.
DirtyHarry07;-;A really fun game to play, used to play this on the xbox (the xbox version) which I used to play all the time when I could or had time, I highly recommend this game to you all if you like long endurance games, where you start of with a group of settlers and grow your empire to be the strongest and rule the world.
rune;-;This game is such a huge waste of time, you start playing it and next thing you know, a whole week has passed and you've grown a beard and have poostains all over you. I wouldn't want to waste my time any other way. I'm currently sat in hospital for not eating or drinking for a whole week while playing this game but it was worth it. It's my turn now so I must go, I would write more but Gandhi is currently launching nukes at my cities.
Crazher;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is the kind of game that almost anyone can get into, even if you are a diehard FPS player, you will likely find some amusement in this game. Civilization V offers a vast variety of ways to play the game, ranging from a campaign-esque scenario mode, to custom games where you pick and choose your opponents (and possibly allies), what kind of map you will be fighting for, and what you will need to do, to win. Do you want to conquer the world? Get a giant earth map, add a dozen or two opponents and fight for world domination! Do you want to start your own religion and watch it spread across the globe like a true pandemic? Well start one, send off your missionaries and start an inquisition, you will be Supreme Pope of Your-Cult-Name-Here soon! Do you want to play out historical battles throughout the history? Well, not much else to be said than: you can! Some people might enjoy setting the difficulty setting all the way down, and steamrolling their opponents; others might do the opposite and try for the challenge of beating the game with a severe handicap. Playstyle plays a huge part in how you will enjoy Civ5, but once you start a map, it is as if it will never end. The multiplayer aspect of the game has both upsides and downsides, when playing with others you need to coordidnate who does what, and it can trim parts of the game from your own experience (as in, you have to share certain wonders, it is not beneficial to have multiple religions and it will suck fighting for superiority). Beyond that, it can be great divvying up an opponents land between you and your friend, for example. Get Civilization V. It is definitely one of my all-time favorites. /One more turn.
TheForest;-;i play as pocatello cause i cant play like a decent human being 10/10
Origibro the Nalaholic;-;Just buy it and thank me later.
Vladimir Putin;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V Positives: + This is an in-depth, turn based strategy game. It features a massive technology tree for the ancient, classical, medieval, renaissance, industrial, modern and future eras. Conduct research to unlock new buildings and units. + Multiple victory styles to suit your own gameplay goals. Aim for world domination, or try for a cultural victory by constructing world wonders and acquiring great works of music, writing and art. Build the first spacecraft through the Apollo program to win a science victory. + Lots of units available for each era, ranging from archers and cavalry to giant death robots and XCOM specialist squads. + There's a well fleshed out system for city development and unit recruiting, whereby you need to balance your productive output with your food and gold output. For your empire to be successful, you need to work the land with citizens appropriately. The more food you have, the faster your town grows, but this usually comes at the expense of production, resulting in longer building times. + This is the ultimate empire building game. Workers can construct roads between cities, and later on railways. They can erect plantations on exotic goods like wine and sugar or ensure resources like stone and gold are extracted with mines. Settlers can found a city in faraway countries. + DLC adds a lot of new features, like religion and tourism, which impacts the game a fair bit and makes it more interesting. + Battles with enemies seems boring at first, but soon you realise that it's much more intricate. The positioning of your troops, the type of unit, the terrain you're on and unit capabilities directly affect your damage or defensive rating. So, battles become quite intriguing. + Multiplayer co-op! Negatives: - Stupid diplomacy system which doesn't make much sense. There's several faults here. You can be allied to another civilization for thousands of years (renewing the friendship agreement when it expires), but the simplest of transgressions results in them "denouncing" you. For example, in one of my games, my spy successfully stole technology without being detected. But somehow, the AI knows that you've taken this research, and threatens me. Very unrealistic. When you denounce them in return, they're suddenly "hostile" and then attack soon after. There doesn't seem to be any complex formula governing diplomacy, it's so simplistic. The AI doesn't take into account your previous good standing with them or mutual objectives. It doesn't recognise your past support for them in wars and trading doesn't seem to have much positive diplomatic influence or effect. This really ruins a core part of the game. - AI can be overly aggressive on normal difficulty and above. It always seems as if it's scripted and the AI has decided to target you. Even if you take the initiative early on and conquer another civilization, there's another ready to invade you. This happened on multiple occassions to me. It would be fine if there was some logical reason behind their attacks, or if other civilizations experienced the same struggles. But it's not like that at all. Overall Score: 8.0/10 Sid Meier's Civilization V is a grand strategy game filled with many hours of content. It can be really, really fun, but also quite unrealistic at the same time. The game has many pros and only a few cons. I suggest buying Civilization V - Gold Edition, which is cheap and has most DLC included, along with the Gods and Kings expansion. The only package which isn't included is Brave New World, but that's not necessary to enjoy the game.
Javious;-;Just one more turn.....
Woody Bobo;-;Sid Meier's Civilization Gameplay: 9.0 Graphics: 9 Music: 9.5 Interface and Control: 9 Rating: 9
Vault 1 1 1;-;Ive just bought the game, and now its 3:48 AM, thats lovely.
Lawl Master;-;How about yes.
Phane;-;i like to play the ottomans cuz he has a funny hat
ShineMYShoes;-;Civ 5 is one of the best strategy games I have ever played. There are tons of scenarios to play if you are into those. Most of the play time for many people is playing against AI. You can choose from multiple difficulties to play on. The harder the diffuculty the more the AI have the advantage. Civ 5 has tons of civilizations to play as each with their own unique advantages. I would say the best part of Civ 5 is during the medieval and Industrial time periods. These are times where I have the most fun at. The reason I don't really like the modern era is becuase the game usually feels drawn out and boring by that time. But if you go to your game options and start the game during the medieval era then the modern era will feel a lot more fun. Overall Civ 5 is a really fun game and has an endless play time to it. I would recommend Civ 5 to anyone even if you are not into stategy games.
knd27;-;this game has everything history-lover need, from arabs to russians, every and each awesome historical nations, (no, gotham isn't included)... if you didnt find youre grandparents past no problem!, there's this awesome ppl who work hard at the WorkShop, they provide us with free dlc, and other cool stuff.... at the end of my speach i really do recommend this game! 99\10
MANIA;-;Even with all DLCs, the game still feels simple in comparison to previous version. Yet an enjoyable "one-more-turn" game.
SpunkyGuy;-;This game is so MUCH FUN!! I bought it before 4 days and i got 23 hours on this 0_0. Just play as your country then destroy everyone :D. I love when other leaders want to kill me but they are too scared to :D. I recommend you to play as arabia it is the beast :). This my first review.
Grim.;-;Built Taj Mahal , Pyramids Of Giza , Eiffel Tower in New York . (10/10)
Mendozacheers;-;"Just One more Turn!" is Civilizations unofficial motto, anyone who played the game and enjoyed it will understand. Known as the biggest turn-based strategy game today with it's rather unique hexagon tiled playfield, Civilization has entertained many throughout it's lifespan - myself included. I used to play a bunch load of Civilization III as a kid and Civilization V has done a wonderful job of replacing that for the past 4 years. Back in the days, turn-based strategy games were pretty common but today it feels like most games are real-time. Turn-based means you take turns to make your move rather than everyone making them at the same time, like in every traditional board game. Evidently Sid Meier's Civilization V is the fifth game in the series and it has really just gotten better and better by every game, the core mechanics are always there but with some variation between each game. The fanbase is rather scattered when it comes to agreeing on the best Civilization game, a lot of people still prefer Civ IV, personally I love Civ III a lot but Civ V takes the prize. The main problem with Civilization V when it came was the lack of content compared to what Civ IV already had. Today, 4 years later, tons of DLCs and 2 expansions have been released for the game and it finally has more content than it's predecessor. The game is about to create, reign and fulfill a civilization throughout hundreds of years and overcome the obstacles alongside, either online or vs computers. Explore, expand, exploit and exterminate - 4X - is the best way to describe the typical steps when playing a game of Civilization. Explore is for the first section of the game, where you settle your first city and scout the surounding area for resources or opponents. Expand is when your small settlement becomes several, either through settling another one or through conquest. Exploit is the description of diplomacy, treaties, spionage and rigging elections to make your cause the ultimate. Exterminate is pretty obvious, if diplomacy or expantion does not work, take the matter by the sword (or the nuclear warhead). There are 4 way of winning and becoming the master civilization; Cultural, Diplomatic, Scientific and by Domination. Along those victory types are also paths for your civilization to easier obtain said victories. For example; you could focus your empire on trade and become a superpower through riches. Essentially buying votes for a diplomatic victory, units for domination or technology for science. You could also be the founder of a religion and slowly but steadily gain your trust from the people of other civilizations that way. I was hoping to see a pure Economical and Religious victory condition, but sadly there are none. It feels like I have done pretty much everything in Civilization V since it's release but I still get really tempted to get back in there, and just let the hours disappear. Suddenly you sit there, 5 AM in the morning and be like "What the hell just happened? I am not 12 anymore, I have a f*cking job!". I remember when I used to plan my next move during bathroom breaks, I couldn't even think of something else for 5 minutes! "Just One more Turn!" I am really looking forward to Civilization VI and Civilization: Beyond Earth. I recommend Civilization V for everyone, not just strategy fans but everyone interested in having control and making decisions for an imaginary empire. Or if you just have a lot of time to spend, I ensure you that you won't be disappointed.
Dried Monkey;-;Civilization V is an amazing turn based strategy game in which the goal is to rule the world through battle, culture, science, or diplomacy. The new hexagonal grid tiles allow for much more interesting gameplay than the previous games in the series. The game allows the player to choose from a variety real civilizations, each with their own unique perk, unit, and building. While this game features multiplayer capabilities, the games take a very long time to complete, and take more than most people are willing to invest in a single session. If you do have a lot of free time, it can be very satisfying to dominate the world with or against friends. I'd very highly recommend this game, particularily in conjunction with its downloadable content and expansions.
Nami;-;Great game, I reccomend having patience if you are going to buy this game, A beautiful strategy game of "What-if". For example, what if The Great Wall Of China was made by America? (The Great Wall Of America) Well, that's possible! Watch yourself holding history in your hands and bending it to your will! 10/10 GREAT GAME! :D
HeartBurnX;-;Civilization V is by far one of the best Civilization Games I have ever played. The game takes awhile to play through both online and offline but rewards the player with both a sense of progression as the ages unlock and the technology advances. Also the game has multiple ways to win and even if you feel your in the lead in science, a friend can come out of nowhere and hit you with a culture vicotry so you have to not only be productive towards your victory goal but also monitoring all the other victory types to make sure no other civilization completes it before you. I would highly recommend buying the complete pack when it's on sale, so you dont have to worry about dlc issues and not having a civilization that an opposing player wants to play as. The game requires all active players to have the dlc in order to play against eachother and use a dlc civilization so be aware of this if you debating between the base game and it's expansions or the complete pack with all dlc. Hope you enjoy Civilization as my as I do and can't wait for Civilization: Beyond Earth to come out :)...
Vargen;-;Being a strategy game, it is one of my all time favourite games of all time. After the hours I have played, I have become hooked, and can't stop playing. Good Things: The gameplay is fun, You have so many things you can go into, but being the obvious, science, and domination are the main two things to go fourth to. I like that if your computer can not handle the full graphics of the game, or you just want to have a faster, and better view so you can see the resources around you, you can always switch to the "Strategic View" (Pressing F10). Bad Things: It is very TIME CONSUMING, Yet addicting. The amount of time it takes to complete a full game, requires you to play with friends most of the time, and not random people, so you can always save and go back to it any time you want to.
JimbabProductions;-;Love this game... I myself am a huge fan of the Civ series
Angusthedead;-;Civilization V, let me just start with this, is an amazing game. Coming from a vetran of the older games, i was at first scared to try the "new stuff". But once i got into Civ V, i never looked back (Btw Civ III is like a rage game, try it at your own risk) Here are my Pros and Cons. Pros: Crisp Clean modern graphics that still follows the look of a civilization game. The leaders' animations and looks are outstanding. No unit stacking. First i frowned at this but began to love it. In previous civ games, cirtain battles felt like my stack vs the other guy's stack of units which felt sloppy in a since in retrospec. Combat takes strategy now, not numbers. Advanced Diplomacy and City States. Diplomacy in the origional Civ V is meh, but Gods & Kings and Brave New World fix that easily. City states makes the world feel more alive, even if your on an island by yourself, a city state there gives it life. Diplomatic victory is just as entertaining, if not more, than a domination victory. The political struggles to hold delegates and get your proposals passed is a blast, and Cultural Victory with the Tourism (BNW) is very very thought provoking. The Add mod feature Encourages its fanbase to be creative with making fun senarios. (PC Master Race ftw) ~probably so much more pros that i can't think of atm so ill stop here. ~ Cons: The only Cons i can come to think of is... Happiness. Until you get an ideology or of the like, your happiness seems a real challenge to keep up, expecially in a war game. (But yet again i play on Prince, on lower difficulties this isnt a problem) Warmongering. Most AI seem very quick to neclect trading and deals with you if they suspect you of a warmongerer. I go to war with france with the persians and take no cities and the arabians are denouncing me already. If you resonably go to war for a cause THEY are responsible for, you become the "joseph stallin" of the world. My only complaint would be to tone this down a little. Other than that this game is a blast. Like the addict i am, ive played over 1k hours of this game, so i hope this helps. 10/10 would restart account and get achevements again.
Stormbird 1104;-;Addictive, fun and strategic. A great game to play with friends and alone. Managed to pick up the complete edition for 8. A great bargain but it's worth about 20. If you like strategy games get this game! 9/10
Boss Pimp;-;Made me neglect my girlfriend, job, and friends for a solid 2 weeks. Totally worth it. Also, Gandhi is my homie. 8/8
McDodley [SrslyWithTheHype];-;I was gonna stop playing, but then I didn't, and I just kept on no stopping playing... Yeah, I have a problem.
Ginger Beard;-;Nuke other great powers as the aztecs and have the same workers for the past 10 thousand years.
Espresso;-;Review for Civilization V with Gods and Kings/Brave New World, November 2013: Civilization V may have gotten off to a rocky start. The streamlined interface, and the removal of staples such as unit stacking were a bit of a shock, and the feeling was different. With patching and updates, however, Civilization V has grown into its own game that stands apart from its predecessors. I won't say it's better than previous games. I won't say the historic immersion is the same (although Brave New World goes a long way to making that come back). So unfortunately, coming into Civ V after playing a previous Civ game will feel awkward and possibly unsatisfying, but this is a game that rewards you with the time you put into it, it gets better as you play it. What remains missing however, is the diplomacy. The expansions have done a lot to repair the broken diplomacy system, and it works much better than before, but there remains a lack of choices for the player. Many systems from previous games, such as spying, tech stealing, and religion, have been restored magnificently to the game in the expansions, but remain missing from the base version. With Brave New World, a lot of the community feels that the game is now on par with the previous game, Civilization IV: Beyond The Sword. I'm not sure I agree, but it certainly is a close call. Civilization V is far less tedious than Civ IV, but still not as immersive. Most of the complaints about Civilization V come from older players, familiar with older Civ games, but Civilization V is a great starting point for the series and strategy games in general. Compared to similar games like Europa Universalis, or even Civilization IV, Civilization V is very easy to learn and has an intuitive interface and adjustable difficulty. Even on higher difficulty, the game features unobtrusive advice which you can choose to follow. No matter if you're a newcomer or a Civ-veteran, Civ V still has the infamous "One more turn" addictiveness this series is known for. And overall, this is my favorite game on Steam currently, and I often have recommended it to people. It's an all-around great game. ----- Original recommendation, June 2012: This is not the most satisfying Civilization game. It may be one of the most fun, however. The classic game is still there, streamlined and reengineered so that less time is spent micromanaging, and more time is spent planning your conquest of the world. The graphics are the best of any Civ game so far, and there are many gameplay surprises that keep you replaying and trying out new things. It is becoming one of my all-time favorites.
Bacchus;-;This game is a masterpiece. Go Buy It.
Juuzou Suzuya;-;Holy cats. Where do I start. If you have never played any of the Civilization games, you are in for a bumpy ride. Once you get the hang of it, though, nothing can stop you. This game is amzing. 9.99/10/ 4.99/5. Whatever. It's awesome. It's like Risk on steroids. But good steroids. Like the kind Barrry Bonds used. Except not. You know what I mean. The DLC makes it even better. The addittion of faith, religions, trade routes, and ing VENICE makes it awesome. I highly reccomend this game. TLDR; OHMYGODOHMYGODOHMYGODBUYBUYBUYBUY
Praetorian Emeritus;-;Amazing game, even better when you play with friends. "Just Pure Class" - TSG
Tuco Salamanca;-;My first game ended at 12 hours ... 10/10 would play again
<TJoL>Cartwheels;-;Probably the best strategy game to approach with a group of friends with the intention of partaking in a saga of epic battles and journeys to conquest, and probably the best strategy game that amounts to simply flubbing around with your friends in merely a matter of minutes. Games are rather slow even on the fast game settings (stay away from 'Epic' if you value your lifespan,) and playing with that one guy that always takes at least 5 minutes to finish his turn can be very much agonising (think five player chess wait times.) The payoff however, more than makes up for it. The feeling of carrying your army across the continent to royally screw over your friend who you were suppossedly 'allied' with is like none other, as is launching a nuke at every neighbouring country and bribing Chengis Khan to mount an attack at the Vatican. Rounds may take a few hours, but you'll be talking about them for the next week. Fans of the previous Civ games may however be a little disappointed with this edition as it seems a few majorly awesome mechanics have been removed (along with with a whole bunch of not so awesome mechanics.) Even religions are nowhere to be found within Vanilla but thankfully both Brave New World and Gods and Kings restore all that was missing to make Civ V as great as its predecessors. Between some fantastic DLC and Steam Workshop functionality (YOU CAN PLAY AS CTHULU IN THE WORLD OF TAMRIEL AND FOUND PASTAFASTARIANISM) Civ may not be a 'perfect' game to please all but it's certainly as close as it gets in terms of Civilisation.
Burnedsausage;-;For all time strategy fans this gme is a must buy. The flawless take on a turn by turn strategy franchise makes the game not only stand out against it's competitors in the industry but also allows the game to boast it's golden reputation and show off its most impressive new features. While there are a few unbalanced things in the game such as how a millitary victory is much easier to achive than other means, the game still manages to get that tone between being complicated enough for veterans of the series and welcoming to newcomers. the change from squares to hexagons is a bold one, but yet again maxis an their brilliant team have done it again. like i just mentioned, the game has changed to hexagons rather than stayed at squares and the game surely flexes it's muscles, but you probably knew that already, what you really want to know is what have Maxis done to the Civilazation series. Did they break it? After all the series has never seen such a huge overhall before and it's assuming the title from a game thats earned it's golden reputation. Well im not going to make your mind up for you old veterans of the franchise but civilization's 5 blows each competitor out of the water one by one. EVERY animation in the game has been redone, the AI is much smarter (though that still dosent make them smart) and the diplomacy pannel while it may be lacking in many ways compared to games like Crusader kings, it is a massive improvement. For more on civilization 5, and boy is there a lot more, buy the game on steam now. This game really has shown us what companies can do when given unlimated time and money (look at gta 5) and lastly this game it appears will stand the test of time...
[CoTM]andribasi;-;A massively addicting strategy turn-based game. Really recommend it!
Mista J;-;Nuked Japan and killed Jews using Germany. Best game ever 10/10
Diavarus;-;xxx: Is everything alright with your internet? yyy: Yea, I have fiber connection. User "yyy" disconnected from the game. User "yyy" reconnected to the game. User "yyy" disconnected from the game.
Kalifornia Royal;-;Civilization 5 has gotten me fired, made my girlfriend report me missing, and destroyed my social life. I really wish i was joking 10/10 with expansions
lumi;-;Finaly works on len00x, windoze is finish
Big Jack;-;The current pinnacle of Firaxis' Civ building genre. Highly recommended, especially with both expansions for a complete experience.
Diablo;-;Great game. Love how they have city states and all. I also like all the modded maps and civs etc.
Lord Sipia;-;You there! Are you able to steer every part of a budding nation to greatness? Do you want to squabble with other nations over resources like bananas and uranium? Are you able to deal with Montezuma declaring war with you every fifteen turns or so? Can you stop that scheming  Gandhi from nuking you to extinction? If you answered "Yes" to all, or at least most of these questions, then you should try out Civilization V. You won't be disappointed. I haven't played the other Civilization games, so I'm not sure how they compete, but this game is certainly friendly to newcomers to the series. The game is very intuitive and helps you keep the game moving by pointing out what you still need to do this turn before letting you move on to the next- no more checking every unit and every city six times like in the Total War games! The game offers several options for victory- you can simply kill 'em all, you can send a spaceship to Alpha Centauri to prove your technological dominance, you can make your civilisation the cultural center of the world, or you can win through diplomacy by earning votes in the United Nations (that is, as soon as you build it! Yes, YOU!). There's several ways in which your civilization has to compete with their rivals- there's luxury resources scattered across the map which are vital in keeping your empire happy, there's strategic resources which are required to build certain units and buildings (factories require coal, for instance), there's city states which will favor the most helpful (or most generous) civilization and grant them the earlier-mentioned resources, and of course, there's the everlasting race to keep your economy and military up to par with the other players. Each player is outfitted with a unique AI, but you can also choose to randomize them to keep the game unpredictable. All in all, this game offers more strategies than countable. What do you research first? Where do you send your new citizen to work? Where are you going to settle your new city? How many cities do you need for your plan for world domination, anyway? Will you build a wall to defend yourself or a library to speed up your research? And so on. TL;DR version: Plenty of tactics to be found here. If you like turn-based strategy games, this one's for you.
Kamgusta;-;Overhelming Holy Master of Strategy! [KAMGUSTA's REVIEW] I always tried to play Civilization but the outdated graphics and the 2D squared tiles never managed to catch my interest. With Civilization V they finally introduced hexagonal tiles and a rich 3D world, so I grabbed the Gods & Kings expansion and gave it a try! At first the game is overhelming with informations and details, but it will take you hand by hand and introduce all the mechanics step by step. After 30 hours and 493 turns I finished my first play and I was able to manage almost everything. This game is simply GARGANTUOUS. There are TONS of things to do and manage. There are dozens of leaders each one with its strenghts and weaknesses. There are 5 different ways of winning a game and you can customize the map in even the smallest detail! There are also premade scenaries, steamworks support and a very populated multiplayer! Simply WOW! Just three advices: 1. Do not read the tips and tricks or they will ruin your fun showing the best strategies (there aren't so much so knowing these may lower your fun of trying new ways to beat the other civilizations). 2. Buy the expansions, these are not money-sucker DLCs but they really improve the base game. 3. Always keep an eye on the clock: I started playing it at 23.00 and I left the game at 6.00 with conquered cities, allies, powerful armies and... frozen legs! It sucked 7 hours of my life without me realizing! Best played with Keyboard and Mouse Recommended Buy Price < 50$ Score 9/10
VAC Banned Pussy;-;If you lost this in HB sales, you lost your gaming world. Basically I ask to myself why they did not included the BNW Expansion, but... No matter, still be the best strategy game I ever played. I had to make a choose, at 3am, my bed or CiV, and... I miss my bed.
Atlas;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V really changed my opinion about strategy simulation games. This game is very diverse and no two games are alike. You start out as a civilization with one city and you slowly build your way up to be the dominator, the diplomatic leader, or the first to finish the Space Race. Not only all this but it is historically accurate!
Rossaluss;-;I was so convinced I wouldn't like this. How wrong I was :(
Citizen Insane;-;"Ghandi has completed the Manhattan Project!" NO NO NO NO
haitagan;-;I grew up playing the first Civilization... I didn't play any other game in the series until Civilization V. I wasn't surprised how much it evolved - it has been 20 years since the first Civ after all. But was amazed by how much of the good stuff I remembered stayed basicaly the same. I haven't played it enough to be sure yet, but this game might be the best strategy game ever. The only flaw is that it will eat up all your time.
Nyxaffinity;-;Probably one of my most played games, It never gets old and a great one if you're an acheivement hunter! Amazing strategy game full of different outcomes and variety of ways to win.
Fear;-;Civilization 5 Pros: Turn based strategy, City building, 5 ways to win, large quantity of nations. Cons: Errors, AI Issues Great replay value: One thing Civilization 5 does great is make the game so fun you don't want to quit. You won't want to go to bed, do homework, take a much needed shower or go to work. The truth about this game is that it makes you want to keep playing, you will think to yourself, its 11:30 I need to go to bed, then think i'll be alright one more turn then im done, next time you look at that clock its 5:44 and I have class in three hours. City builder: Something that I love about Civilization 5 is the city building aspect of the game being able to customize what each city produces or specialize that city can give you a huge advantage over your opponents. If you want your city to be able to produce tons of troops or want it to be a mecca for scientific advancement you have the ability to customize, you can make any city what you want or need it to be. Winning: With any game that is a city builder there are many ways to win. My personal favorite is to conquer the world, crushing armies. The feeling when an enemy player comes to you and offers everything they have to save their capital, is the best feeling in the world! Other ways of winning are being the first person to build the space station, or having a culture that influences other nations. One of the hardest victories to achieve is the diplomatic victory, you need to have the rest of the world like you enough to elect you to world leader. Errors/ AI issues: My biggest complaint about this game is the errors that still exist after four years. I wouldnt say its game breaking but very annoying when you have spend five to seven hours and are close to the end game when the game crashes. Then to combine this issue the AI needs to be reworked to make smarter decisions while at war. The AI will continue to suicide units into cities when they could easily take the cities by using archers or other ranged units to weaken the city. Price: Best thing about Civ 5 is that the price. You get a great game that gives you hours if not years of gameplay. Even tho it has been out since 2010 its well worth the asking price, on steam you can pick this game up for $30 or get the complete edition for $40. The complete edition comes with more civs and two expansion packs that add a lot of new gameplay features and just builds on an amazing game!
Kim Jong Wen;-;It is DOPE
tcookc;-;probably the best turn-based strategy game. it is engrossing and deep - a must play for anyone who's ever enjoyed a strategy game. + hundreds of hours worth of challenging playtime + best combat system of any Civ game yet + you might accidently learn a thing or two - bot AI in co-op multiplayer is broken :( score = 4.5/5
Umbra;-;Only play if avaliable to play for more than 10 hours, otherwise don't bother buying.
BaconBoi23;-;Civ 5. Where can I start? Civ 5 is one of those games with everything. Amazing Graphics, In depth gameplay, astounding soundtrack, and a variety of different characters with personalities of their own. I would reccomend this to a friend, definitley. It is definitley worth the money. Can not stop playing. Literally. It is becoming a problem..
iruns;-;Love this game but be careful one minute you're playing at 10pm next thing you know its 5am, trust me it happens very addictive.
the_dan_meister;-;Warning!!! This game is ridiculously addictive! I bought this game a while back and never really had a chance to sit down and give it my full attention but when I did decide to do so I was glued to my seat. A playthrough that I originally thought would last a half hour quickly become a 13 hour marathon and after many defeats ( being a noob) I still felt like going back for more, each time being rewarded for my persistence by learning or discovering something new about this wonderful game. If you haven't bought this already, What are you waiting for?
OVDU;-;1) Buy it! 2) Never press Next Turn! P.S. Dont  with Gandhi!
Mr.Sandman;-;It is Civilization, the most popular and well known Turn-Based Strategy game of all time. This version is still as good as the older versions when you have all the expansions. I would recommend you get the "Gold" or "Complete" version of this one. The new hex tiles add an interesting level of strategy to the game. No longer can you have a one tile army taking over countless cities. Instead you have to plan ahead with artillery (ranged) units in the back, infantry in the front and cavalry on the sides. This one is definatly worth getting. Replayability is high, you will have countless hours of fun.
Squints_a_lot;-;Just look at the amount of time reviewers have spent playing this game... Yeah, it's that good. As other reviewers have mentioned, the game is newb-friendly. I was brand new to the Civ franchise, but thanks to the advisor system in the game, I was able to pick up the basics very quickly. After you've started feeling comfortable, or if you are not a newb in the first place, those advisors can easily be turned off in the options. This is a fantastic strategy game that will keeping you thinking for hours... Even when you're not playing! The gameplay is rich, deep and complex. I've spent over 400 hours with this game, and I still notice new things and consider different strategies. I started playing games on Warlord difficulty level (3 of 8), and I've advanced enough that I feel pretty confident on Emperor now (6 of 8). I recommend watching some Deity-level Let's Plays to help develop your understanding of the game and to consider some new strategies. Civ 5 is also stunningly beautiful. However, you can play it on older systems. When I got the game I was running a 2006 Dell Dimension E521 (with an AMD Athlon 64 3800 and an nVidia GT9500 (which I put in specifically so I could do some gaming), and it ran just fine on low to medium settings. It just got MORE beautiful when I built my new rig with a 4th gen Intel i7 and GTX760 and could run it on max settings. The music is also spectacular. I'm still listening to it (not muting it like some other games I play) during gameplay even after 400 hours! I have all the DLC, and I would highly recommend you go ahead and get the Complete Edition. Bare minimum though, get the Brave New World expansion. It adds so much richness to the base game. Enjoy building a civilization that will stand the test of time!
gorillaedan;-;Using United States. Map size 4 players. Playing againts AI. 6 hours had passed and the game even finished yet.
skyheat;-;If you like strategy games like XCOM. Buy it. If you like PEW PEW games. Buy It. If you don't have cash get a friend to gift it to you.
Uvecrep;-;This game is absolutly amazing, definatly a must have 10/10
Konth;-;One of best strategy games ever, gotta love it, especially dem nukes.
Burger;-;AUDIO: Superb AESTHETIC: Impressive MEMORABILITY: Strong WORTH: Full Price PROS: Civilopedia and tutorials have gotten a bit of an upgrade from Civ4 and are now more palatable to new users. The game is workshop friendly and the community is actively perpetuating content for it. Expansions actually have purpose and add dimension to the game. With all these new features, the games depth and strategy is no longer confined to country tierlists. Hex-style grid was a great addition and feels very natural. CONS: As a long-standing fan of the Civilization series, I can't say I like the movement away from the board game feel of older installments (Civ2 and Civ3, specifically.) The graphics and animations are a bit unnecessary to me for this reason, though they are excellently-done and very beautiful. OVERALL: My qualms with this game are entirely from the point of nostalgia. At the end of the day, I'm willing to say goodbye to my virtual "Risk" board game in favor of what Civ is blossoming into as a series: a highly-complex strategy game that is a blast to share with like-minded friends. SCORE: 10/10
TurkeyDinosaur;-;A fantastic game, well worth buying it. Best played with all DLC and a bunch of friends.
VanillaEars;-;If Montezuma's in one of your games, you better bloody prepare for war, cause it's coming about one turn after he meets you.
doddle;-;This is a fantastic game with BNW. This is an alright game with G&K. This is a flatout broken game with Vanilla.
Hiitali;-;This is the game of realism. Prepare to get nuked by Ghandi, owned by barbarians on the year 1890 and be friends with russia.
Cakestepid;-;Do you like: Buning tiny cities? Obliterating other cites with nukes and giant robots? Domiating other players and elimiating them form the game? If yes: Buy this and get a domination victory.
Mr_StarDelta;-;Civ 5 is an amazing high definition strategy game which requires a lot of thinking and skill. I have been led into massive wars and online multiplayer with friends is just pure fun. You start in the ancient era and can end up researching all the way into the future era! Massive full scale wars never fail to impress me and the multiple different ways of winning is very interesting. I still have yet to go through all the paths of winning! 9.2/10
Kiwi;-;Ok im cutting my self off... one more turn (11:00 PM) Looks down at clock...  its 6 am........
Kalle;-;The best game ever made! Civilization has been around since I can think (I dare say that start in the late 80ies). Since about 1990 I played Civ 1, Civ 2, Civ 3 and for years I played Civilization 4 and thought it could not get better! But it did! Civilization 5 takes it to a new level! Everything has so much more meaning, is simpler or just makes more fun! Let me give you some examples: Combat system In every part of Civ before this was determined by how many units can you possibly stack on one field, march through enemy territory and wreak havoc. Now in Civ 5 tactics really matters! Move your units carefully, organize a retreat of heavily wounded veterans and bring fresh units to the front. Range units finally have a range! Terrain matters! I was sceptic playing a demo of Civ 5 some years back, but I'm converted! Religion & Diplomacy In Civ 4 religion was only about bringing in some extra cash once you built the holy shrine of that religion. Now it has meaning! You can customize your religion to match the victory you strive for. Heading for a military victory? Give your units a combat bonus near cities of your religion and prepare your conquest with missionaries. Going for culture? Pick a belief that grants you bonus culture from terrain around your cities! Great! City states - first I thought what useless crap they were. Again I'm converted: A diplomatic victory is much fun and you can easily spoil other players bloodthirst with winning diplomatically before being conquered. Ideologies The modern age pendant to religion: Again you can decide between three different ways of winning and customize it to your needs. And it's all so easy!!! I have the feeling they ADDED MORE features to Civilization while at the same time making it MORE SIMPLE! Scenarios My god, scenarios! There's loads of them and the official ones provide an incredibly deep playing experience! Story, historical background, it's amazing! It even pushed me to publish strategy guides on my own blog! ___________________________________ So if you're still not sure whether you should go for it - trust people who have more than 1,000h play time! Do it! Get it! Play it! Enjoy it! Have fun!
Bruce Ashbey;-;Do not purchase this game if you want to do anything else. Prepare to wonder where the time went, wonder why you havent eaten all day, and wonder what that stain on your chair is. Civ 5 is the ultimate time sink, even more so than any illegitimate children you might have. Barbies OP.
*****_kn;-;Simply grand strategy, only hexes need getting used to.
SixZoSeven;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is the best strategy game I've played. The new hex grid tile system works extremely well for combat, allowing for a much more strategic, intellectual battle. Sadly, the game doesn't fully feel complete without both the Gods & Kings and Brave New World DLC packs. G&K's revamps the technology tree, adds more buildings, units, and civilizations, includes an espionage system, and adds a religion system to the game. BNW adds a new cultural system/victory, new civilizations, ideologies, trade routes, and a world congress. Both DLC packs are a must-have for the full, complete experience. Be prepared to be a victim of "just one more turn".
Sloth#AnimalRights;-;Great game, the vast amount of ways to win and loose in this game make it full of replayabilitie to play as diffrent civilizations. Games can last for hours and the back stabbing, the secret relations, war, this game is just fantastic. The game can get a little slow in the start, especialy if you are playing alone but it really pics up a few turns in especially if you play with freinds. If you play you will have a complete distaste for Barbarians after you experience this game, 8/10.
hamuka;-;This game let me play as Bismarck and steal horses from Genghis Khan, while Alexander the Great made an alliance with Catherine II of Russia, who in turn went to war with Darius I, while Ramesses II decided to not give a crap about any of us and expanded over North America, building Angkor Wat in the meantime. Oh, and all of us lived 6000 years. Most accurate depiction of history I've seen in a long while. 5/5.
Blarghalt;-;Recommend, but for the love of God do NOT buy this without all the expansions. It's bare bones otherwise.
SPxDropshot;-;This game is great for ruining reltionships. Dropped a nuke on my buddy, he wouldn't face me for the rest of the week. 10/10 would nuke again.
Plundered Kittens;-;One of the best turn based 4x strategy games out there. Civilization V is vastly improved by the expansions Gods & Kings and Brave New World so I would reccommend picking those up if you are considering Civilization V. This game is great at allowing you to expand your civilizations through any way possible whether it be by war, diplomacy, or your economy. The game doesn't stale as you head into the late game because of the World Congress and Idealogies you are able to pick up once you get closer to the Atomic Era. Idealogies does a great job of creating rivals and allies as you align with the people you share Idealogies with. This game is relatively easy to run and can be accessible to most poeple. The multiplayer is fun if you can find friends to play with as it is more interesting playing with people you known. There are some faults with multiplayer as the game will often reload itself for no apparent reason. Overall great game and is a must own for anyone that enjoes 4x strategy games.
Chalupasaurus;-;The depth and replayability are unsurpassed. It took a couple of expansions to catch up to the enjoyment I felt playing its predecessors, but now with all of the new systems in place it has become one of my favorite iterations in the series. Thank you Sid Meier's, Brian Reynolds, Jeff Briggs, MicroProse, Hasbro, Infogrames, Atari Interactive, Take-Two, 2K Games, Firaxis and any others I am forgetting for providing me with years of such boundless entertainment. I can only imagine what the future holds for such an amazing and storied Franchise.
~(=^.^);-;You're gonna screw up your roads. I guarantee it.
buggthewaitingman;-;For those who are not familiar with the Civ games: Sid meier's Civiliazation is a simulation of how and why the political status-quo is as it is today. In randomly generated map (though its not your only option) play the leader of a slightly to heavily flavoured nation and quest for world dominition. Either kill everyone, make them love you, make a utopia or be the first to send the rocket to space. Sometimes you'll be the baddy, sometimes you'll the curse the vandal leader who will play purely combat while you build your latest wonder. This game's realism is really informative and there are many things to learn from this simulation. It's replayability is one of it's strongest points since you'll definitely want to try again for a better setting (resources and other civ placement), different map size, different nation etc. For those familiar with previous installments: Is there anything better than a resuscitation of a game you already love with new graphics, new/different nations and a slightly different approach to some of the mechanics? I cant say this is wholly an improvement or a deterioration in terms of realism since, although the diplomacy is MUCH better and a diplomatic victory is actually an option now, the religion mechanic for example is more of "game" nature than the more realistic Civ 4 counterpart. This is less blocky and repetitive than Civ4 and much easier to play though you may not like all the changes (NO MORE STACK OF DOOM! :P)
Douche Nukem;-;Ghandi exterminated my people with nukes after I asked to be friends 9.37865/10
JaydenMoon;-;I have been playing civilization since it first came out - even back when the game's units had white backgrounds to distinguish them from the maps assests it still held that special something that made it one of the greatest and deepest strategies of all time. Civilization 5 is the perfected version of Civilization, especially with the sales that Steam has for the complete version, you would be crazy to not pick this up regardless of your flavor of genre. This game like all of its predecessors will have you up at 3am saying "just one more turn..."
I need onion rings;-;Would you be interested in a trade agreement with England?
Isaak | VACation for 11 days;-;Your average Civ game. "Gandhi has completed the Manhattan Project!" Quit game without saving. Exit Civ 5. Exit Steam. Delete Civ 5. Delete Steam. Shut down computer. Punch the screen in. Break the computer with a hammer. Throw the computer out of the window. Burn the computer with a flamethrower. Dance on the ashes naked. Buy a plane ticket to India. Go to a missile silo. Launch a nuke. Leave India. Watch and laugh as the rest of the world pulverizes Gandhi's smug face with nukes. Kill yourself. "Alexander has won a Diplomatic Victory!" Come back to life. Repeat. 8/8 Gr8 Game M8 Gandhi With The Pro B8s 420 Nukes.
Not Enough Pancakes;-;Good. It's a shame ghandi is an annoying prick
JaydenMoon;-;I have been playing civilization since it first came out - even back when the game's units had white backgrounds to distinguish them from the maps assests it still held that special something that made it one of the greatest and deepest strategies of all time. Civilization 5 is the perfected version of Civilization, especially with the sales that Steam has for the complete version, you would be crazy to not pick this up regardless of your flavor of genre. This game like all of its predecessors will have you up at 3am saying "just one more turn..."
LockeProposal;-;+ Extremely ing addictive. Hours feel like minutes. + Interface is excellent + Every aspect of the game feels balanced and well-designed + Massive variety of cultures to play + Multiplayer is just as addictive - AI can be inconsistent at times - Loading screens are horrendous
The Iron Captain;-;This let me live out my life-long fantasy of being a war-mongering dictator. I was able to govern an empire with an iron fist and crush all of my enemies with a horrible wrath. 10/10 would conquer and rule all with fury again.
Ellak;-;Great game, and gets better with expansions.
JoelDrake2;-;This game allows you to unleash the inner sadistic dictator that we all are underneath, burning cities and ravaging the countryside. Engaging in a pre-emptive strike against Gandhi, I was able to keep him in the renaissance era while everyone else moved on into the modern era, preventing him from nuking me or anyone else in the future. In the meantime, I took part in the very practice I claimed to condemn and sent two consecutive atomic bombs to Amsterdam. This game allowed me to engage in a foreign policy similar to the U.S.A.'s without the real life worldwide scorn and condemnation. 11/10 The only thing I would add to the game is the ability to stage false flag terror attacks, to further the realism.
ZechsX18999;-;This is a game I'll put many hours into. I've only put in 20 hours and I still don't know how to win, but I'm having fun! Edit: I finally found out how to win. There are 4 ways to win, which makes things interesting. Domination Victory is the most straightforward way to win. I've been trying to get a Culture/Science Victory by not building an army so I can focus on my Culture/Science and by being nice to everyone so they don't attack my defenseless country with no military, but I always end up getting a Diplomatic Victory instead for being nice to everyone.
Pani Marko;-;In Civilization, alas, is assumed that the neighboring power much hate my country, and then also much begging me not to destroy their city. But I'm not offended, no. It's fun! In my opinion, this is the best turn based strategy I've ever met. I recommend!
Sidearms4raisins;-;Sid Meier delivered yet again with the latest, and debatably greatest, installment of the Civilization franchise: Civilization V. I'm not going to pretend I have played hundreds of hours on this game as you know I haven't becuse it says above(EDIT: yeahhhhhh, this game is addictive). But from what I have played of this game makes it one of my absolute favourites in my library. I personally am not usually the fan of strategy games because I haven't got the brain capacity to work out simple war strategies, but this game had me hooked from the begining. So much so, even, that I managed to convince my dad to buy it which he is now playing by my side religiously. I know I have tried and failed to sound intelligent so I will just say it how it is. BUY THIS GAME!!! The only fault i could possibly pick with this game is a few bugs that will inevitabley be fixed and the occasional crash. I would highly recommend that you save the game every 5 turns to avoid loss because of crashes. But what the hell do I know, maybe its my  laptop's fault. All in all the game is very fun, highly addictive, seriously time consuming and life destroying but however needs some polishing 9/10
B_udgie;-;Pros: I can play this game casually and competitively All the civs mean you can have alot of replayability I personally find this fun and can play it in long sessions Mods are fun Simple learning curve Cons: If you plan to play multiplayer games then you have to buy dlc's which is expensive. Bugs are rare but they can be game breaking and barely fixed Overall a great game 9/10
NASA;-;4K fans will love this game; those from an RTS background looking to try out turn-based strategy will be disappointed in the fact that combat victories are essentially impossible in games of more than 4 players/NPCs. The game is too heavily slanted towards other victory acheivements; it is too difficult to conquer cities and happiness makes a global conquest strategy through military might nigh impossible because eventually your armies will simply be spread too thin and enemies will too easily be able to reinforce their positions on large maps. I still recommend it though for 4K people, but coming from a Command & Conquer/Starcraft/Warcraft background, I can't get out of the conquest mindset and the other strategies aren't to my taste. If you enjoy the longer, slower-paced games which involve meticulously building up a civilization, this is one of the best games out there for that.
CHN Supreme Overlord Xi Bigbig;-;The best game around the universe that can stand the test of time..! 11/10 would: wait...just..one...more...turn! I rule by World Domination!
FluffyQuack;-;Hello... friends! I am recommending this game for you not because of steam's treasure hunt, but because my extensive playtime with this game (that being a whole 39 minutes) has made me realize this game is where you can play as a viking building the pyramids, eiffel tower, big ben, stonehenge, pentagon and just about everything. You know, how history *really* should have gone. Actually, I'm not even sure if you can play as vikings, but the idea of it is still neat. I would like a sockpuppet civilzation, but I guess they don't want me to create the perfect world history yet. Gotta keep something for the sequel, eh? Anyway, this is a game and stuff. You should probably check into if you like games, and if this particular type of game is specifically to your liking of specific games of this specific type. Oh holy bananas, did you know there's a kangaroo standing behind you right now? Um, you should probably do something about that. I don't think a kangaroo is supposed to be in your room.
TallFire;-;Sick plays by Gandhi. - Dank m8
Vectera;-;Easily recommend this game and a must for anyone who enjoys strategy games. Not a steep learning curve, very easy to get into it and learn the game, but there is a lot of more in depth things which give a lot more control, like manual citizen management. Love this game, definitely one of my favourites.
burnedrobot;-;Quad nuke a empire. 10/10
Theid;-;Imagine this, it's 7:20 am, and you lasted 6 hours while Gandhi is right next to you. He decides to nuke you so hard your internet crashes. 10/10 Would get nuked again.
Shogelovs;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V vainilla sucks hard but with both expansions it's a pretty good game. I suggest you to buy the whole thing or not buying it at all since without the expansions there will be no religion, no espionage and the diplomacy will be pretty broken too, making the game kind of unplayable. Three weak spots: 1-You can not found companies like in CIvilization IV Beyond the Sword. 2-Edit: Warmongering is super tricky and difficult now. 3-The "Empire happiness" system was improved a lot but it's still illogical, since every city should have his own level of happiness like in Civilization III or Civilization IV, you could have an empire happiness level system but it should be regulated from the individual level of happiness of every city. Let's say you have an empire with 2 cities, Lisboa and Oporto. If Oporto is under siege it's logical that the happiness of Oporto drops and than that deteriorates it's growth, commerce and productivity but why should Lisboa which is very far away from the warfront be upset about it? Let's be real, every city has it's own problems, should there be factors that deteriorate the happiness of ALL cities? YES, like nuclear war, declaring war against civilizations with the same idiology or religion but happiness should not be only global, the fact that you build a circus in Oporto does not make Lisboa any better, it makes no sense. If Lisboa is overpopulated let Lisboa be upset and unhappy about it but it's madness that because one overpopulated city the whole productivity of your empire drops. Said that, this game is good stuff, good graphics, good combat system (even better that Civilization IV), decent diplomacy, no bugs at all, very nice multiplayer, all civilizations are good but England and France.
AHHHHH;-;Tis goooded
Burgeri;-;Lobby Simulator 2014 would press ready again 11/10
roadrunner;-;Civilization V is probably one of the best turn based strategy games out there. Singleplayer works great, but the multiplayer is quite buggy sometimes. It still might be worth the purchase for you if you enjoy building your civilization.
Morwo;-;Played for years. one 4x gamer will have fun with all DLC. nice art and music. high replay potencial even after completing the game.
Spaghetti Netflix p;-;"morocco gets suicide bombers" - matt
Darkz01;-;get the complete edition... its fukken worth it eventho you already has the base game with some DLC...
Jefferson Davis;-;Great game, 10/10 but fix the mother ing connection issues in multiplayer please!
DoctorMozG;-;How can you not be overwhelmed by Civilization V? It's a perfect example of a series that's getting close to perfection, step by step. The new improvements are great and feel like they've been there all along. A must-buy for the fans and a great way for newcomers to finally get familiar with the series.
Reese;-;My friends betrayed me every game. 10/10
Tenebries;-;On the whole, Sid Meier's Civilization V is one of the best strategy games I have ever played. Rating: 10
ERIPPER35;-;I love this game more than ghandi loves neuclear weapons 10/10
A GOD DAMN SEXUAL TYRANNOSAURUS;-;I ruled the world as a fascist Germany and steam rolled England, Russia, and America with nukes and Giant Death Robots. 8/10
stresser;-;that grin that ghandi has, is the grin of no mercy.
Protecto;-;never have i ever controlled 19th century germany through confucianism 10/10
dasaard200;-;A must-buy for any serious gamer, how to take over the world in under 500 turns; many units, many tech's, infiite ways to build your civilization ! Since I bought this game, (and its add-ons; Gods and Kings, and Brave New World) I have not spent any money on other games !! If the wife hears about this, she's gonna want HER cut of my savings !!!
Squidlfied;-;Found tanks and infantry weapons inside of ancient ruins 10/10
Superior leader;-;This is a strategy game were you can relive and recreate history with your own civilization. + Graphics + Interactions + Game modes + Decisions & consequences + Interaction with other leaders + Multiple ways of winning the game + Resource management + Evolution of your civilization - Game takes a long time to win.
Archer_Wessel;-;For the people who like strategy games, this is heaven. There are so many strategies for this game that you can't decide which to choose. Try it out, and make your own strategy to rule the world.
edsonmasson;-;Fantastic!! I can't stop playing... 10/10
Edge;-;This game definitely has the potential to be (one of) the best strategy game(s) of all times, but is one example of a messed up DLC policy. Their are literally hundreds of purchasalbe DLCs. Buy them in a bundle to save money.
CrazyWildPanda;-;You can fap while playing this game 10/10 would fap again
HAL 9000;-;It's the videogame form of drugs.
aa;-;Just... one... more... turn...
-- guitarhero2015 --;-;Civilization 5 is an amazing strategy game. Definitely one of the best strategy games out there. The best game I have ever played in my life.
Brodin;-;ing great but don't ever play it with friends because you will hate them by the end of the game
fgt. superlubo;-;strengthening friendships/10
jamieb33r;-;got it drunk played it sober great game!
NathanD;-;If you loved Civilization I then you will love Civilization V :P
Rigatoni;-;I can't remember what "outside," is.
jbrewj;-;Very acceptable
alazysloth | BE;-;game so good I forgot how to breath
Matt;-;Great strategy game
Taken Aghast;-;Hi, I'm Jlrantz and I like this game.
deadphantom;-;My friend Josh really likes this game
Kuki;-;My review is mostly related to the single player part and the AI of the game, which i both consider to be very relevant in this game. First of all: With the BNW add-on the CIV5 game gained new potential. Especially in late-game the game has become a lot better. However, Civilization 5 still lacks a lot of the strategic component of former installments of CIV or Alpha Centauri (one of my all-time favourite games). Especially without GK and BNW the game is very simplistic and strategically non-challenging, offering few ways to win and few actual decision-making. This is a shame, especially when comparing the game to its predecessors. With BNW the strategic component got a lot better, allowing many different paths to victory, exploring new strategies, and finally giving culture an actual purpose and allowing you to win with culture. A downside however is, that the different civilizations and leaders are poorly balanced. For example when playing at the last two difficulties, it seem almost impossible to win (unless you use specific AI and gameplay exploits...). This is mostly the case because it is generally not possible to keep up with the rapid technology advance and army production of the AI. The AI can do this because it receives massive bonusses and you receive a massive handicap. As an effect of the research and construction speed handicap, you will very often find yourself in a situation where you cannot build certain wonders in your game, even with an ultimately optimised building strategy and a perfect starting position - which is quite frustrating and will limit your selection of feasible strategies in higher difficulties, to a small selection - most of which are based on exploiting the overall weak choices the AI makes in wars. The AI also often reacts irrational and seems random, for example the way it changes from being your best friend, to backstabbing you and siding with your enemy, in just one turn, or when they declare war on you despite the immediate outcome being obviously negative for that civilisation as well as already having another enemy at its neck. The options for diplomatic interaction are overall weak. My main point of criticism is that the AI is dumb to the point that it can only be seen as challenging by that it produces a lot of military units and advances a lot faster in technology than you. This also means that you inevitably have to prepare for often long wars against an ridiculously large stream of enemy units that you might often destroy easily due to the AI's weak decision-making while attacking. Often you can only win with perfect start position and by exploiting certain game mechanics and the mentioned lack of AI tactics. This is what makes this game of little interest to me. A strategy game that offers a lot of different ways to win needs a good AI and not one that acts as military-unit factory. For example, games with the difficulty setting at which the AI has the same handicaps as you feel like a pony-ride to any halfway experienced player, even when there are lots of rivaling civilisations on the map. However, once you play at higher difficulties, the AI plays with the exact some behavior and underlying "intelligence" but can manage to be ahead of you at all times in matters of creating wonders, researching technologies, producing culture, and army. At the "king" difficulty, where you already have penalties, I found it possible to win pretty much any game at any starting position with any civilisations or leaders. But at the last two difficulties the AI advantage becomes clearly unfair, the intelligence of the AI however is still not any better. It is apparent that the AI "knows" what goes on on the entire map and will use this knowledge to its advantage. In addition, the advantages it receives are not possible to be compensate using smart decisions. For example, at Deity difficulty, Firaxis basically throws you into a gladiator fight where you play a limbless and "slow" person. You fight against dumb, aggressive and cheating brutes that will turn hostile at some point, no matter what. Sounds more fun than it is. I found it to be still possible to win at deity, but you are WILL find yourself limited to a very very small set of tactics and choices and even leaders: The most likely option to win is militaristically: you have to wait for your enemy's rare appearance of a weakness, at which point you have to attack with your limbless body hitting the enemy gladiator continuously, which will feel like cracking a hard nutshell with a rubber spoon, until the target slowly turns into a pudding-like consistency. You will have to forget all the other tactics and playstyles you might have previously liked to use, once you play in that arena you have to stick with what the little that's left, being severly crippled in your abilities and fighting against dumb hostile brutes. Thumbs down for the AI
Airstorm;-;great game very intense but relaxing at the same time
/=Sinister=\;-;If you get expansion its the best
jimcatmanv1.64;-;Hella good, only with the DLC.
Triumph The Dog Jnr;-;Having alot of fun playing this game.
Milk_Man;-;This game is fun to play when your trying to burn time
Nuclear Divergence;-;I'm in danger of failing my college classes becuase of this. 10/10
Castle;-;Easier to stop eating Pringles than playing this game.
Atahualpa;-;One More Turn
JeuDeTarot;-;I really like that part of oldest "sitcom" in history of game development... ). So, guys, just try and enjoy that stuff. If u will play with friends, u will find great timekiller and funny moments in that game. ). Civilization V back us to classic hexagons rather than Civ IV. It's first good sign. 2. Great multiplayer mode. 3. Great scenarios for lone wolves. 4. Extended settings for your own game. 5. Recommended by time. ). 6. Of course, i love that soundtrack. Great work by composers. 7. I think that game HAVE balance. All nations have own bonuses. Choice what u like and beat your opponents. 8. For newbies  easy to learn. Omg... It's just Civilization, what i can say more?! And... Only one bad sign i can say about Civ V  cropped release version... Because, if you want religion  you will need to buy DLC Gods & Kings... Nobody like that marketing politic. Cheers, Mazy.
Wotan;-;The words ''Just one More Turn'' have a different meaning in Civ V , one day I wanted to do a fast and ''Short'' match.....it took 9 hours 10/10
Something Fishy;-;Really addicting game,worth the money
Eifersucht18;-;Civilization 5, simply put, is one of the best Strategy games on the market and the benchmark that all other Turn-based Strategy games are measured against. Players are given a fantastic array of Civs to choose from (Queen Elizabeth (England), Napolean (France), Bismarck (Germany), Caeser (Italy), Harun Al Rashid (Persia), Gandhi(India)) to name but a few, polished graphics and gameplay, deep technology and culture trees, a multitude of victory tracks (to include Domination, Culture, Science and Diplomatic victories), Civilization-specific war units and equipment, deeply satisfying combat, broad customization options, engaging multiplayer and a seemingly endless amount of replayability. This is a must-have title for any PC Gamer - Highly Recommended. - [Graphics (10/10), Gameplay (10/10), Sound (8/10), Replay Value (10/10), Multiplayer (9/10)] - (Rated 10/10)
Impulse Manslaughter;-;I am a fan of turn based strategy games. I know a lot of people find these to be the antithesis of fun, but for me I find the slower pace to be quite enjoyable. It is just a blast to watch your civilization grow and finally envelope the world. The game can be challenging but it is just so fun to watch your guys, who have developed to the freaking space age, tearing through the medieval armies of your foes. It is one of those games that is difficult to stop playing. I have played games from start to finish in one sitting. Those familiar with the title can tell you that can be a LONG while. Cannot recommend this game enough.
thezzo;-;Alexander asked me to help him in a war, one turn later he denounced me for helping him in his war. 11/10
Taiga Aisaka;-;Solid game, like Civilization series before But you need Complete Edition to explore more potential of this game
Wade Wilson;-;It's awesome
SeaFoodKingSpecial;-;One of the best games i have ever played especially if you get the DLCs
Smel RIbson;-;If you like having you're  split open then you'll love this
Mono;-;Crack.
bermensch;-;This game is definetly BADASS !! Step 1 : Start The Game Step 2 : Watch your clock Step 3 : Start The Match Step 4 : End The Match Step 5 : Watch your clock Step 6 : WHERE THE  DID 6-7 HOURS GO??
Hyal;-;A really good strategy semi-rpg game, it even has decent graphics on the lowest settingsand still works if your like me with intergrated graphics..... I reccomend the Gold Edition, as it saves you having to seperately buy all the dlc available, even if it costly its totally worth it. Apart from the really long loading screens, and sometimes crashes, its a brilliant game! 9.5/10 -Vippsyboy
Steve;-;these persian mother ers raidin my  , then the mother ing barbarians come along , then ing chinese come along and  my  up. Good Game!!!xdmemes!!! 11/10 - IGN
Piff the magic dragon;-;Ruined my life, 11/10.
Cowkiller;-;Civ V if u loved the civ series then u will love the game from the battles with the pc players to the achevments that make u feel like you did something amazing
Rangerdanger0;-;Such a great game So much fun to play with friends
Bono.;-;One of the best games I've played till now.
Ads102;-;Good early strategy game to get into the genre provides a lot of help
flYing;-;Fun with friends, better with dlc's
Mango Kush;-;I would recomend this game to anyone of my friends, if they didnt already have it.
Sparky;-;Everything about this game makes me wanna play more, it has a special place on my hard drive away from all the P*rn and all the dirt :3 JK, its a really good game and well worth the money had a lot of fun on it yet to still try multiplayer 9.5/10
Piff the magic dragon;-;Ruined my life, 11/10.
Mitchell;-;The geniuses game, this game is all about strategy and patience, it's incredibly fun and will fill up all your free time, it doesn't require a super computer but looks amazing; this game is easy to pick up and learn and when you get better you can increase the difficulty. The multiplayer is absolutely amazing and I've had hours of fun with it although it seems to take a while for the AI to do it's turns in the higher rounds. The community is making the game even better, with thousands of mods hiding away in the workshop once you're done with all the standard stuff you can install extra mods and make the game even more enjoyable. Probably one of the best games I've ever owned. 10/10
Mono;-;Crack.
Monsterclip4;-;The city state or Warshaw was more difficult to take over, than the Japanese empire. Ghandi uses nukes and George Washington is one sly S.O.B. 10/10
Hyal;-;A really good strategy semi-rpg game, it even has decent graphics on the lowest settingsand still works if your like me with intergrated graphics..... I reccomend the Gold Edition, as it saves you having to seperately buy all the dlc available, even if it costly its totally worth it. Apart from the really long loading screens, and sometimes crashes, its a brilliant game! 9.5/10 -Vippsyboy
Steve;-;these persian mother ers raidin my  , then the mother ing barbarians come along , then ing chinese come along and  my  up. Good Game!!!xdmemes!!! 11/10 - IGN
thezzo;-;Alexander asked me to help him in a war, one turn later he denounced me for helping him in his war. 11/10
Taiga Aisaka;-;Solid game, like Civilization series before But you need Complete Edition to explore more potential of this game
Wade Wilson;-;It's awesome
Retsof;-;This game is great. I have always loved strategic games that involve tactics and intelligent play. Although, sadly I have never been a civ player, but this has got me wanting to play all of the previous versions. Get it now as it is definitely worth the money, i mean you pay for what you get! Conquering every other player as a japenese empire is how i play my game, but how will you play yours?
that fuckin wizard;-;Just in case playtime recorded doesn't count as a recommendation on its own: I ing recommend this game. Seriously. Do you like strategy games? Okay, buy this, we don't have anything else to talk about. The expansions are well worth it, too, though if you're only going to pick up one I'd say grab Brave New World (if you can even get the second before the first, I wouldn't know). The trading system gives you a lot more to think about but it's really the update to cultural victories with tourism, museums, and artifacts that make the expansion for me. If you like non-aggressive play, the changes are amazing. There isn't quite as much to offer for you war-mongers, but moving resources around with the trade routes is still going to be important. Not to mention it added Venice which is pretty much the only civ you will ever need to play as ever again. The religion and espionage systems added in Gods and Kings are definitely fun, but I felt both systems could've been a little deeper (I really wanted to set myself up as a sort of 16th century Vatican City puppetmaster-type civ, but alas...). Both systems are integrated in the changes to Brave New World, though, and I found that worth it as well. Get them both! Don't even wait for a sale, buy them all right this instant!
E>Zaba;-;historical strategy does not get any better than civ 5. Allowing people to play an alternate version of history is great, and sid and his peeps at firaxis hit the nail on the head. with hours of replayability the game allows for a different story each time.
Lunatic Princess Near;-;Freaking amazing. Best top-view strategy game I ever played. I love how you can control who is in the world and the difficulty level, map type, etc. I felt like i was competing against real players when I was faced with the AI leaders in the game. I actually checked to see if I was in multiplayer somehow by accident. 10/10
Mortalsyn;-;This game will consume your life!! 10/10!
Notice Me Senpai;-;Don't trust gaundi
Cotang;-;Probably my favorite turn based games. I have all the DLC and I never get bored. It's just hard to find the time to play a whole scenario through.
naznatips;-;With the expansions, Civilization V is one of the best strategy games ever made. I can't recommend it highly enough!
[Fragers] [Lux-I] Panther;-;This is one of my favourite games of all time, i will make a more detailed review in future, but what i have to say now is BUY IT STEVEN. BUY IT. YOU KNOW YOU WANT TO.
unit2k10;-;you can play this game for 12 hours and still not finish
7grain;-;Civilization V is as much a lateral step away from the complicated nature of Civ IV as it is a step forward in the franchise's vaunted history. Most importantly, after 18 months, Civ 5 has improved dramatically from the game it was upon release. The AI is improved, key game concepts have been buffed and nerfed, as needed. And there is welcome, but not critical, DLC. What I love about this version: hex-based game board for more natural movement. No more stacks of doom. Global happiness. No tech trading. Drastically improved AI relations. Improved event notification system means you never miss a beat. What I dislike: The tech tree has been significantly flattened from Civ 4. Tech and Culture victories are terribly boring to achieve: hunker down, press "next turn", repeat 200 times. Overreliance on gold farming to buy off all problems. Overall - a successful attempt to streamline gameplay without removing core elements. Civ 5 is a success, and I welcome the coming expansion(s).
pushtrak;-;This game is brilliant. My PC isn't the best, so I decided I'd give the demo a go. It gives just enough to make you really want to see more. I picked up the Gold version of the game and had a lot of fun with that, but I would really advise getting the Brave New Wolrd expansion too. It adds great new systems to the game. There isn't really anything else I can say that a go at the demo wouldn't say other than if you get this game, get Brave New World too.
Flats the Flounder;-;Honestly? Yes, I do reccomend it to any MMO Board game fans or Strategy players out there. Civ V is a time-eating game, it's a game you can casually playand check your emails/facebook while playing, but thatdoesnt mean the game isn't intense, whenever I sit down to play a game of Civ for a few minutes, I end up spending my whole day building my civillization. This game also has great tool-tips and UI. I mastered the game without the need of tutuorial but there areadvisor-in-game diologues that explain everything. (These can be disabled.) In all fairness, I give this game a 8.5 out of 10, buy this game, it's worth every single penny.
Windows 95;-;Civilization V is a very fun strategy game. You choose a country which you are the great leader of such as George Washington for U.S.A, and Elizabeth for England. You try to build a strong civilization. You can win five different ways: using diplomacy, using millitary, using science, using culture, or just having your civilization have the highest score by 2050.
toolmns;-;This is a vast game, with the highest replay value of any other I have ever played. The differences among civilizations range from slim to huge, and they all have a very unique style of gameplay. Put in the many factors that can be modified before a game session, such as map size and resource abundance, and you'll find yourself living with this game for a long time. Big points for the soundtrack and graphics as well. The AI is really well adjusted too, compared to older versions of Civilization. It is now possible to actually stand a chance playing in the hardest settings and still feels rewarding if you lose and yet tried your best. There is nothing left to say other than... play this game!!! Oh and get the expansions too!
Scoobysmack;-;Fun game. I usually play under a different account so not all my hours are logged here. Lots of replay value -- games always feel different and there's no 'one way' to win.
Milk_Man;-;This game is fun to play when your trying to burn time
Nuclear Divergence;-;I'm in danger of failing my college classes becuase of this. 10/10
Castle;-;Easier to stop eating Pringles than playing this game.
Triumph The Dog Jnr;-;Having alot of fun playing this game.
Tajik;-;One more turn...
mlobel;-;Make sure you stock your food pile. keep it near the computer before download comences, otherwise you should have an amazing time!
jimcatmanv1.64;-;Hella good, only with the DLC.
Uneven Gradient;-;Really good fun. As long as you have time. You might get sucked in for a few hours sometimes. ITts worth playing
Scytherix;-;great turn based strategy game
Something Fishy;-;Really addicting game,worth the money
[kd] Ce'Nedra;-;This is definitely the culmination of the Civilization franchise, can't wait to go to space next... but until then... just one more turn.
BloodMoney13;-;One of the best strategy games I've ever played. So many hours have gone into this game its ridiculous. Highly recommend getting the expansion pack because it completes the game where the original falls short. If you're a fan of turn based games, this is a must!
Scytherix;-;great turn based strategy game
jah war;-;With only a thousand pounds in my pocket i was just able to afford SID MEIERS'S CIVILIZATION V and the gold edition and the DLC and the limited edition 'SID MEIERS'S' keychain. At first i was fairly sure that i had accidentally bought farming simulator 2014 but then I realised that they have not released that game yet. The defining moment of this game was when i made an artillery cannon and blew up most of Spain. I don't have anything against people from Spain i just think that their country is really hot and once i went there and asked for a glass of milk and was given a shot of vodka. I was going to complain but the man behind the counter was really scary so i didn't. My favourite SID MEIERS'S CIVILIZATION V to play as is Russia because it means i don't have to look at the Russian lady who is not very pretty. I think they could have stepped up their game and bit their lip and hired someone better, because she is negatively portraying Russians as ladys who don't have legs but instead have strange domes which need massive dresses to hide. My verdict overall is ok but i think if SID MEIERS took care of his CIVILIZATION he wouldn't have to keep replacing them.
Bigmacfatattack;-;Ruined my life, 10/10 Also, 287/287
that fuckin wizard;-;Just in case playtime recorded doesn't count as a recommendation on its own: I ing recommend this game. Seriously. Do you like strategy games? Okay, buy this, we don't have anything else to talk about. The expansions are well worth it, too, though if you're only going to pick up one I'd say grab Brave New World (if you can even get the second before the first, I wouldn't know). The trading system gives you a lot more to think about but it's really the update to cultural victories with tourism, museums, and artifacts that make the expansion for me. If you like non-aggressive play, the changes are amazing. There isn't quite as much to offer for you war-mongers, but moving resources around with the trade routes is still going to be important. Not to mention it added Venice which is pretty much the only civ you will ever need to play as ever again. The religion and espionage systems added in Gods and Kings are definitely fun, but I felt both systems could've been a little deeper (I really wanted to set myself up as a sort of 16th century Vatican City puppetmaster-type civ, but alas...). Both systems are integrated in the changes to Brave New World, though, and I found that worth it as well. Get them both! Don't even wait for a sale, buy them all right this instant!
E>Zaba;-;historical strategy does not get any better than civ 5. Allowing people to play an alternate version of history is great, and sid and his peeps at firaxis hit the nail on the head. with hours of replayability the game allows for a different story each time.
Nugz;-;this is an awesome game!!
i hate life :D;-;Civilization V is one of the best turn-based strategy games Ive ever had the pleasure of playing. Whether teaming up with my friends for some multiplayer, or simply losing a whole night of sleep to the games endlessly replayable single player, this is one game that any strategy enthusiast, or, hell anyone strat-curious should check out. Sure, I miss some of the deeper inter-civilization relations that the more defined religion and government setup brought in Civilization IV, but thats nothing anyone new to the series will even think twice about. With all the tips, advisers and tools in place, this is the first Civilization for PC that I feel is worth just about every persons time. Go forth and create, subdue, and exploit.
Lunatic Princess Near;-;Freaking amazing. Best top-view strategy game I ever played. I love how you can control who is in the world and the difficulty level, map type, etc. I felt like i was competing against real players when I was faced with the AI leaders in the game. I actually checked to see if I was in multiplayer somehow by accident. 10/10
Mortalsyn;-;This game will consume your life!! 10/10!
Interracial Sloth Wizard;-;It's gettin hot in here, so take of all yo clothes. I won.
Sevin Church;-;I'll keep this short and sweet. I never played Civ games for more than a few tries here and there over the years. I never played the original one mind you, but I played 2-4. I appreciate the genre, I grew up on board games like risk so this is nothing new to me. All that being said, I now love Civ. It may have taken 5 games to get there, but I am hooked. I have spent many hours dominating the world, I will spend many more again. Buy this, you won't regret it.
dh16dh;-;This is definitley one of the best Strategy Games I've ever played. And the fact that it's modable just makes it so much better. I might be new to Civ but if you love Strategy, get this game. It's worth every cent. Although if you want (cuz it's pretty expensive with the expansion packs) then wait until there is a sale. Then you can buy the Gold edition. Having an expansion pack adds so much to the gameplay. Either wait or buy now, but once you do buy it, well, ENJOY!
Kadziet;-;The One Game. The Best Game. 10/10
The Next Oppenheimer;-;Civilization V is an immensely popular Steam game, and rightly so. Its 'Just one more turn!' brilliance is down to lots of brilliant options to customise your game and an abudance of great mods to add for further customization, no playthrough is ever the same. I would recommend this game to anyone interested in history, geography, or just strategy games in general; its realism is sufficient yet not so much as to be boring. First-rate game in my opinion. I would recommend that you buy the gold/complete edition if you are serious about playing the game. It gives you the nice DLC's that are really worth their money.
Dragosmd;-;For those that enjoy playing strategic war/non-war games will like this. Might not be as in depth like other stratergy games like Europa Universalis 4 but an enjoyable pass time.
Cosby;-;Really fun, and really addicting once you really get into it.
"WiseWolf";-;A quick paced game at first, as it progresses you must constantly adapt and change your stategem in order to survive.
thepianosquid;-;This ... Game ..... Is .... Epic! It's complex at first but REALLY fun!
Fritzpud;-;Great game, if you have time. You could easily spend 48 hours straight on this game. Workshop support is fun, though not all of the mods really work that well. Also, seems to have optimization issues, can run on almost any comp within the last few years on low, but high seems to have trouble on even dedicated gaming comps. Also the more turns have passed, the more time it takes for the cpus to take their turn. Like I would get over a minuite sometimes. Also, the game isn't quite complete without the dlc sadly. The dlc adds a great number of features, fixes, ect, but should have been a free update. You can however get it pretty cheap if you check the steam sales.
Evil Brew Doge;-;Amazing game. Not only does Civ V rise up to the expectations of series, it exceeeds them.While the army stacking may be a small flaw, other features including simplified diplomacy and improved interface make the issue almost non-existant. If you played a perivous issue of the series or are a fan of strategy in any sort, pick up a copy of this game ASAP.
Smittywerbenjagermanjensen;-;This game will test your trust bonds with your friends
Rhaliek;-;Buy this and the Brave New World expansion 7/10 Civ V 9/10 Civ V+ Brave New World
Abominable;-;This game, is a mix of adrenaline, and a mix of relaxation while you spread your culture, religion, or your power. You can win the game by science, domination, culture, and a few more, but those are the most common, and most enjoyable. I personally love playing science and domination. You get a nice mix of everything in those games, and i mean, come on, war is fun, and so is science! From worrying about your happiness to keep Revelation at bay, to worrying about Russia assembling units around your borders, this game is sure to give you a gratifying, and amazing experience. Many of which you will find yourself telling your friends about. This game is addicting as hell, you will find yourself slugging along at 4 in the morning "Just....One.....More....Turn" and so on. The combat is brilliant, the game is pretty balanced, only a few issues with that, but hard to notice, and rare to come across, and it's a blast to play with friends, and by yourself. Now, if you are a civ4 player coming to 5, the new diplomacy will take some getting used to. ALWAYS and i mean ALWAYS have a good defense, or civs who are bigger, and better than you will walk all over you to expand, but if your military is a threat, they will back off. Also, your actions can affect your relations with the other civs. If you were to make a proposal in the world congress a civ docent like, it will make then VERY angry with you, deepening on the proposal, it could be a war on your hands. Overall, the game is worth every penny, and it one of my favorite games of all time, a MUST HAVE!!!
Nugz;-;this is an awesome game!!
Drewfus;-;Rule 1 of Civ 5: NEVER TRUST AGUSTUS CEASAR. that dude make some good salad, but he will murder you and everything you love.
Stangthy Leg;-;Buy it. Just do it. Tis worth every penny from the hours of gameplay you gain from it
TheHeroGothamDeserves;-;OMG HELP ME I CANT STOP PLAYING HOLY  IS GOOD.
Jack!;-;I thoroughly recommend Sid Meier's Civilization V, as it provides literally hundreds of hours of captivating entertainment at the expense of a mere 40 Earth Dollars. You can have endless fun attacking your (not really) best friends with nuclear weapons of mass destruction, destroying all of their tiresome efforts in one fell swoop. I don't recommend doing that last part too much, as, judging from personal experience, it can tend to provoke suicidal thoughts in the victim's mind. Other than that, it's pretty  and overpriced.
never ending bass solo;-;tom clancy's civilization V is a good stratagame
Wotan;-;The words ''Just one More Turn'' have a different meaning in Civ V , one day I wanted to do a fast and ''Short'' match.....it took 9 hours 10/10
kodyd194;-;One of the best Civ games out there, I wont debate with you why I think its one of the best, but I will concede that its has to be at least in the top 3 Sid Meier games. I dont think I have to explain why I love Civilization games, I mean Civ 1 came out in 1991 and Sid Meier has been making games since 1982 (thanks Wikipedia for having a Sid Meier page) Overall Civilization games have been one of my favorite strategy games out there and I hope that the upcoming Civilization: Beyond Earth (can anyone say Alpha Centauri?) is also a smashing success!
Stromboli;-;Great strategy, although some glitches if you are running an extremely long game. My friends and I hotseat alot on his computer and I finally bought it for solo play. Great game
Lefty Flip;-;If you want a game to eat your afternoons away, this is the perfect game for you. No other game has made me play it for 6 hours straight and not checking the time until after I'm done.
[FiTiRi] Purple Hexagon;-;Do you like playing games for >10 hours on end without stopping because you just have to build that last road, or take down that one city, or finally stop Gandhi from his scheming tricks? THEN BUY THIS GAME 10/10 Best Turn-Based Strategy All Time
icybyrd96;-;Fun game that you can play for hours on end and never get bored.
The Beast With Two Backs;-;This is quite possibly the world's best and most addictive game and I highly recomend that you buy this game right now.
Egon Spengler;-;whcih civilization should i pick i cant decide
Cataphracts;-;It's just so HEXY!! I love it!
Jonathan McAwesomepants;-;Great game, buy it. Now! :)
Kiniro;-;You will lose countless hours in "Taking another turn."
Haunting;-;A truly awesome and addictive game. Once you pick it up, you cannot put it down and you cannot stop thinking about it when you take a little break from it. One Sunday morning I decided to play it. Once I finished up, I realised my day was gone. The game is somewhat slow, but I hear it's DLC "Brave New World" speeds it up a bit. I find no cons in this game. 10/10
Rajput;-;Just buy it its very good game cant stop playing
kchaos401;-;Civ 3 was my first taste of the series and it's been a journey watching this franchise grow. Each release is innovative and makes the game that much more fun to play. Civ 5 has been by far the best in my opinion. I will be playing this game for a long time.
Kid Zemo;-;I've whiled away many an hour playing every version of this game. Civ V has it's detractors among those who want a highly detailed wargame along the lines of Civ IV, but I like it's focus on immersion and versatility. It's still not the perfect version of the game it wants to be, but Brave New World is a giant leap toward that ideal. The layers of possibilities for your Civilization have never been so diverse and interesting. All hail the King of Turn-Based Strategy!
Mordean;-;Its a great game and I can spend tons of hours on it creating different scenarios for myself
Action Bastard!;-;Just one more turn before bed. Just one more, man. Just one turn. 6 hours later, still playing Civ. 9/10.
Kinky Kiwi;-;This game is like a GabeN Waifu. 11/10 would bang!!
Dextrill;-;Ghandi may look good,but it will be bad when the Manhatten project starts.
Pink Frosted Doughnut Man;-;This is an awesome strategy game. I haven't played any earlier Civ games so I cannot comment on how it compares, but it definitely ranks in my favourite strategy games.
Cactus Sauce;-;You'll hate your friends for weeks after playing with them and some relationships break down completely. I have PTSD and trust issues after playing Civ 5. 10/10
Atratzu;-;-Quick Review- Sid Meiers Civilization V is one of the best Strategy games I have ever played, period. I struggled to get into the Medieval total war games, however Ive been playing the Civilization games since I was twelve-years-old. The game is rather expensive, and to get all the achievements you need to get a fair amount of DLC, I purchased Civ5 Gold edition, so I was forced to also buy the Brave New World DLC. So fair warning; if youre after everything, expect the DLC trick. -Detailed breakdown review- Story: There are three main aspects to Sid Meiers Civilization V, 1) Single Player Matches, 2) Single player Scenarios, 3) Multiplayer Matches. As single player you may select from a list of nations to play as, you may chose as Rome, Greece, Germany, the United States, Russia, England, and many others. You play against other NPCs, you can choose your map size, map style, and other specialized options. In the scenarios you are usually given a choice of nations that were in that scenario, often times the scenarios are historic events, such as the conquest of Genghis Khan, 1066 conquest of England, or the Fall of Rome. Lastly, in Multiplayer you can have a battle of wits against your friends; you can play co-op on the same computer, or play online with your steam friends. This mode is definitely an incentive for people whom are more competitive. Game Play: As Ive elaborated already, you can choose your country, be sure to read the perks that country has, certain countries are more effective at certain things. Some countries start out with special units, others get bonuses from conquering barbarians, and still others get great benefits from city-states. The game has a lot to keep in mind while you play; thankfully the game has advisors which help you get used to the game really fast. They always pitch in their opinions and explain whats happening in the game. Are you an advanced player and tired of hearing them say the same things over and over? No problem! Just disable them in the options menu in game. You start with building your first city which becomes your capital, and then you build armies, settlers to build more cities, workers, buildings, wonders, and much, much more. Achievements: I wouldnt be consistent and true to my nature if I didnt add notes about achievements in my reviews, lets face it, many of the achievements in Civ5 are a grind, win as every nation, play as every map size and type, chop down 1,000 tree tiles A lot of these achievements arent particularly interesting, however I enjoyed them greatly, and many people who might be looking to get away from grinding might prefer to avoid this game for the achievements alone. Many other achievements are very challenging to get, at this time I havent started to work on getting Deity (the hardest difficulty) achievements, but many of those achievements are very difficult to get, and often times require some tricks you pick up from playing. Price: As I have already indicated, expect this game to be rather pricy, the vanilla (original) version of the game is $29.99. If you are just looking to play a strategy game, I think thats a fair price for the amount of time you can put into this game. But to get more enjoyment out of your game, the DLC does bring new scenarios, new nations, and new elements to the game that really makes the game just that more dynamic. If you are looking for the whole set, I would recommend buying the Sid Meiers Civilization V: Complete Edition. Its standard price is $49.99, I would also recommend waiting for a price reduction either on Christmas or the Summer Steam Sale, or keep your eyes open for a Humble Bundle sale. Conclusion: While the game might be expensive I have personally put 219 hours into the game at this time, for me thats the mark of a good game (And having great replayability) , if you enjoy playing it enough that you hit the 200 hours mark. I have enjoyed the quality of the game, the game style, playing it with my friends and family, and enjoyed getting the various achievements. I highly recommend this game to anyone who has liked Civilization games in the past, and anyone who is looking for a strategy game to simply try out.
sad and bored;-;I can be GabeN, lord of the PC master race. I love the workshop. Other than that, good game, especially with the DLCs.
MVP Jekob;-;One... more... turn...
SilverAlchemic;-;I made a giant Death robot, and then an unoriginal comment. 10/10
Mitchell;-;The geniuses game, this game is all about strategy and patience, it's incredibly fun and will fill up all your free time, it doesn't require a super computer but looks amazing; this game is easy to pick up and learn and when you get better you can increase the difficulty. The multiplayer is absolutely amazing and I've had hours of fun with it although it seems to take a while for the AI to do it's turns in the higher rounds. The community is making the game even better, with thousands of mods hiding away in the workshop once you're done with all the standard stuff you can install extra mods and make the game even more enjoyable. Probably one of the best games I've ever owned. 10/10
Adolf Titler;-;Since its release, Civilization 5 has gone through a long period of developement to reach the point where it is today. If this were a review of the original game before the Brave New World expansion, then no, there is no way I could honestly reccomend this game. It was by no means a bad game beforehand, it was just that it felt somewhat incomplete and it couldn't stand alongside Sid Meier's previous releases. However, looking at the game after Brave New World was released and after it has been extensively updated, Sid Meier's Civilization 5 has truly become a game which just like its predecessors can stand the test of time. As a somewhat more casual gamer due to my time constraints, I really shouldn't like the Civilization series. But somehow I do manage to find the time to slot a few games in here and there. But yeah, I don't know what else to say about the game except that it's ing amazing, but you should get Brave New World, otherwise it kind of feels a bit incomplete.
Monsterclip4;-;The city state or Warshaw was more difficult to take over, than the Japanese empire. Ghandi uses nukes and George Washington is one sly S.O.B. 10/10
Stickydoggy;-;Amazing. A blast with friends. Conquering and crusading for your glorious nation and renaming every city something silly is one of the best things to happen to gaming. 10/10 would play again.
Portia;-;Amazingly fun game. Easy to get in to. Easy to lose track of time to aswell haha.
A Judgemental Waifu;-;I played it and gahndi nuked me
Axodox;-;Just. Awesome. Anyone who missed the humble bundle for this... you should be ashamed .
Raccoon Kin;-;I've invested 1/3 of my life into this game.
Blue Waffles;-;Best turn based game on the market. I'm Batman
Jordo;-;Go from being great friends to ing hating eachother. Would recommend
[ADAWG] NG;-;Its like crack. There.
NightFantom;-;Friendly AI prepared to backstab you at every turn. 11/10 would get fukt again.
Atahualpa;-;One More Turn
JeuDeTarot;-;I really like that part of oldest "sitcom" in history of game development... ). So, guys, just try and enjoy that stuff. If u will play with friends, u will find great timekiller and funny moments in that game. ). Civilization V back us to classic hexagons rather than Civ IV. It's first good sign. 2. Great multiplayer mode. 3. Great scenarios for lone wolves. 4. Extended settings for your own game. 5. Recommended by time. ). 6. Of course, i love that soundtrack. Great work by composers. 7. I think that game HAVE balance. All nations have own bonuses. Choice what u like and beat your opponents. 8. For newbies  easy to learn. Omg... It's just Civilization, what i can say more?! And... Only one bad sign i can say about Civ V  cropped release version... Because, if you want religion  you will need to buy DLC Gods & Kings... Nobody like that marketing politic. Cheers, Mazy.
Mattnub;-;Great depth of play. I still don't know what i'm doing.
Real Housewives of New Jersey;-;Fun game to just play with friends. Could be taken seriously if you're that hardcore I guess...
fista1;-;Note: This review is about Civilization V: Complete Edition. I will not describe the gameplay very deeply. I believe it was described many times in other reviews here on Steam and on many game sites. This game brings back the atmosphere that was in the good old RTS like Rise of Nations or Empire Earth. Choose the civilization you wanto to play as, then guide it from the ancient history to the near future. You can win by conquer every capital city on the map. If you are going to do that, you probably will have to kill everything that stands in your way and conquer all the cities on the way as well. However, there are more victory conditions than just conquer and kill everything. There are more peaceful ways to achieve victory. You can spread your culture to other civilizations. You can become a world leader. Or build a spacecraft and send it to Aplha Centauri. Thanks to this, the game is not only for bloodthirsty warmongers, but also for players who like to play as a peaceful lord. It's also more replayable. Another good point of Civ V is the opportunity of taking history in your hands and change it. What if Zulu was the first nation who sent their spacecraft to Alpha Centauri? Does it hear ridiculous to you? Or what if Napoleon didn't declared himself as the Emperor of France, but was elected as Leader of the World instead? Do you say that it's impossible? Not in this game. This is what I miss in newer games. The game is turn based, so you don't have to hurry. This makes the game relaxing. What makes it even more relaxing is the soundtrack, especially when you play as one of the Middle East civilizations. Another thing that I like about games like this is the fact that you can learn something by just playing them. Civilopedia, the in-game manual, contains informations not only useful for the gameplay, but also some historical facts. The other way to learn something is to create The Great Works of Arts. They can be produces by Great Writers, Musicians and Artists that are born in your empire. They are named by real persons and the works they create really existed. You can read excerpts from the books, hear parts from the songs and look at the paintings. Sure, you won't gain enough knowledge to teach at Oxford University, but it can raise an interest in you about these things. Well, at least it did in me. There weren't many games with such an impact on me, only Age of Empires II and Rome: Total War, as far as I can remember. I was able to lost myself while playing this game. Many times I told myself "Ok, I will play this for a few minutes". Then I looked at the clock and thought "Well, it's pretty late". I can fully recommend this game for anybody who likes to play strategies. "Sir, what will be it today?" "We are going for the space victory, James". "What civilization will you send to space, my lord?" "We will play as Morocco." After few days... "How is it going, sir?" "We are nearly done, my dear James. We have the most delegates in the world congress. The other nations are waging wars against eachother." "What ideology have you chosen, if I may ask you?" "We are following the Autocracy ideology." "Pardon my, my lord, but I am not sure if Autocracy is suitable for space victory." "Maybe it isn't, James. But we'll get an achievement for it if we win." "Oh, I understand. How much did you progress in your goal to win the science victory, sir?" "Just a few turns and our spacecraft will be ready. Then we will send it to space and we will be the winners. Just a few turns..."
vale @ dank mems;-;Lose the nuclear arms race to Ghandi 11/10 would play forever... IF I COULD
SpotterX;-;Great strategy game, looking forward to the next one in the series.
fromthedepthsbelow;-;Just...one... more...turn..... 11/10
Mister Captain;-;Very fun! Very real. I love how it is base on real civilizations. Buy it now! 5/5 uh... I don't know for this one so... 5/5 stars!
Schrdinger's CatDog Paradox;-;Amazingly time wasting game
K5TRL K4N3;-;What is there to say about this game? It's great in strategy, always allowing for choices on what kind of nation you want to lead with Policies, Research, Diplomacy... It would seem like there is always something new to discover, something new to learn, which is, in any game, awesome and something that makes games timeless and entertaining for a long time. but you wouldn't need me to tell you that, I'm hardly a strategy game pro. Besides being an awesome strategy game though, this game also chose to have this message of showing you how awesome humanity is with quotes and cinematics... just great stuff, really makes ya feel optimistic :D But all I can say is: Great Game. Of all the games you "need" to buy on Steam, this one is one of the best classics that still holds up time and time again.
The Gong Traveler;-;(NOTE: I played a lot more of this during the elongated time my internet was down) Sid Meier's Civ V is an awesome turn based stratergy game rich in content and only deepened by the vast collection of online mods. Gameplay is simple at first but surprisingly deep and addictive. You pick a leader, and you rule your country. You start with only a few units and anciet technology but soon amass yourself with large armies, and highly advanced mordern technology. Forging alliances with leaders is fun but the AI is rather idiotic at times and that can be troublesome, but it's only a small problem for such a well made game. 'Just one... more... turn''
Mystz;-;If there is one turn-by-turn strategy game to own, Civilization is the one to go for. The first episode was the game I spent more time on, until I discovered MMOs. This Vth episode is probably the best since then : complex, detailed and with plenty of different civilisations. A must have, more words aren't necessary.
Tony Abooooot;-;Its like Skyrim, but with Geroge Washinton.
Jesperhino;-;I reccomend this game because: - Much reality (civ's are pretty acurate) - Nice community (Mod support etc.) - Much fun (Multiplayer, play with friends) - Much rage (Wonders get stolen, JUST 1 TURN BEFORE YOU FINISH THEM) Watch out though, it's very addictive....
cindercock;-;Amazing game especially with friends. Best if you get the DLC.
Slappy Meals;-;I stay strokin to this game.
LazyNooblet;-;I think I like this game .... too much. :/
Wolfgang;-;Legend a Complete Legend! Everybody should play this game, one of my favorites:D
Lerat;-;good strategy game,it will consume time without you realizing
-akirea-;-;Very well-made game, can be played solo or with friends. Highly recommended unless you really like being productive. If you value being productive, then I would stay away since it's really addicting.
will be back on tuesday;-;Germany was talking . So i nuked them.
AjiMundi;-;Do not play this game! This game will create a dangerous local temporal anomaly if played for more than three turns. This game will make you loose hundreds of hours of your life that you will not even notice. For you it would be mere hours, and you will wonder if aliens had abducted you and erased your memory, cause that will be the only explanations for all those passing days you can't remember. But it's not the aliens, it's this game. So, do not play it! You have been warned. Now, excuse while I make just one more turn. I swear it will be just one more turn.
Isterdam;-;This is ing drugs man
MY MIND IS TELLING ME NO;-;Ghandi was my friend, I gave him Uranium, he changed sides and nuked me. 10/10 would get nuked by Ghandi again.
-akirea-;-;Very well-made game, can be played solo or with friends. Highly recommended unless you really like being productive. If you value being productive, then I would stay away since it's really addicting.
Odyssey;-;I sat down at 5:00pm and started to play this game. Dinner time came, and i passed up food so i could keep playing, 11:00pm roled around and I stayed up, the sun camp up and I stayed up to play some more....at 8:30am I realized Ive not only been playing for 19 hours without stopping, but i missed my first class....if you want a game to eat your soul and make your life a peace of crap.....please join me in my sadness!
Ya boi Franku;-;Well I was Gandhi and I blew everyone else the f*ck up.
[NS] iAmEco;-;Built a nuclear missile in 1870. 11/10 would logic again.
downranking;-;If you enjoy building your armies for glorious desolation, creating a nation of arts and music to shock the world to do your bidding, or seeking victory through the subtle manipulation and underminging of those who are your lesser, this game is for you. A fully captivating experience that is different every time. Play how you see fit and allow your nation to rise or fall on your choices. In short: Buy It.
will be back on tuesday;-;Germany was talking . So i nuked them.
TeaglesVsSoupy;-;This game is amazing, i have spent hours playing it. well worth the money.
Jesperhino;-;I reccomend this game because: - Much reality (civ's are pretty acurate) - Nice community (Mod support etc.) - Much fun (Multiplayer, play with friends) - Much rage (Wonders get stolen, JUST 1 TURN BEFORE YOU FINISH THEM) Watch out though, it's very addictive....
Dr. Bane;-;Like crack, but better.
RepublicErwinRommel;-;The only problem about this game is the amount of sleep you will lose due to getting addicted
MooPy;-;A game which brings you through time, start a civilization and build up your empire.Wars, science, economy ,culture and diplomacy , you will need to master all of these things to be able to conquer the world. Do you have what it takes?
TeaglesVsSoupy;-;This game is amazing, i have spent hours playing it. well worth the money.
Odyssey;-;I sat down at 5:00pm and started to play this game. Dinner time came, and i passed up food so i could keep playing, 11:00pm roled around and I stayed up, the sun camp up and I stayed up to play some more....at 8:30am I realized Ive not only been playing for 19 hours without stopping, but i missed my first class....if you want a game to eat your soul and make your life a peace of crap.....please join me in my sadness!
Galacticthreat;-;like skyrim with history -IGN
h0spitalfatbags;-;Had 2 cities, versus a civilization with easily 7. Duel map. They were technologically scores ahead of me. I mass produced Privateers and attacked their costal capital. Within 3 turns, Shaka offered 4 of his cities to me to end my onslaught. 10/10 Would force my privates in again.
DickScoper360;-;An Epic game where you learn to never to trust Ghandi!
The Shrekening;-;This game has consumed 400+ hours of my life. No regrets.
Big Brown Bear;-;If you want to keep your wife/family/job/grades/all of the aforementioned DO NOT BUY THIS GAME. Apart from that, 10/10.
BICEP CURL;-;Very good strategy game. Easy to learn hard to master.
Chinese Electric Batman;-;I.. I promise just one more turn and I'll go to bed
noibn;-;It's not like this game is so obscure that it actually needs a recommendation, but I thought I would add one from the perspective of someone who has never played a Civ game until #5. I grew up on PC games and could have easily played any of the previous versions, but for some reason just felt this wasn't really my type of thing. Well, it took 20 years or so, but I can finally admit I was wrong. It's a really fun and extremely addicting game. That said, there is definitely a bit of a learning curve for newbies. I really had no idea what I was doing at first, but eventually it all gels and you start to see why the series has been so popular. I have no idea how Civ 5 compares to previous games, but from personal experience, I can at least confirm that it's most definitely a good place to start for those new to the series. If you are like me and was never really sure if Civ was for you, I say give this a try. You'll probably be addicted before you know it. Just... one... more... turn... ;)
Le  Doge;-;One of the best strategies to date. I keep coming back to it, and killing some boredom. It's also a very good game to play with friends, and you can play with many friends on the same computer with Hotseat mode! It's really the best time-killer, even tough it gets boring after long sessions or in late game. I really really recommend it.
downranking;-;If you enjoy building your armies for glorious desolation, creating a nation of arts and music to shock the world to do your bidding, or seeking victory through the subtle manipulation and underminging of those who are your lesser, this game is for you. A fully captivating experience that is different every time. Play how you see fit and allow your nation to rise or fall on your choices. In short: Buy It.
perturbed_cupid;-;I mean like it's okay I guess idk
Ya boi Franku;-;Well I was Gandhi and I blew everyone else the f*ck up.
[NS] iAmEco;-;Built a nuclear missile in 1870. 11/10 would logic again.
PDMc11;-;Pure Awesomeness
Octodogs;-;I am new to Civ. I never played the old ones, only seen them played, so I'm fresh to the series, since I only recently acquired a PC capable of playing decent games. Civilization V is one of my favourite games in recent memory. I've spent well over 100+ hours playing it, and I am not tired yet. Each race and location adds an exciting change and its fun to attempt a victory in the many different ways you can in this game. But as I mentioned, I feel the game is well worth the money you spend, but I am also new to the series and have nothing to base this game on other than the fun I get from it. And from my perspective, this game is an instant classic.
xZaniity;-;Nuked the Middle-East as America. 10/10
BeaverGames;-;I have played this game for a long time and I still love playing it. Every time you start a game it is different and this game is great on your own but even better with friends. I suggest buying this game will the DLC as it does improve the game and it completes it.
Shero;-;Civilization V is a must buy for any turn-based strategy gamers out there. It allows you to grow a civilization of your choice through the ancient era all the way up to the information era, if you can survive until then that is. The vanilla game itself is decent but is lacking in some areas. I highly recommend buying the complete edition which includes two major dlcs; Gods and Kings and Brave New World, with some other small civilization and map dlcs.
TheDo0octor ;;-;Best strategy game on steam (Well... that i know of)
Hard Like Heroic;-;Civ5 is kind of like a sandwich. With all the ingredients, it's the best one you've had. Take out the mayo and cheese, and it's still tasty, but you feel no satisfaction.
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
Xenanigans;-;A game where you can accomplish nearly anything you want. Nuke people as Gandhi or become a scientific empire as Genghis (not necessarily advised). You can also backstab your allies or let them inevitably backstab you (two turns later). Ultimately, you can play as 43 different civilizations with multiple ways to win, so try it!
Croaker;-;I get sidetracked, every game. I am determined to convert the world to Judaism. So when I see the AI has started sending missionaries, I go to war. I cannot stop myself. One game, I did convert Germany to the Judaism (YAY). Then Ghadni started sending some missionaries over. This was in the latter parts of the game. I had not built nukes, but Ghandi had. This was my first play through, I did not know that Ghandi has no qualms vaporizing cities with fireballs hotter than the sun. All jews perished that day, at the hand of Ghandi.
Lain23;-;I once woke up, played this game for the whole day, went to bed, and the game wasn't even three-quarters finished. 10/10.
Loki;-;Its like history class in a video game. 9.5/10. Loses half a point because of the limitations on modability.
Enzo Wangg #wheresDavidFlorero;-;wtf is dis  gaimmme i just attack mad beches and like no help from mah bois 0/rediculus
Dizzylizzy~;-;Just look at the amount of hours I've spent playing it
Seor Dingus;-;One of the best games I've ever played. Addictive, fun, and great with friends. Just watch the clock, or you'll find you spent 4 hours when you just wanted to play for five minutes.
Ganondorf;-;Hours of endless stress and strategy, probably the best non-competetive microcosmic strat out there.
Cable Guy;-;Its really really really really adictive in a good way
MuffinBaskets;-;Had a peaceful alliance with Gandhi until he nuked me. 101/10 would lose capital again
qaxaq (Arkan);-;It's good.
Roger;-;Well then, the time has finally come to review what has occupied my life for the past months. Oh Civ 5, how I underestimated you this past summmer when I saw your GOTY edition on steam. How I was hesitant to buy you and thought your gameplay was boring. If only I knew... I bought this game out of pure review score, which of course -being a 90- I assumed was something special. As many of the steam games that are bought during sales do, it sat on my library quite some time while I was busy murdering Teemos on the Fields of Justice. When I finally got tired of that, I decided to check this game out, so I double clicked on the icon, and went into the game with little to no prior knowledge of what lay in store ahead. I booted up the tutorial, grabbed my water and said, "Well Civ 5, do your worst." I was greeted by a Morgan Freeman like voice, telling me about America and its past, along with some facts about George Washington. This narrator got me so pumped up; the combination of music, the epic dialouge, the VOICE, mother of god THE VOICE, I had so many goosebumps running over my body that I could hardly contain myself! And then I did it, I pressed Begin Your Journey, little did I know this would take me above and beyond what I believed was a true gaming experience. It started out simple, a settler and a warrior unit, and some lady telling me to found a city. I plop it down and start producing a monument, moving my warrior around and reasearching pottery. I found my neighbor soon after, the Incas, and I was greeted by a stunning display screen with a great voice actor and interface. Soon enough I had made a Declaration of Friendship and one thing led to another and all I remember was me saying just....one....more....turn. I ended up playing the tutorial for ~6 hours straight. Yes. 6 HOURS ON THE TUTORIAL, AND IT WAS GLORIOUS. I ended up panicking and  at the fact that I could not save my progress, but I digress, it was the tutorial after all. Nowadays I find myself using my spare hours to play this meth like game. My grades were rekt, my relationships were rekt, my reading life was rekt, my League career was rekt and my plans to play Bioshock Infinite were REKT. All in all I give this game a 20/10 and reccomend you pick it up now that it will be dirt cheap with the summer sale, only and only IF you would like to have some -Ghandi nuking you, Would you like to make a trade agreement with ENGLAND, cursing that damned jungle king Monty, and OH MY GOD THAT WOUNDER WAS ONE FREAKING TURN AWAY FROM BEING BUILT I JUST WASTED 25 DAYS OF PRODUCTION AND ONLY GOT A MEASLY 100 GOLD SANIADSUFLUDSBASFJDSBFJSFDSLFA- filled afternoons then this is the game for YOU! Life Status: rekt  | not rekt  | Tyrannosaurus rekt
Retalak;-;Started playing tutorial at 12AM. What feels like 45 minutes later, I check the time. 5AM. I think I've found an actual time traveling device. 11/10 would McFly through space and time again. Many more hours in: Just one more turn. One more turn. More turns.... Turns.......................
Tyramath;-;this game is fun, but its kinda boring if you are not playing a conquering-through-conquest type of gameplay which is the only way i can sit through a game, but its very addictive and i found myself almost 36 hours awake when i finally crashed XD. WARNING: this game is the biggest time bandit i have ever known. Recommendation: play with an egg timer XD
The Lone Pickle;-;i choose rome and started playing i set it to earth because i thought the land mass thing wood be pretty cool. i set up my town and start production. i get a worker and cut down some trees, i send my warriors into a ruin, i discovered aminal husbandry. For 30 minutes i danced then proceeding to train some. I found a city state. immedlitaly warred it and damned it to hell. I then did another 30 minute dance. after that i starting adopting more poilcys, building more ttowns and being a huge  to the other civs. At the medivel era i had 15 towns and was 500 points farther than the 2nd place civ. I was resaerching musketmen already. 3 hours of hard work later i wiped 3 civs and 6 city states and had 36 towns. after i finished dancing i decieded that i would finish the game 2morrow. i hit the exit button and forgot to save. i lost 6 hours of gameplay and roughly 3 and half hours of dancing. 10/10 i'd do it again,
Jerry Chan/Carlos;-;Amazing Never get bored of it Brave new world is amazing
Patronus;-;This game is well made, awesome graphics, decent AI, and so many options for ccustomizing your experience!
EagleEye;-;just an advise to you my friends: attack gandhi and siam when they are weak. Those ing backstabbers
Victim [I am back];-;ing Gandhi nukes everyone. take him out first 9/11 would fly again
Ryucchang();-;After all, one of the best games of all time.
Science Dog;-;Simply amazing. Being able to beat the game from numerous vantage points along MANY different civs on countless maps/sizes adds to replayability. Love it to death!
LucastheBird;-;The only game where my internet will support online play, it being fun is just a bonus.
Kaellrus;-;Alright so I just finished my first game of Civ 5. I decided to play the Babylonians. My people settled along a river, no doubt reminescent of the fertile crescent, and situated in the middle of a jungle. Early on in the game, it gave me the option for my first social policy. When I was looking at them all, I decided that a scientific people like the Babylonians would have no interest to be bogged down by tradition or resort to superstitions or religions, so that meant I would go down Liberty or Honor. I always imagined the Babylonians as a rather honorable people so I decided that I would go down the path of honor. The game even rewarded me with the title of "Nebuchadnezzar II the Great." Okay, great, so I noticed that a few of my neighbors (Assyria, Persia, and Greece) were expanding a bit aggressively towards me and encroaching upon my great people's sovereign lands and areas to roam and I decided to put a stop to this. Using the might of the famed Babylonian Keshiks (bestowed upon us by the benevolent city-state of Ur), I conquered and annexed their lands so that my people might know further glory. Around the year A.D. 1950 I was given the choice of an ideology while within the late industrial era. I chose the ideology of Order so that the many comrades that now lived under my banner could be more productive and efficient in their works. We Babylonians do not tolerate any tomfoolery amongst our working class. The game went on until the year A.D. 3000 when I finally won a culture victory against the remaining nations of Arabia, the Zulus, and the Moroccans (Morocco conquered the poor nation of the Songhai) and the world would forever know the great poetry and works of the honorable and orderly Babylonians lead by Captain Nebuchadnezzar II. tl;dr it's a pretty good game
The Dead Lincolns;-;Tricked friend into trading city for extra luxury resource 10/10
Generic White Kid;-;Great game normally when i want to get off i cant because its just so addicting. The game can last forever there is hardly a chance that you will finish a game in one day even if you do a quick match.
P0RNHUB.KATIE;-;A fantastic turn-based strategy. You'll be stuck for hours. A must play for tbs fans
Chip Dickory;-;https://youtu.be/5ygKd5oxoSU If its good enough for Ice-T, Its good enough for anyone. 10/10
LegoLink11;-;Peace is for hippies and pacifists! Nuke the s! -Gandhi
Cockwaddle;-;This game is my existence and I would commit bloody murder against anyone who would take it away from me
Mil Fio;-;Next to Super Smash Bros. best way to show your friends who's boss.
TheChemicalBerry;-;This game is one of the best time-wasters out in the market! The fact that you can also mod the game is amazing! Its a must get game!!!
Mikhai;-;Bad  strategy game.
The Pirate Duck;-;Awesome game, though lacks features that were in the previous games.
Meatbird;-;Ty's Fat
Papa  Dragon;-;Bit of a bangout game, Science Science Science is all really.
wessi;-;Very civilized game.
DON'T TOUCH ME I'M STERILE;-;This is an amazing and very well-made game. All of the aspects in the game (such as production) are linked to each other (building the great library for science, building a worker for happiness, etc) in such a way that every choice you make will shape the outcome of the game. It also offers wide range of potential playing styles, so that no matter what mood you're in you still want to play the game. Because of this, it has amazing replay value and appeals to a large amount of people. 9/10 (the multiplayer is weird) 0/10 if you're playing with Ghandi's AI.
ericpickles69;-;Got the Great Library first. Gave my friends Crabs. 10/10
snake docter 1;-;best game i have played in a long time but say good bye to your life
Skoomasteve;-;I Have almost all the Civ Games and they are all similar but have their own feel. Civ IV is my personal favorite but civ V is a close second!
Dan [greuceanu];-;The BEST strategy game I have played I must say! I must warn you it's an addictive game, the most addictive I have ever played, but in the same time always a pleasure playing it. It's a must buy, and I give it 10/10.
Alixei Kashi Maru Dono;-;I love playing Civ V. Graphics are great, though there are some loading issues and sometimes slow game progression. The new additions from CIV IV are really good and adding some mods helps bring back some of the removed content.
Jattack;-;The only game where Genghis Khan, George Washington, Queen Elizabeth I, Atilla the Hunn, Caesar and Napoleon can decide to attack you. You think NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO! I was doing so well. But then Gandhi pops up on your screen declaring war and you see Nuclear Missiles destroying your empire, which has existed since the start of civilization. You know you won't last long. So you just sob quietly in a corner. And revert to earlier save. Only realising you saved while at war.
Norwegian - On Vacation;-;> Start first game > Do a lot of  > Get uranium > Gandhi wants your uranium > You give Gandhi uranium > Gandhi nukes you TL;DR: Play as Gandhi, and everything will be good. (In case you're not playing as Gandhi, never trust Gandhi, and try to kill him as fast as possible. He acts like your friend, but he's the real backstabber.) Oh and also, Gandhi is a warmongering piece of .
Subject ()ma;-;I have played this game so much that I have wasted a month of my life on this game but in parallel I have conquered the world as the British the Americans The Russians the Germans the Morracans and the list goes on and on screw the other victory conditions all I want to do is conquer everyone as everyone so my journey may never be complete in that regard.
HappyMask;-;One of the best games I've every played. Highly addictive. Must play. If you think you won't like it, you're wrong. So very, very wrong.
Gaffar;-;Much strategic strategy 10/2 - bad game IGN
Duck;-;Great game.
ThundyTheFilthyFuckingWeabooShit;-;>le me playing civ 5 at 5am >have madoka magica mod on >I'm god madoka >start the church of madoka >gets rid of Catholicism and Buddhism for madoka >everybody's friendly no fights >on turn 500 or something >homura asks for uranium >I give it to her >she pairs up with devil homura >they nuke everyone together >we all die 10/10 homura did nothing wrong
asian hunk lookin for gf;-;YOU CAN'T INVADE INDIA THEY TOLD ME, YOU'LL NEVER NUKE FRANCE THEY SAID. WELL WHO'S LAUGHING NOW?! AMERICA  THATS WHO
Princess shadow;-;LOVE THIS GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! i have played this game a few times and got into it straight away, fun to play with friends, if you love games where you command a civilization then this is the game for you. eevee gamers know all so you should listen to us
Dan;-;Achievement #1 Never been nuked by Gandhi Rule #1 of Civ 5 Always nuke Gandhi
mopfood;-;this game is one of the most intricate games on steam. before i go any further, just because it is an intricate game doesnt mean it is an amazing game. Civ v is a strategy game that allows you to control, nurture, and grow your own civilization. you compete against other civilizations, computer controlled or player controlled, for the strongest empire in the game. the game gets this part spot on. it allows you to make your empire any stlye you want, whether military, production, tourism, and many more. it allows you to build anything significant that has been in history. now, when you look past all the creativeness and choice you have in the game, you'll find it very, how do you say, ordinary. other than the realistic historical storyline that you follow and the option to choose what you want to build, the game breaks down to a 2D tile scroller where you command your pieces to move, attack, build, etc. this is the main process of the game. the game will "allow" you choices like what you want to discover, whether archery of the wheel, but in the end it doesnt matter what you choose, because for the game to progress you must, in the end, choose both to discover. and while you are allowed to choose what to build and who to attack, it is so tedious to do these things you wont want to do them. for instance, if you want to attack the empire next to you, first you must make some warriors, which takes numerous turns. then, you must move the warrior piece to attack position, which takes even more turns. now, to conquer the city next to you, it takes 10 warriors. see the dilemma? by the time you conquer that city, you will want to quit the game, lay in your bed, and think about your life decisions. overall, this games pros and cons balance themselves out. only buy this game if its on sale.
AlienAnt;-;Me and gahndi were friends, then he asked for money and i said no. He nuked me, HARD. 5000/10 :)
moonpockets;-;The only thing that kept Bismarck from declaring war on me was because I was giving him such good trade offers which he said were "Bringing our nations closer together." What were these offers you may ask? I gave him 0 gold per turn for nothing on his part.
Stangle Khan;-;Pros: It's fun Cons: You're life is over
BoosBoi911;-;>Friends say Civ 5 is amazing game >Is puzzled by their sense of wonderment towards the game >Tries game for first time, DX10 crashes multiple times > :( >Fixes crashing >Plays huge world map as Rome >Conquers Sweden during Ancient Era in South America >Attempts to take over the city-state of Valletta in Chile >Loses all military units >Comes back much later with trebuchets and archers >Destroys Valletta >Spain and China freak out and denounce me >Coalition forms globally and the rest of the game everyone is either guarded or hostile towards me >Bismark becomes only friend >420 rekts Spain and China in North America >Spam s of Battleships and develops biggest navy in the world >360 noscopes Russia, Japan, France, England, Arabia >Builds ~20 nuclear missiles using captured Uranium mines >Bismark flips his  and declares war >Commence German version of Fallout 3 >Nuke Berlin and othe cities into the ground >Realize I've spent the entire day on Civ 5 >Finally realize what my friends meant 9/11 would nuke my only friend 20 times and take over the world again
Depotato;-;I've had this game since December 2014 (4738 hours) and in that time I've spent 928.7 hours playing civ, 928.7/4738~~20% of my time playing civ Help me...
Muwumb;-;I don't care how big of a warmonger penalty you get; ELIMINATE GANDHI WHILE HE IS WEAK.
Ellie;-;My friends say I take too long with my turns
Atheist McClellan;-;The game is amazing but the only problem is the DLCs are too expensive.
Benpie;-;Plays with a friend against AI Plays as America and friend plays as Russia With the help of friend becomes most advanced civilisation beating the AI by 2 whole eras and reach the modern era in the 19th century Friend makes massive army and declares war on every other civilisation I become most inactive ally since italy in WW1 and WW2 Friend conquers most of the map with only two civilisations left and having enough happiness to keep all cities he claimed, whilst i struggle to maintain happiness with my own cities. Produce atomic bombs Friend nukes my capital (Washing town) I wait patiently for next turn so i get two nukes and ignores war with AI civilisations Next turn arrives and i nuke his capital doing more damage than him Begins to lose connection with friend Next turn arrives and friend wins cultural victory 10/10 would wage war against AI and ignore them later
Lazyspartan;-;I'll review this game right after I finish this turn.
iVeck {ShameSauce};-;Digital crack.
torster2;-;Civilization V is an absolutely massive game. The DLC gives you lots of stuff to play around with, and I recommend that you get the Complete Edition, with all of the DLC's but after you get bored of the official stuff, or even before you're bored of the official stuff, you can get mods! If you don't know how expansive the mod community of Civ V is, then just check out the Steam Workshop for Civ V. That's only a small part of the mods available for Civ V, you just have to jump in and start playing!
DogtagKewsor;-;I conquered the world as Sweden 10/10
Jake from State Farm #Kappa;-;Does your child stay up to strange hours of the night? Does your child talk about "improving faith" or "culture bombing"? THESE MAY BE SIGNS OF CIVILIZATION V ADDICTION Civ is a very serious drug, it captivates the user for long hours, forcing them to want "just one more turn" Together, we can stop it. TALK TO YOUR KIDS ABOUT CIV BEFORE SOMEONE ELSE DOES
Miasmus;-;Musics and Quotes are incredible. Civilization 5 is not just a game.
Nox DObber;-;For a guy that talked about peace, Gandhi nukes me too many times.
Goalie;-;What would happen if I took I paradox game and babbyfied it to the max? Civ is the answer.
Falacu;-;This is my favorite strategy game on PC. Highly recommended!
Greystark;-;This is game is one of the most fun games that i have ever played, good for strategy game junkies, or for people who are just looking for a fun game to play. By the way, if you are going to get the game, get the gold edition. You'll save a ton of money. 11 uncooked weiners/10 uncooked weiners
Pete [I'm back!];-;Oh Civilization V, what a masterpiece you are. Most of you who are interested in this game probably don't know the series. But Sid Meier's Civilization dates back to the 1991 and has span a long time. The second most recent was Civilization IV, a game most fans are calling a masterpiece. With it's advanced gameplay, not fully broken diplomacy and a good mod community it was destined for greatness. Then this came a long. Civilization V is an amazing game. You'll be leading a Civilization through all of human history (And even the future) looking at how your civilization progresses. Will you wage war, and be a war mongler the world fears? Will you lead in science, and be the first to launch to a diferent world? Will you have all of the world succumb to your civilization's greatness? All of this is up to you. You have full freedom of what you want to do within the game. And it benefits from it. Since you can do whatever you want, you end up with fun scenarios, intensity, and essentialy some very satisfying gameplay. The visuals and the overall presentation is good as well. You get a very good cultural appropiate soundtrack while you're playing as a specific civilization, which is very neat. The best is especially the in-game rendered diplomacy screens. Where you will stand face to face with the leader you're discussing with. It is amazing the first time, and it's still awesome the 561th time. The only thing I'm dissapointed with is the AI. in the game. They tend to either be passive, or be down-right agressive. However there are mods fixing this, and you can always play multiplayer against/with other people. Which is a lot of fun in it self. The base-game is already a worth-while purchase, but can you afford it I'd suggest getting Gods and Kings as well as Brave New World. Both expansions add a lot to the vanilla game, and I personally can't go back to the normal experience. All in all, this is a must buy for any strategy gamer, whatever if one's casual or hardcore. You'll be spending a lot of fun re-(or just creating) historic events. Get this game as soon as you can, no doubt about it.
Zakilados;-;I love to conqure the world lol
Dorgarr;-;It is hard to walk away from this game. I am always paranoid that my civilisation will crumble when I go for a snack. Even if it's just for a second! I end up hoarding all of the resources necessary for my survival in my room before I build my empire, in which, as it happens, I do the same thing. That being said, it breaks immersion when there are no archers waiting to fend off invaders from my room.
Mengy;-;Just one more turn.... Civ 5 plus both expansions is the best Civilization to date in my opinion. Great user interface, best tactical combat of the series, fantastic looking graphics wise, and most importantly very fun and addicting. All eras now seem wonderfully fleshed out (thanks to the expansions) and the game now feels as complete as Civ 4 did wth Beyond the Sword.
Yenniku;-;this game taught me that Ghandi IRL was an
Otman;-;Very fun game to play, if you are into a turn-based strategy game that can take up to hours to complete. then Civilization V is the game for you. you can choose different paths to win the game, if it's increasing your culture or researching new technology's you will always be watching your back for other civilizations who might attack you out of jealousy or hate. Very addictive game that can keep you entertained for hours, a must buy strategy game.
Brian Is God;-;This is practiclly Holocaust Simulator 2015
BigYesh;-;It is Civilization.
littleagentz;-;Good however needs dlc to be any good.
mzm777;-;This game is the bee's knees 10/10
Zegon;-;An all around fantastic 4X RTS game, Civilization V, once it has the two major expansions (Gods & Kings and Brave New World) is an amazingly engulfing game. So much of it is designed to pull you in and keep you wishing to advance your empire one more turn. Winning the game can be completed multiple ways with large or small empires, and on higher difficulties victory can be a mad dash to the finish. Combat is fun, and offers enjoyment in outwitting your opponent, or holding off large waves of enemies at a choke point. The units are are crafted in high detail, and each civilization plays a slightly different way, letting you try a vast array of different strategies. The game is not without its faults, however. The biggest of these issues is the AI, which can be confusing or downright moronic. Additionally, while the shift to tactical-styled combat is a nice change of pace in the series, the AI doesn't seem to grasp how to make the most of its units and can make obvious tactical blunders with startling regularity. The game's netcode and stability are also questionable at times once larger maps come into play, but when it is working play is smooth and almost seamless from one turn to the next. All in all, an excellent game in a series full of well-made games.
Mengy;-;Just one more turn.... Civ 5 plus both expansions is the best Civilization to date in my opinion. Great user interface, best tactical combat of the series, fantastic looking graphics wise, and most importantly very fun and addicting. All eras now seem wonderfully fleshed out (thanks to the expansions) and the game now feels as complete as Civ 4 did wth Beyond the Sword.
Yenniku;-;this game taught me that Ghandi IRL was an
Zegon;-;An all around fantastic 4X RTS game, Civilization V, once it has the two major expansions (Gods & Kings and Brave New World) is an amazingly engulfing game. So much of it is designed to pull you in and keep you wishing to advance your empire one more turn. Winning the game can be completed multiple ways with large or small empires, and on higher difficulties victory can be a mad dash to the finish. Combat is fun, and offers enjoyment in outwitting your opponent, or holding off large waves of enemies at a choke point. The units are are crafted in high detail, and each civilization plays a slightly different way, letting you try a vast array of different strategies. The game is not without its faults, however. The biggest of these issues is the AI, which can be confusing or downright moronic. Additionally, while the shift to tactical-styled combat is a nice change of pace in the series, the AI doesn't seem to grasp how to make the most of its units and can make obvious tactical blunders with startling regularity. The game's netcode and stability are also questionable at times once larger maps come into play, but when it is working play is smooth and almost seamless from one turn to the next. All in all, an excellent game in a series full of well-made games.
Ebbsy;-;This is the main reason way i got a steam account to play civ 5 an amazing game
BubbleGrump;-;Probably the best game I've ever played, very addictive fun with mates :)
Otman;-;Very fun game to play, if you are into a turn-based strategy game that can take up to hours to complete. then Civilization V is the game for you. you can choose different paths to win the game, if it's increasing your culture or researching new technology's you will always be watching your back for other civilizations who might attack you out of jealousy or hate. Very addictive game that can keep you entertained for hours, a must buy strategy game.
Metro;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is really one of the best strategy games of the genre and the best of its series. Clocking in countless hours, I still find myself frequently playing the game and still discovering new content and strategies that only add more depth to the game. Graphics + Detailed enviroments and units + Beautiful terrain and water Gameplay + Dozens of civilizations to play as with unique units and traits + Hours of features that bring you back to play + Not to diffucult of a learning-curve + Easy to set up multiplay that allows you to play easily with friends - Buggy multiplayer Overall this is one of the best games I have in my library and one of the best I have ever played. I also recommend others in the series as they add their own unique spin on the genre and provide even more unique gameplay. 9/10
makiri;-;Lose days playing this game pretty sure I now live in the year 2050
PapaFrancis;-;WOOOOOOOO CIV 5 ---- BEST GAME 2010 ---- BONER!!!
Metro;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is really one of the best strategy games of the genre and the best of its series. Clocking in countless hours, I still find myself frequently playing the game and still discovering new content and strategies that only add more depth to the game. Graphics + Detailed enviroments and units + Beautiful terrain and water Gameplay + Dozens of civilizations to play as with unique units and traits + Hours of features that bring you back to play + Not to diffucult of a learning-curve + Easy to set up multiplay that allows you to play easily with friends - Buggy multiplayer Overall this is one of the best games I have in my library and one of the best I have ever played. I also recommend others in the series as they add their own unique spin on the genre and provide even more unique gameplay. 9/10
Beaches;-;Settle a city Get your first worker Barbarians steal them Lose game.
makiri;-;Lose days playing this game pretty sure I now live in the year 2050
PapaFrancis;-;WOOOOOOOO CIV 5 ---- BEST GAME 2010 ---- BONER!!!
PronePrune25455;-;This game is not good without the expanionpacks. With the expanions this game is worldclass 10/10 would play forever
Chandan;-;Wow this game is addicting as . Civ 5 will consume hours of your life at a time if you do not pay attention. Improves in many areas of the old Civ games with updated graphics and music. Cool and interesting DLC just keeps adding to this game to make it relevant for years to come. If you ever wanted to rule the world or turn it upside down with a different dictator now is the time grab this game! Final score 9/10
NoodleNose;-;Meh, it's ok.
(NRP) Old Gregg;-;A very complex game that has a slight curving point for noobs. Though it takes a while to master it, it is still by all means my favorite game. The things I like about it: It has very fun scenarios such as the American Civil War, Scramble for Africa, and the Fall of Rome to name a few. There are a lot of countries to choose and master. It takes true strategy you can't just build a city and say you'll win (You probably won't with that overconfidence). A very good wide variety of maps too choose from. The multiplayer is amazing except for the fact that if you go to war with another human player you have to play in sequential order. The graphics are quite astonishing aswell. The things I dislike about it: There are no multiplayer Scenarios. :( Overall I give this game a 9.5/10 Please leave any critizism in the comments. Thanks! :D
Scabbers;-;I bang of this game, i love quirky dialogue and getting bumed is also fun, back to the game, i love it with all my heart and it has almost infinite replayability and it has found a place in my eye. And with add on packs such as Gods and Kings, layers upon layers of pure golden gameplay (See what I did there) are added into the game, I would recommend this to anyone who doesnt have any mental issue, or is crazy in the head (You know the head im talking about). Anyway its a great bangable game and It will stay in my steam library for ever and ever and i might do a jiggle with it.
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
ParkerAS;-;Buy this, and say goodbye to a couple weeks of your life every few months.
Legendary Chicken;-;Worth Every Penny
WashingtoN;-;Gandhi has now declared war on you! 10/10
Magmabolt;-;its even better than 2 potato's! 10/10 would buy again!
XYZ Dragon Crayon;-;This is the est ing game I've ever ing seen. Jesus ing Christ, the turn-based "strategy" is the most god-forsakingly awful thing I've ever endured. I've been in waiting rooms more interesting than this.
Sog;-;Why is Germany right beside China?! And I'm pretty sure Gandhi would not have wanted to make those nuclear warheads in real life, just saying.
Jack Of Spades;-;Fun for all the family (and friends (actually primarily friends (actually this really isnt fun for all the family (it'll make you hate each other, and everyone knows, you only want to hate your friends))))!
Grozny;-;Worth it if you Gods & Kings and Brave New World.
Sengma;-;I have played this game so much that i lost my job, my wife left with kids and my monkey. I said take the kids but you leave me my monkey, unfortunately my wife took my monkey which i was gonna feed bananas to, i've got a surplus of bananas so i've got that going for me which is nice. But gethis 3 years later it turned out that my wife was having an affair with my monkey so i was heart broken and ofcourse the bananas had gone rotten, all in all this is a great game, but you should note that i loved my monkey he was like my best friend and now he's with my ex-wife, so i found a new friend he's called oscar the chicken, he wasn't as friendly as my monkey but he did taste good.
Corinthian;-;If your looking for a review on this game you've come to the wrong place, but if your looking for an outstanding pie recipe you've come to the right place. Ingredients: 1. 6 tablespoons unsalted butter 2. 1/2 cup white sugar 3. 1/2 cup brown sugar 4. 1/4 cup water 5. 1/4 teaspoon cinnamon 6. 1 pinch salt 7. 5 apples - peeled, cored and sliced 8. 1 pastry for double-crust pie Directions: 1. Preheat oven to 425 degrees F (220 degrees C). 2. Combine butter, white sugar, brown sugar, water, cinnamon, and salt in a saucepan over medium heat. Bring to a boil, remove from heat and set aside. 3. Roll out half the pastry to fit a 9-inch pie plate. Place bottom crust in pie plate; pour in apple slices. 4. Roll out top crust into a 10-inch circle. Cut into 8 (1-inch) wide strips with a sharp paring knife or pastry wheel. Weave the pastry strips, one at a time, into a lattice pattern. Fold the ends of the lattice strips under the edge of the bottom crust and crimp to seal. 5. Pour butter-sugar mixture over top of pie, coating the lattice, and allowing any remaining sauce to drizzle through the crust. 6. Bake in the preheated oven for 15 minutes. Reduce heat to 350 degrees F (175 degrees C), and bake until the crust is golden brown, the caramel on the top crust is set, and the apple filling is bubbling, 35 to 40 more minutes. Allow to cool completely before slicing.
Creasy;-;A very relaxing game to play, once those achievements start racking up it becomes very addictive. The multiplayer takes the game to a whole new level as well either playing against friends or on the same team.
Gabrielis(Jiabi);-;This game is a unique strategy game with original ideas and features and it's verry joyful; also you meet legendary people who ruled different countries from different era's, this game and concept of it it's just amazing, recommand !
gorshborsh;-;Amazing strategy game! It is the -child of AOE II and Starcraft, even though it is turn-based. I would highly reccommend playing with a group of friends as playing AI can get monotonous, however it is still very enjoyable. Don't feel bad if you lose on higher difficulties though, it will happen often before you find your favorite civ and play-style.
Danny;-;addicting
TheDwemerComrade;-;A great game. You control a country of your choice with a historical ruler and it puts you in a randomly generated map where you develop your civilization. Construct buildings, research technologies, recruit units and interact with other nations while trying to achieve either a military, cultural or science victory. I would definetly reccomend to those who are fans of strategy games.
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
shakyjimy;-;Ver good Game, Im addicted
Ted_Talks;-;Lost countless hours to this game. Would reccomend.
HoboSlayers;-;By far one of the greatest strategy games of all time, the addictive nature of Civ is in its unique ability to completely invest you into the civilization you create and grow. Through violent conquest or peaceful cunning, the game's near infinite number of ways to be played adds a replayability unrivaled by any game before it save some modern FPS's. As one of my top 5 games of all time, I cannot recommend this game enough.
Hot Wine;-;This game ruins friendships... 10/10
stevodog;-;Fun game. A strategy with a turn based system, gamers that enjoy slower pace should go for this game. 8/10
rant2087;-;Very awesome strategy game a must have for anyone
Tamerland.' vienie schnitzie;-;Words cant describe how much I love this game... But numbers can: 8/10
Employee#427;-;Another installation in the Civ series, and a fantastic one at that. I just don't see how anybody could hate this game. It's a polished version of the amazing Civ IV. Great job Sid Mier! I doubt you will see this review, but keep up the good work! 101st hour Edit... I regret nothing
Square;-;Played all difficulties up to Immortal Played Diety A city state took my city 10/10 Would get wrecked again
Costanza;-;Best strategy game
Vae;-;This game is addictive as hell! If you will buy it you will spend the crazy amount of hours to play it. Just alone or with friends. This is this type of game which you can play many many times and will be always different. I have played only very old Civ 2 which was amazing game. But Civ V is just must have for people who love the strategy games. Just buy it. You won't regeret it.
Flapjack Attack;-;Civilization V is the first game I played in the Civilization series, recommended by my friends. The game slowly robs you of your time, absorbing you into its' gameplay, until five hours have gone by and you've gone from trying to not be overrun by barbarians to blasting foreign cities with cannons while building the Lourve. Brave New World made the mid-game a lot more interesting and balanced, and it's fun finding which nations suit your play style (burying your problems in gold, researching faster than everyone else, converting everyone to your religion, etc.). In my first playthrough, I was a militaristic Japanese nation who nuked Washington D.C. for some meta humor. 10/10
C.G.B. Spender;-;Aquire Christendom, spread it to all and conquer the world by holly rights. A laugh and a half.
Adolf Melon;-;just all around fun game to play when you are in the mood to be nuked by ghandi 10/10
PANEER GOD;-;A wonderful game to waste away hours on. So many possibilities and strategies to learn, all played at your own pace. This is a great improvement on previous Civs, totally worth the money 100%.
JacobTberry | trade.tf;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a game that will keep you intrigued and entertained for hours on end, be warned, however, that this game EATS time. The tutorial itself is eight hours long. With both the base game and DLC the game never feels repetitive and is always entertaining.
(   );-;10/10 would nuke Ghandi again.
[GG] Hfdej;-;I really really REALLY like this game!! My friends forced me to play Starcraft II... it was good but i thought it should go slower and this is more relaxing so its perfekt!!
Fumi Duck;-;It's a really good game without and add-ons. It's an even better game with just Gods and Kings. It's an amazing game with A Brave New World. I reccomend it for single player, and I especially reccomend it if you want to have a fun game with friends (Or even a bloody war). It's a game filled with Alliances, Betrayals, and most of all Barbarians. I definitely reccomend it.
Lionel Messi;-;Don't play this game before you go to bed.
COCO;-;Great game, its very fun planning attacks on places and I love the multiplayer! 5 Out Of 5 Stars!
Mrshortzi;-;Great game. started playing at 12PM. When i stopped it was 11 pm. Just dont play before anything important then you will be fine.
Vladimir Toot-in;-;Its Amazing
Gian;-;Brilliant game, a must play even if you don't like eagle eye strategy games! If you're bored just whack this one it'll make 10 hours go by fast!
Blur;-;The game is very fun and can keep you busy. It is laid out very well and generaly a fantastic game
Milk;-;I have no idea what all the fuss is about, Ghandi is a push over. but don't get me started on them Ottomans! friends the entire game, deals in their favour and gold gifts when they are in need of assistance. but i nuke one enemy city and ooooo i'm power hungry and need to be taken care of.
Astero;-;There's something about taking over Tamriel with celestia as your long time ally, then suddenly the penisface city states declare war on me. time to break out the tsar bombs again...
Hickery;-;you should buy this computer game
Potion Seller;-;It is a good game. Prepare to spend hours on one game, but it is totally worth it.
Nero;-;Good game, worth it. Stays true to the Civ legacy while also innovating itself! Enjoying it a lot!
Alexithymia;-;This game was definitely worth the money. A game without an ending, it can be played for hours without end. Can't wait to buy the next game!
SpanZotab;-;By far, my most played game on steam. I have ruled the world many a time and I shall again many more times thanks to this amazing game.
[P.P.R.] Air is Light;-;I would definitely have to say that I thoroughly enjoy Civilization V. Civ 5 is up in my top ranked games, and many reasons got it there. One would be the fact that you can see your own civilization progress through the ages, which I find to be a very interesting concept. Should I list all of the reasons in this review, it would be a good 5 pages long, so instead, I'm just going to say that I highly recommend this game, just make sure that you have the patience for it. Finally, as I'm sure has been said in most reviews, I would say that although this game is great, like an actual empire, it takes the collaboration of all of the components to work swimmingly, that being said in simpler terms, this game is only worth it with all of the DLC that is available for purchase. It may be a sum of extra money for some, but it will be worth it in the end. If you are a bargain hunter though, then wait until a huge sale, such as the summer or winter sale, and get the game with all of the DLC for less than the price of the game alone when it's not on sale. That's all from me, so happy gaming!
jammasterj78;-;If you are looking for a relaxing, turn-based, high replay value, time eating game then you have come to the right place. Just one more turn.
jennyS;-;Pretty good. Buy it. That's all.
TOX1C PHAN7OM 8;-;Very good stratergy game, one of the best ive ever played, lots of variety and content 10/10
ackermax;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a roundbased turn-based strategy, 4X ( = eXplore, eXpand, eXploit, and eXterminate) game. I'll review and recommend this game together with its expansions, as those DLCs add important things to the main gameplay, making this game so outstanding good. If you like games like Crusader Kings or the Total War series, you definitely should check this one out. (There are of course some minor to major differences) You pick a leader/country for a game and have to reach different goals for different victory conditions. My (formerly) most played game on steam, here's why: + addictive as hell + high replay factor + you get so much game for your money + every country/leader has different strengths + you'll be able to play against friends + lots of diplomacy and different victory conditions + it is so much fun to watch your empire grow + every game you start is quite different + with DLCs: there is now religion and even more ways to win a game + many different characters, with DLCs: even more different characters + Graphics are actually neat, can look quite nice but does also run on older pcs (I guess) About the music: Some parts of the soundtrack are very nice and beautiful, but after playing a long time they can get repetetive and annoying, so it's neither really bad nor good. Some small things do bother me: - I guess this is a matter of taste, but I think there are way to many achievements, like 280 of 'em. - the scenarios are quite boring - sometimes I feel like you should have more diplomacy options and sometims it's annoying how fast another nation dislikes you (but I guess this is somehow realistic =) - Battle is really simple, if you want a similar game with more focus on battle/war, try the Total War Series (e.g. Medieval or Rome 1) Overall, this game is giving you extremely many hours of gametime due to its addictive gameplay and I guess you'll easily get plus 100 -150 hours with this one. Rating: 94/100
Panda;-;Must-Buy Strategy Game This game, when it has all the DLC's is way too addicting, and is a blast to play through your own alternate history. It's way too easy to spent 8+ hours simply building up your own empire, and then several more in a devestating war for more land. Only buy this game if it is with all the DLC's, particularly Brave New World, because the DLC's add some great features that the base game missed. Just buy the complete edition really. Right now.
MattDamonsOwl;-;It's pretty good. I like to take it out on the boat with me, but there is no wi-fi out on the water. If you're looking for a boat I would highly reccomend the 430 Sports Coupe. It comes with the convenience of a walk-thru windshield and sunroof standard.
RedNaddar;-;A fantastic strategy game where you can make your own civilisation and nuke all other civilisatons! Whilst renaming your cities to whatever you want!
Metro;-;Civilization gets 'mainstreamed!' Less demanding in the micromanagement department but most of the changes make for more interesting gameplay. Culture and religion are now 'currencies' you can expend -- the former to unlock 'civic trees' and the latter to buy improvements. Both are essentially proxies for mini-perks that boost various resources. Espionage is now menu based and more efficient. City-states add a new dynamic to diplomacy and warfare. One unit per hex eliminates stacking and speeds up combat time. Overall: different, less tedious, but not necessarily worse. Only truly egregious thing was the shameless milking of DLC.
Illasera;-;"Like Excel and Powerpoint combined but with better UI" - Illasera 8.5/10 without DLC/Expansions 10/10 with DLC/Expansions.
AYE, SIWMAE;-;dumb and hard. takes forever for other people to move. they're dumb.
The Master;-;Good game really fun
Tee;-;A lackluster game on it's own, but with the Gods & Kings and Brave New World DLCs, it's a game you can sink hours into and wonder where the time went. The game with the 2 big DLCs goes on sale often, pick it up!
__Quasar_;-;"Unfortunately, not everyone in my country is as committed to non-violence as I am" - Gandhi
kihmari;-;Highly addictive game! Recommended for all turnbased strategy fans
Force;-;Great game. Fun without DLC, and DLC make it feel like a whole new game, or a whole new world (<----Pun).
dmc;-;The best strategy game I have ever played! Great graphics, gameplay and DLC's! Playable for hours on hours!
Epicguy78;-;Great game way better than civ 4
THE PEAS MADE ME DO IT;-;I lost my life thanks to this game I can do nothing besides play civ 10/10
NotTruant;-;Be prepared to have a 12 hour gaming session, set the game down for 4-6 months, and then pick it up again for another half-day session. This game is a good way to sink a ton of time, but gets repetitive fairly fast.
stephenbrink;-;it is a fun game of strategy and can go any way you want
Major Abbora;-;Gandhi built a city just to try to steal silk away from me. I don't like when someone tries to steal my silk. 11/10 would nuke him again.
Heckenschtze;-;After being gifted this particular game I was sceptical as to whether or not I would enjoy playing it, I do indeed enjoy strategy games but I also sometimes tire of them easily. I am also not one to read instructions, and for a complex game such as this I imagined it would hinder me at first if I didn't read about the mechanics. However, I decided to just dive in and see how well I could do to begin to understand how it functions, I haven't played a lot of this game but I have played enough to understand how it works and how to role out different units. It is particularly fun and entertaining but borderline addictive - thus my recommendation is to buy this game unless you feel that you will fall into a time sink wherein the only light you will see is from the burning fire and destruction in the massacre of other civilizations you plunder and ruin in your wake.
the_radar_dish;-;One of the better games that I have played. After you get started in a game, the "Just one more turn" mentality is insanely addicting. I highly recomend this game even if you are new the Turn Based Strategy genre.
[PMD]Daniel93a;-;Wasted hundreds of hours of my life and university time. 10/10
DankMasterDan;-;Awesome game. Can't wait for Civ: Beyond Earth!
TownFunk;-;One of the most addicting games I've ever played! In depth enough that it takes some work, but simple enough that it isn't cumbersome. 10/10 would play again!
DukeOfSparks;-;Really good game!
GABBA67;-;This game is great. Nice graphics and sounds. The new combat system is very nice, no more stacking plenty of units on the same tile. Must have if you like turn based strategy games. My favourite is still Civilization III but it's getting out now with 4:3 ratio resolution. 9/10
Freets;-;CIVILIZATION V's appeal comes from its rather humorous and endlessly entertaining historical scenarios and simple-to-grasp mechanics that allow any casual strategy game enthusiast to sink their teeth into. I've sunk hours upon hours into this game because of it and I keep coming back for just one more turn of this long but incredibly enticing game. Give it a shot no matter what game genre you like, It's for everyone
;) kuwaii while high ~~;-;Beautimus gameplay that does last eternity, but an enjoyable eternity. Definitly worth getting during a sale, as the expansions are required imo for a balanced gameplay.
Tinyflare;-;Best Game In My Libary 10/10 Fun, Strategic and addictive (that may just be me). Would Recomend to aney Strategy or Citybuilder fan.
Timber910;-;I LOVE this game. Civ V is one of my favorite games of all time, beating out some really great games. It's addictive and fun, you just really get lost in the world. I seriously do suggest though getting the Complete Edition, don't waste your money on the base version, and try and buy the expansions later, just shell out the extra $30 ($5 now during the Weekend Deal). I HIGHLY recommend this game. I have had a lot of fun in the time i've played it, and I can't wait to play more. 9/10
Bill Nye The Nazi Spy;-;Yeah, it's just one of those games that you can play for 659+ hours. Swag.
Israel;-;One... More... Turn... Warning: Civilization V is highly addictive! I've been playing Civilization V since it was launched many years ago. The game is excellent! Hard to write a proper review. If you have already played any Civilization game, you'll feel basically at home with this one. There are a lot of nice new features like: * The hex grid (instead of the old square one) * Units cannot be placed on the same tile anymore, so you have to find a new battle strategy now * City-States, which are independent small nations, which also offer new strategy for the long-time games If you are new to the series, this an excellent but very complex game. You have a lot of variables to care, different victory types (better with the latest expansion). You can destroy every other nation, build the most advanced technology possible or even be a diplomat who conquers the game by the other nations's votes. My advice for you is: Start from the beginning, play easy games to get into the rules and progressively increase the difficult as you understand the game better and better. Final advice if you're planning to buy: Get the complete/universal/don't know what they call edition, with both expansions, they add a lot to the game for a really nice price.
Cryonic;-;Over a days worth of gameplay and still not even close to bored! Amazingly addictive game.
Protego->twitch.tv/projvalkyrie;-;Probably the best "bang for your buck" as far as replayability. You want to go outside again? Stay away!
General idea(5101)[VJC];-;epic game, and many different scenarios :)
OrangeFondant;-;i think this game is very good for new civ players
[M.A.W.] Chino;-;Ignored my girlfriend for a week to play this. I'm single now. 20/10
noodle;-;Buy this, quit drugs. Most addictive game I have ever played. Absoluetly the best strategy game out there. 10/10
Elhoim;-;With the Brave New World expansion it became the best Civ game to date. I can't stop playing it! One... more... turn... Damn! It's 7 AM in the morning!
frankcastle51;-;Are you serious ? You need a review for CIVILIZATION V and/or expansions ? You had to spend all your life living under a rock, just go, buy and play it if you didn`t already. Yes ! IT IS awesome. Just never ever play it "for a while" before you will go to sleep, it will not going to happen until your wife/fiance will come and slap you. "Just one more turn" syndrome is strong in it, i double dare you !
B4K3D B34N;-;its alright
Merick106;-;If I had to choose between this, or satisfying my Heroin addiction, I would choose this.
Highmax;-;A real Turn-Based Strategy, balanced your civilation with Military, Diplomatic, Religion, Technology and Social Policy. Own the world, win the game.
sendingsignal;-;crack.
frozz1e -AA- * @mix;-;Frozr, Highly recommend it!
Storpappa;-;If your looking for a review of Civ V, just get it. How have you played video games and never gotten this series?
Razorkiller1337;-;One of the best turn-based strategy games EVER, basically unlimited replayibility, especially with every game's length and production trees...
Deadsh0t#SuicideSquad;-;With both expansions this game rivals all other civilizations. A solid 10/10.
Karma;-;Very damn fun strategy game though it would be better if the multiplayer AI weren't .
bshado;-;Every game is different, thats why I enjoy this game so much
billsfanaddict;-;its Civ V, so naturally its Awesome, nuff said
BantamBrunette;-;I enjoy playing this game however I wouldn't rate myself as a serious player for it. I like that you can attack other players however I prefer much smaller games as opposed to large games as unfortunately I get bored after a while. I'm much more of a Skyrim girl. Good game though and my husband loves it, he can play it for hours!
Dodge Chance;-;Civ 5 is a game which there is much fun to be had. You can easily get 70+ hours with this game. 10/10 must buy
Zomby Goast;-;Ignore all the griping you hear about Civ 5 being "dumbed down" or "too different from Civ 4." It's still a great strategy game, and with the Gods and Kings expansion just around the corner, it's going to get even better.
Wild Hunt 1.06;-;CIV 8/10 This game takes so much time off your day and it is still so much fun, even though you just sit there and use one hand (just like watching adult films).One game takes hours, and that is when your settings are on quick mode (well I am not really sure, I am a casual gamer, not really competitive). Fun with friends. It is always so much fun building your own empire, whether you overpower your enemy or just simply build a utopia for your people and win through peace, the game is awesome. P.S. Just press "next turn" already...
Fjordhex (GONE FOR VACATION);-;GENGHIS WE COULD HAVE RULED THE WORLD
RPINerd;-;Normally I'd start this review off by saying something like "if you're into strategy games this is a must buy!" But ironically I, myself, am not a big fan of strategy games, so I think it speaks volumes to the entertainment value of this game when I have logged over 600 hours into Civ V yet don't identify myself as a lover of the turn based strategy genre. If you can grab this for a good price, it's absolutely a must buy!
MightyDuckLord;-;ok i started to play this game had no idea what i was doing but after about 3min i had a army starting a farm 2 kingdoms and a alance with a fellowship other kingdom and i started to get into it before i new it 5min turned into 1 1/2 hrs and i still wasent board:D i would recomend this game if you like stratagy and tower defence type games :)
Zethess;-;Very addicting game. Really intense and I reccomend people buying this game!
Queen Lily the Fluffybutt;-;10/10, would trade Pearls for Uranium again.
FBI Special Agent Burt Macklin;-;Made Hentai a religion, 5 stars.
Buzzolini;-;I would write a review for this, but too busy playing. Maybe in another turn...
Chasdragon;-;"Oh i'll just finish this turn" 5 Hours later you're still thinking the same thing.
Matt;-;Built Rome in a day. 10/10
DildoParfait;-;Ghandi pointed a nuke at me and told me to rate this game good. 10/10, would nuke again.
Josh;-;If you've never played a Civilization game before, expect the learning curve to be a brick wall. You may be a seasoned gamer who's used to playing on normal or hard on other games right from the get-go, but if you are brand new to this series, play on super easy mode first to learn and experiment before trying harder difficult levels. That said, once you've learned the basics of the game and are ready for more challenging experiences, you will be greatly rewarded. Games typically last between 1 and 12 hours (depending on the type of victory you seek and the pace you set in the beginning), and you will never have the same experience twice, giving this game a massive replay value. There are always new maps to play on, new allies to make, new choices that will decide the game's outcome, and new diplomatic challenges to face. Civ V does a great job of landing you into a new game and you always feel satisfied by the game's end, even if you lose. That by itself always leaves you wanting to play more. Even if you somehow get bored of playing in single-player vanilla mode, multiplayer is offered and there are a plethora of mods out there to try. So if you're patient and willing to learn, I highly recommend this game and its expansion packs.
Tdo65;-;Truly a great game, relatively slow paced at times. But so full of content. Especially with the expansions. (Brave New World + Gods and Kings)
P3ACE;-;Just look at how many hours I've spend playing it...
retrogamerred;-;I had to uninstall this game to keep miself from playing it
Sugarcube;-;.   ,    Total War.   ,  ,  ,      ,    .      ,     : "  ..."     !
MiniNubs;-;To me? This game is fun. I can go for hours on end sometimes playin this game. Not the best at it but there are so many options and goals. There are like 5 ways you can win for s sake. You can spread religion, gain culture science and a bunch of other . Its ing awesome! Especially with the workshop it has HUUUUGE potential. Only beat 1 game in 20 hours but its definitly a GREAT time consumer were u to play on your plane flight. I will never do online as that  would take days but still. Good game if you like long matches with tons of options. Probably the most changable game with workshop on steam!
Quickbell;-;10/10 would bang
rutger1501;-;Fun game, multiplayer works fine' 10/10
Draetor;-;It had it's flaws when it first came out, mainly that it lacked depth and detail compared to Civ IV. But like all Civ games, they grow and grow and become more fun as time progresses. I feel at this point (actually since G&K expansion hit) that Civ V is beyond any other Civ in the past, and it makes it very dificult, if not impossible to play previous titles again.
SentinelChicken;-;472 hours in and the game is still as dynamic and engaging as ever.
Hendipen;-;Good game, Its a lot like Skyrim but with guns
bshado;-;Every game is different, thats why I enjoy this game so much
billsfanaddict;-;its Civ V, so naturally its Awesome, nuff said
BantamBrunette;-;I enjoy playing this game however I wouldn't rate myself as a serious player for it. I like that you can attack other players however I prefer much smaller games as opposed to large games as unfortunately I get bored after a while. I'm much more of a Skyrim girl. Good game though and my husband loves it, he can play it for hours!
Dodge Chance;-;Civ 5 is a game which there is much fun to be had. You can easily get 70+ hours with this game. 10/10 must buy
Zomby Goast;-;Ignore all the griping you hear about Civ 5 being "dumbed down" or "too different from Civ 4." It's still a great strategy game, and with the Gods and Kings expansion just around the corner, it's going to get even better.
Wild Hunt 1.06;-;CIV 8/10 This game takes so much time off your day and it is still so much fun, even though you just sit there and use one hand (just like watching adult films).One game takes hours, and that is when your settings are on quick mode (well I am not really sure, I am a casual gamer, not really competitive). Fun with friends. It is always so much fun building your own empire, whether you overpower your enemy or just simply build a utopia for your people and win through peace, the game is awesome. P.S. Just press "next turn" already...
Fjordhex (GONE FOR VACATION);-;GENGHIS WE COULD HAVE RULED THE WORLD
Highmax;-;A real Turn-Based Strategy, balanced your civilation with Military, Diplomatic, Religion, Technology and Social Policy. Own the world, win the game.
Applepie;-;Great for a bigger LAN with your friends. THERE IS NO STOPPING MID GAME. YOU PLAY IT ALL IN ONE SESSION? GOT IT?! You think you can just stop the game and socialize with people? NO! The game eats you whole without a warning.
Ossisaverni;-;Great strategy game with an easy-medium learning curve.
Archimedes;-;This game has eaten too much of my time You can start a game at 5pm, play for what seems like an hour, then check the time and have it at 2am Highly addictive and amazingly well put together, this is a must for all game strategists library.
jamiethebird340;-;You never get tired of this game due to the large ammount of civs and downloadable content from the steam workshop. It is always fun to play alone and even with friends
JGray;-;When played with all the expansions and DLCs, quite simply the best PC game ever (at least in my opinion!)
Mr. Miniike;-;I have a very soft spot for the Civilization series. Civilization III, is, to my memory, the first game I ever played. I have since played 2, the SNES version of the original, and this. Like the rest of the series, it's decently polished, easy to learn, has a lot of depth, and is periliously addictive. I didn't get into it as much as I did III, but that's probably just nostalgic bias. If I had to complain, I would say that the diploacy is rather limited, and not being able to trade communications blows. Thankfully, the rest of the game does it. Also, I nuked Beijing eleven times in a row, and it still stood, with two citzens who refused to die, District 13 style. 11/10.
Sloy;-;Hart vidogam. Make it fun at time. I many lik it
iSayPwn;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a god among games. If you don't get it you are mentally .
ill clinton;-;I've been saying to myself "this is the last turn i swear", but i'm just not able to quit. These are the problems that show up as soon as you begin understanding the fundementals of this game. Sid Meier's Civlization V is a turn-based 4x game, where you manage you cities and make sure your people are well fed and happy. The goal in this game is to be the most progressive population on the planet. You start out with a city that fits the population you've chosen. From here on out you start exploring and building things. With the first unit, you will find things like ruins and barbarian camps. The barbarians are your first real enemy, you will have to try to fight them off while progressing your first city. When you start expanding alot you find out that the barbarians are not a real threat anymore. In fact you will be alot more busy with the other populations on the map. The other populations can be friendly but also an enemy. This is where diplomacy comes in, some leaders of the populations may trick you and create traps to backstab you after a while, so you have to be carefull on what you decide what's best. You also get to trade and discuss with these leaders, for instance, you could trade a luxury that your population wishes for. After a couple of hundered turns you'll get the hang of it and start liking the game alot, for me it's the progressing that makes me hooked to this game. it's the mentality of "just finishing this one thing" that makes it soo addicting to me. I find it to be one of the best games i have every played. This is the first civilization game i ever played, but now i regret that i never played the previous parts of this series. All in all a great game! I highly recommend it!
B4K3D B34N;-;its alright
Merick106;-;If I had to choose between this, or satisfying my Heroin addiction, I would choose this.
Buzzolini;-;I would write a review for this, but too busy playing. Maybe in another turn...
General idea(5101)[VJC];-;epic game, and many different scenarios :)
OrangeFondant;-;i think this game is very good for new civ players
[M.A.W.] Chino;-;Ignored my girlfriend for a week to play this. I'm single now. 20/10
noodle;-;Buy this, quit drugs. Most addictive game I have ever played. Absoluetly the best strategy game out there. 10/10
Elhoim;-;With the Brave New World expansion it became the best Civ game to date. I can't stop playing it! One... more... turn... Damn! It's 7 AM in the morning!
Lucius Vorenus;-;Great game really addictive with or without friends!
Louie221;-;Allows a great story of the civilizations of the past and present! I highly recomend it to all you history obbsesors!!!!
TheBeatsGoBoom;-;This game is really fun to play but you get the most out of it when it's multiplayer. Unfortunatly a lot of people play with dlcs so you can't join unless you have them.
dyl4n lft heavy;-;Because of this game, my family abondoned me, I got fired, my friends hate me, I lost my house, and I forgot my name. But I just researched atomic theroy so thats nice
Jros phd;-;Pretty Awesome
KaneH;-;i broke up with my girlfriend because of this game. its amazing!!
Crisp;-;I have never spent so much time on a game only to work towards being more angry. Still Angry. Still playing.
Socialist Supreme;-;I LOVE this game! Its very realistic, allows you to change history with each action in each time period or stick to the books on what really happened in the past. The various ways to win the game gives a lot of choice in how you want to become the greatest civilization in history. There are a ton of mods that add many new ways to play aqnd win. Also you can invite friends and have massive battles or simply be peaceful with more then 10 players. Overall this game is amazing and is 5 out of 5.
mrmcmuffin234;-;this game sucks because there are not enough explosions and im bad at it 1/5 bananas
Solly: Panparam;-;Just... one... more... TURN! >Playing for 3 days in a row. No sleep needed.
Blur;-;The game is very fun and can keep you busy. It is laid out very well and generaly a fantastic game
Milk;-;I have no idea what all the fuss is about, Ghandi is a push over. but don't get me started on them Ottomans! friends the entire game, deals in their favour and gold gifts when they are in need of assistance. but i nuke one enemy city and ooooo i'm power hungry and need to be taken care of.
Astero;-;There's something about taking over Tamriel with celestia as your long time ally, then suddenly the penisface city states declare war on me. time to break out the tsar bombs again...
Force;-;Great game. Fun without DLC, and DLC make it feel like a whole new game, or a whole new world (<----Pun).
frankcastle51;-;Are you serious ? You need a review for CIVILIZATION V and/or expansions ? You had to spend all your life living under a rock, just go, buy and play it if you didn`t already. Yes ! IT IS awesome. Just never ever play it "for a while" before you will go to sleep, it will not going to happen until your wife/fiance will come and slap you. "Just one more turn" syndrome is strong in it, i double dare you !
casey;-;I cried at the end 10/10 would civ
Ben (Mbweha);-;I've played all the Civ games, and this is my favorite.
pvpster;-;This game is simply amazing.
WtchsTooMch;-;I love opening this game to play it. I do it every 20 minutes. Doing my absolute best to shy away from vulgarity this game crashes harder than the Challenger and bigger than the Titanic, And Far More Often. The game becomes increasingly unstable as you play, crash after crash, until you have to reboot the entire computer just to enjoy a single turn of play again. It also has truly bothersome glitches that cause dedicated units set to work tasks or to travel from point A to point B to just forget what they were doing entirely. I do not run this on a laptop or a toaster either, it does this on optimized specs. Now, let me tell you why you should buy it anyway. The big frustration of this game is that it really is just that fun. When you crash out and lose a lot of time and effort (just save your game before ending every single turn. Every Turn. I mean it.) it makes you all the madder because playing and accomplishing is so fun in this installment of Civ. I'd say it's probably the best one yet and I really got a feel for it lightning fast. Pro job..... other than what I assume to be the coding.
MaddestDawg;-;bot personality needs a rework, all else is g
[BIA] SPIDER ASSAULT;-;Why are you reading reviews?! Just go buy this game, ya dingus! The metascore for Civilization V is completely accurate. Everyone deserves to experience this game in all its glory. Although it is a complicated Turn-Based Strategy game, the developers have truly smoothed the flow of gameplay. Turn-Based Strat games of the past (Personal Example: Total War Series) have had a very realistic vibe and impressive gameplay, but the learning curve was a little too much for me to actually enjoy it. Started feeling like a world-weary president! The Civ series has found the perfect in-between. This game is as complicated or as simple as you wish to make it, and that type of customization promises hours of joy. I never tire of starting a brand new game from scratch, as the maps and resources change every time. Every playthrough is a new experience! You'll love it. This game is a true work of art.
Todeshund;-;Fantastic game lose hours playing it
Sefthuko;-;Great Game. Have learned all those famous leaders of society :)
Trotskyist;-;Get it, you won't be disappointed.
CombustibLemons;-;An amazing game if you like strategy games. Has plenty of gameplay, can keep you hooked for literally hundreds of hours. And since the strategy is turn based, you have no rush to play moves off quickly, like an RTS. But still, wished it ran a bit faster and the loading time is a bit long, but otherwise a great game. 10/10 WOULD BANG.... I MEAN BUY.
The Cave of Wonders;-;Amazing game, I was reluctant at first, saw it pop-up a bunch of times in reviews but I couldn't understand why people like it so much, from the screenshots it seemed like a simple tabletop game, boy was I wrong. This game will keep you playing and playing for hours, just one more turn, just one more turn. P.S. don't expect to finish a game in one go; games tend to last for days.
Jerzat;-;With all the expansions, Civ V is an extremely well executed strategic game true to its root. Full of content and endlessly replayable with friends. Had quite a few hiccups in multiplayer, but now they are largely fixed. Steep price to get with all the DLC, but well worth it.
Artour Kulachkov;-;In four words - "Best of a kind"! Totally recommend it!
yo;-;Great, great, great, great game! Just like buy it, It's best strategy.
[SIN] Zeton [Prop Posterous];-;I think it is the best iteration of the Civilization franchise yet. letting no more than one combat unit occupy a space expands the tactcal strategy of the game. a must by, and excellent expansions.
Shotime;-;Sid Meier's Civ 5 is the latest forray into civilization building from this acclaimed series. It is also the first in the series that I have played, so my review of the game is unbiased by the previous installments. Many have said that "Civ 3 is the best" or that "Civ 4 is the only one to play" but I've found that Civ 5 is an excellent game that stands quite easily on its own merits and is definitely worth a play by anyone that enjoys a long, drawn out, turn based civilization management game. Pros: Wonderfully polished Many civilizations to choose from Great music Extremely variable gameplay Cons: Some DX Bugs Resource intensive (laptops tend to lag) Might spend TOO much time playing this game A relaxing game that you can dump hours into. This is one of the best multiplayer games that I've had the joy of playing, and singleplayer is also a blast. The expansion, Gods and Kings, while expensive, is totally worth purchasing. The other DLC is good, but since there's so much of it wait for a sale. A
L'il Bubba-Boy Mac Chillin';-;Hello this is very good game pls Jones and Ellstrm buy this game it is very good and also tres bien as the french often say........................ GG WP........
THEWHITESPICVAPINGWIZARD;-;Really good game! Best strategy game ever!:)
NipNip;-;Great game. Nor as much depth as Civilization 4, but combat has improved tenfold. With Brave New world the game is great, and almost matches up to its predecessor. Almost.
Spinosaurus Aegyptiacus;-;(could have sworn I did osmething liek this before) Ever wanted to take the reigns and manage your own nation? Well now you can! :) Take command of prestigious nations like the USA, Great Britian, Japan, China, Russia, Germany and much more, and contrcut cities (even rename them if you'd like) and bound your nation forward through the starting era of your choosing-be fro mthe "Ancient Era" or even disregarding that and just starting in the future era with all technology unlocked. You can negotiate with other nations through trade agreemnets, Research partnerships and much more. Your peopel giving you trouble with belly aching, or is your nation incapable of producing that little osmething you want? Go talk to a discovered civilizatio nand see if they have it up for trade :) I recommend this game to those who have always dreamed of commanding their own nations. Give it a try!
Potassium;-;This game is one of my favorites out of all the games I have. This game provides countless hours of playing time with out getting repeating its self if you like stragey-turn based games. So if your into these types of games, then definitley get it.
Seksiness;-;Been playing civ since the first one in the dos days. Genuinely thought this game was rubbish when I first started and preferred to play Civ4. Picked up both the expansions which changed my mind. G+K fixes the game and makes it playable and BNW is an improvement on that. So yeah, good game as long as you have at least G+K.
StorySays;-;I recently got this game, i was expecting myself to never get the hang of it but HOLY JESUS! I really cant stop playing its impossible to stop, i got the hang of it perfectly in at least 4 hours which is very good to understand every little thing thats in the game. Its the first time i've ever played the franchise and its good i popped in at this stage in the franchise. might i add... the best part of the game is going past 2013 :D 10/10
nameunimportant;-;Filled to the brim with strategy, this game is a must have. I highly recommend the Brave New World expansion; I found it far more entertaining than the vanilla game.
Anoninson;-;This is a really fun game that you just have to own! I love all the dlc and its an amazing game, don't question it just buy it!
Delicate Danseuse;-;Ah, CivV. The game you don't multiplayer with anyone you like, or you'll never speak to each other again. When I first played CivV, I wasn't sure what to think about it. Civ5 founded an entire genre. It's not the "best" in the genre (my friends inform me that is Galactic Civilizations II,) but it's the bread and butter. Civ5 is the best introduction to strategy games avaliable. Most of what the game offers doesn't appeal to me, personally; the multiplayer has some bugs, and I wasn't joking when I said the game ruins relationships. My boyfriend didn't talk to me for a day after our first match. I don't enjoy the idea of several weeks of playing the same game, and it strikes me as tedious, personally. That's just my personal preferences, though. The game? It's good and worth giving a try, if you're interested. Civ5 is the best one so far. I do recommend getting the Brave New World and the Gods & Kings DLC if you decide to, however. They really add a lot to the game and flesh out some of its weaker aspects.
StevieLondon;-;This game is awesome and diverse. It's very lengthy to complete a session.
Stargazer Nightfall;-;A wonderful game that you can get lost in!
Gallowglas;-;Without any of the addon packages, Civ V is still a decent game, but somewhat of a sidegrade from Civ IV. Add Gods and Kings and Brave New World, however, and you have yourself a heck of a game that's very rich in content, very deep in gameplay, and very, very addictive. My complaints are few: namely, I wish the barbarian levels were adjustable (they'll wreck your civ in multiplayer) and I wish multiplayer were a bit less buggy. However, these are minor compared to all the amazing gameplay.
f-a_18;-;Awesome game, very easy to play, I dived into a game and it was fantastic
Kilo_doreo;-;this game is very fun. it is stratigy based and provides loads of game play :D
Margarine;-;What time is it, why is the sun rising?
awmace5;-;Best strategy game ever created.
richy3;-;Great Turn Based Strategy game.
[GG] Hfdej;-;I really really REALLY like this game!! My friends forced me to play Starcraft II... it was good but i thought it should go slower and this is more relaxing so its perfekt!!
Fumi Duck;-;It's a really good game without and add-ons. It's an even better game with just Gods and Kings. It's an amazing game with A Brave New World. I reccomend it for single player, and I especially reccomend it if you want to have a fun game with friends (Or even a bloody war). It's a game filled with Alliances, Betrayals, and most of all Barbarians. I definitely reccomend it.
Lionel Messi;-;Don't play this game before you go to bed.
COCO;-;Great game, its very fun planning attacks on places and I love the multiplayer! 5 Out Of 5 Stars!
Z3RO;-;I played quite a bit in LAN so far in CoOp mod against AI's... it's alot of fun and quite addictive... and well, you tell yourself after lunch... "ok lets play half an hour!" then you look outside after "15 minutes" and its getting dark... well you get the picture... I guess I / we are gonna train a little more vs. the AI taking over the entire map and then do the same in online MP (yeeeeaaaa right) :P On a slight downside though... your view constantly jumps around to units needing orders or your allies battles. this can get very frustrating after a while since you can not do anything while the battle is going on either. There are ways to stop this from happening but often this causes the nice battle animations to not show at all. I have not looked at anything from the modders community, perhaps they got a solution... Anyhow... the game is an overall VERY awsome experience.
ciTrus;-;If this game was a potato, it would be a good potato. 8/8
S7N Wrath;-;A great game and easy to get in to. Just dont start on deity if you are new to the Civ series. 10/10
Icestarman;-;Never, have I ever, not even once... had a session of this game that was not a complete blast. What can't be said about Civ V. It's the peak of gridded strategy games, not only will you have to plan out what direction you want your civilization to go in terms of how cultured, scientific, wealthy, and happiness, you'll also have to keep track of the plots and connections of various city-states and of course, other civilizations. You can play a plethora of leaders to be the ruler of your civ, each leader is unique and different to play; however, they are all fun to play, there's no real "bad" or "op" leader. The real fun of Civ V is the mulitplayer, whether you hop on a public server or have a match with your friends, Civilization will have you laughing, sweating, cheering, crying, and swearing. ~From a player with 60+ hours, and no completed games. I <3 this game.
Melkor;-;Best global strategy. You'll never find anything better in this genre.
Rejected Wasp;-;What makes this game is the Expansions, they add lots of content and make the game more enjoyable. With this game you can play as Caeser in 2024 sending a nuke to the warmongering Ghandi. If you like historical accuracy/plausability you may be shocked by this, if you like absurdity and grandness but want a challenge you'll like this. If your new to Grand strategy game this is a good starter as the UI is laid out well and very easy to access. A good game can last for 12 hours from start to finish. I have to force myself not to click the "One more turn" button
Pilotonpc;-;Great game good graphics i would recommend this game
[OJSA] SpotHydra;-;You won't be able to just have one more turn, you fool
Pixel_Apocalpyse;-;Civilization 5 is addicting and fun
bcollar;-;Well worth the money, long gameplay and obviously great replayability
^2[Weed]Anher;-;great game
plonko69;-;Awesome i love the series and this is an excellent addition a must buy
Flibbertigibbet;-;As a new time gamer I really enjoy this game. There is definitely a lot of strategy required in making sure your civilization is victorious. I can't wait to delve deeper into the game and experience more of the strategy.
InarJollyhound;-;Its damn good! And it is at its best when played multiplayer with close friends ^_^
WhiskeyFox;-;One of the best time wasters I have ever played! Can easily zap away the day one of the main reason I try not to play it too much! As I have too many games to catch up on.... Endless space is almost like this game just in space and a steeper learning curve that sucks up alot of time! If you love strategy games and/or turn based games I highly reccomend this game to you! Watch these hilarious Civilization commericials! http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_OjpZO-KAfU Then my favorite for the fourth game http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KRNsv69_tmg
dutchman47;-;I've been playing Civ since Civ 1 on my 286 and this is the best in the series
Magea;-;Awesome game, but a super time sink.
RoboCeir;-;...The most addictive game I ever played...first week...18 hours of gameplay because its that addictive. ALL PEOPLE GET IT!!!
devastator2014;-;Amazing and addictive game! A must buy
elomario;-;Ever wondered what the world would be like if the Shoshone tribes had tanks and machine guns to battle some samurais? Or if Ghandi was held prisoner by Genghis Khan and after many centuries of captivity, India was saved by the Irish? Civ V is a very well furnished strategy game where the smallest quarell over some truffles can cause heinous wars. Building, trading, invading/evading, Civ V is all about those stuffs. Some drawbacks though, it is a real time consummer. Also, the game is less meaningfull (not complete) without Gods & Kings and A Brave New World: two extensions that make this game a killer. So prepare your settlers and equip yourself with some fine diplomacy and strategy! (with numerous and technically more advanced troups on the side just in case).
stevodog;-;Fun game. A strategy with a turn based system, gamers that enjoy slower pace should go for this game. 8/10
rant2087;-;Very awesome strategy game a must have for anyone
Tamerland.' vienie schnitzie;-;Words cant describe how much I love this game... But numbers can: 8/10
Employee#427;-;Another installation in the Civ series, and a fantastic one at that. I just don't see how anybody could hate this game. It's a polished version of the amazing Civ IV. Great job Sid Mier! I doubt you will see this review, but keep up the good work! 101st hour Edit... I regret nothing
Hero McDohl;-;In the words of many Civ Players... "Just. One. More. TURN!"
Selkie707;-;Great game with hours upon hours of game play. Best played with friends and voice chat so you can talk while planning wars, etc. Nothing beats watching a friend try to invade an entire continent with just cannons
vhhhhyyyyy;-;Great game
Ted_Talks;-;Lost countless hours to this game. Would reccomend.
HoboSlayers;-;By far one of the greatest strategy games of all time, the addictive nature of Civ is in its unique ability to completely invest you into the civilization you create and grow. Through violent conquest or peaceful cunning, the game's near infinite number of ways to be played adds a replayability unrivaled by any game before it save some modern FPS's. As one of my top 5 games of all time, I cannot recommend this game enough.
Hot Wine;-;This game ruins friendships... 10/10
Devil_Of_Death_1;-;its a great stetegic game
Helios;-;Awesome game, would recommend to anyone who likes strategy games.
PharWolph;-;Amazing game, Definitly worth buying
Markus;-;I like the game ,because it have so many Civilizations!!!!!!
Sloma;-;Amazingly good strategy game. If u're looking for great turn-based strategy game u don't have to search any longer! This is the masterpiece of strategy games, and with it's 2 big dlc's it's even better than just the base game. If i only had more time to play it ... It would be a great game if you're in prison, u'd have a lot of time to improve your strategy. Score 10/10!
suck my ass;-;i was playing this game and then i realized that i had been playing for 120 hours straight and got off
FiX_;-;I thought games like this wouldn't be something for me, but I played two games so far, and even tho I got my  kicked by Gandhi, I'm hooked now.
my grand kids like me;-;911 out of 420, would play again.
Tys984;-;I LIKE THS ALOT LIKE OMG SWAG
ArmyOfPoint5;-;Would add to my fridge.
DiracDeltaFunk;-;JUST. ONE. MORE. TURN.
FredinkinsIII;-;you will lose your life tho this game
No name, cant be stuffed 4 one;-;This is the greatest game ever. If you can develop a strategy to play, you will not stop playing. I play this and I cannot get bored. Their is no O.P. things that can ruin the game, even Unique Abilities that are called O.P. have a small downside that if exploited is perfect. I cannot think of any gaem breaking mechanic that will destroy it any time to come. Please buy this game, and maybe I may be competing against you to build an empire that will stand the test of time. Another side not is that you will need to buy the Expansions as they are worth it and are brilliant. I brought them then couldn't go back to playing without them.
Anthor;-;This is a great game for strategy lovers, and is even better when played multiplayer.
The Vocaloid Time Lord;-;Great Game! Love it! A uniuqe expirience that requires stratigic thinking and planing turns wisely. Overall, a fun game!
The Vocaloid Time Lord;-;Great Game! Love it! A uniuqe expirience that requires stratigic thinking and planing turns wisely. Overall, a fun game!
mitchymitchy99;-;this game is the best game i have ever played, i just cant get enough
tom shearer;-;Civilisation V is better than having a girlfriend.
Zanzibar Buck-Buck McFate;-;The gold standard for strategy. More user-friendly and prettier than Civ 4, with some great additions, but lacking the stunning Fall from Heaven II mod. Gods and Kings is also recommended.
shakyjimy;-;Ver good Game, Im addicted
Mr. Pug;-;This is the best game ever. Better than Minecraft. Can spend many hours playing this AMAZING game. Get it now. You can be many civilizations like Poland, Russia, Germany, England, Spain, France, Rome, Greece, Venice, Babylon, Japan, China, Mongolia, Askia, Zulu's, Shoshone, Ireqouis, Mayans, Korea, Indonesia, Portugal, Morocco, Inca's, Siam, Denmark, Austria, Netherlands, Ethiopia, Egypt, America, Arabia, Carthage, Brazil. And some I can't think of at the moment.
JimmyConway;-;great game! had it for a very long time now but only just went back on it and it shows how much ive been missing out! it is highly addictive and extremely hard to turn off so i would definatley reccomend it especialy if your like me and love stratergy games
Dilithra;-;Definately worth the money when played with both the available addons.
Tobie240;-;Honestly I'd go for the Complete Edition for this game. You get WAY more stuff for $20.00 more, It sounds like 100 times more money but it's a realy great deal.
Alice;-;I have owned Civ V now for almost two years, and it has always been nothing but awesome. Even more awesome now with the Brave New World DLC, and the addition of Religion, Spies, Congress, Tourism, Trade Routes, etc. This has made the game even MORE interesting. I lose track of hours on this, building my economy, while trying to build my army and not breaking the bank in the process, watching other civilization's machinations with my spies, and increasing border expansion to an all-time high without  off my neighbors. It is indeed very complex and I am always learning new tips and tricks. Besides Skyrim, this is most definitely my favorite game on Steam. I give it 10/10 cupcakes.
CFlamesFanatic;-;When using raid foam to kill an ant colony outside of my house... as I'm spraying i pictured in my mind how the ants would deal with the "fog of war" and then went to play CIV 5.
didierharrington;-;Spent hours building up Greece to become a super power in the modern age only to be backstabbed by Gahndi.
Holiday;-;The game is crack. Plain and simple. It will devour your life. Stay away.
Flossia;-;This game is great to play with your friends, but take ages so be prepared to spend a long time on this game
ChapSteve;-;Nothing is better than taken over the world with tanks. Well, apart from taking over the world with nukez....
Prevalence;-;Dont start this game after 5:30pm if you plan on getting a reasonable amount of sleep.
NinjaMT;-;Nice game to play with friends.
Ferra/Torr;-;Get this game! It is often on sale and is an amazing strategy game. Games last for a long time and there is multiplayer that you can play with your friends on I recommend this game and you should get it
Brodsky;-;The best strategy game I have ever played.
Silver Ranger;-;Phil please play this
Plague (Dylan);-;In what other game can you spread the great religion of Herpes across the land?
donald23;-;Civilization V is my favorite installment in the Civ Series! Especially with the two expansion packs. Buy them, play them! You will not regret it!
The Reichshtangle;-;according to my playtime I have 25 hours. I've played a round and a 1/4 and don't notice time passage anymore. Haven't encountered ghandi but Elizabeth is a  don't trust her. Japan has a crazy strong military I've successfully settled the great wall of Japan beside the pyramids of britian. Welp. 10/10 would be sucked into the void again.
Draven_Rayne;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V This game is the absolute best as far as realistic strategy games go. The amount of depth they have put into the mechanics is mind boggling. I will warn though that historical documentaries will never be the same for you after this game. I can't tell you how many times i have been watching something on WWII and found my self pulling apart and analysing their strategies and in some cases implementing them into my own gameplay strategies.
USAFMike;-;I used to really enjoy games like this when I was little and since then I've moved into first/third person shooters, a big change for me. So when a friend recommended the game I was like.....ehhh. But it was already sitting in my library as I think it was gifted to me awhile back. Decided to install it and give it a go. At first I felt like it was going to be too much. There's so much to click on/read ahhhh what do I do?! But wasn't very long till I was getting comfortable with what was going on. I just took the time to hover over each button to see what did what. The game's tips that pop up aren't annoying and provide just enough info for you. It's been quite fun starting cities, building armies, creating natural wonders, great civs being born in my settlements, making farms and mines...good stuff. The music has been quite enjoyable as well. I definitely recommend this game, and this is from a gamer that's been playing nothing but TF2, Call of Duty, Loadout, Battlefield, etc for the most part the last 7 years.
0ud315;-;This game eats up my whole life. I have Stockholm syndrome for Civ V.
Pixi;-;alot of fun, cant wait for the next one.
Dr. Njkantzas;-;Best game ever! You are missing out if you dont have it. Dont be fooled by the price. It is worth it.
Macsmansion;-;I can get lost in this game! Hold on...where I'm I? HOLY MOLY! WHERE THE HELL AM I?!
Mike's Hard Lemonade Co.;-;Amazing game that consumes time
Z_Man_115;-;One of my all time fav games, this requires you to have a stong economy while ballencing other aspects of your empire on multuple fronts. Not only is this game diplomaticaly focoused it also has extreme focous for combat and war situations aswell. For example your units gain a bonous for attacking from a hill and can often not attack with indirect fire... If i had to make one complant i would say that some of the Civ's need a little re-ballancing other then that if you are a stratigist then you need to pick this game up 9.5/10
piratus;-;The best way to get rid of few days, a week or even a winter. Be careful though.
[ECPA] Marijuana Magic Man;-;Can't even trust my brother 10/10
Cornish Patsy;-;Great game where you can play at your own pace
zachalony rex;-;this game is awesome
Rainbow Eater;-;Good game as it stands but the DLC makes it a much much better game
LOL;-;I am the king of my nation. I am the ruler of my kingdom. And I will  everything up - oda nobunaga
tubzilla99;-;totally worth every penny
Fwostyburn;-;This game is very, veeery addicting. Gandhi nuked me, 23/10, Valve no not nerf.
Hadley;-;I'm addicted to this!
logster1217;-;never trust anyone
BlabberJabber;-;This is my first Civ game and let me just say that it's made a great impression, me and my friend just haven't stoped playing. Dominating whole countries and having your whole empire crumble from one mistake. This game is a must have, the multiplayer is also a wonderful and fun time, just make sure you bring friends and a glass of water cause things can get stressful. 10/10
Po-ta-toe;-;I was in another country, couldn't find my friends i was alone....... 5 years alone Alone/10 "Like skyrim whit no friends"- Machinima
Clint Murdoch;-;It's really good, despite it being a Turn type of game, it is very fun and addicting to play <3 especially with friends
farrar121;-;In my opinion this game has limited replayability and no challenge to it as I beat deity within a few hours. I certainly am not the kind of person to keep playing this for hours on end in order to shove a nuke right up Gandhis  because he is a massive . Overall 0/10 10/10 in reality. I live for this game.
Trafficcone Buttplug;-;right after I bought this damn game it went back down price son of a gun
charliehorse8472;-;IT IS THE BEST FREAKING GAME EVER 700+ HOURS PLAYED 800 AND BEOND
mishmosh;-;This game ate away my life. 10 whoopi goldbergs
Dylan Day;-;you Freedom Beef you ugly  muffin you never ing play this  game with me. I WILL ING END YOU YOU   MONGER.
Hakuna Ma Taco;-;Ghandi stole everything from me... I attempted to please him with my gold and resources in return for mercy and peace, it was not enough however... After his conquests in America and Mongolia, Ghandi's bloodlust targeted my puny, pathetic civilization. He nuked all of my cities and razed all those who survived... His giant death robots marched towards my Capitol as I pleaded the great one to spare me, he simply laughed and pillaged all the remaining land I had... With my people starving and unhappy, I had no choice but to vote for Ghandi as world leader in the United Nations in exchange for oranges... GG, Ghandi... GG. 10/10
SpongeMuse;-;An amazing game, i reccomend it to players that like a challenging game. Even though it might take a while to get into and the games may be long, still a fun strategy game to play.
Madmax;-;It's a good game. Why? -It takes away 3 GB free space from your hard drive -It makes you experience feelings you've never experienced before as you watch the city you spend 9 hours building gets destroyed by enemy forces -What, real life? Is that a server? -You can get nuked by Ghandi -You can nuke Ghandi back So overall great game, should play it.
mandaryn3d;-;Awesome to play with few people, but only if you can afford to buy all expantions. If not then simply buy one of previous parts.
Combat Mentality 86;-;Historical figures controlling countries and living for thousands of years, with nukes and giant robots from the future. 10/10
Explosive1010;-;Best game on Steam.
[CVG]Anton;-;This is a good starter to get into the strategy based games. Its enjoyable and will suck up allot of your time without you realising it. I don't feel that the addon packs are all that worth it though, what is included with the game is more then enough.
flaa;-;Civ V is potentially "the" refresh of this monumental frachise. It's practically your beloved civ on a hex grid with a modern resculpting of the classic game mechanics. It's just as addictive - One more turn, you'll find yourself thinking. The pinnacle of a genre defining game!
Romero;-;This is my favorite Star Wars sequel.
Defectiv;-;By far one of the best games that I have ever played. With the addition to the expansion packs, this game has created much more depth and gameplay. The various ways to win now is incredible and starting a new game is bound to kill 5+ hours without realizing it. Thumbs up.
mattlowie0919;-;DO NOT PLAY THIS GAME!!!!!!! seriously, its so awful! if you value your time you cant play this, its just too god dam amazing! NEVER EVER EVER play this game! the one more turnturns into one more hour, then one more afternoon! STAY AWAY!!!!!
Omiid;-;Ruining my life. 10/10
CONQUEST;-;The best Turn-based strategy game i played.. they keep updating the game with large DLCs, it costs money but that makes the game durable. You never played a turn-based strategy game before? well Civilization 5 is a lot easier to play than the civilizaition games before. just try it, its awesome!
YakisobaDare;-;France is an
Jextman;-;Whenever I play this game I can't stop. Maybe I have a problem.
Ryan;-;Endless hours of fun. Once you begin a game it's very hard to stop playing just like all of the previous Civilization games. If I were to give this a 1-10 score, I'd give it a 9/10.
Rainbow Eater;-;Good game as it stands but the DLC makes it a much much better game
LOL;-;I am the king of my nation. I am the ruler of my kingdom. And I will  everything up - oda nobunaga
tubzilla99;-;totally worth every penny
Fwostyburn;-;This game is very, veeery addicting. Gandhi nuked me, 23/10, Valve no not nerf.
Nicc Flamecaster;-;This game is superbly time consuming and highly addictive. Indeed, this game is a time machine game. Do not play this game, it has high chance to ruin your life. Don't tell me that i didn't warn you.
Samuel;-;Hours and Hours on this game and still there is more to do! One match of Civ is like a whole game of other games, 10/10 not found a game as good as this!
Kevin the Sea Cucumber;-;Certainly one of the best Strategy Games from one of the best Strategy Game companies. Civilization 5 is a strategy game about controling an empire throughout human history-from the settling of the first towns to the near future, and is fun in every part. The game manages to have the same concepts at all times, but still having different flavors depending on how far into a game you are. Great: Incredible amount of Content-doing everything the game has to offer is next to impossible. On top of this the game is very addictive, with stuff going on constantly to keep you hooked. Good: Game Concepts are very well made with one exception, and the game looks very nice and has a fitting art style. Combat is much more refined than past Civ games, ommiting the "Stack of Death" involving placing 30 units into one tile and bashing a city for minutes until one unit happens to win. Bad: Vanilla version of the game is lacking. Not to say it's bad, but the Complete Version for 50$ is far superior. And 50 dollars is a lot compared to some other options. Also, the happiness concept is a bit flawed. Having an unhappy civilization all but stops expanison, causing cities to not grow and also giving you a economic and military penalty. In order to keep a civilization happy, you must find luxury resources, which may be inacessible to you without a crazy amount of effort or trading, or may be right on your doorstep. Also, the AI seems to get a Happiness Bonus, who rarely have a problem with the unruly masses. It's kind of unfair. Ugly: The game is a bit unstable and is prone to crashing. I can't play on full screen, as my GPU becomes overused and the game needs to shut down. Other crashes are seemingly random, with little to no explanation on why. tl;dr: It's good. Crashes sometimes, but it's good. 9/10 Oh yeah, I'd get the Civilization SDK (Whatever that stands for) Along with this in the game tools section of Steam. It's a game editing tool that allows for Map Creation and making your own Mods.
spr1n;-;Strategy that looks like a chess. Its quite fun.
[STG] Sheepdog Actual;-;"Just one more turn..." -Said everyone who has ever played Civ V. *Played just one more turn* -No one who has stated the previous quote. Oh yeah, and f*** Ghandi.
matias_fierro;-;Do you want to play for more than eight, sixteen or maybe twenty-four hours to become the greatest civilization in economy, religion, tourism, miltary power or religion? Well, if that is the case, this game is extremely addictive. When you start, you don't want to stop until your child, your fragile civilization, becomes the Owner of the World. I would say the only great defect of this game is the multiplayer. It improved a lot but still has some bugs and performance issues. No mention that is really hard to play with strangers without getting kicked or suffer quiters. An important note: the game improves a lot since Gods & Kings, and much more with Brave New World. The vainilla version lacks some importants features which make it too similar to his previous version Civilization IV which is dissapointing at least. But with a complete version, you have fun guarantee and if you bore of this, you can play the Scenarios to get some tasty variations.
Oreki;-;Much rather contract the highest form of autism then play what is essientially a map simulator with a fresh coat of paint. After playing this game i got cancer in the eyes and i'm pretty sure i wanted to  my friend gary.
Scrpi;-;This game behaves just like women do: you have to wait for ages, and when it comes to multiplayer-action; the answer is no.
CONQUEST;-;The best Turn-based strategy game i played.. they keep updating the game with large DLCs, it costs money but that makes the game durable. You never played a turn-based strategy game before? well Civilization 5 is a lot easier to play than the civilizaition games before. just try it, its awesome!
Crush;-;I have no regrets buying this game. I am hooked. You will become addicted to this game so say goodbye to your friends family and life. Looking forward to the next installment of "Beyond Earth".
The Rich Communist;-;One of the best strategy games i own.
Kunai;-;This is a really good game
Xxx_360NoScope4LifeFaze420_xxX;-;Good Game. But dont plan on finishing the game in one hour or so.
Cornish Patsy;-;Great game where you can play at your own pace
zachalony rex;-;this game is awesome
Vindicator;-;This game and I have a love-hate relationship. While I would consider this game to definitely be in my top ten, it is dangerously addictive. I find myself going down a deep rabbit hole when I play this game because of how engrossing the premice of the game is. For those of you who haven't had the chance of picking up a copy of a game in this series so far, think of yourself as warned; the outside world will not know what happened to you until you can finally find the strength to crawl out of your darkhole from which you have been engrossed in for the passed 8 days known as Civilization; your friends will understand. Game Summary: Now for a quick rundown of how the game works. The title to the game describes the plot in itself: you are the plot. You start by choosing from a number of civilizations listed, ranging from 18th century America under George Washington to Napolean of France. How large you want the planet you are set on and how many other civilizations and city states you want to play against can either be determined by the player or randomly selected. Once you drop into the world you'll start out with a settler and a warrior in order to found your capital city and explore the surrounding lands. Each civilization has the gift of a specific bonus to it's empire as well as excess units and buildings which can be constructed only by that civilization. As your civilization progresses you eventually start to get more and more choice. You will move through each era depending on what technologies you research. With this freedom of choice players can also choose how they interact with other civilizations and city states. Eventually depending on what routes the player chooses to take in developing their civilization, there will be a number of options for how one can win the game. You can either achieve a science victory by researching all of the technologies and blasting off into space in order to plant your flag into the soil of a distant earth like planet! You can conquer the entire world with rutheless military might and capturing the capital of all other opposing in-game civs for a domination victory. These are jsut a few of the options available. The great thing about this game is rather than following a linear path for play, you really get to make history yourself; or if you want to go about doing it with a friend, drop into a match and play it out with your buddy! Mods: The second best thing about Civ V besides it being Civ V is that the game is very community orientated. There are hundreds upon hundreds of mods sitting in the steam workshop in this game ranging from new ingame civilizations to playable scenarios. The development team over at Firaxis did a great job in allowing variety for such a trully immersive game and one of the best ways they've done that is by letting the community take adding on new parts to the game themselves. DLC: The core game itself is fantastic but I would really recommend both DLC's for this game. They are a bit pricy so you might save some cash by just picking up the Civ V Gold Edition during a steam sale if you really want to get the fullest experience of the game. Not only does it add a number of new civilzations (that are personally my favorite to play as), it also brings back religion from the previous games in order to spread your pious agenda across the globe to assist in your victory. It also brings back spying as well as trade routes. Trade routes help for boosting ones economic output when connecting to other civilizations but they can also provide science and spread religion to other cities. These factors are just the tip of the iceberg especially considering there are so many mods on the steam workshop which require either the Gods and Kings DLC or the Brave New World add-on. In the end, they are both fantastic in-game content packs and really worth the extra penny.
Gankat;-;Perhaps one of the best strategies on your PC.
Crazy Wizard Senpai Man;-;Dear god..Ruined my life..I forgot my friends names, that I had a dog, Hell I wasn't even sure I was alive..This is what happens when you play..For five hours..I've played for 239..I have no more life to worry about. Because civ is my life, my love, my reason, my only sun in the sky..Oh yeah and you should convert to the religon of civ ruined of my life. 9001/10 OH AND DON'T IN LISTEN TO THAT FAT  GHANDI..He nuked me..Four times..
Passing Breeze;-;No more stacks of doom! My Game of the Year 2010.
herojelly!;-;cool game it's like call of duty except the combat is worse ghandi keeps on nuking me what a bully
[Puron] Thomas;-;I love this game. The whole concept of growing an empire and competing for resources is something I'm into and crave, and this game satisifies that craving. I would definitely recommend this game. There are a few bugs though. My Rating: 8.5/10
duckmanly;-;Amazing game with addicting game-play and immense replay value. Also, mods. There are those too. 10/10
lolz089;-;Awesome game buy it and come play against me
A Gay Baby;-;This game stole away my life. Do not buy unless you like losing all your free time.
javier.1;-;This game is handsdown my favorite game ever created!!
Jabor;-;Well, the 251 hours played on this game most likely explain how much i like it HOWEVER it can get a little boring if you only play on your own so sadly, if you have no friends, your screwed...
June Kaldwin;-;I've never played any of the previous Civ games and I'm a huge fan of Catan (a board/online game it reminded me of) so this automatically won me over. Civ 5 is more complex than Catan in that it has more features to offer and it's more organized, less random, and more relaxed whereas you can never predict what your opponents are gonna do in Catan so it gets pretty intense. You play a historical leader (each civ comes with perks) and choose how you interact with other leaders and their civilizations. You can build whatever you want, from armies to cities, as the technology and resources become available to you throughout the centuries. It's addicting and so much fun; I can only imagine the shenanigans and how awesome it'd be to get a group of friends to play. Plus I'm really diggin a lot of the references made with the achievement names. Can't believe I didn't get into this sooner.
killass mcfuck;-;"it ing sucks" 420/10 -ign
Brigzilla;-;Imagine being locked in a room with Big Gaz G, and Razza, while m.r. West films it all. This is the opposite of that situation.
JGray;-;When played with all the expansions and DLCs, quite simply the best PC game ever (at least in my opinion!)
Mr. Miniike;-;I have a very soft spot for the Civilization series. Civilization III, is, to my memory, the first game I ever played. I have since played 2, the SNES version of the original, and this. Like the rest of the series, it's decently polished, easy to learn, has a lot of depth, and is periliously addictive. I didn't get into it as much as I did III, but that's probably just nostalgic bias. If I had to complain, I would say that the diploacy is rather limited, and not being able to trade communications blows. Thankfully, the rest of the game does it. Also, I nuked Beijing eleven times in a row, and it still stood, with two citzens who refused to die, District 13 style. 11/10.
Hrin;-;Great turn-based game. Amazing graphics and infinite possibilities and endings.
Josh;-;If you've never played a Civilization game before, expect the learning curve to be a brick wall. You may be a seasoned gamer who's used to playing on normal or hard on other games right from the get-go, but if you are brand new to this series, play on super easy mode first to learn and experiment before trying harder difficult levels. That said, once you've learned the basics of the game and are ready for more challenging experiences, you will be greatly rewarded. Games typically last between 1 and 12 hours (depending on the type of victory you seek and the pace you set in the beginning), and you will never have the same experience twice, giving this game a massive replay value. There are always new maps to play on, new allies to make, new choices that will decide the game's outcome, and new diplomatic challenges to face. Civ V does a great job of landing you into a new game and you always feel satisfied by the game's end, even if you lose. That by itself always leaves you wanting to play more. Even if you somehow get bored of playing in single-player vanilla mode, multiplayer is offered and there are a plethora of mods out there to try. So if you're patient and willing to learn, I highly recommend this game and its expansion packs.
Tdo65;-;Truly a great game, relatively slow paced at times. But so full of content. Especially with the expansions. (Brave New World + Gods and Kings)
P3ACE;-;Just look at how many hours I've spend playing it...
retrogamerred;-;I had to uninstall this game to keep miself from playing it
Sugarcube;-;.   ,    Total War.   ,  ,  ,      ,    .      ,     : "  ..."     !
alexanderGDI;-;10/10 - AMAZING, love it, would fap to ... again
Sloy;-;Hart vidogam. Make it fun at time. I many lik it
iSayPwn;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a god among games. If you don't get it you are mentally .
ill clinton;-;I've been saying to myself "this is the last turn i swear", but i'm just not able to quit. These are the problems that show up as soon as you begin understanding the fundementals of this game. Sid Meier's Civlization V is a turn-based 4x game, where you manage you cities and make sure your people are well fed and happy. The goal in this game is to be the most progressive population on the planet. You start out with a city that fits the population you've chosen. From here on out you start exploring and building things. With the first unit, you will find things like ruins and barbarian camps. The barbarians are your first real enemy, you will have to try to fight them off while progressing your first city. When you start expanding alot you find out that the barbarians are not a real threat anymore. In fact you will be alot more busy with the other populations on the map. The other populations can be friendly but also an enemy. This is where diplomacy comes in, some leaders of the populations may trick you and create traps to backstab you after a while, so you have to be carefull on what you decide what's best. You also get to trade and discuss with these leaders, for instance, you could trade a luxury that your population wishes for. After a couple of hundered turns you'll get the hang of it and start liking the game alot, for me it's the progressing that makes me hooked to this game. it's the mentality of "just finishing this one thing" that makes it soo addicting to me. I find it to be one of the best games i have every played. This is the first civilization game i ever played, but now i regret that i never played the previous parts of this series. All in all a great game! I highly recommend it!
Dr.Bugbait;-;This game is just pure awesome! It allows you to run your own kingdom while either combating or being buddies with others. You must also develop technology and build a military and industry. The beginning game options are pretty nice too, the allow you to pick who you are, how long you want the game to play out, what era it starts in, the world layout, and many more things! It's such a huge games that I could sit here for hours typing up everything! And the best part is... YOU CAN GET MORE STUFFF WITH WORKSHOP!!! I'd say *10/10* for this game!
Peter Butter;-;This game is ruining my life.
Dragovi;-;10/10 would get nuked by Gandhi again
Manaop;-;GandhiNukedGermany/10 would play for all eternity
Gourds;-;It's alright
Triumphingnoob;-;If you are going to buy this game, you need the Brave New World DLC. Once you have that it will be great expirience. I recommend this game extensivly 9/10
BloodOfTheNorth;-;I started playing this morning, why is it dark now?
Uro #Shenmue2015;-;"One more turn" I swear...this time it's tru-wait  Ghandi has a  load of tanks at my capital's border.
MrOllie;-;One of my favourite games, have not been able to part with it since I bought the game. A real challenge on harder difficulties, with smart, aggresive AI's snapping at your heels. Never the same scenario twice. Would reccomend to all.
Nin7a;-;Where did all my time go?
tedehug;-;If you want to spend hours playing just one map then this is the game for you. I just love it.
R3EV0LUT10N;-;Great game, really good community behind it, it has a massive amount of replay value, I have spent countless hours playing and am still not bored.
kingchris20;-;This game, by far, is my favorite most replayable game I have. It never gets boring and is always different each time I play it. Recommended x1000!
Krowzin;-;Civilization 5 is possibly one of the most diverse strategy games to be released in the past 10 years. Often you are faced with killing everyone in the game just to win but Sid Meirs Civilization 5 lets you choose how to win, Let it be Cultural, Diplomatic, Science or if youre a fan of eliminating the competition, Domination. Civilization 5 puts you in the seat of historical leaders with unique building or units, and also unique traits that relate to how they ruled or dominated in the past. Replay value is a huge strongpoint for this game; the randomly generated maps with customizable options will drop you into a fresh experience every time you play a Match. The game also features maps such as Europe, Mediterranean, and Earth. The maps have accurate placements of geographic features that correlate to the real world landscape. Most importantly for me about Civilization is the huge knowledge you can earn from playing the game. Learn how leaders commanded their armies and how they rushed for continents to settle on. Natural wonders and World Wonders have descriptions that tell you history about them All in all civ is an amazing game that I would recommend everyone to buy, even if you're not a huge strategy buff, this will definitely make you think twice.
DarkCreator;-;This game was very dumbed-down compared to civ 4, nontheless it has unlimited replayability and enjoyable gameplay. Overall 9/10
SlayerS;-;Love It
iPros;-;Love this game. <3
Jamsspinle;-;This game will entertain you for hours. :)
MrBritishBiscuit;-;Civ 5 is one of those games were you will say oh i will play for 5 or maybe 10 minutes just to see how your Empire is doing. 8 hours later youve just won the space race and have to get ready for school. This is what this game is like. Its always just one more turn .....alright just one more turn please and you keep going because you want to discovere flight so you can bomb your enermies from the sky and so on. There is just something magical about the game. The soundtrack is just divine and the graphics if youve got a good enough PC are amazing. In terms of gameplay massive changes have made since the Civ 4 days. For example you can no longer just pile unites on top of each orther and in stead of sqaures you now move in hexes these new features that may seem small but change the game in a big way. The game is with out a doubt is worth your money. I give Sid Meiers Civilization V a 10/10 ENJOY
The Common Humanoid;-;this game made me hate all countries availible.
melonman;-;An amazing game, and great DLC. Recommend this 100%
Weejus;-;you ghandi are you serious trying to declare war on me you
belcomar000;-;its really fun :)
Sponge Cage;-;Once you know how to play, you could basically spend hours playing without even getting bored. But if you think that the game is still missing a little something, the workshop is FULL of mods that could spice your game up.
Curtis;-;People who are actually good at reviews will have already done a better job at explaining what makes this game fun. Me, personally? I just like Ghandis method of acheiving peace through a scarcity of living enemies.
MarkToast;-;If you want to spend all of your life on a game that you probably won't like at first but end up getting addicted to get this game.
Staggerman;-;This game will make you wonder if you ever really could trust your friends.
Pinkie Spy;-;Just one more turn... Then I'll write the review...
Killious;-;I absolutely recommend this game to anyone with even a passing interest in the turn based strategy genre. While the base cam can be said to fall a bit short of the greatness mark, once you've got both of the expansions the game begins to truly shine. Everyone from the neophyte stratigist to the Grand Master Generals will find this game to their liking. I would highly recommend this game.
ChocoSexyUnicow;-;Well I got this game expecting amazing stuff.... and what came out of what pure amazingness and it made me poop like litteraly all over my walls i had hire 400 men to clean off the poop, it was so deeply stained into the wall like they didnt think they could save the house but i told them to believe just like i believed in Civilization V... They cheered they roared in the awe i was presenting of amazingness then they got to work and within 4 years they cleaned my house into a palace of versailes and then and then only did i poop all over the walls again knowing of the legendary of amazingness Civilization V..... :) it is also teaches strategy which also helped the men clean the walls... good luck players ;)...
rooamin;-;Great game, requires many hours to complete and can sometimes take over your day.
Jannzky;-;very entertaining. Like a good facebookgame without hours of wait.
Antithesis Kane;-;Another great add to the Civ series.
MattSaturn;-;I really enjoy Civ 5. It is a good mix of strategy and action. I think anyone could have fun with this game!
Parfait!;-;While the base game leaves out a lot of features I loved in the older games of the series, I.E Espionage, Religion, It it still a great game and I really can't wait for the next installment in this amazing series. Can this series "Stand the test of time?".
GuyFawkes;-;I enjoy playing Civ 5 you can take you time you can also win by time,war etc 10/10. Good game to play when you get bored and when you have nothing to do. So you should try to enjoy it as much as i have!
Delusia;-;just  play it plebs
Vovlock;-;At First, I really diddnt think I would like this game. It just diddnt seem in my style. The only reason I bought it in the first place is because all my friends bought it on the Humble Bundle. Anyways, I tried the game out, and I was immidiently hooked. In the first week, I had more game time on it then even TF2. The game is extremely user friendly, and real easy to learn if you put your time into it. I absolutly love the content in the game, even though the DLC may be a bit pricey. All in all, I highly recommend this game to anyone who has enough time on there hands, and loves strategy!
Calonyr11;-;Can't exclaim enough how much I love this game. One of, if not the best series ever. I have played this game since early childhood and each version of the game just gets better and better. This latest edition, Civ V is absolutely stunning... Addicting, Challenging, EPIC. Who doesn't want to conquer the world?
Rotano;-;This game: Swagalicious.
Psycho;-;Who doesn't like going around destroying your friends hard work and laughing in their face, no but seriously this game is really awesome it brings back memories of old conquest games and this one is just the next level of awesome. Really nice designed layout and overall feel. They only problem i did have with the game was the fact the maps even on large were not actually that big, i always seem to be close to somebody. But overall this game rocks and you should try it and build a civilization to stand the test of time :P
Makenshi;-;Thanks to the streamlined experience and some simplification, Civ V makes for the best multiplayer experience out of the series. Unfortunately, for the same reason, Civ IV is probably the better single player experience as there feels to be more depth and you have all the time in the world to finish your turn. Vanilla can feel too restrictive and frustrating due to some of these changes, but Brave New World brings around some exciting End Game features meaning that runaway Civs aren't always guaranteed to win past T150 or so. If you got a group of like-minded friends who like strategy board games like Risk or Axis and Allies, I cannot recommend this game enough.
Ro;-;Once you will start, you will not be able to end. - One... More... Turn...
[Junkies] Rinvidia;-;This game ruins friendships.
Tinska;-;This took my life. This took my soul. This took my everything. How can someone create such an addicting game? I mean, I don't normally even like strategy-based games. Still, in just a few days I have accomplished to play 30 hours of this game. At first, I tried it with my friends on multiplayer. I had NO idea what to do, and succeeded to build a city. Then after a few turns I tried to understand it a bit, and at last, I took an interest in the game. Later on, I started a singleplayer save, and hot damn it took time to get off the computer. Everything about the game is great. So many different Civilizations, so many choices for your world's shape. Also, running out of people to play as is no problem, there is always the workshop. I just love how you start as a one small town, and at the end you are some kind of gigantic nation. But that of course depend on how you play it. Also I like about how many things you can do in this game. You can research all kinds of things, you can build all kinds of buildings, and you can train all kinds of units. 10/5 would buy again (even though a friend gifted this to me) BUY IT. NOW.
Semaj;-;What more can be said about this game than what other's have already said. This game is a massive time sink, and that's a good thing. It's a "just one more turn" type game that will leave you realizing that it's 4:30 in the morning.
Lumb;-;i dont even own the game wut
Nifty;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V what can you say about game or the Civilization series that hasn't been said already. If your a fan of Turn Based Strategy games this is a no brainier GET IT. If your thinking of getting Civ 5 and haven't played the others GET IT. This game probably has to be one of the most addictive games of all time.
JUST DO IT;-;wow much civ very science much culture
Sionainn;-;Definitely tons of fun with friends. It's very time consuming, so sometimes it's hard to keep a large group together in one save, let alone complete one. Despite that, though, worth every penny and tons of enjoyable hours spent on this game.
jofo2360;-;This is a great game of stragety, and dominance. I ighly recomend it, if you are a strategy type of person
NotAFatNerd;-;I have spent over 400 hours playing this game and it just never gets old. It is especially engaging once you by Gods & Kings and Brave New World DLCs, which add religion, ideology, and dozens of new leaders. This game is simply a must buy.
Krowzin;-;Civilization 5 is possibly one of the most diverse strategy games to be released in the past 10 years. Often you are faced with killing everyone in the game just to win but Sid Meirs Civilization 5 lets you choose how to win, Let it be Cultural, Diplomatic, Science or if youre a fan of eliminating the competition, Domination. Civilization 5 puts you in the seat of historical leaders with unique building or units, and also unique traits that relate to how they ruled or dominated in the past. Replay value is a huge strongpoint for this game; the randomly generated maps with customizable options will drop you into a fresh experience every time you play a Match. The game also features maps such as Europe, Mediterranean, and Earth. The maps have accurate placements of geographic features that correlate to the real world landscape. Most importantly for me about Civilization is the huge knowledge you can earn from playing the game. Learn how leaders commanded their armies and how they rushed for continents to settle on. Natural wonders and World Wonders have descriptions that tell you history about them All in all civ is an amazing game that I would recommend everyone to buy, even if you're not a huge strategy buff, this will definitely make you think twice.
MrBritishBiscuit;-;Civ 5 is one of those games were you will say oh i will play for 5 or maybe 10 minutes just to see how your Empire is doing. 8 hours later youve just won the space race and have to get ready for school. This is what this game is like. Its always just one more turn .....alright just one more turn please and you keep going because you want to discovere flight so you can bomb your enermies from the sky and so on. There is just something magical about the game. The soundtrack is just divine and the graphics if youve got a good enough PC are amazing. In terms of gameplay massive changes have made since the Civ 4 days. For example you can no longer just pile unites on top of each orther and in stead of sqaures you now move in hexes these new features that may seem small but change the game in a big way. The game is with out a doubt is worth your money. I give Sid Meiers Civilization V a 10/10 ENJOY
The Common Humanoid;-;this game made me hate all countries availible.
melonman;-;An amazing game, and great DLC. Recommend this 100%
Weejus;-;you ghandi are you serious trying to declare war on me you
belcomar000;-;its really fun :)
Sponge Cage;-;Once you know how to play, you could basically spend hours playing without even getting bored. But if you think that the game is still missing a little something, the workshop is FULL of mods that could spice your game up.
Curtis;-;People who are actually good at reviews will have already done a better job at explaining what makes this game fun. Me, personally? I just like Ghandis method of acheiving peace through a scarcity of living enemies.
MarkToast;-;If you want to spend all of your life on a game that you probably won't like at first but end up getting addicted to get this game.
TehBrownSheep;-;Fantastic strategy game, very easy to pick up and extremely addicting. Highly recommended for anyone who enjoys history or just raising a great civilization. 10/10
Kanye "The only direction" West;-;Your civilization can only last for so long, but barbarians are forever.
TheUnamusedDuck;-;This game is just so fun and addictive, out of all the games I have, I like this one the most. This will be played even 10 years after it's launch. If you like the age of empires series, then this is one you must get. But I do reccomend checking it out online first.
Tom;-;By far my favorite strategy game. It's an enhanced version of Chess on an enriched field of play with the ability to create units on demand.
Jeffy :3;-;ING AWSOME GAME GUYS CHECK IT OUT (its prob gonna take some getting used t its different)
Pool Master 4000;-;Great game for anyone with enough time to sit and play for 4-5 hours straight
Dank Santa;-;Good game with clear graphics, it works on my comr even though it's fairly old.
DrExplosive;-;Civilization V is a very complex but easy to follow game with many different ways to play it; you can invite some friends or people you don't know to have a massive battle for victory with the unique methods of winning: culture, domination, time and science. You can load up some scenarios to play without having to start from scratch. or maybe the single player mode catches your eye by setting up your game just how you like it. Never have I seen a game so fun and player friendly in a very long time. Once you start playing, you cannot stop! Let alone the easy-to-install 2 DLC packs. For 20 each, so worth every penny. If you enjoy a fantastic balance between strategy and action, buy this game right now. Thanks for reading.
VAN DOMINO II;-;Civ v is without a doubt one of the best games on steam. Everyone i know who played this game enjoyed it thoroughly. The replay value is amazing! both expansions add some real new dimensions and do a great job to alter the game mechanics in a way that no other expansion has before. Stop reading... you should be playing Civ V
Casus-Belli;-;Truly a great game, i hope the dev team just irons out a couple more bugs in mp stability.
K1LLRK1D;-;This is game is meant to destroy your life from the inside out while you slowly take over a virtual world. Nuff' said.
Cats Are Not For Bags;-;Very enjoyable game, I havnted played to much but I for sure will be putting many more hours into this game
Fight the Power!;-;Great game. Too addicting.
rgers;-;The greatest stratagy game ever. The Multiplayer runs smoothly and is extremely deep. 10/10
generalassassin;-;i think its good if u like trun base games
ScoobyDrew;-;This is the best entry level strategy game there is. Get Brave New World before you play though, it adds a lot of improvements to the base game.
Abandoned Mind;-;Perhaps the best strategy game i've ever played. Great game and if you liked the other civ games then you will enjoy this one.
Haruu~;-;My great musician is Edgar Allan Poe. 24/1O
Tirasangue;-;Incredible game, full of strategy, i'm really impressed by the game, it is fun and never gets boring, you can retry the game loads of times with another nation, you can play with a friend, you can grow your town to be the feared and most destructive country or as the most peaceful and calm country. Do buy it, it's an amazing and well made game.
Swiftcheese :>;-;Completely sold my army, research labs and resources to stop Ethopia from winning a diplomatic victory, and then declares war. All but capital destroyed, about to be taken, wins cultural victory. 10/10
gNatFreak;-;Really, really, really, really fun strategy game (turn based). If you need a singleplayer game that will keep you busy for as long as your brain remains inside your head, this is it. Singleplayer offers nearly limitless gameplay; you'll only quit after you realize your strategy is the same thing game after game. However, if you mix up your strategy it's like playing a whole new game! Or at least something like that. Eh, worst part of the game is its slow load screen (to the main menu even!), and all the paid DLCs. Still, it's worth whatever the initial asking price is at the moment (it's worth at least $30!)
alexanderGDI;-;10/10 - AMAZING, love it, would fap to ... again
Hrin;-;Great turn-based game. Amazing graphics and infinite possibilities and endings.
TrulyIrish;-;It smells of succession and addiction
Docdra;-;While I still think Civ III was the crowning achievement in this series, I can't dismiss how good this iteration is. Start it up and get ready for hours to fly by...
Spleenzy;-;Can spend hours playing this game and not even realise, once you start building up your civilzation, you won't want to stop. It's sooo addictive!
nyo ho ho;-;its civilization nuff said
Spoiler Alert;-;but did you get brave new world? DID YOU? GO GET IT! NOW!
Foonish;-;By far the best turn-based strategy game I've ever played. Also, I highly reccomended both of the major DLCs, they give you a whole new game to play!
Midnight Shadows;-;While I really love this game and think it is very good, Multiplayer is a joke. When you aren't DCing, you come back to find the AI, even if it's only been one turn, has entierly ed your stratagey, moved your troops, spent your gold, founded new cities, ect. It's a pain in the  to fix. I reccomend the game but if you have problems DCing, don't play multiplayer. I personally think it should ask the game host if they want to continue playing when someone dc's to prevent the AI takeover from hell.
Coleburn;-;With the release of Brave New World and recent patches this games has become a definitive must-have for everyone interested in the Civilization franchise or turn based strategy in general. Good visuals, great music and endless sessions await you! I've already invested a lot of my time into this game and with BNW I'm looking forward to invest even more.
Buffrey;-;Great game really fun!!
Zadrave;-;See what happens if mayans still existed in the year 2012! Blow up Gandhi! Surrender to France in irony! Anything can happen in Civ 5.
Kaevo;-;Extraordinarily fun and complex. Even small matches can easily last upwards of 6 hours, and each one is unique to the extent that your strategy must constantly evolve and change for each situation, resulting in potentially hundreds of hours of game-play. Truly mastering this game is like mastering chess, in that you never really quit learning. But dammit, if I get beat to a culture victory by one turn after a six hour game again I'm burning down a museum.
jofo2360;-;This is a great game of stragety, and dominance. I ighly recomend it, if you are a strategy type of person
NotAFatNerd;-;I have spent over 400 hours playing this game and it just never gets old. It is especially engaging once you by Gods & Kings and Brave New World DLCs, which add religion, ideology, and dozens of new leaders. This game is simply a must buy.
Paladin-UK;-;A very addicting and absolutely fantastic game! If you can pick up both map packs with the game itself for a reduced price it is definitely worth getting.. The content and AI tweaks and changes make a big difference when playing. Even though I have played (only) 103 hrs when writing this review, there are still many, many different civilisations I have yet to play. If you are new to Civilisation games, there are many tutorials on Steam to look through. The in-game tutorials are pretty decent as well.
Weasel McGee;-;A really good game! The single player is very good and the multiplayer is even better. but it's the DLC that really makes the game come alive. The Mods don't always work.
K1LLRK1D;-;This is game is meant to destroy your life from the inside out while you slowly take over a virtual world. Nuff' said.
Cats Are Not For Bags;-;Very enjoyable game, I havnted played to much but I for sure will be putting many more hours into this game
Jamsspinle;-;This game will entertain you for hours. :)
Postsigns;-;End turn and watch your life waste away
Nauxuron;-;Addicting!
julius_levis;-;Great game single player but really shine in multiplayers.
Rythian Tyrant;-;This Game is AWESOME! Cant stop playin
Big Rob eh;-;This game is by far the perfect strategy game. The gameplay, AI and general fun surpasses all of its competitors, and its ability to eat up your life is completely unparalleled. I would recommend this game to everyone. Gandhi's a  though.
Nehabje;-;Defiantly buy this, this game is most likely the easiest way to waste time :D
Vannaka;-;Have an hour until you need to get to work? I guess this is the game to spend your time on. Once you start playing there is no going back, until you lose of course. Back in the past, when I had this game torrented, I had spent over 14 hours STRAIGHT playing. It turned me into a monster, that even my parents rejected me. They wanted me off the computer but I denied them and told them that my time is needed to be spent here. Playing Civilization is similar to being locked in limbo. The only way out is to either win correctly or lose with dignity. If you intend to play for 5 minutes, make it a couple days. Your life will turn upside down and you wont know what hit you. Your girlfriend wants sex. What do you say?  NO! Sex is for the weak. This game will teach the ups and downs of society, religion, and war. It will teach you what the true meaning of greed is. Don't let your gaurd down, the  in Greece (The AI BOT), will  that you are 'too close' to their land.  them over when you get the chance, show all who is boss. 10/10 Get this game, 100% no regrets.
Po1nter [Selling 2x CSGO];-;Great game.
BaronVonBiscuit;-;This is a truly amazing game, its fun to play and has so much replay value it will cause you to play for hours on end thinking; 'just one more turn...' The multiplayer however is also fantastic and makes the gameplay even more interesting, but it can be very buggy and prone to random crashes often making the experience enraging and annoying. Lucky the majority of the time this game runs smoothly and without issue, making it more than worthwhile for any gamer interested in the strategy genre. However I strongly recommend if I was you, purchase the 'Complete Edition' version of the game as the 'Gods and Kings' and 'Brave New World' expansion packs make this game even more exceptional, fixes many of the base games issues and bugs while presenting the player with a massive extension to the base game. The packs basically add two extra massive games into the already massive base game. Overall this game scores a 7/10 + Fantastic experience and replayability + Amazing and worthwhile expansions + Fun and challenging multiplayer - Multiplayer is often full of bugs and random crashes
[AOD] GridNoDC;-;Great game, CIV V will provide one with countless hours of stragetic fun. There is more than one way get a victory in the game which will provide many options on how to arrive to one. Eac DLC only improves your experience and adds more hours of fun. The CIV series gets better and better, so far this is a must have for anyones library.
[Dairy]SourCream;-;i r recommend cuz it stole mah sleep :3
somesum;-;Addicted. I need help!... Can't stop... Just one more turn.... I'm a re-newb to the genre so I won't go into technical and comparison. To any other newbs I recommend checking out the Steam Community guides if you find yourself overwhelmed by the plethora of set-up options and want some frustration saving strategy hints. Totally worth a little reading time. Very few games out there keep me playing after the main objective has been met. I can't even properly describe why... why I can't stop. Once you get past the initial learning curve it becomes seductively simple and almost hypnotic. You'll be all like, 'Hey, I can have this running and do a turn here and there while I'm getting on with something else'... 4 hours later... 'I'll do it in a minute, just one more turn...' Graphically, it's a pleasant enough mask for the clever mechanics. Many ways to play and win. Nice array of buildings and units, Stealth and Nuclear Missile being my favourites... "Oh! Hello. Looking round my border are we? BOOM! SHIq I'll melt your faces off and rub my butt all over your tiles!" The UI is uncluttered and easy to find your way around. Tooltips and tutorial messages and in-game help are surprisingly helpful. The community is active and awesomely creative. The achievements are plentiful but stretched across DLCs. Recommended for people with time to spare.
[TARU] General Groundbound;-;Play as a variety of civilisations in a fight to survive. Will you be a warmonging country, going for fast expansion and a conquest of the world? Will you be diplomatic, aiming to trade and ally? Will you be sneaky, pretending to ally with a country and then wipe them off the face of the earth? There are so many options, and each country has a relevant perk. Very much true to history... which you can rewrite! Did Japan take over Korea? Did Spain destroy everyone and control the map? Or did Germany choose to be a friendly, negotiating country? It's up to you in a world of endless possibilities. Another must have. My game library wouldn't be complete without it. And neither is yours.
BenderRodrigeuz;-;great game, just keep an eye on the clock
Sasquatch;-;Swaggy McBalls
asherrench;-;Perfection.
Oterico;-;Civ 5 is a brilliant game. It provides hours of fun and entertainment, takes some time getting used to but when you do you won't stop playing for a while.
The Phallic Chicken;-;I thoroughly enjoy this game it is not as fast as a game like starcraft but still has that feel to it
Unit49311;-;Life consuming
Foonish;-;By far the best turn-based strategy game I've ever played. Also, I highly reccomended both of the major DLCs, they give you a whole new game to play!
Midnight Shadows;-;While I really love this game and think it is very good, Multiplayer is a joke. When you aren't DCing, you come back to find the AI, even if it's only been one turn, has entierly ed your stratagey, moved your troops, spent your gold, founded new cities, ect. It's a pain in the  to fix. I reccomend the game but if you have problems DCing, don't play multiplayer. I personally think it should ask the game host if they want to continue playing when someone dc's to prevent the AI takeover from hell.
Coleburn;-;With the release of Brave New World and recent patches this games has become a definitive must-have for everyone interested in the Civilization franchise or turn based strategy in general. Good visuals, great music and endless sessions await you! I've already invested a lot of my time into this game and with BNW I'm looking forward to invest even more.
killass mcfuck;-;"it ing sucks" 420/10 -ign
Tom;-;By far my favorite strategy game. It's an enhanced version of Chess on an enriched field of play with the ability to create units on demand.
Jeffy :3;-;ING AWSOME GAME GUYS CHECK IT OUT (its prob gonna take some getting used t its different)
RIP Iwata;-;Make wiping India off the face of the Earth the first priority of every single one of your games.
Perrymanon;-;Great way to spend many hours, A good casual 4X
YakisobaDare;-;France is an
Jextman;-;Whenever I play this game I can't stop. Maybe I have a problem.
Ryan;-;Endless hours of fun. Once you begin a game it's very hard to stop playing just like all of the previous Civilization games. If I were to give this a 1-10 score, I'd give it a 9/10.
The Mechanic;-;Tons of fun, multiplayer is great for ruining friendships.
Yellow Butter;-;It all started when our protagonist, Civ 5, woke up in a pumpkin patch. It was the fourth time it had happened. Feeling ridiculously exasperated, Civ 5 groped a sock, thinking it would make him feel better (but as usual, it did not). Unexpectedly, he realized that his beloved  of truth was missing! Immediately he called his friend, Leroy Jenkins. Civ 5 had known Leroy Jenkins for (plus or minus) one million years, the majority of which were sassy ones. Leroy Jenkins was unique. He was intelligent though sometimes a little... dimwitted. Civ 5 called him anyway, for the situation was urgent. Leroy Jenkins picked up to a very happy Civ 5. Leroy Jenkins calmly assured him that most koalas yawn before mating, yet otters usually earnestly grimace *after* mating. He had no idea what that meant; he was only concerned with distracting Civ 5. Why was Leroy Jenkins trying to distract Civ 5? Because he had snuck out from Civ 5's with the  of truth only four days prior. It was a saucy little  of truth... how could he resist? It didn't take long before Civ 5 got back to the subject at hand: his  of truth. Leroy Jenkins sighed. Relunctantly, Leroy Jenkins invited him over, assuring him they'd find the  of truth. Civ 5 grabbed his desk and disembarked immediately. After hanging up the phone, Leroy Jenkins realized that he was in trouble. He had to find a place to hide the  of truth and he had to do it thoughtfully. He figured that if Civ 5 took the truck, he had take at least eleven minutes before Civ 5 would get there. But if he took the ? Then Leroy Jenkins would be alarmingly screwed. Before he could come up with any reasonable ideas, Leroy Jenkins was interrupted by seven abrasive aligators that were lured by his  of truth. Leroy Jenkins sighed; 'Not again', he thought. Feeling frustrated, he thoughtfully reached for his mitten and aptly backhanded every last one of them. Apparently this was an adequate deterrent--the discouraged critters began to scurry back toward the thicket, squealing with discontent. He exhaled with relief. That's when he heard the  rolling up. It was Civ 5. ----o0o---- As he pulled up, he felt a sense of urgency. He had had to make an unscheduled stop at Wal-Mart to pick up a 12-pack of pencils, so he knew he was running late. With a calculated leap, Civ 5 was out of the  and went indiscriminately jaunting toward Leroy Jenkins's front door. Meanwhile inside, Leroy Jenkins was panicking. Not thinking, he tossed the  of truth into a box of mittens and then slid the box behind his piano. Leroy Jenkins was concerned but at least the  of truth was concealed. The doorbell rang. 'Come in,' Leroy Jenkins sassily purred. With a careful push, Civ 5 opened the door. 'Sorry for being late, but I was being chased by some funny-smelling maniac in a Vette,' he lied. 'It's fine,' Leroy Jenkins assured him. Civ 5 took a seat vaguely close to where Leroy Jenkins had hidden the  of truth. Leroy Jenkins cringed trying unsuccessfully to hide his nervousness. 'Uhh, can I get you anything?' he blurted. But Civ 5 was distracted. Without warning, Leroy Jenkins noticed a selfish look on Civ 5's face. Civ 5 slowly opened his mouth to speak. '...What's that smell?' Leroy Jenkins felt a stabbing pain in his butt when Civ 5 asked this. In a moment of disbelief, he realized that he had hidden the  of truth right by his oscillating fan. 'Wh-what? I don't smell anything..!' A lie. A insensitive look started to form on Civ 5's face. He turned to notice a box that seemed clearly out of place. 'Th-th-those are just my grandma's mittens from when she used to have pet bunnies. She, uh...dropped 'em by here earlier'. Civ 5 nodded with fake acknowledgement...then, before Leroy Jenkins could react, Civ 5 randomly lunged toward the box and opened it. The  of truth was plainly in view. Civ 5 stared at Leroy Jenkins for what what must've been four seconds. Unexpectedly, Leroy Jenkins groped wildly in Civ 5's direction, clearly desperate. Civ 5 grabbed the  of truth and bolted for the door. It was locked. Leroy Jenkins let out a eccentric chuckle. 'If only you hadn't been so protective of that thing, none of this would have happened, Civ 5,' he rebuked. Leroy Jenkins always had been a little insensitive, so Civ 5 knew that reconciliation was not an option; he needed to escape before Leroy Jenkins did something crazy, like... start chucking mittens at him or something. All of a sudden, he gripped his  of truth tightly and made a dash toward the window, diving headlong through the glass panels. Leroy Jenkins looked on, blankly. 'What the hell? That seemed excessive. The other door was open, you know.' Silence from Civ 5. 'And to think, I varnished that window frame nine days ago...it never ends!' Suddenly he felt a tinge of concern for Civ 5. 'Oh. You ..okay?' Still silence. Leroy Jenkins walked over to the window and looked down. Civ 5 was gone. ----o0o---- Just yonder, Civ 5 was struggling to make his way through the pumpkin patch behind Leroy Jenkins's place. Civ 5 had severely hurt his arm during the window incident, and was starting to lose strength. Another pack of feral aligators suddenly appeared, having caught wind of the  of truth. One by one they latched on to Civ 5. Already weakened from his injury, Civ 5 yielded to the furry onslaught and collapsed. The last thing he saw before losing consciousness was a buzzing horde of aligators running off with his  of truth. About seven hours later, Civ 5 awoke, his butt throbbing. It was dark and Civ 5 did not know where he was. Deep in the humid desert, Civ 5 was abundantly lost. A few minutes later, he remembered that his  of truth was taken by the aligators. But at that point, he was just thankful for his life. That's when, to his horror, a oversized aligator emerged from the cornfield. It was the alpha aligator. Civ 5 opened his mouth to scream but was cut short when the aligator sunk its teeth into Civ 5's face. With a faint groan, the life escaped from Civ 5's lungs, but not before he realized that he was a failure. Less than two miles away, Leroy Jenkins was entombed by anguish over the loss of the  of truth. 'MY PRECIOUS!!' he cried, as he reached for a sharpened spoon. With a heroic thrust, he buried it deeply into his neck. As the room began to fade to black, he thought about Civ 5... wishing he had found the courage to tell him that he loved him. But he would die alone that day. All that remained was the  of truth that had turned them against each other, ultimately causing their demise. And as the dew on melancholy sappling branches began to reflect the dawn's reddish glare, all that could be heard was the chilling cry of distant aligators, desecrating all things sacred to virtuous men, and perpetuating an evil that would reign for centuries to come. Our heroes would've lived unhappily ever after, but they were too busy being dead. So, no one lived forever after, the end. :'(
(GDI)NEO29UK;-;always has been a great game.
apevik2;-;this game was surprisingly good. i don't like strategy games but this one was awesome
Pandemonium;-;one of the best strategy games ive played, challenging and fun, but be ready for very long games
The American Tank;-;This installment of the Civilization franchise has the best gameplay you will find in any Civilization game. Guiding an empire from fledgling tribal city into world spanning empire is amazing, and does not get stale, even over many iterations of founding and building nations. Excellent graphics help add to the game, and the fact that Leonard Nimoy does loads of voicework in the game is great. Overall, highly recommend the game and the expansion packs for it, including Gods & Kings, and Brave New World, which add new civilizations, scenarios, and units that keep the game interesting.
Lammenam;-;I bought this game without any idea of what to expect. Took some time to understand, but now I think it's a really great game! It's different than other strategy games, but I think it's nice not having to be quick, since I never been to good at that. I recommend it strongly, especially if you like strategy with more thinking time.
NinjasRAwesome5;-;Couldn't write an articulate review... have to play my next turn.
Jeremy;-;Veterans of the Civilizations franchise may be immediately put off by the lack of features in this hexagonal iteration, but the expansions (GK+BNW) add a lot of content back and Steam frequently has them for sale. To be honest the smaller scale of warfare due to 1-army-per-square and reduced warfare abilities in general as a result put me off at first. However, I really came to appreciate how much more significant country borders became as a result of this, making each expansion risky due to quick flanking maneuvers by the AI. I still think the AI for Civ is still too predictable and even when set on random, a bit harsh depending on your difficulty level. Still recommend the game for fans and newcomers, you will easily end up spending way more time than you thought carving your perfect Civ.
KrystalMath;-;Civ 5 is probably one of my all time favorite games. Though not as in depth as other Civ games, Civ 5 is an amazing game worth playing. Reply value is incredible, every civilization is unique and different in many ways, and never seems to get boring thanks to a wide variety of difficulty settings and expansion packs. I highly recommend this to anyone who is new to strategy games, or to any experienced veteran out there. I also recommend the expansion packs to improve gameplay. Civ 5, to say the least, is a truly remarkable piece of art. And quite addicting at that. The AI may be a little funky at times, but that is to be expected for nearly every game. I would pay 50 dollars for this game (evidently that was the price when it first came out), it is just that good, and that is saying something for myself because I am quite frugal and prefer to only purchase games when they are on sale. This is one of those games that you will be up till 4 a.m. in the morning, telling yourself, "just one more turn......"
Icestarman;-;Never, have I ever, not even once... had a session of this game that was not a complete blast. What can't be said about Civ V. It's the peak of gridded strategy games, not only will you have to plan out what direction you want your civilization to go in terms of how cultured, scientific, wealthy, and happiness, you'll also have to keep track of the plots and connections of various city-states and of course, other civilizations. You can play a plethora of leaders to be the ruler of your civ, each leader is unique and different to play; however, they are all fun to play, there's no real "bad" or "op" leader. The real fun of Civ V is the mulitplayer, whether you hop on a public server or have a match with your friends, Civilization will have you laughing, sweating, cheering, crying, and swearing. ~From a player with 60+ hours, and no completed games. I <3 this game.
Bambooma;-;amazing game. I can play for hours and still have fun. looks lovely and has lots of content. 10/10 recommend to EVERYONE!
Crispin;-;Fun game that I enjoy playing, but I don't enjoy it chrashing and losing all of my progress,
Joey Joe Joe Jr. Shabadoo;-;It's a good game.
Peanut;-;Another great civ game with so many people and things to do
Koren;-;Absoluteley great game!
Charter;-;Sid Meier's Civilization is one of, if not the best tbs on the market. Civ V added to the collection of the others and is not a downgrade in anyway. I will state that the multiplayer could use a much needed revamp but the single player works completely fine. The A.I. as for most Civ games will attempt to do outragous deals or not abide by what you say, but the flow of the game great. The expansions are also worth almost every penny, and a new one is on the way.
BloodyGreek | Headbanger;-;Amazing. having 500 hours on it already. it just one more turn...
Diplomatix;-;Destroyed my life 10/10
Przndude;-;good game but dear god dont ever get into a war with anyone, it's going to take years to finish your game if you do.
The RAM Downloader of NotrRAM;-;get the dlc or your friends hate you 10/10
zachary.jones03;-;Brilliant. Best with expansions. Best. Game. Ever.
alexkayownsabus;-;Incomplete without DLC. But either way fantastic stuff.
Shaolin Munkin n Dunkin;-;Insanely fun game.I convinced my freiends to buy it after watching the yogscast play it,and in a few months we have hundreds of hours on this game.Its one of those games where DLC is actually revolutionary and not just something nifty they threw in. I personally would wait for a sale then buy it with all of its dlc as it makes the game insanely fun.
Naru #;-;Perfect game ever!~
Broseidon_KingoftheSeas;-;This game is absolutely amazing. It's so easy to sink all day into a game like this.
Apex - Weaboo;-;Really Nice And Fun Strategical Game!
The Prince of all Asians;-;This is a great game. If its ever on sale, buy it! It is one of the greatest games ever made!
GrimThunder62;-;Quick Summary The fifth edition of one of the most classic strategy games on the PC. Purchase Verdict: Yes (I personally would wait for a sale, though) Points of Interest -I'm not a huge fan of this type of strategy game, but found it fun while playing with friends online. -A semi-active community workshop that allows for a lot of customization. -Offers plenty of different ways to win. You build your nation the way you want to build your nation.
FX10morph;-;BUY THIS GAME!!! IT IS AMAZING!!!
Hellion;-;After doing a few sex favors for a horny gamer girl that I've known since the vietnam war, I finally traded naked pics with an australian mafia to smuggle videogames and one of them was CiV which stands for "Can't into Vidya", if only starcraft 2: heart of the quickscope were on steam i'd be reccomending that instead but CiV was made by people who clearly failed middle school world geography because i started as mayans and found the city of Venice a few miles or tiles away and those crazy italians tried to culturally enrich my  but I called the powers of montezuma and la muerte peluda to overthrow their , but that wasnt the end because later came the dunegook empire trying to take over my new land and I had to 1v1 quickscope with the arab nerdlord and put them to shame because im american and I still remember the alamo
Deadly CornFlakes;-;More friendships have been tested through this game, truly it is a game that many will play for entire weeks without pause. Great game overall and all friends must endure it!
SCORCHIE THE PYRO;-;The ultimate strategy game, Civ V pits you in glorious combat through brute force or brains in an epic showdown for up to as many as 19 players, with AI's and other people! It is an AMAZING game for people who like strategy, the challenge of difficulty levels 5-8 (hardest), or the almost God-Mode-Like easygoing-ness of the easy difficulty levels, 1-4. However, if you are a person who doesn't like to use stuff from archers to nukes and wants to actually take part in the battles, well, they didn't classify this as FPS, now did they? Still, an amazing game and totally worth it- especially when you get to the DLC.
Berg [HL] [VGS];-;It's a Classical, You won't be dissapointed and you will not get bored of this magnificant game! I dare you to buy it!
Dunston;-;At the time of writing this review, I have spent more than a whole day on this game. Yes, more than 24 hours! Civilization V is a game where you are a leader of an empire tasked to rule the world. Every turn, you can move your people, in the game they are called units, around, to build, fight and conquer (I think thats how it's spelt!). Other AI Civilizations are also spawned in, and your task is to beat them. There are different ways of winning the game, such as researching different things and spreading your religion (DLC). The modding on this game is brilliant. You get an achievement just for subscribing to an item in the Steam workshop, and another if you play that mod. You can download any type of mod, from a LOTR map (Really good!) to a completely new civilization! The game doesn't need the DLC to make the game good. The base game is magnificent. It really is. But I advise getting the DLC as well. The DLC to this game is amazing. The main DLCs, Gods and Kings and Brave New World, havwe a heavy price tag, so I would advise buying the complete edition, because it saves you ! Overall, I would rate this game 10/10!
yo;-;Great, great, great, great game! Just like buy it, It's best strategy.
[SIN] Zeton [Prop Posterous];-;I think it is the best iteration of the Civilization franchise yet. letting no more than one combat unit occupy a space expands the tactcal strategy of the game. a must by, and excellent expansions.
Shotime;-;Sid Meier's Civ 5 is the latest forray into civilization building from this acclaimed series. It is also the first in the series that I have played, so my review of the game is unbiased by the previous installments. Many have said that "Civ 3 is the best" or that "Civ 4 is the only one to play" but I've found that Civ 5 is an excellent game that stands quite easily on its own merits and is definitely worth a play by anyone that enjoys a long, drawn out, turn based civilization management game. Pros: Wonderfully polished Many civilizations to choose from Great music Extremely variable gameplay Cons: Some DX Bugs Resource intensive (laptops tend to lag) Might spend TOO much time playing this game A relaxing game that you can dump hours into. This is one of the best multiplayer games that I've had the joy of playing, and singleplayer is also a blast. The expansion, Gods and Kings, while expensive, is totally worth purchasing. The other DLC is good, but since there's so much of it wait for a sale. A
Jeremy;-;Veterans of the Civilizations franchise may be immediately put off by the lack of features in this hexagonal iteration, but the expansions (GK+BNW) add a lot of content back and Steam frequently has them for sale. To be honest the smaller scale of warfare due to 1-army-per-square and reduced warfare abilities in general as a result put me off at first. However, I really came to appreciate how much more significant country borders became as a result of this, making each expansion risky due to quick flanking maneuvers by the AI. I still think the AI for Civ is still too predictable and even when set on random, a bit harsh depending on your difficulty level. Still recommend the game for fans and newcomers, you will easily end up spending way more time than you thought carving your perfect Civ.
KrystalMath;-;Civ 5 is probably one of my all time favorite games. Though not as in depth as other Civ games, Civ 5 is an amazing game worth playing. Reply value is incredible, every civilization is unique and different in many ways, and never seems to get boring thanks to a wide variety of difficulty settings and expansion packs. I highly recommend this to anyone who is new to strategy games, or to any experienced veteran out there. I also recommend the expansion packs to improve gameplay. Civ 5, to say the least, is a truly remarkable piece of art. And quite addicting at that. The AI may be a little funky at times, but that is to be expected for nearly every game. I would pay 50 dollars for this game (evidently that was the price when it first came out), it is just that good, and that is saying something for myself because I am quite frugal and prefer to only purchase games when they are on sale. This is one of those games that you will be up till 4 a.m. in the morning, telling yourself, "just one more turn......"
L'il Bubba-Boy Mac Chillin';-;Hello this is very good game pls Jones and Ellstrm buy this game it is very good and also tres bien as the french often say........................ GG WP........
THEWHITESPICVAPINGWIZARD;-;Really good game! Best strategy game ever!:)
NipNip;-;Great game. Nor as much depth as Civilization 4, but combat has improved tenfold. With Brave New world the game is great, and almost matches up to its predecessor. Almost.
Spinosaurus Aegyptiacus;-;(could have sworn I did osmething liek this before) Ever wanted to take the reigns and manage your own nation? Well now you can! :) Take command of prestigious nations like the USA, Great Britian, Japan, China, Russia, Germany and much more, and contrcut cities (even rename them if you'd like) and bound your nation forward through the starting era of your choosing-be fro mthe "Ancient Era" or even disregarding that and just starting in the future era with all technology unlocked. You can negotiate with other nations through trade agreemnets, Research partnerships and much more. Your peopel giving you trouble with belly aching, or is your nation incapable of producing that little osmething you want? Go talk to a discovered civilizatio nand see if they have it up for trade :) I recommend this game to those who have always dreamed of commanding their own nations. Give it a try!
Potassium;-;This game is one of my favorites out of all the games I have. This game provides countless hours of playing time with out getting repeating its self if you like stragey-turn based games. So if your into these types of games, then definitley get it.
RANK JaJa;-;80/100 Stand-Alone 95/100 Gold
Astro;-;I started my first game in 9:00 pm Saturday then realized it was 5:00 am Sunday when I destroyed one Empire 0.o i think I'm in love
Swajira;-;i reccomend this to people who like turn based strategy games. it is very fun, a little challenging at times, and is fun to play as all the civilazations to see what their unique units are
[EX] thematrixman;-;An extemly additicting stragey game that you can spend hours and hours. Also mmultiplayer is intense and never know what going to happen. Lots of play time for your dollar and a definite buy!
UnBaLANceZ;-;Nice SLG GAME very Deep content , Worth to bought it !!
ChronoX;-;you will not eat or sleep properly after you install this. just saying... 10/10 for you, 1/10 for your health, job, and significant other.
left overs;-;Its very good with friends a bit crap by yourself because the AI is stupid. Very fun and always engaging. Gandi is a very violent man in this game.
Strategist Spacer;-;This game asks one simple question: Can you build a nation that will stand the test of time? Its not an easy question to work out "yes" to if you're looking for a challenge. The AI might be random at times or it might be entirely logical, But from playing it I've learned you should always keep on your toes. Outside of easy, the computer players can outmatch you but not just militarily - unless you hit the ground running you can be quickly overshadowed. This incarnation of the Civilization franchise makes a lot of changes, namely the switch from a grid to hexagons and the removal of the ability to stack units. Some people loathe this but after playing it i've found the whole thing less of a meatgrinder; no throwing your army at a stack of 23 armies on one square, no 31+ stack of armies lying in wait when you attack an enemy city. In fact the system makes it more viable and likely to surround a city (which is what happened in most wars by the way) rather than charge headlong at it with a bulk army. Every detail of the world is beautifully rendered, sometimes I found myself panning the camera over my and my enemies' civs imagining what life is like in the piece of Earth they have carved out. Gods and Kings and Brave New World - its epansions - at a ton of variety to the game. The culture victory option for example, involves tourism and cultural influence, which is how places like America, Japan and the UK ingrain their cultural mannerisms elsewhere in the real world. The game is not just beautiful on a strategic level; I'm a fan of history and culture and this game is bursting at the seams with it, especially with Brave New World; every technology has an associated quote be it a passage of a holy book, a line from a Greek, Roman or Shakesperian play or a phrase coined by a legendary person. Every world wonder you complete shows you an oil-on-canvas painting of it complete with a quote that relates to its purpose or its reputation, in the second expansion your great people can world-renowned paintings and compositions which you, the player, can enjoy for yourself. It makes you want to build wonders even more if this is your kind of thing. Whether you're an empire builder at heart, passionate for history, love high culture or just enjoy watching burning everything to the ground. This is a worthy addition to the franchise so get this, get the expansions too (even if you're nonreligions, Gods and Kings adds a lot of other stuff to the game), this game would be ideal for you. Just don't expect to be done in a three-hour session; Civ is not a game for the twitch player. Its famous for that.
A134drew10;-;Easily in the top 5 of all strategic games!
aunt joemima;-;I'm cold.
Postsigns;-;End turn and watch your life waste away
Nauxuron;-;Addicting!
julius_levis;-;Great game single player but really shine in multiplayers.
Rythian Tyrant;-;This Game is AWESOME! Cant stop playin
Big Rob eh;-;This game is by far the perfect strategy game. The gameplay, AI and general fun surpasses all of its competitors, and its ability to eat up your life is completely unparalleled. I would recommend this game to everyone. Gandhi's a  though.
Buggsy;-;A game that helps you learn if your friends are  or not.
LivingColour;-;Never trust Gandhi. Not once, not ever.
Cooldude189 l Trimming Armor;-;This is honestly the best game I've ever played, whenever you play it you jsut want to play it all the way to the end, after playing the base game fro awhile I got bored and decided to pick up both DLCs and still trying out all of the civs. I've been hosting civ5 tourney's now. This game is like the console games for thsoe who play the AAA games. This is a must-buy.
Red_Behemoth;-;Simply brilliant. A piece of software that allows you to live and reenact (even change!) most of the important historical events that humankind has ever lived. You can quench you thirst for power and domination with this game, as well as your blood lust. Develop a CIVILIZATION from the very beginning where rocks were weapons, to the all modern Nuclear Fusion Death Machines. Take your time, and lose your life with this game. I've been playing since the beginning of the franchise, and I can say that this is the best game so far. (Especially for the crap that Civilization IV was.) If you can afford all the expansions as well, don't waste time. BUY THEM ALL. Brave New World brings the concept of diplomacy and World Congress to a new level, I strongly recommend playing this if you have some passion for history, politics, warfare and economics. #OneMoreTurn
Chimp;-;CIV 5 so much good. Very nice. Sometimes i play this game then fall asleep because it lasts 23 hours.
(GDI)NEO29UK;-;always has been a great game.
apevik2;-;this game was surprisingly good. i don't like strategy games but this one was awesome
Pandemonium;-;one of the best strategy games ive played, challenging and fun, but be ready for very long games
The American Tank;-;This installment of the Civilization franchise has the best gameplay you will find in any Civilization game. Guiding an empire from fledgling tribal city into world spanning empire is amazing, and does not get stale, even over many iterations of founding and building nations. Excellent graphics help add to the game, and the fact that Leonard Nimoy does loads of voicework in the game is great. Overall, highly recommend the game and the expansion packs for it, including Gods & Kings, and Brave New World, which add new civilizations, scenarios, and units that keep the game interesting.
NinjasRAwesome5;-;Couldn't write an articulate review... have to play my next turn.
asherrench;-;Perfection.
[TARU] General Groundbound;-;Play as a variety of civilisations in a fight to survive. Will you be a warmonging country, going for fast expansion and a conquest of the world? Will you be diplomatic, aiming to trade and ally? Will you be sneaky, pretending to ally with a country and then wipe them off the face of the earth? There are so many options, and each country has a relevant perk. Very much true to history... which you can rewrite! Did Japan take over Korea? Did Spain destroy everyone and control the map? Or did Germany choose to be a friendly, negotiating country? It's up to you in a world of endless possibilities. Another must have. My game library wouldn't be complete without it. And neither is yours.
BenderRodrigeuz;-;great game, just keep an eye on the clock
ber Metal Machine;-;Build giant death robots and have fun!
Ralekei;-;One of my most favorite games to date. Watch out, though, for it will consume your daytime and nighttime like nothing. Also, don't be afraid to lose. Even losing while trying out something new is an entertaining experience. The expansions are a must-have, however, as they greatly improve the experience you have while playing as a civilization. The multiplayer pales in comparison to the single player, but with a good group of friends, that doesn't matter. Just make sure you don't use the option where combat takes turns; nobody likes waiting for the enemy to do all of their moves before you can advance or retreat.
Giggles_Manically;-;A Fanastic game that with both expansion packs, becomes an endlessly engrossing game that sucks you in for hours. While it does lack the systems in Civ 4 like pollution, it is a simple to learn game, that gives you a depth of play styles with its leaders and victory conditions that keeps you coming back for more. Well worth trying to demo and contracting onemoreturnitis.
Newtman24;-;BEST GAME EVER. (*Forrest Gump Vocie* THAT"S ALL I HAVE TO SAY ABOUT THAT.)
Spleenzy;-;Can spend hours playing this game and not even realise, once you start building up your civilzation, you won't want to stop. It's sooo addictive!
nyo ho ho;-;its civilization nuff said
Kat;-;9/10 Few minor bugs but with a great replay value, with sessions that can last for 6+ hours. Decent variety in gameplay & gametypes, with alterable features such as core & dlc civilizations and artifical intelligence. Great fun to play with friends, but lag can be present with high AI counts and world sizes.
Captain Singleplayer;-;One more turn... one more turn... oh, it's 4AM in the morning already?! Oh well, one more turn...
Tom;-;A hip hop The hippie to the hippie the Hip hip a hop and you don't stop, rock it Rock it out, Baby Bubba to the boogie da bang bang The boogie to the boogie, the beat. I said, I can't wait 'til the end of the week When I'm rappin' to the rhythm of a groovy beat And I attempt to raise your body heat. Just blow your mind, so you can't speak And do a thing but a-rock and shuffle your feet And let it change up to a dance called the freak And when you finally do come into your rhythmic beat, Reast a little while so you don't get weak. I know a man named Hank He has more rhymes than a serious bank So come on Hank, sing that song, To the rhythm of the boogie, the bang bang da bong!
Garner;-;Just one more turn... one more... *falls asleep at keyboard*
Pilotonpc;-;Great game good graphics i would recommend this game
[OJSA] SpotHydra;-;You won't be able to just have one more turn, you fool
Pixel_Apocalpyse;-;Civilization 5 is addicting and fun
bcollar;-;Well worth the money, long gameplay and obviously great replayability
Loccen;-;A fantastic game with many hundreds of hours of addictive fun, the king of all turn based games.
Mushroom Man;-;This game is amazing. I've had it and played it for years, and it genuinely never gets old. It has an infinite amount of replayability, and no two games ever end the same way. I'd fully recommend getting the DLC as well as the standalone game, seeing as you'll lust for more content after you play 100 hours or so, and the DLC Civ has to offer is fantastic.
Flan;-;I'm not even a fan of strategy games but dang this game is great
Mr.BurgerMuffs;-;I didn't trade horses with Gandhi so he nuked me. It was fun.
Elegantly Light Bulb;-;As Washington, I amassed an army of such great magnitude that I decimated every other inferior countries except Germany. I left Bismarck with a tiny isolated island. Then I nuked them later. Best 10 hours ever.
Skrikey;-;Come one and all, kings and Generals, dictators and leaders of free men across the world, and hearken to the rallying cry of all who play; "Just one more turn!" And that, dear reader, is how your life slowly begins to disintegrate all around you whilst you dream of hex-tiled landscapes, and every thought becomes that of unit cost vs efficiency. Fiendishly addictive and a fine addition to the Civilization stable that improves with every little bit they add on. Easily worth all the time and money that you throw at it, if you're an armchair politico of any stripe.
Ben Dover;-;This game is very interesting and I can play it for hours. It is very realistic and has great depth. My friend got me this for my birthday and I'm glad he did. This is a must-have.
Weasel McGee;-;A really good game! The single player is very good and the multiplayer is even better. but it's the DLC that really makes the game come alive. The Mods don't always work.
peteyfat;-;Started game as Germany Made them Jewish (along with Vatican City as well XD) Eclipsed everyone in research Got to 200% culture dominace over China Got arrogant Declared war on Greece (with backups by other civs) Didn't stand a chance Retreated and headed for china Greece successfully allied all 16 city-states Greece gets 40 diplomats World-Leader proposal in 20 turns Goes to drastic measures Bombs city-state so Greece can't win through diplomacy City state survives 4 atomic bombs No more turns So close to a science victory and Greece wins through city-states T_T 11/10
.UVExplore;-;10/10 Would nuke again.
GameGirl91;-;I need to play this game more. Once you get into it's very addictive! I'm glad I got it!
RamboJesus;-;It's like History class, except everyone is alive at once and wants to kill you.
KraziestTaco;-;This game is a great way to spend a day! With complex and fantastic gameplay, this game is a great buy. There are countless map types and characters giving you an infinate number of experiences!
Newtman24;-;BEST GAME EVER. (*Forrest Gump Vocie* THAT"S ALL I HAVE TO SAY ABOUT THAT.)
mrkmkz;-;Civilization 5 has had an interesting journey over the years and remains the game I have most likely wasted the most time on. But do not think it is perfect in any ways, it is as flawed as a game can be. I will not waste time on Single Player as the AI is either unfair on Diety and it is a challenge so far that you have to play one exact way to win or ly stupid and all you do is haul those wonders and wait for a time to attack. Their attack strategies are mediocre at best and even with number advantage you are able to defeat the opponent without any issues. But there is a reason I only played Civ Beyond Earth 30 hours and this game since then 500 hours. And it is the Multiplayer. Back in the day I used to play Civ 3 with some buddies on Hot Seat Mode and that was a blast, so going into Civ 5 I started playing MP right away and have not been disappointed, well I have been but more on that later. The team games are awesome, they require great tactics and strategy and are highly competitive given you play with the right group. FFAs are plenty and can be fun too, there is nothing more rewarding than winning a 6 hour game. At the beginning there are several ways to be competitive and one has to make quick and rash decisions on whether to build wonders, cities or units. There is a default way to be effective but one still has to analyse its territory. With the addons this just becomes better as one has to decide whether to go for that early pantheon, how to deal with city states and potential neighbors. Sometimes an early rush is the only option you have to succeed. This is what makes the game great, you are required to make game altering decisions quickly and early. It is not like AoE where you can play with a preset mindset as sometimes it just dont work out. When you are playing as Babylon, a science powerhouse, but you see yourself surrounded by 2 players, your typcial play by rushing Great Library will not be possible anymore. With all the updates and addons I do have to say I like the current setup of Wonders as well as the selection of Natural Wonders. There are some which are gamebreaking and are usually banned, e.g. Great Wall. But I do like them as a adjustment to your game. The Natural Wonders are IMO also quite nicely balanced, except of course El Dorado and the Fountain of Youth, which are rare spawns. The 500 Gold equalizes an early Settler buy or 2 workers, which gives you a great advantage to do anything. Fountain of Youth gives you 10 happiness plus higher Reg, you can expand without worries for a long time. But it is possible to still defeat a person with these wonders, something that can be rewarding. The Tech Tree I always had my issues with as it is pretty locked and sometimes offers little room for strategy. There are some techs which are game deciding, Crossbows and Navigation the most apparent ones. Later one as the tech tree branches out one has to make a decision on getting certain techs while neglecting others. One of the toughest decisions is always on whether getting Public Schools or Artillery, Science or the 3 range unit. Early on I always play a default setup, I rarely adjust it to the start. C
Nordic Nigga;-;Its a fun game to waste a few hours of your day, except when that  Gandhi decides to nuke your  for demanding 40 gold pieces
Insane;-;I played this game for 10 minutes, after that 4 hours had passed. 10/10 would play again.
IM_INNOCENT!;-;*Looks at clock* "oh ok its 16:30 i have got plenty of time" *15 minutes later looks again, its 5:30*
Astari;-;The most time consuming game you could possibly play
Rio;-;Friendly to everyone Nuked for no reason 10/10
john cena;-;this game gave me nightmares of being gangbanged by genghis khan attila the hun and shaka of the zulus 10/10
Virgash;-;After 200 hours of playtime in Civ 5, I'm still playing the game a ton and enjoying it. This game has so much diversity and depth to it that you can immerse yourself in it for hours on end. This is arguably the best strategy game ever made and has a lot of replayability. I recommend this game to anyone and you can play multiplayer and enjoy the game with friends.
Tronski;-;Very good game. It's a shame you never finish a game with more than 3 players.
TheSnazzyWizard;-;An okay game,you know, if you like turn-based strategy and all.
CyborgTiger;-;This game is just an awesome game, I recommend it to everybody that likes a great strategy game. This game is probably infinite because after beating the game you can just change civilization and do it in a diffrent way. As I said I recommend it to everyone that likes strategy games!
InternetCat;-;Civ V taught me how to geography. thx Civ V.
TheDecoyTheory;-;Such a good strategic game. Would recommend other people getting this game.
SuperNova;-;bought it one morning and thought i would play a 'quick' session to see what its like days later i'm still in my underwear and have not washed nor shaven. 10/10 would abandon hygeine and social life again
Forsaken Avocado;-;Please love yourself and get this and all the DLC next time it goes 75% off, which is relatively often. I'm not sure how veterans to these sorts of turn-based strat games find it, but to a total newcomer like me the mechanics are rich and complex. It takes a while to become familiar with how everything works (I'm 150+ hours in and I'm still discovering things) but that just makes it more enjoyable in my opinion. You get out of it whatever you put into it. If you're super serious and looking for a challenge, this has it. If you're interested because you've heard of the potential hilarity that can ensue, this certainly has it. The worldbuilder DSK that comes with the game is also very enjoyable, especially if you're a writer or an artist. It's a great source of inspiration.
Galucia;-;When I look for a strategy game I'm interested in three things. I want a deep and rich strategy platform. Something that makes you think and really makes you feel like you are in control. All decisions good or bad will way into the outcome of the game and only when you are at your best will you obtain victory. I want this deep strategy but I also don't want it at the price of over complicating things. Too much of a good thing as they say, it needs to have that deep strategy but not get overly complicated about it. Last and most obviously the game needs to be entertaining. By this I mean that even if the game takes a while to complete, as most strategy games do, I want to enjoy the entire experience and not feel as though I am grinding through the game or spend un-necessary amounts of time just waiting for things to happen or finish happening. Civilization V hits this on all points. With every expansion the way to victory has become deeper and more rewarding without getting unbalanced or to complicated. Everything is very intuitive without being too simple. You really feel as though you are in control of a Civ and building your way to global domination and victory. Civilization has always been one of the best strategy games out there and the latest instalment continues this tradition. 9.5/10
TyBlood13;-;Hitler found Judiasm in a modded game. 11/10
Russell;-;Have a lot of free time? Have a girlfriend? Have a life? Buy Civilization V! Now you don't have any of those things but you can get nuked by Ghandi! Great deal, right? 10/10 would get nuked again
BIRB;-;Tips on how to Civ V. 1.) Make an alliance with Ghandi. 2.) Wait until near the end of the game. 3.) Ghandi has researched nukes. 4.) ded.
Dhalsim;-;Best time machine money can buy.
Shneeky Shpee;-;Great Game.
MICOOOOOOL;-;Gandhi is peacefull... always trust him, nothing could possibly go worng...
Aug3600;-;And on the 8th day, God created Civ 5. He has been hitting "next turn" ever since.
luke609;-;This game is amazing.
Apollo;-;Fantastic game. Pity the DLCs are too pricey for me :(
kungisans;-;Game good. Works like timemachine... only goes into the future. Have fun. Lose youth. Grow beard. No bath. Attract flies.
TheCatWithTheHat;-;If this game was a potatoe, it would be a unique, tasty and edible potatoe 10/10 TheCatWithTheHat
Juan Carlos Bodoque;-;Well, what can I say, It's one of the best games I have ever played and obviously its one of the best Strategy games ever! Although it's very under-estimated, compared with other Strategy games, such as Victoria II and Europa Universalis IV, It's FUN! It's not just thinking, It's Also Loads of Gameplay! But Vanilla isn't quite fun, because you start with MANY less civilizations, plus, there are very few mods in the workshop for vanilla. My recomendation, Its waiting unitl Summer/Spring/Winter/Fall sales, so you can get it with G&K for 9 Dollars, instead of 40. I don't know how much the complete edition will cost, but, it will be totally worth it. Ok, now we come to the part of [Insert Joke about the game here]... Let's see... I'll just play one more turn aaaaaaand it's 6 AM :|
Tuna;-;So my Civilization is all like BOOM RATATATATATATA CHACHING *WINNER* Yours be like *prrrtt* Clean.
Mesaif;-;Ive spent time. time TIME TIME WASTING TIME DOING THIS GOING TO GO PLAY NOW
Exotitan;-;great strat game
jeff;-;Gandhi once said: "I object to violence" Gandhi lied.
Feelzilla, King of No GF;-;People talk about its chops as a strategy game all the time, but it's actually at its best as an unintentional comedy simulator. Ghandi the bloodthirsty dictator! Stanley Kubrick, that great medieval Japanese artist! Spartacus, the Austrian general and inventor of the jeep! Okay, but no, it's great. Buy it, get addicted, hate yourself.
BeatsByStu;-;This is a genuinely great game, and it's easy to get into. My only problem with it is that the camera control is a bit awkward if you use a laptop, but apart from that, I haven't found any problems with it
EkiSangheart;-;Most. Addicting. Game. Ever.
nerd;-;Just... one... more... turn... You have to strap your  to the chair until you win the game or you play for so long that you forget who you are.
Commie;-;Fantastic game, much like Age of Empires or Rise of Nations, but more complex and more victory types!
Ol1yGat0r;-;Possibly the greatest turn based strategy game of all time. Picking a Civilization and using its abilities, units and buildings to turn a small settlement into a planet spanning empire gives you an amazing sense of achievement. the beautiful graphics, music and easy gameplay make Civilization V one of the best games of all time. Ever. 100/10
redcrew;-;Let out your inner leader and nuke the world to send your rivals back to the stone age!
Wowhub;-;Awesome, one of the best games in the world. If you playsingle player the cpu's will automatically at random declare war on you. It keeps you on edge wanting more.
Dark Shadow;-;Do you want to see King Leonidas driving a jeep? Do you want to see Queen Elizabeth nuke Ghandi? Do you want to kill the Mayans with tanks and riflemen? Do you want to have Einstein helping create the first wheel? If you want this then you should get Civ V.
Zorelnam;-;good gameplay the mods support give you even more interesting stuff to do worth 30 dollars dont buy for any thing on top of that
[50] Wliu;-;As a friend said: "Wait, it's 4am already? It was 9 last time I checked..."
General Phoenix;-;The game that makes you king of the world (if you so deisre) just watch out for Gandhi and his nukes.
RectusErectus;-;Great game.
cade;-;420/10 made me not get a gf, stay home all summer, and take over japan all in the same month thanks sid meier, for a game that made me eat more hot pockets in a hour than a child in africa did in his entire life
OgoDaHero;-;The Byzantines denounced me so I destroyed their whole 4000 year old civilization. 10/10
Sir Clone;-;Destroyed Japan. Got a culture victory. 10/10, Great game!
dragondave;-;don't trust gandi.... he will kill you, and wont care.
JacuzziMan;-;I have learned more from this game then from school. 11/10 Would learn again (on a serious note: this is the game of the year every year:))
ChristStopper;-;A crazy addictive game that will have you playing day after day to refine your play style and skill. Truly a great game and a big improvement on the last game in my opinion. This is the sort of game that you could leave for a few months and come back to and still enjoy. Tones of replayability and enough options to make each game completely unique. 9/10
Secret Squirrel;-;This game is the best. Its a 10/10 Except for the time you will spend playing it! 11pm turns into 4in the morning before you know it. I was so into today that I forgot today was my friends birthday....oppps Can't wait for the new one!
lirich90;-;There are two types of people in this world - those who dislike Civ and those who buy the game and lose the next 16 hours of their life clicking on the 'next turn' button. As a 4x game Civ does it all: Economics, diplomacy, strategy, empire macro-management, city micro-management, religious disputes, etc. And it does all of it in an immersive, attractive environment that progresses with the state of your civilization. The only real cons are that public multiplayer games take forever without a good method for pausing/saving/resuming but this can be remedied by joining a Civ steam group or just playing with friends. At the very least, give the Brave New World Demo a try and find out how expendable your sleep is.
JFK;-;oops its 4 am and I have to work today... just one more turn
Lord Sherbert of Hattes;-;This game is beautiful, addictive, and fun.
Sniping_Badger;-;This game be the , 13/10 would finger
The Pan Man;-;Used this game to help me study for a history exam. Got an F. Apparently, the Mongolians didn't wipe out the Chinese with a nuclear weapon. Teacher also says George Washington didn't invent and establish Judaism as the world religion. 10/10 Taught me world history, teachers got their facts worse than Wikipedia
lllATTABOYlll;-;bought this game a few days ago at full price went on sale today 75% off with dlc 10/10 worth it.
Rather Dashing;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is one of the greatest games I have played. With an almost infinite replayability value, this game can be played over and over again and get a different experience each time. Depending on how you set up the game you can play a quick hour or two game or a game that lasts days. If you are looking to sit back, relax and dominate, you can play on an easier setting. If you are looking for a very difficult challenge, you can play on the hardest difficulty mode. And the modding community for this is great and extensive, there are all sorts of cool and entertaining mods. I really enjoyed this game, and its DLC's.
Chad;-;Wuy this for my friends Cat, Sophia, Aqua, and Pedro please
Cheeki Breeki;-;The greatest TBS since the slave trade
bzl;-;PROCEED WITH EXTREME CAUTION; If you get suckered into buying/downloading this, there is a serious chance you will spend an embarrasing amount of time playing it.
Mao "Big Dong" Zedong;-;The very first game I ever played of Sid Meier's Civilization V was with a few of my friends. We decided to all random our leaders. I got Alexander the Great. Being a fan of history I assumed that he would be a great leader for war and conquering. I managed to be an absolute power house. I took out the 3 ai civs we had and one of my friend's civ. The next and final target was the best player out of all of us. He was terrified and was desperate for a cultural victory. As I sended my forces to rain havoc he took advantage of his many cities, thanks to his leader's, who was Ghandhi, unique ability that allowed him to have plenty of happiness with many cities. He then switched all of them to science production and then stole the game from me that everyone convinced was mine. I didn't talk to him for a week. Later on in life we made another civ game, hoping to have as much "fun" as before. I selected Brazil, who bonuses from golden ages and is a cultural based civ. The same person who stole my victory as Ghandhi chose Askia, a warful civ who benefits from fighting. I was working on building the Chichen Itza, a wonder that would increase the length of my golden ages by 100%, a huge help to my culture victory. I had one turn left until the Chichen Itza would be complete, making me a powerful contender in this very competative game of civ. The turn ends and I am extact to show off the completion of my new Chichen Itza, however I was met with a very unpleasent suprise, the Chciehn Itza has been built in Askia. I insta enter a fit of rage nearly breaking my computer and then quite quickly rage quit the game. I didn't talk to him for 2 weeks. Teared a friendship apart 10/10
WYS MDubs;-;It's fun...............................................................................................................................................................................
[HL] 2-Dimensional;-;Civilization V is a strategy game by Firaxis Studios that supports both multiplayer and singleplayer. Unlike other strategy games I know, (*Cough cough* Starcraft II *cough cough*) this game does not have as huge of a learning curve to it. I was introduced to it at a fairly young age as both my brother and father were avid fans of the series. You start off usually by doing a single player game. Before you dive into the actual gameplay you must set up your game. First you are given a choice of factions, of which there are many. My favorite for the classic Civ is Egypt, while in Gods and Kings it is the Huns, and in Brave New World it is Brazil. After you select your faction, you select your land type (Islands, Continents, Fractal etc.) and game length. Getting started can be tough, but the helpful "Advisors" will show you the way. There are many ways to win, so finding your play style will not be a problem either. As you player you contruct buildings to help with different conditions, and units to help defend against or conquer your enemies. Just like the real world, world wonders of all different varieties can be constructed for your empire as well, however only one of each may exist. There are many as well, ranging anywhere from the Great Wall of China to the Big Ben. The different victory types are diplomatic, cultural, domination, science, and time. I personally have only won twice with both victories being cultural as Egypt and Rome. In addition, there is endless replayability. With the many different world types and Civilizations to choose from, gameplay is endless. You will be investing hundreds if not thousands of hours on this game, I assure you. Multiplayer is something to brag about as well, I have never had a better time anywhere than playing with friends on Civilization V. There are two expansions to this game, Gods and Kings and Brave New World. Each of these expansions are worth every penny. In the end, this game is spectacular and one of my all time favorites. If you can afford it, pick it up immediatly or if you don't have the cash, wait for a sale and then do yourself the favor. This game and all of it's expansions combined earns a 95/100 from me. Fantastic, amazing, superb. Get it.
Bart;-;Played not that much but looking forwards tot play more.
Chaoos;-;I overlooked this game so many times until I bought it when it was on sale to play with some friends, and it is one of the only strategy games I like. As more of an Action RPG kinda player going in to Civ was a strange experience, but around the 1 play time mark I was hooked, I didn't want the session to end. These games can be played for a while, left for a week and then come back to, so actual "matches" as I'll call them can last weeks (Some friends and I have been playing one match for about 2 months now). As for the game itself, I found it best from a casual point of view, one of those games where you can get together with friends and just play. Civ can also be very intense at some points, with decisions to side with friends or kill them (Or side with them, and when your contracts run out just completely  them over) So in conclusion, BUY THIS GAME. Friends or not, this game is extremely fun for both casual and competitive players
miller9953;-;WEll you can see by my hrs logged what I think about this title...Nuff Said!
jonte;-;Honestly one of the few games out there that has managed to hold my attention for ~1000 hours. With each expansion the game has become more rounded and fun, each in turn smoothing off the rough edges of its predecessor. Whilst purists say that Civ IV is superior, the 'one unit per hex' rule of Civ V is what gives this iteration the edge for me.
Kaiser;-;This game is actually fantastic. Very entertaining, keeps me engaged for hours. Fun to play with friends too.
NS.KuruNinji;-;Although the game is long-winded and takes a while to play, Civ V is a very fun game for multiplayer and a good time spender when your bored as S**t! Nuke Them All - 'Nuff Said 9/10
eldrasis;-;not a bad game when it actually starts, so long as you never try multiplayer
Aj Da Star;-;My god, this game is exetremely addicting and takes such a long time. But, it is such a amazing game that you don't care how much time it takes.
D33DAA;-;An extensive and deep strategy game that is easy to learn and consistently fun. A large array of content, enhanced by numerous DLC packs, a blast with friends, singleplayer can drag over time. Relaxing in times of peace, and thrilling in war.
Jony-;-;PRO: + Full potential of trade is elegantly subtle + Real-world economic cooperation + Science, religious influences, and some cultural effects + Achievements + Steam Cloud + Multiplay + Nuclear arms + Spies' missions + Vote in the United Nations + Besides religion and espionage, Gods and Kings adds a bevy of new units, buildings, wonders, and civilizations to play. CONTRA: - DLC for $ CONCLUSION: Probably one of the biggest changes is Brave New World's inclusion of trade routes.
Ren;-;Wonderful game. Be prepared to put allot of time in this game. My parting words are Never trust Ghandi or Genghis Khan!
Starfoxguy;-;This will eat your day up, Also somehow launching nukes at Arabia doen't stop my people from visting them.
John Sheppard;-;What if Civilization had lyrics... There's a game called civilization, Where you get your own little nation Be immortal, ruler as you see fit With just one click and you can decree  From Civ 1 to Civ Revolution It's your job to find the solution Need advice from somebody wiser? Just ask Elvis he's your advisor. Everybody thinks you're nobody important; if this were fight club you'ld be Edward Norton A gimp, a geek, a shrimp (they call you weak they call you wimp, so lame) Little do they know that you're a man of power! You can conquer people hour after hour! They'd fear you, if they lived In the borders of your Civ! So keep playing Civilization Take good care of your little nation Start a war with Ancient Egyptians Spread your equally valid Religion Win with science, culture or napalm Watch out Ghandi might drop the A-bomb You can show your neighbors you love them Or just beat the dog- out of them When you're playing Civilization History becomes your creation Learn to write before you can read And build the Taj Mahal right in Cleveland Keep your wits and your sence of humor Watch out for that Prick Montezuma (**he's a  bag**) You can change the future a lot-see You can even make Jewish Nazis Civilization is the bomb, I hope they don't drop the ball when they bring it to Facebook.
Ridnarhtim;-;Great game, and one of the few games that has survived the test of time! Great stratigic game, and a lot of different ways to play it do to many different victories and the different civilizations which each grant their own special bonus. 10/10 ;) If you are planing on buying this you could also buy Brave New World :)
Uncle Timmy;-;GG 10/1o IGN would play again
ShadeOfGuns;-;ross and i make hard love when on this game, this game sucks to play alone so pick up a buddy before hoping into the world of Civ 5, good game play but sometimes gets a little repeatative after a while. the factions are bipolar and will go from loving you to hating you in a matter of turns.... 10/10 would be bipolar again
Kakrenad;-;very exciting
KingJeff;-;It's a Sid Meier's game! And it's incredibily fun and nice to play. It's flaws is that the multiplayer session is sort off weird and sometimes you will definitely get disconnected, but other than that the game has been nice and awesome. And bloody hell wtf is there a lot of DLC? I love the expansion but the amount of dlc for this game is ludacrisly much, please do not release a game where you tries to milk your fan base by getting them to get the dlc content.
Spankks;-;Heroin is less addictive...
Kanye Blessed;-;if you want to win pick china for war, korea/babylon for science, and inca/poland for everything else
Redington;-;Civilization V is a great game. I am not the best at it but I have fun playing it especially with friends. This is a good game to play with friends or alone and once you start playing you tend to forget what time it is until you really need to get off, I myself really enjoy this game and sometimes I never notice how fast time goes by. I may spend up to six to seven hours a day on this game. This game is not just for gamers who enjoy strategy games but I my opinion it is a game for anyone who just want to mess around with friends.
Sejong the Dong;-;I respected and admired the man known as Mahatma Gandhi before playing this game. When I first found him in my one of my playthroughs, I was overjoyed as he continued to give me gifts of gold and luxuries, he asked passage through my lands and I gladly accepted. What happened next was the game Fallout as I now despise the man named Gandhi. 11/10 Gandhi Hating Simulator 2015.
Darth Serf;-;Civilization 5 is my favourite game because it offers an endless amount of playtime. Every time I play, its different; so I keep coming back because it always offers something new. Learning how to play may take a few games, but once you understand the basics there's no going back. On top of all that is the Steam Workshop which offers so much more to explore, from modded Civilizations to different game play. Plus it helps that its addictive.
Cheeki Breeki;-;The greatest TBS since the slave trade
redcrew;-;Let out your inner leader and nuke the world to send your rivals back to the stone age!
Bearded Batman;-;If you like being America and conquering everyone and everything like I do, then this is the game for you!
nurseliv;-;One unit per tile makes combat much better while turn times are awfully long. As long as I play on smaller than average maps it's not too bothersome, though and it's a great game nonetheless.
icelite;-;If you have ever wanted to have complete control of an empire diplomatically, culturally, or even with brute force, Civ 5 is the game for you. It features 30+ different civilizations, all with their own unique look, to play as if you manage to buy the gold edition. You can easily sink in 5-6 hours like I did whenever I started the game because It's not mentally possible to stop until you conclude the fate of your civilization. Hopefully this convinces you to buy the game as soon as possible. - Christian:)
ChristStopper;-;A crazy addictive game that will have you playing day after day to refine your play style and skill. Truly a great game and a big improvement on the last game in my opinion. This is the sort of game that you could leave for a few months and come back to and still enjoy. Tones of replayability and enough options to make each game completely unique. 9/10
Secret Squirrel;-;This game is the best. Its a 10/10 Except for the time you will spend playing it! 11pm turns into 4in the morning before you know it. I was so into today that I forgot today was my friends birthday....oppps Can't wait for the new one!
lirich90;-;There are two types of people in this world - those who dislike Civ and those who buy the game and lose the next 16 hours of their life clicking on the 'next turn' button. As a 4x game Civ does it all: Economics, diplomacy, strategy, empire macro-management, city micro-management, religious disputes, etc. And it does all of it in an immersive, attractive environment that progresses with the state of your civilization. The only real cons are that public multiplayer games take forever without a good method for pausing/saving/resuming but this can be remedied by joining a Civ steam group or just playing with friends. At the very least, give the Brave New World Demo a try and find out how expendable your sleep is.
JFK;-;oops its 4 am and I have to work today... just one more turn
Lord Sherbert of Hattes;-;This game is beautiful, addictive, and fun.
Sniping_Badger;-;This game be the , 13/10 would finger
The Pan Man;-;Used this game to help me study for a history exam. Got an F. Apparently, the Mongolians didn't wipe out the Chinese with a nuclear weapon. Teacher also says George Washington didn't invent and establish Judaism as the world religion. 10/10 Taught me world history, teachers got their facts worse than Wikipedia
Jason Todd;-;Conquered every other race as Japan and founded the magnificent imperialstic New Japanese Empire. 11/10 would conquer the world again.
Dank Vader;-;This game is more addicting then crack. You see Korea and you're like ''Well F**k'' That's my science victory gone or is it? 20 turns later i have 2 catapults 3 spearmen and 3 composite bowmen. surrounds Seoul and takes it in 5 turns. Korea starts to negotiate peace and gives me Busan that's too much win xD 20/10 hoes xD Sorry if my language was offensive at some points xD
Road to Rank 5 hearthstone;-;A Epic Game,A classic with good graphics,If you are a fan of the previous civ games,This fixes the civ 4 unit stacking problem.It should be picked up immediately if you like strategy games.10/10
Tyrant;-;This game is pretty chill. Find it more relaxing to play than AoE 2. But its also pretty addicting. Find it amusing that you can spawn William Shakespeare in Japan.
Zires;-;Civilization V is, by far, my favorite game I have ever encountered. For starters, you can play from a large range of historical civilizations such as the Romans, Egyptians, Ottomans, Mongolians and Japanese; Each one of these civs are unique, since each gets a bonus to help in the game (Example - Persia has a longer golden age / Romans build buildings faster). The graphics are extremely good, considering this is game from 2010, a few glitches here and there with the tiles not showing up or FPS drop when scrolling through the world. What can you do? ... You can be militeristic, take over the world with an iron fist and create an empire. You can be a cultural nation, only having a few cities and being peaceful with fellow nations. The game is extremely fair, no nation has over powered bonuses to give them a boost during the game. A lot of strategy is needed if you wish to succeed in winning, you can't just create a large army and not expect any consequences. Civ's large selection of maps is also amazing. You can play on Earth, with America, Europe, Asia, Africa, and the Middle East, each having realistic minerals inside them (Middle East has oil, America has gold in the west), aswell as islands and Pangaea (Hope I'm spelling it right :C) Now, for the problems of the game, none of these should scare you away from buying this masterpiece, though. 1. Civs will randomly denounce you, even if you haven't attacked anyone. 2. Adding on to Civs doing random things, they sometimes will declare war on you for no reason (Somewhat rare, tough) 3. Lagging & FPS drop. Nothing to overly concern about, but the farther you get into the game, the laggier it gets with all of the cities and units. That's really all of the problems I've encountered, others might have seen more. I recommend this game to anyone who loves Strategy, turn based games. It's seriously one of the best strategy games out there today. Defiantly worth the money! 9.0/10 (Ignore possible grammar/spelling mistakes)
Trousers;-;This game lets you choose how you want to progress as a civilization. Whether you choose to relay on scientific research to develop more efficient mechanisms or you want to build a huge powerful army to eliminate the competition. Civilization 5 seems like it'd be boring and a waste, but I found it engaging. The freedom of how you progress and solve problems is definately a plus. I like it.
Cuauhtemoc_saw;-;One of the greatest parts of this game is naming things, cities, religions, to hilarious things "Veganland demands chocolate!" "Jerusalem has converted to Ilikemen". All around a wonderful game, be sure to get the complete edition, it does "complete" the game.
Deathlyhaze;-;Fantastic game, spend hours on it without even knowing
.lll.l.lmo|Kbaer.;-;800h +... "The trouble is, we think we have time" B. (_)
my trap is still bunky;-;if my  prolapsed 6 times in a row and ok i couldnt finish this review i crack myself up :)
Diminutive Resplendence;-;An excellent strategy game. Don't forget to read the supplementary material... may actually inspire you to discover more about history. Even if you don't, this game has so many options for replayability it is well worth the money.
ChronixPsyc;-;I bought this game because I had  all to do and thought lol, 30. Whats that when I am a multi millionaire living with hugh hefner in brazil with some hookers and , This isnt the point, the games good, get it bruv
Shia LaBeouf;-;Great Game, and kills time too fast that you forget everything but cool thing is you don't feel like  or your brain feels like toasted... This just keeps you even fresher and is so not tiring. But I think DLC's could have been cheaper.
Guiorgy;-;The best as allways...
jamescdawson;-;Literally the best game ever made.
Buddha;-;Countless hours of my life wasted on one game. Totally worth it.
Zarakoza;-;Really nice game if you like the turned based strategy stuff
[HL] 2-Dimensional;-;Civilization V is a strategy game by Firaxis Studios that supports both multiplayer and singleplayer. Unlike other strategy games I know, (*Cough cough* Starcraft II *cough cough*) this game does not have as huge of a learning curve to it. I was introduced to it at a fairly young age as both my brother and father were avid fans of the series. You start off usually by doing a single player game. Before you dive into the actual gameplay you must set up your game. First you are given a choice of factions, of which there are many. My favorite for the classic Civ is Egypt, while in Gods and Kings it is the Huns, and in Brave New World it is Brazil. After you select your faction, you select your land type (Islands, Continents, Fractal etc.) and game length. Getting started can be tough, but the helpful "Advisors" will show you the way. There are many ways to win, so finding your play style will not be a problem either. As you player you contruct buildings to help with different conditions, and units to help defend against or conquer your enemies. Just like the real world, world wonders of all different varieties can be constructed for your empire as well, however only one of each may exist. There are many as well, ranging anywhere from the Great Wall of China to the Big Ben. The different victory types are diplomatic, cultural, domination, science, and time. I personally have only won twice with both victories being cultural as Egypt and Rome. In addition, there is endless replayability. With the many different world types and Civilizations to choose from, gameplay is endless. You will be investing hundreds if not thousands of hours on this game, I assure you. Multiplayer is something to brag about as well, I have never had a better time anywhere than playing with friends on Civilization V. There are two expansions to this game, Gods and Kings and Brave New World. Each of these expansions are worth every penny. In the end, this game is spectacular and one of my all time favorites. If you can afford it, pick it up immediatly or if you don't have the cash, wait for a sale and then do yourself the favor. This game and all of it's expansions combined earns a 95/100 from me. Fantastic, amazing, superb. Get it.
Kalnder;-;With countless civilizations at your fingertips to begin on a journey through time there is no doubt that Civilization V will have you playing for hours on end. > With various different game speeds there is a choice to suit most- be it standard, quick or marathon game times. > Multiplayer works very well but is known to have a few minor issues from time to time which are easily fixed through restarts. > Single player is also done to a great standard. There are many bot difficulties availabe for the fresh-faced beginner to the experienced. > The games tutorials are very helpful and guide you through what needs to be done. However it is worth noting you don't have to follow the advisors. It is your Civ after all. > The animations and details put into the game means it is quite visually impressive, you can easily make out and enjoy the various landscapes. > There is a strategic view for those who want to concerntrate purely on the game mechanics and systems. > Combat works nicely however multiplayer works on a first - to - move basis which can be marginally annoying. Is the game mechanics complex? At first the game may seem a bit daunting to a first time player. However you quickly pick up options quite easily. You will start to notice that the game almost runs on repeats. All in all Civ V is a great game for those looking for that Earthly, Turn based strategy :3 ~ Kalnder
Average Dictator;-;I might have had to sell my kidney to pay the electric bill but I took over the world as germany 10/10
Frost Berry;-;SI THIS GAME IS AWESOMELY EPICS! I LOVE IT! i also have an extra key if you so happen to want the game as well just msg me bout it. there is only 1 so be quick :P
Kramer;-;bought it and didnt know id have this much fun 10 out of 9
Kaidene;-;Playing Civ 5 has given me so much confidence, for example I went to the store the other day and people were bowing as I passed by... My status as God-king must surely have had something to do with it. To test this theory I demanded tribute from the cashier telling him if he did not my army would surely lay waste to this market. To my shock and awe... he did not. Seriously though, picked this up on sale for $12.50 (plus all DLC) and it was deffinately worth it. Very engrossing game. Graphics are great. Highly recommended. Now I'm off to lay waste to more pixels!
Alice Cadaver;-;You down for some boiling rage? uncontrollable yelling? mistrust of your friends? then definitely buy and play multiplayer civ V. You'll hours and days and not even noticed!
Jeremy;-;Phenomenal game. Provides hours upon hours of gameplay. If you like strategy games, this is the game for you, and if you don't have it you're making a mistake. [/u]
WeeChucky10;-;Ghandi asked me for some Uraniam i gave him it but i wonder what he is going to do with it....
wake me up inside;-;took over middle east, africa and named the cities and put anti chink names as the cities 8/8 would take over er land again
CptCalculus;-;This is the Very nice game fun with friends since new patch.
8370519;-;This is one of the best games i have played in recent memory. Multiplayer is incredible. Got nuked by ghandi 10/10
TugBoat;-;Love it. Have so much fun with friends and destroying the world. 11/10 would buy again.
Ron Swanson;-;If this game was a Pineapple , it would be a very nice Pineapple that strips you to a chair and gives your  a thorn job when you suddenly look up and realised you waisted your life away in hopes to give some retribution to the pakistanian army , however you failed to win and died by barberians who made a peace treaty with ghandii. Dont even get me started on the culture you can choose a social polecy on the second round and.....Ghandi has nukes GG.
Quinnighan;-;Civ is the sh*t
KingJeff;-;It's a Sid Meier's game! And it's incredibily fun and nice to play. It's flaws is that the multiplayer session is sort off weird and sometimes you will definitely get disconnected, but other than that the game has been nice and awesome. And bloody hell wtf is there a lot of DLC? I love the expansion but the amount of dlc for this game is ludacrisly much, please do not release a game where you tries to milk your fan base by getting them to get the dlc content.
Spankks;-;Heroin is less addictive...
Argos;-;This game is soo awsome I am speechless
Pandarama;-;This game is amazing and will slowly take away your soul by havind ghandi nuke you and get  by barbarians. 5/5
Kramer;-;bought it and didnt know id have this much fun 10 out of 9
Stephen Colbert;-;Sleep is just another sacrifice on the road to victory
ChasingTheDawn;-;Worlds best waiting simulator.
diatribe;-;Great game with endless replay possibilities. A nice step up from the previous version, but Civ2 will always be my favorite as it introduced me to the series. A little too heavy on the DLC for comfort. Although they do add some nice additions once you have grown accustomed to the vanilla version. Like Civ2, plan on setting aside many late nights saying to yourself "just one more turn".
Shaolin Munkin n Dunkin;-;Insanely fun game.I convinced my freiends to buy it after watching the yogscast play it,and in a few months we have hundreds of hours on this game.Its one of those games where DLC is actually revolutionary and not just something nifty they threw in. I personally would wait for a sale then buy it with all of its dlc as it makes the game insanely fun.
Naru #;-;Perfect game ever!~
Broseidon_KingoftheSeas;-;This game is absolutely amazing. It's so easy to sink all day into a game like this.
Apex - Weaboo;-;Really Nice And Fun Strategical Game!
Commissar Sayle;-;Sid Meiers once again astonishes me. This game is more than genius. 10/10
Zaiux;-;If you come from previous Civilization games you won't get dissapointed by CIV5. It might not beat CIV4, but it sure is a step beyond in the franchise worth playing and play one turn more. PD: DLC's are a scam, not because they don't add good content, but the price/content ratio is a joke.
Kudushoo;-;It's like crack....
Kanye Blessed;-;if you want to win pick china for war, korea/babylon for science, and inca/poland for everything else
Bernie Sanders;-;I got nuked 17 times by Gandhi 10/10
Daltonimor;-;My friends were taking Washington, and I decided to intervene and do the last bit of damage. I lost two friends, but I now own Washington. 9/11
Turtle12312;-;Civ. V is amazing, awesome animations and hours and hours can be put into one single game. Requires srategy!
SLICK TRIK FOR A PILE OF PRICKS;-;i remove the kebab. the entire kebab.
ScrubLordCasual;-;>Start game >Become friends with everyone >Attila declares war on me after years of friendship >Destroy him down to his capitol >Attila offers peace >Denied >Kill Attila >Get called WarMonger 10/10 would warmong again
EssenSchmutz.exe;-;Spawn in a game. Start to build an empire. Get declared war on by ever other empire and city-state. Get rekt. Get gud. Kill everything near me. Start expanding. Get rekt. Get gud. Done.
Gurran;-;My 700 h with Civ 5 speaks for themself so here are some pro tips instead if you decide to get the game: 1. Alexander is a rich, arrogant, city state hoarder/stealer . Target acquired. 2. Don't let Gandhi get any uranium, don't trust him. 3. Everyone is , especially you the player. 4. Genghis may seem like an  but if you look past his quest to conquer every city state, he's a pretty good friend.
Fatigue;-;The AI is socially  AND I LOVE IT
EFC99;-;You must get this game. GET IT!
[F2B] Jimmitybob;-;this shizzle wizzle be the best shizzle wizzle out there
JosephUtopia;-;My Civ V review i have built the pyramids, written philosophy. i destroyed my neighbors, and i was the prophet of my own religion. i sailed the seas, found new worlds. i built an empire, then invented the steam engine. i was nuked by ghandi. i came, i saw, i conquered. 371 hours played and i beat king dificulty. 10/10
Quickdraw Synchron;-;Great game!
Killerbean;-;Recently bought this game and it quickly became one of my favorites.Definetly buy this game if you are into strategy games.
DragonWolf;-;"How long could one game on marathon really be?" - 107 Hours Ago
I want to see the world.;-;My first game on steam. The one that started it all. Completely worth buying but I got bored after a while
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
Bram [SS];-;great rts game
Lytheden;-;This is the most entertaining strategy game I've ever played. Even though I'm somewhat of a latecomer, its never to late to join the party :3. So much replay value, and the DLC's are definately worth the investment, especially Gods & Kings expansion. SO if your a fan of turned based strategy or even just strategy have a look at this!
Cizzin;-;Very much recommend. Love it
98kikic;-;If your into turned based strategy, look no further. Civ has been around a long time and Civ 5 is well vetted. It had a bit of a rocky start with the vannilla, but the first expansion is awsome.
Chowjers;-;Never see the sun again.
TheCheeseMaster101;-;This is a great turn-based game. It's really fun. I would recommend that you play it.
Killerbeaz101;-;I've played a bit. It's ok, I guess. 10/10
coolkat;-;This game is fun, I mean REALLY fun. You start as a insignificant civilization in 4000 B.C. and work your way up to a global super power in 2050 A.D.. Since I own the complete edition, the vast amount of civilizations (of which there are 43, more with mods. I play as the Americans most of the time) and the fact that one wrong move can lead to your downfall is very interesting. While the game is fun with all expansion packs and DLC, the game gets better with mods. You can download those in the workshop. The game will look EXTREMELY boring to a normal person, but try it. You'll be glad you did! Pros; -43 civs. Whole lotta' choices. -More wonders. Never will building the Eiffel Tower feel so good. -A social policy system better than Civ 4. Adopt social policies to enhance your empire and actually keep them. -Espionage is improved. Spy on your foes and see what they are planning within the click of a button!. -Loadsa mods. Over 4,000 of them. -They have America. -Did I mention they have America? Cons: None! Expect me or someone else to make a mod based on Sonic the Hedgehog's nation the United Federation.
Turtle12312;-;Civ. V is amazing, awesome animations and hours and hours can be put into one single game. Requires srategy!
Pavlov's Dong;-;I cannot play as Sid Meier, do not be fooled.
ciiDz;-;English: Honestly the best stratigy game I have ever played. There are a lot of different leaders, scenarios, maps and game modes to choose from. Furthermore there is a huge range of mods on the steam community and the internet which help to make a great game even better. Multiplayer mode is also a briliant addition and is really fun to play with several people. However the largest let down with this game is the in ability to use mods online as it would be great to play out scenarios such as the american civl war with me playing as the British and one of my American friends playing as the Americans. :          .            .                     .            .                                    .
Luna;-;Just as you may know it, this game has the positive reviews it has earned for entertaining the masses in times of boredom. Feel you want to be Kim-Jong Un? You know it. Be korea and rename the civ, cities and units. Have lots of fun!
"Canaba";-;Hexagons of fun. Worth.
Microsoft PowerPoint;-;This is a incredibly fun and addictive strategy game that is only funner with friends.
[TAW] VaporMatrix;-;Hands down the best game on steam I've ever played, I highly suggest this to anyone. I would suggest getting the full version; it may seem overpriced, but with what you're getting, it should be $40 more expensive. Get this game!
Kane112esimo;-;Great game experience. But I cannot forget the Golden Age of Civilization II and III awesomeness...
Pittmania!!;-;This will eat your life.
casey;-;I cried at the end 10/10 would civ
Ben (Mbweha);-;I've played all the Civ games, and this is my favorite.
Shia LaBeouf;-;Great Game, and kills time too fast that you forget everything but cool thing is you don't feel like  or your brain feels like toasted... This just keeps you even fresher and is so not tiring. But I think DLC's could have been cheaper.
Guiorgy;-;The best as allways...
jamescdawson;-;Literally the best game ever made.
Joe;-;It's great! Goodbye.
ChronixPsyc;-;I bought this game because I had  all to do and thought lol, 30. Whats that when I am a multi millionaire living with hugh hefner in brazil with some hookers and , This isnt the point, the games good, get it bruv
Kudushoo;-;It's like crack....
bettsJ;-;Amazingly addictive game! Great turn based stratergy game that leaves you wanting to play more!
du Bldmann;-;I hope you dont have a life because with this game your going to forget you had one. Civilization is a srategy game where you command your cilivilzation by build cities, going to war and trying to dominate your enemy, or going to the moon any many other things you can do when you play this game. this is one of the funniest and most time consuming games i have ever played and it is worth the price and the amazing DLC that lets you make trade routes with other civs out there or even creating your own religion to spread faith across the globe and gives you many more civlizations the play as. Buy this game now! the only thing you will regret is that you havn't showered in days because of this game.
Superstorm;-;Civilization V Review (with all DLC) One of the best PC games of all time Pro(s) +TONS of civilizations to play as (50ish with DLC) +multiple ways to win, not just through war +the mods... they make an infinite game even more infinite (INFINITCEPTION!) +badass and fitting music for each civilization +diplomacy is amazing with BNW AND GaK +mostly compitent AI (*cough* Rome II) +100ish maps to choose from +multiplayer is great and fun with friends +the moments in this game where Ghandi wins domination victory or Washington DC is on an island Con(s) -AI is super ing agressive Verdict (without DLC): 9/10 Verdict (with DLC): 9.4/10 WARNING: When you buy this game you make a pact with your soul to end any and all social interaction and give up your life for ruling your glorious civilization and making sure others do the same. My count is 3 people and growing so far :)
Joezapy;-;it is really easy to get absorbed in this game. last summer i spent up to 8 hours a day playing this game for a while. the most thorough game I have bought so far.
Turts;-;Fantastic game, but im begging you fireaxis please please please allow us to play an internet multiplayer game with mods. I beg you to add functionality my friends and i wish to play game of thrones and middle earth games together. How much fun would it be to have the war of five kings or the battles of middle earth in a multiplayer match, even if it means we all have to have the workshop dlc and its completely unranked, just for funsies, i want to rule westeros as the dorthraki and middle earth as saurumans white hand nasties.
7th Guards Brigade (Cho);-;JUST GET IT, IT'S QUITE ADDICTING
KabitKanit;-;This right here, is the best s.h.i.t i've smoked in a long time
Charm;-;It's alright
Vanilla1370;-;I'm 35 hours in, and I still haven't won a game. I find this to be a good thing, since similar games are really easy. I just want to know why Boudicca hates me enough to send every Celt military unit to my capital, bribes me with gold to give her open borders, then proceeds to curb stomp me within 20 minutes of every game.
Luke;-;10/10 would potatoe
Ray;-;2 kinds of ebola this game is good ebola
[B-LG]coolbreess;-;BOW DOWN TO MY EMPIRE Ahem. There are basically two types of people that will get this game. Those who've played the Sid Meier's Civilization series and are looking to get into the next installment, and those who've never tried it and are a little reluctant on embarking on what looks like a very complex strategy game. For those of you who have played the series before and haven't tried Civilization 5, just get this one too. There's really no reason not to go to the next installment. It's got nicer, more realistic graphics, new civilizations and smarter AI. With that said though, the DLCs are absolutely necessary. Vanilla Civ 5 was a bit lacking due to missing features we had just played in Civ 4 and not featuring many drastic improvements. God's and Kings, and Brave New World really make Civ 5 a true sequel to previous ones, and then some. They add religion and more complex politics and economics. Bottom line: If you spent hundreds of hours on previous Civ games, keep doing so on this upgraded version. Just make sure to get the DLCs Now for those of you who've heard of these games but never touched them, take a look at the other reviews on here, especially the hours played. Notice the pattern? 100 hours, 300 hours, some people even clock in 1000s of hours. And I know for a fact that many of them don't even touch the multiplayer and stick to the campaigns (or in many other cases, vice versa). We've all started out apprehensive about how complex the mechanics of the game look. You'd be surprised however, that you pick it up in about 15 minutes. The campaigns let you take on the role of histories greatest leaders and lead your nation to victory using whatever method you like. Do you love destroying opposing countries because they share a different culture than your own? Do you prefer making surrounding nations join you because the just see how happy your subjects are? Would you rather focus on science and discover electricity while everyone else is still using fire? If you answered no to all of those questions, then sure, fine, go play something else. In my case, the part of Civilization 5 that really shines is the Multiplayer. Team up or go against your friends while progressing to world domination. There used to be a lot of problems with starting a multiplayer game. Sometimes there were even crashes. However, it has now been stabilized and the only issue i can think of would be the long loading times. Even then, though, that never stopped us from playing until morning. Bottom line 2: Civilization 5 is incredibly easy to learn. The wide variety of choices let you be the ruler you want to be and make sure that the game never gets stale. It's got a few kinks, but you'll probably be too busy building the Taj Mahal in Italy to notice.
General Tugy;-;Brilliant game, definitely worth the money! I personally love replayability and this game has it coming out of its ears!
TOX1C PHAN7OM 8;-;Very good stratergy game, one of the best ive ever played, lots of variety and content 10/10
ackermax;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a roundbased turn-based strategy, 4X ( = eXplore, eXpand, eXploit, and eXterminate) game. I'll review and recommend this game together with its expansions, as those DLCs add important things to the main gameplay, making this game so outstanding good. If you like games like Crusader Kings or the Total War series, you definitely should check this one out. (There are of course some minor to major differences) You pick a leader/country for a game and have to reach different goals for different victory conditions. My (formerly) most played game on steam, here's why: + addictive as hell + high replay factor + you get so much game for your money + every country/leader has different strengths + you'll be able to play against friends + lots of diplomacy and different victory conditions + it is so much fun to watch your empire grow + every game you start is quite different + with DLCs: there is now religion and even more ways to win a game + many different characters, with DLCs: even more different characters + Graphics are actually neat, can look quite nice but does also run on older pcs (I guess) About the music: Some parts of the soundtrack are very nice and beautiful, but after playing a long time they can get repetetive and annoying, so it's neither really bad nor good. Some small things do bother me: - I guess this is a matter of taste, but I think there are way to many achievements, like 280 of 'em. - the scenarios are quite boring - sometimes I feel like you should have more diplomacy options and sometims it's annoying how fast another nation dislikes you (but I guess this is somehow realistic =) - Battle is really simple, if you want a similar game with more focus on battle/war, try the Total War Series (e.g. Medieval or Rome 1) Overall, this game is giving you extremely many hours of gametime due to its addictive gameplay and I guess you'll easily get plus 100 -150 hours with this one. Rating: 94/100
Panda;-;Must-Buy Strategy Game This game, when it has all the DLC's is way too addicting, and is a blast to play through your own alternate history. It's way too easy to spent 8+ hours simply building up your own empire, and then several more in a devestating war for more land. Only buy this game if it is with all the DLC's, particularly Brave New World, because the DLC's add some great features that the base game missed. Just buy the complete edition really. Right now.
MattDamonsOwl;-;It's pretty good. I like to take it out on the boat with me, but there is no wi-fi out on the water. If you're looking for a boat I would highly reccomend the 430 Sports Coupe. It comes with the convenience of a walk-thru windshield and sunroof standard.
RedNaddar;-;A fantastic strategy game where you can make your own civilisation and nuke all other civilisatons! Whilst renaming your cities to whatever you want!
Metro;-;Civilization gets 'mainstreamed!' Less demanding in the micromanagement department but most of the changes make for more interesting gameplay. Culture and religion are now 'currencies' you can expend -- the former to unlock 'civic trees' and the latter to buy improvements. Both are essentially proxies for mini-perks that boost various resources. Espionage is now menu based and more efficient. City-states add a new dynamic to diplomacy and warfare. One unit per hex eliminates stacking and speeds up combat time. Overall: different, less tedious, but not necessarily worse. Only truly egregious thing was the shameless milking of DLC.
tOm;-;Good game. Good life.
DukeOfSparks;-;Really good game!
GABBA67;-;This game is great. Nice graphics and sounds. The new combat system is very nice, no more stacking plenty of units on the same tile. Must have if you like turn based strategy games. My favourite is still Civilization III but it's getting out now with 4:3 ratio resolution. 9/10
Freets;-;CIVILIZATION V's appeal comes from its rather humorous and endlessly entertaining historical scenarios and simple-to-grasp mechanics that allow any casual strategy game enthusiast to sink their teeth into. I've sunk hours upon hours into this game because of it and I keep coming back for just one more turn of this long but incredibly enticing game. Give it a shot no matter what game genre you like, It's for everyone
;) kuwaii while high ~~;-;Beautimus gameplay that does last eternity, but an enjoyable eternity. Definitly worth getting during a sale, as the expansions are required imo for a balanced gameplay.
Tinyflare;-;Best Game In My Libary 10/10 Fun, Strategic and addictive (that may just be me). Would Recomend to aney Strategy or Citybuilder fan.
Timber910;-;I LOVE this game. Civ V is one of my favorite games of all time, beating out some really great games. It's addictive and fun, you just really get lost in the world. I seriously do suggest though getting the Complete Edition, don't waste your money on the base version, and try and buy the expansions later, just shell out the extra $30 ($5 now during the Weekend Deal). I HIGHLY recommend this game. I have had a lot of fun in the time i've played it, and I can't wait to play more. 9/10
Bill Nye The Nazi Spy;-;Yeah, it's just one of those games that you can play for 659+ hours. Swag.
Fraekith;-;Civ V is a great strategic game. You can either build an army or put together a thriving culture, or a mix of both. I really can't begin to tell you how fun this game is, I'll just let you know it was worth every penny.
OL;-;Probably the best turned-based strategy games. Even though there are a few negative aspects of the game i do not find them game changing. Even though i have never finished a single game, i still find it extremly funny. However i do not like to play it against a computer and the Multiplayer-mode isn't that successful witch make's the game a bit boring. I am recommending this game to people who want's to have an amazing ingame-experience. Here are my opinions on the pros and cons: Pros: + A lot of ingame opportunities / different ways to play. + Offline-mode, you do not need a internett connection. + Pretty decent graphics. + Verious difficulty option's. + You have a verious of factions. You can even play the father of peace, Gandhi. + Helpful turturial for beginners. + A save and load option. + A very large technoligy tree. + By far, the best Civilization game as for now. Cons: - In my experience, a very poor multiplayer-mode. - Can take year's to reach victory or defeat. - 2 expensive LDC'S, where only 1 makes it a bit better. - No one ever got the time to finish one game. - Your friends are lazy and will never play with you. - You might get  by barbarians who'll  everything you own. To sum up, its a very beautiful game with a lot of content. From a scale 1-10, i would give it a strong 7.
29mar04;-;one time i was playing with 3 other friends on a 10 civ map, and one of my friends attacked america and a few turns later he was at war with 3 civs at once with only 3 units and one city left. 10/10 would play again
shadowlord;-;This is the best Civilization yet in my opinion, less micromagement than previous games without losing depth.
Spare a knife?;-;Its fun
Spladoosh;-;This is a GREAT game, but i just wish it was less expensive.
drewthegreat;-;Well for one, it's actually called Civilization V instead of a "rehash" (I'm looking at you Sim City and DmC) so for that it gets props. This review is under the assumption you know what the CIvilization series is. Let me acknowledge right off the bat the comparisons to Civ 4 are justified, but don't let that you bypass this game altogether. Pros: Nice graphics - compared to the previous entries, it sure is a breath of fresh air, rendered clouds, and detailed terrian, fluid ocean live, and units. Soundtrack - high quality tracks that reflect whatever nation you choose to play, but can get old if you play for an extended period, have background music streaming when you tire of it Gameplay - Hex tiles deserve to be mentioned as they promote better tactics with adjacent units. Various options to select from including victory types, barbarian spawns, turn limits, world fertility, and map types Replayability - very high considering the nation DLC releases, Gods and Kings expansion which adds religion and esponiage that grant passive national bonuses and perks, Various tech and research upgrades tailored to your particular strategy, whether domination, culture, and science Mods - works very well with the Steam workshop and increases replayability. Recommended mods: R.E.D. Modpack, InfoAddict, and Real Earth Map Cons: Multiplayer - It is enjoyable to play against or with friends, but you can only play online without mods of any kind (this includes statistical mods like InfoAddict) AI - The major thing lacking for me personally, I can get lucky and spawn on an island and defend it quite easily using a few trained water tile ships. Nation leaders tend to be sporadic (even with their personalities mirrored to history) and childish at times. Trade agreements can be outrageously disproportionate to the demands being made. Great Turn based strategy game that fulfills what it was created to do.
The River King;-;Very great game and have tons of more fun with friends who play as well.
DigiM;-;What can I say about this game? It's confusing. Not to mistake that sentence as a bad experience, I enjoy it a lot. At start, it'll be really simple, just go explore and grow your city. But, late game, you'll have to multitask a lot, doing diplomatic events while thinking on what you should do while assigning units tasks. Confusing, yet fun. One of the other fun thing of Civ V is the way on how history shapes itself. You can find yourself as Washington leading a civ directly beside German, and you can also have Arab found the Catholic religion. Conclusion Fun, simple yet confusing, and interesting to play with, especially with friends. I highly recommend.
Dizza Pogs;-;WITH the two expansions, Civ V is a brilliant 4X game, perhaps one of the best out there (although I couldn't say; I don't have a lot of experience with the genre). An epic strategy game with an accessible learning curve but a very high skill (and knowledge) ceiling, with hundreds of different techs to research, distinct units for different eras, a functional diplomacy system, stellar religion and covert ops mechanics and big- nukes made better with friends. Just make sure you pick up Brave New World and Gods And Kings with it, because without it the game feels bare-bones.
ROMAN REIGNS;-;Just one more turn, and I got nuked by Ghandi who said that he was just waiting to backstab me. 16/10.
Explosive Armadillos;-;Very good training if you want to be president one day.
Heph;-;This game is amazing. Never gets old for me! I just wish the multiplayer was a bit more stable.
Torock;-;Completely ruined my life, I've stopped doing homework, passing exams, seeing my girlfriend and my family but overall those 200 hours were worth it, would buy again
Royaume;-;This game made me want to throw every item in sight. 10/10
Cory Baxter;-;Ghandi started a war with me because i did not give him sugar. 10/10 would not give sugar to ghandi again
Dennis;-;When you have a few friends to play with, this game will be forever fun to play 10/10
CharlemangeII;-;Entertainment value through the roof. Value of life rock bottom. Do not buy, unless willing to risk life. Sorry review was short, needed to warn *cough* *cough* *blarrrrghhh* ... Transcript ended.
SirSchmoopyDestroyerofSchlongs;-;Amazing game 10/10 would fap again
Renesco;-;Played it for a bit, it's alright.
Tech Geek 19;-;Best game on Planet Sid!!! No seriously.... it is really good strategic game play!
Etoile~Sama;-;Always did love the Civ series, my first intoduction to Civ was on PS1. From then on I fell in love with it, the ability to create your own civilization from the ground up... To me each installment of Civ has just gotten better, including this one. I love playing it over and over. It can even teach you a bit of history which is a nice aspect. Plus it also tends to the people who like to blow things up and destroy everything too. I'd rate this game a 9.7/10, only because that time where Ethopia and The Huns teamed up to destroy me last game. Dying after 100 turns *Sigh*... course it was on Deity...
Darth;-;With almost 1000 hours logged into this game, I can still say there are Civilization's I have not played as, and strategies I have not dabbled with. Civilization 5 is simply one of the best games I have ever played. Because this game satisfies on so many levels, it's hard to write a concise review with enough detail. All I'll say is that if you're thinking of getting the game... do it! Pay for the entire package with all the DLC's, and prepare to enter "the time machine that only goes forward." You will lose so many hours of your life to this game, but you will enjoy every single one of them.
Mr. K;-;so fcknawesome strategy game i ever play. will be better if Gajah Mada have 'Santet' army play this right now if u wanna waste ur time 6/5
Sadius The Fiend;-;I'll admit, I'm someone who is horrible at startergy, I usually dislike the whole genre and 4X. But this game is Bloody amazing, I enjoyed this so freaking much. At first this game needs breaking into, getting used to, but once you do, it's one hell of an experience, it's just so much fun, I spent literally entire days playing this straight. There is no story, you forge that pretty much with choosing your civilization, once you do that, you can select the map, the time and all these other details are what makes your experience far better. Graphics are nice and doesn't need to be strong because the gameplay, the sound, the details and makes up for it completely. Though I feel as if this game does need the expansions, so grab the complete pack because the expansions make them far better. If you are considering buying this, it's worth it, you may spend hours upon hours, like I do. The game is also easily modable through the menu so that which makes it far better
MrOuldy;-;Civ5 Has a good range of DLC's and the same is turnbased. The game is very good for a long time if you are bored. The game is best with friends and very easy to connect to each other. I haven't had any problems with this game. It is a very easy game to play you will learn quickly and sometimes it gives you a challenge. The game itself is around 20 but there is a gold edition which is 20. The gold edition gives you BNW (Brave New World bundle) and other things. I love this game but you need to commit to the game you are playing or you will lose the game. Rating 8/10 or 4/5 stars! Rated by MrOuldy
Cornelius;-;Fantastic Startegy game.
Beejay Simpson#12Days Till Birth;-;no questions asked, mongolia is a .
DanteDDL[UA];-;Want to build your own country? A Empire that can go through the test of time, war and economical issues? Then take your settlers and start the journey. You decide how your empire grows, will it make war or diplomatic influence. Fight with barbarians and other countries, explore the world, gain resources so your name will be carved in stone for eternity. Strategic balance of battles, smart AI, lot of leaders to choose. At the end you want to make "Jest... One... More... Turn..."
zachary.jones03;-;Brilliant. Best with expansions. Best. Game. Ever.
SirSchmoopyDestroyerofSchlongs;-;Amazing game 10/10 would fap again
Renesco;-;Played it for a bit, it's alright.
Luna;-;Nice game 9/10
LieutenantLafayette;-;2000+ hours, this game must be good.
alexkayownsabus;-;Incomplete without DLC. But either way fantastic stuff.
Mr. K;-;so fcknawesome strategy game i ever play. will be better if Gajah Mada have 'Santet' army play this right now if u wanna waste ur time 6/5
Cornelius;-;Fantastic Startegy game.
Djenithalls;-;Slowly giving up my social life for this and I have to say, it is so worth it.
Bilgoosh;-;This game stole what little I had left of my social life... you should play it...
Luna;-;Nice game 9/10
LieutenantLafayette;-;2000+ hours, this game must be good.
[C.C.P.S] SprinkleWinklez;-;Really Good Product, Ever since I first tried KFC I couldnt get enough of it. Thanks to KFC I will never be hungry again. 9/10 (Could have better nuggets).
Lazeeeboy;-;This game is only worth it if you get one of the expansions, which i would just recomend getting the complete pack instead of buying the expansion and game seperately. I had a lot of fun playing alone and with friends, but the online multiplayer does have problems in terms of lag and other problems that take away from the gaming experience.
DanteDDL[UA];-;Want to build your own country? A Empire that can go through the test of time, war and economical issues? Then take your settlers and start the journey. You decide how your empire grows, will it make war or diplomatic influence. Fight with barbarians and other countries, explore the world, gain resources so your name will be carved in stone for eternity. Strategic balance of battles, smart AI, lot of leaders to choose. At the end you want to make "Jest... One... More... Turn..."
[RTNBP] Uncle Pinky;-;Wonderful game, fun by yourself or with a group of friends. However, I recommend turning on quick movement and quick combat (personal preference, if you play with these options off then the camera pans to a unit whenever there's some kind of combat, and it can get annoying :P). 10/10 , DLC is also worth it.
Tours732;-;Buy it. It's a work of art.
Komrade Insane Kommie (BE);-;This game is epic ! Sad that "Brave new world" and "Gods and Kings" is so expensive !
Cola;-;Choose a world leader. Create a civilization. Make cities, name them, improve them. Conquer other lands. Choose your government. Immortal Communist George Washington. Great Merchant Steve Jobs, born in 1576 to Japan. A+
Mjankner;-;Just really good, like very really good.
KaoticPopTartz;-;One minute, Gandhi is my friend and gave me 5000 gold as a gift, and we're both fighting Theodora. Next minute, it's the other way around. 11/10
Sir Scrubsalot;-;This is the biggest time destroying game ever created. There is no way to have a quick game in CIV, to really enjoy it you have to start from ancient,you have to be playing agains friends and you must kill Gandhi! 10/10 i love this game and i havent even wasted many hours on enough civs yet.
henryowen;-;Great game, great replay value. I loved it and still play it often
Based Eli;-;I formed a strong friendship with the prosperous peace-loving Mongolians that lasted for 5,000 years before they were completely wiped out by nuclear missiles launched by Mahatma Gandhi, followed up by a massive land invasion aimed at killing any survivors possibly mucking through the nuclear wasteland with a sprinkle of hope in their eyes. All of the cities were then conquered by Gandhi and turned into slave-driven resource factories to funnel supplies into his wars. He used this irrational and indiscriminate genocide to scare me away from joining into the righteous war which other nations were waging against him to stop his massive land conquests. Fuming with anger, I joined into the war with the hopes of wiping that evil smirk off Gandhi's face. Maybe I was just a fresh-faced leader with a dream, but god damn I couldn't let him get away with it. I waged war on him. Instantly, my beloved lands were swarmed with giant death robots and infantry, but I swamped his mainland with every single troop I owned. It was a race to see who could destroy the others' cities first. I barely managed to hold off his armies and then assisted the other nations in conquering all of his lands. Gandhi was dead. I was beaten, my lands torn apart, my infrastructure damaged beyond any reasonable repair. Then Montezuma attacked me in my weakened state and took everything I had. 10/10 Would Recommend RIP Genghis Khan and his Mongolian people 3000 BC to 1987 AD Never Forget
m8;-;You ready to lose 100+ hours of your life in a blink of an eye? The buy this in' game. 10/10 would bang again.
Fegelein;-;Say goodbye to your social life. You don't need one when Gandhi is nuking your cities. 20/10 for the Might Warlord Gandhi AI. 10/10 everything else.
Mikuru Asahina;-;Very fun strategy game recomend to people who enjoy learning about history or enjoy strategy games!
Christina;-;The good, the bad and the ugly.~
yung paul blart (bill);-;had to delete it because i was too busy trying to stop russia from taking over the world even though i had already won 10/10
Mag Icag;-;I created a city in the middle of the desert. At first I had some problems sustaining my country, but I was fine. I gained a following as a leader, then I desided to start a war with russia last winter. After that i bought Civ 5 and it was fun.
Lewis;-;Having not a great deal of experience with previous Civilization games, I was expecting myself to find this installment of the series hard to get the hang of, imagining myself spending hours trying to work out how to start up a civilization that will "stand the test of time". Instead, I found the game to be extremely helpful and newbie-friendly. Like other strategy games, you learn the basics then gradually build up a better understanding of the game and its mechanics, feeling more and more like a pro with every minute gone by. After about four hours playing I felt pretty confident, but even today I am learning things I never knew or had any comprehension of in the game. The simplicity which has been introduced to help newcomers coupled with the fact that the game maintains the same look and feel with older generations is a really positive thing that was pulled off very well. The game offers serious levels of depth due to the vast number of playable races, multiple methods to seek victory and the ability to play on completely randomly generated maps every game, with available templates to choose from if so desired. I have only played a handful of games right to the very end since they can last for many days, especially if each session isn't particularly long. Every game feels very different to the next, providing this title with a lot of replayability. The AI is sometimes criticised but I think that it is well done in this game with a large range of difficulty levels to choose from, ranging from literally zero experience to the grandmaster level. They can often be somewhat unpredictable but I personally see that as a good thing, I mean, what's the point in playing such an in-depth strategic game like Civilization V when you can anticipate what the AI will most likely do? Part of the magic of this game is that it immerses you into the position of a leader, facing situations where you have to make decisions on the spot with no idea what your opponent is going to do. Overall this is a great game worthy of your money, but I would advise waiting for it to come on sale as it frequently does, it isn't the newest game in the world either.
fraggrenade_kitten;-;Even though a bit old, sort of fun in singlplayer, very fun in multiplayer. I would advise getting gods and kings or Brave new world, as they fix some stuff. (liberty being op)
JonThePenguin!;-;I loved this game so much :D 10/10!
Bablacity;-;Such a fun game even for cats
Marshall;-;This game is the best just the best the only best.
Tounge Tattoo;-;Just Yes
warden;-;You'll make the choice to play for a single hour, then before you know it five days had past and your girlfriend left you, but you're on the brink of killing Ghandi is doesn't even matter.
Harri;-;great with friends
JackBoosh;-;Hours and hours of fun, totally addictive, love it.
gunsage;-;It's Civ. Is there anything else I really need to say?
Tsirk;-;This is one of the great turn based RTS that I ever played with. Owning this Game will never make you regrets because the every game you start there is a different situations that you might encounter and always not predictable specially if you are playing deity with 12 or more Civiulizations to compete. The only thing that makes my game hard to finish is to win Science victory in Deity level. its very hard and awesome. 9/10
qmobius;-;Asked for gold from Russia, they declined. I dropped a nuke on Moscow in disgust - all 16 countries declared war on me. 10/10.
Kage;-;Its good
That 80s Milk Man;-;Do You Really Need a Social Life to Be Happy?
3kr;-;Buy this now. Why haven't you bought it yet? It's one of the top 3 games ever.
Frost Berry;-;SI THIS GAME IS AWESOMELY EPICS! I LOVE IT! i also have an extra key if you so happen to want the game as well just msg me bout it. there is only 1 so be quick :P
PureAwesome;-;Awesome turn based strategy game.The graphics are amazingly clear.And once you go to war with ghandi your dead!!!!!
Simmage;-;CIVILIZATION V It can be said without doubt, that Civilization V with all it's expansions, DLC's, and add-ons, is the most complete Civilization game to date. It possesses a great deal of strategic and tactical options, but hidden deeper within it's hulking, play-all-of-human-history theme, lay its greatest features. It has character, depth, and charm that only further add to what is an astounding amount of replay value. Add Steam Workshop support and a robust modding community, and you have a game that can truly stand the test of time. I started my Civilization-ing while still in single digits age wise, playing Civ II on the Playstation, and slowly matured into a more season TBS gamer with titles such as Heroes of Might and Magic 3. When Civilization IV was released, I had just grown into the world of PC gaming and enjoyed at least a thousand hours of fun through hundreds of playthroughs. When Civilization V was announced, I took time off work since I knew that I would be "one more turn" struck for several days. The music, art design, UI - everything on the surface of this game is top notch. From the sublime ability to switch from industrial production to artistic endeavours, to the hardcore build orders used by veterans, it's all there. The introduction of a hexagon grid simply makes sense, and it would now seem ridiculous to ever return to square blocks. Military units are also no longer allowed to be stacked together into formidable "doom stacks" that conquer whole nations. Both of these changes force players to adapt to terrain and it requires great tactical and strategic skill, both in the short and long term to outsmart another player. Small issues, such as sometimes predictable AI, and long turn times still plague the game, though these issues are easy to overlook given the charm and fantastic design of Civilization V. Do I recommend Civilization V on it's own, sadly I do not, but if you have the coin to purchase the complete edition of the game I couldn't recommend it enough. TL;DR = Buy it. Buy the expasions. Happy gaming, friends.
Vesper;-;yes is good thanke
Illasera;-;"Like Excel and Powerpoint combined but with better UI" - Illasera 8.5/10 without DLC/Expansions 10/10 with DLC/Expansions.
Super Speth;-;Play as 3D Adolf Hitler and vanquish your enemies in this exciting new game.
KaoticPopTartz;-;One minute, Gandhi is my friend and gave me 5000 gold as a gift, and we're both fighting Theodora. Next minute, it's the other way around. 11/10
m8;-;You ready to lose 100+ hours of your life in a blink of an eye? The buy this in' game. 10/10 would bang again.
Infernal;-;play this buy this live this
henryowen;-;Great game, great replay value. I loved it and still play it often
The Stig;-;Finally i've bought the game on steam after countless hours playing with "another version". Best 4X game ever, nuff said.
Sir Scrubsalot;-;This is the biggest time destroying game ever created. There is no way to have a quick game in CIV, to really enjoy it you have to start from ancient,you have to be playing agains friends and you must kill Gandhi! 10/10 i love this game and i havent even wasted many hours on enough civs yet.
RUBY_RED;-;Ghandi is a ruthless S.O.B. and will ruin your life 10/10
Alice;-;Better than Civilization 4 but not as good as actually ruling the world.
Faceman;-;I'm still stuck in the tutorial...
Nathb;-;spain took out the aztecs 100% historically accurate
Geobiry;-;Got nuked by Ghandi, he killed millions of my citizens.... if you're reading this send help. Don't trust Ghandi he will borrow your uranium and by borrow i mean turn it into a nuke and give it back in the form of a missile. 10/10 would give Ghandi uranium again.
Sire Furr Folfie;-;This game is one of the best games i found, i love it alot and play it quite a bit.
potatowhale of victory;-;If you like strategy games this is the one for you
AkkuEnzeru;-;Civ 5 is a great game! Can't stop playing and recommend it to anyone.
zensuine;-;What can I say....Soo much time lost!!!!!!
[RDST]Poch;-;Absolutely, under no circumstances, play this game if you plan to actually be productive. You go in thinking you'll only spend about 30 minutes tops, and then off to bed, and suddenly it's 5am and you've conquered everyone with death robots and mechanized tanks. Seriously though, great game. 5 Stars.
Nasty;-;said to family: "one more turn!" 400 turns later I get nuked by Gandhi who continues to burn down my cities and I lose. 11/10 ign
Ash Smashum;-;I led a communist America that conquered the world with its culture. Good times... good times... Also once watched as Gandhi adopted autocracy and wiped out Japan. Then there was this one time i directed a mostly peaceful Carthage until everyone denounced me. Something in my brain snapped, and i proceeded to begin a rampage that ended in me taking everyone's capital. And that time i became the world leader as the Ottomans after the poor  Shaka voted for me because i liberated his cities from who else but the Scourge of God. Oh, how i laughed... There are some games of Civ that you just never forget... On a more serious note, if you like world history, turn-based strategies, and bringing justice to a war-torn continent, you oughta enjoy this game. Sid Meier's Civilization V allows you to raise a unique civilization from the suspiciously simultaneous discovery of agriculture, build and use great armies, customize your government and political career, and the game even has an encyclopedia incorporated into it to inform you on the civs that you lead to stand the test of time and the badass units you use to get them there. The music's pretty cool, too. I recommend getting the game with all the DLC and on sale, though, if you want the full experience
Hipster Headcrab;-;Kinky stuff 4 kinky people. Side note: Get BNW it makes the entire game two times better.
PipsiDipsi;-;I played the Tutorial 12hrs , lost .
A HAM;-;Brilliantly fun game, just play it now! GHANDI GETS NUKES!!!!! NUKES!!!!!
urblammo;-;LOVE IT
Mr.Vader;-;this game so amazing,when i play this game am fell like i the leade of the country and manage the some country ,so you play this game cause it so amazing
TheRealDuckling;-;Great game. One issue the developers made was giving Ghandi uranium.
Simba;-;I've never had the thrill in real life to have a 5000 year war with Babylon as China. This was an exhilarating experience.
[TGoEG] Ben;-;This game is awesome, just flat out awesome! Its one of those games where when you first get it, you'll play it a ton, then you won't play it for about a month, then one day when you're bored, you'll look through your steam library and find this game, and you'll start playing it again. Oh yeah, and this game has a ton of steam DLC, each one adding in more gameplay mechanics, more civilizations, and more everything else. So if you feel like you'll enjoy it, you probobly will. And if it looks kinda dumb to you, it'll probobly seem pretty dumb when you play it. Or maybe you'll still enjoy it. Thats possible to.
jorgeosca;-;Really good game! Hundreds of hours. Totally recomended
PipsiDipsi;-;I played the Tutorial 12hrs , lost .
[TGoEG] Ben;-;This game is awesome, just flat out awesome! Its one of those games where when you first get it, you'll play it a ton, then you won't play it for about a month, then one day when you're bored, you'll look through your steam library and find this game, and you'll start playing it again. Oh yeah, and this game has a ton of steam DLC, each one adding in more gameplay mechanics, more civilizations, and more everything else. So if you feel like you'll enjoy it, you probobly will. And if it looks kinda dumb to you, it'll probobly seem pretty dumb when you play it. Or maybe you'll still enjoy it. Thats possible to.
Mr.Vader;-;this game so amazing,when i play this game am fell like i the leade of the country and manage the some country ,so you play this game cause it so amazing
TheRealDuckling;-;Great game. One issue the developers made was giving Ghandi uranium.
Simba;-;I've never had the thrill in real life to have a 5000 year war with Babylon as China. This was an exhilarating experience.
Brodin III;-;One of the best turn based strategy games I have ever played, each game will be different and unique to its map and A.I. personalities.
El Pablo BR;-;-Started as Arabia -Love it, a lot of money -Friendly towards almost everyone but the germans -Game goes smooth and calm -Germans eliminated, not my problem. Keep selling stuff -Got Oil Tec -Fortunatly, a lot of Oil around the empire, excluding the bonus of 2x Oil. Jackpot. -Happy as crazy, working all the tiles and selling it to my allies -Click Next turn -America has declared war on you 10/10
*|PEZ|* Vaelant;-;Was able to still play the game, despite the HardDrive it was stored on crashed and was formatted. Minor texture errors, was still able to continue the multiplayer game.
pyreseal;-;This game will ruin your life 10/10
Daryl Hall;-;This game destroyes my social life almost as fast as Ghandi destroyes my cities with nukes. That nig. 69/8 GOTY Sid Meier is love, Sid Meier is life.
jorgeosca;-;Really good game! Hundreds of hours. Totally recomended
urblammo;-;LOVE IT
_Q__Q_;-;One day I'll finish a game.
A HAM;-;Brilliantly fun game, just play it now! GHANDI GETS NUKES!!!!! NUKES!!!!!
-SoG-Greenarrow;-;My dad plays this game all the time.
Hipster Headcrab;-;Kinky stuff 4 kinky people. Side note: Get BNW it makes the entire game two times better.
Fire af;-;Great game, this is one my my favorate stragety games of all time. If you are a fan of turn based games then I would definetly reccomend it.
Gooch;-;You spend 3 hours doing nothing but clicking next turn with the occasional ordering of a unit. For added fun after 3 hours you get nuked by Ghandi. On multiplayer you and all your friends can hit next turn together for 3 hours before getting nuked by Ghandi.
Super Speth;-;Play as 3D Adolf Hitler and vanquish your enemies in this exciting new game.
Infernal;-;play this buy this live this
The Stig;-;Finally i've bought the game on steam after countless hours playing with "another version". Best 4X game ever, nuff said.
Aidan is now a year older;-;Sweet game, I loved strategy games when I was younger. This is better than any of them. I only got this game yesterday and I put 9 hours into it, That's like nearly enough time to complete Dishonored's main story on high chaos. The gameplay mechanics are great and the game makes you feel really good about yourself when you win a war, mostly against Ghandi. One word of advice for you. If you are allies with Ghandi he will stab you in the back and nuke you. Bye. -M'aiq the Liar.
Bush did Sandy Hook;-;Now I actually own the game I can actually review it. It's awesoem, Thx devs luv ya. xoxoxoxoxxoxoxo MWAH MWAH
Hotshot;-;"Thanks Ghandi" should be the "Thanks Obama" of Civilizations.
Deuce in the Peuce;-;I started with Civilization and have played every iteration. This is easily my favorite. The unit system eliminates the "stack of death" balance issue. I would recommend starting with both expansions as they add a great deal of content.
amazinger;-;bush is my best friend i love u <3
AkkuEnzeru;-;Civ 5 is a great game! Can't stop playing and recommend it to anyone.
Nathb;-;spain took out the aztecs 100% historically accurate
Faceman;-;I'm still stuck in the tutorial...
Alice;-;Better than Civilization 4 but not as good as actually ruling the world.
Nasty;-;said to family: "one more turn!" 400 turns later I get nuked by Gandhi who continues to burn down my cities and I lose. 11/10 ign
Ash Smashum;-;I led a communist America that conquered the world with its culture. Good times... good times... Also once watched as Gandhi adopted autocracy and wiped out Japan. Then there was this one time i directed a mostly peaceful Carthage until everyone denounced me. Something in my brain snapped, and i proceeded to begin a rampage that ended in me taking everyone's capital. And that time i became the world leader as the Ottomans after the poor  Shaka voted for me because i liberated his cities from who else but the Scourge of God. Oh, how i laughed... There are some games of Civ that you just never forget... On a more serious note, if you like world history, turn-based strategies, and bringing justice to a war-torn continent, you oughta enjoy this game. Sid Meier's Civilization V allows you to raise a unique civilization from the suspiciously simultaneous discovery of agriculture, build and use great armies, customize your government and political career, and the game even has an encyclopedia incorporated into it to inform you on the civs that you lead to stand the test of time and the badass units you use to get them there. The music's pretty cool, too. I recommend getting the game with all the DLC and on sale, though, if you want the full experience
Kukas;-;Say goodbye to your social life, one turn at a time.
Coin;-;Basically virtual crack.
QUOKK[A];-;This game taught me more than school ever did.
Lewis;-;Having not a great deal of experience with previous Civilization games, I was expecting myself to find this installment of the series hard to get the hang of, imagining myself spending hours trying to work out how to start up a civilization that will "stand the test of time". Instead, I found the game to be extremely helpful and newbie-friendly. Like other strategy games, you learn the basics then gradually build up a better understanding of the game and its mechanics, feeling more and more like a pro with every minute gone by. After about four hours playing I felt pretty confident, but even today I am learning things I never knew or had any comprehension of in the game. The simplicity which has been introduced to help newcomers coupled with the fact that the game maintains the same look and feel with older generations is a really positive thing that was pulled off very well. The game offers serious levels of depth due to the vast number of playable races, multiple methods to seek victory and the ability to play on completely randomly generated maps every game, with available templates to choose from if so desired. I have only played a handful of games right to the very end since they can last for many days, especially if each session isn't particularly long. Every game feels very different to the next, providing this title with a lot of replayability. The AI is sometimes criticised but I think that it is well done in this game with a large range of difficulty levels to choose from, ranging from literally zero experience to the grandmaster level. They can often be somewhat unpredictable but I personally see that as a good thing, I mean, what's the point in playing such an in-depth strategic game like Civilization V when you can anticipate what the AI will most likely do? Part of the magic of this game is that it immerses you into the position of a leader, facing situations where you have to make decisions on the spot with no idea what your opponent is going to do. Overall this is a great game worthy of your money, but I would advise waiting for it to come on sale as it frequently does, it isn't the newest game in the world either.
JonThePenguin!;-;I loved this game so much :D 10/10!
fraggrenade_kitten;-;Even though a bit old, sort of fun in singlplayer, very fun in multiplayer. I would advise getting gods and kings or Brave new world, as they fix some stuff. (liberty being op)
Coin;-;Basically virtual crack.
RB;-;Brilliant strategy game but be warned it's really addictive
QUOKK[A];-;This game taught me more than school ever did.
NovaScotiaDuckTollingRetriver;-;This game is really fun. Challenging, you have control over what you start with, and you can easily screw yourself over. Getting ahead of everyone in technology is key. Airplanes v.s Renassiance guys... i think you know who wins.
m'lady;-;strategy on it's best
LlamaPotato;-;One of my all time favorites, So many options hard not to have fun, Only problem is getting people to stay the whole 5 hours xD
rabbitZ;-;Very Solid and fun game. Fun by yourself or with friends. DLC also add a huge new and refreshing aspect on the game!
Bery;-;Fun offline game with unlimited gameplay oppurtunities.
Dras444;-;Great Game! Time sure flies.
Giggert Worletza;-;Japan was my best homie, but then I made nukes then he got mad at me for being better. The war was over quickly. Siam got scared as he was the last civ. That war was over quickly aswell. 10/10 became Gandhi himself
Erik Taurus;-;Usually I wouldn't recommend someone to become addicted to something. But in this case being a bit addicted to "One more turn" is OK! My feeling of game completion in regards of development. Civ V: 60% Gods and Kings: 65% (It did only add religion back to the series) A Brave New World 100% I stopped playing Civ V autumn 2012 due to the patch they released which utterly destroyed balance. Now with BNW the game is again playable. I really like the addition of trade routes which forces you to build a navy to protect your ships and land based look outs not to have your carvans plundered by barbarians. There are some things which aren't that great: The AI is cheating because they're stupid. Your starting position is vital, if you start in a bad position you'll have a bad time. Some civilizations are abit over powered. Some of the world wonders are too important to miss out on. With my 2544,2 hrs played* I can truly tell you this is a very good game. Finally, don't ever think "I'll play one more turn " because Fireaxis implemented some kind of sensor which triggers a random declaration of war from your ally or rampaging barbarians, which leads to you have to fix the mess at hand! *as of october 6:th 2014
Ryciu;-;This game never ends be prepared for huge time sink while playing it. At the beggining it wasn't so great but with expansions this game is the best of the kind. I`m at 400 hours right now and still haven't touched some scenarios yet. Best part is the multiplayer with friends :)
Abortus Superstes;-;9/10 Pros: Pretty much the whole game Cons: Waiting for everyone to finish their turn (online) can be boring
Fuckhands McMike;-;why am i still so bad after 205 hours
Messitron;-;It's like Skyrim with war.
BananaSquid;-;As we all know, in 1999, Montezuma and George Washington fought each other with nukes, both at the age of 3000.
Offsidekiller42;-;Fun turn-based game that allows you to pick what country you want to play as to dominate in multiple ways. Military is my personal favorite, but there are ways like culture and science.
Lord Jackson;-;Amazing game. I can easily see how i could dump at least 40 hours into it before having fully explored the game. It is very in depth, and has amazing gameplay.
Elich;-;Just one more turn!
WaterbearWarlord;-;I read the reviews, I saw the "This game will steal your life" and "Just one more turn". Did I beleive those claims? No I didn't and I was wrong, you'll realize this after you've spent multiple hours launching nukes at America.
Chuckles The unfunny;-;its a good turn based game
Datdrummadude14;-;If you don't have this game 4 years after it came out, what rock have you been living under? Good turn based 4x game. 42/10 Would cause 'Ghandi Holocaust' again.
Galactic Bulge;-;One of the most addicting games I have ever had the pleasure of playing. I don't know how many times I've started playing at 10pm or so and looked up at the clock to find it was 4 in the morning. So... I guess don't buy this if you really need your sleep, haha. Otherwise you totally should if you like RTS's, solo or with friends.
Fergie4Lyfe?;-;I just resently started playing this game, and I have already played a lot. It is a little confusing when you start out if you don't know what you're doing, but it is super fun! Single player is fun, and if you're looking for a real challenge, try multiplayer with some of your friends.
das_xwcg;-;Do you have spare time? Well, if you want to keep it that way, you should NOT buy this game. The turn based nature alone makes you play it for "just a few turns" and you will keep telling yourself that. Before you know it you have been playing for a week straight and the putrid smell in your house turns out to be your dog that has died of starvation and your children have run to CPS and you are getting arrested. Thanks Civ V! 10/10 Must buy.
gunsage;-;It's Civ. Is there anything else I really need to say?
Talox;-;The game is easy to pick up and remember, ive had it for a couple of months and it is a game which is easy to follow and a game which can keep you playing for a while, the only reason why ive had to take long breaks inbetween is so i dont get addicted, since the strategy element is a my favourite aspect however its also fun watching turn by turn as you dominate the board. to people who dont like slow games, this can be quite slow depending on how you play however, the gameplay is solid even though in my first game which i think is on normal difficulty it is way too easy. since i control half the board and the next world leader is 500 points behind me.
Chamois;-;A really addicting turn-based strategy game on building and expanding your civilization. It offers hours and hours of fun giving you a rise of plans to conquer the world. This game willl keep you saying "just one more turn."
binary;-;Just one more turn... Ill be like five minutes. Right? *two hours later* But noooooooooooo... Just one more turn And the cycle goes on, solid 10/10
NovaScotiaDuckTollingRetriver;-;This game is really fun. Challenging, you have control over what you start with, and you can easily screw yourself over. Getting ahead of everyone in technology is key. Airplanes v.s Renassiance guys... i think you know who wins.
Jonasma;-;strategy on it's best
FlatWhite_;-;Ghandi has nukes Napoleon a ing crackhead and will declare war on you if you so much fall over Rome created the Pyramids and America is made up of Jews 100% Accurate History 10/10 But Seriously, playing with or without friends is fun, but you NEED the 2 major dlc packs, the game is flat without them.
Hectic;-;Great game, but I advise you to get it with the DLC because it adds some pretty core features that should really have been in the vanilla game anyway. I'm talking about Gods and Kings, and Brave New World.
IronWolf;-;Great game,addicting and fun to play all around!
-{PD}-SaxtonHaven.Lofticries;-;The game has good dialogue for civilization leaders. The game is very simple and fast paced. The tutorial and tips are very helpful. One of the best RTS with many mods which makes replay a new exciting experience each time. Rating: 10/10
Bablacity;-;Such a fun game even for cats
Marshall;-;This game is the best just the best the only best.
Ayuri;-;Civilization V is probably one of the most complete, detailed and fascinating strategy game I've ever played. I highly recommend it.
A. Yeager;-;This is a game that is very complex to master, but it's easy to learn the concept. I usually have a hard time grasping games like these due to a learning difficulty, but this game has a very good tutorial system as well as advisors that points out to you what needs to be done around your lands to improve it. What I like Culture divirsity The game becomes very beautiful to watch thanks to the leaders bringing their own culture to the game. The character models are very well detailed and features clothing that is appropriate for their time. There's also a fantastic soundtrack which will play music depending on who you are playing with. My favorites include the music while playing Morocco as well as the beautiful "I wow to thee my country" while playing with Elizabeth of England. Leader personalities Each leader behaves a certain way and when you have the game randomized, it gives a big diversity to the playstyle. Some leaders will go for a cultural victory and will mostly be pleasent to those around to be able to cross their borders. Other leaders are extremely aggressive for a domination victory, so you need to build up your own army early on in case they plan to attack you. You can't be friends with everyone Your neighbors will make you mad and you will get mad with them. I have tried so many times to be pleasent to everyone, but after a while there will be disagreements. Border tensions when you want the land your neighbor owns, differences on science or cultural approach, religion views. Some neighbors deliberately try to force themselves on your lands by building cities where your borders expand and the only way to deal with that is going to war. Different approaches to victory You don't have to take over the world if that isn't your style, you could boost your science or culture to win over the opponents. You can also turn off some of the winning conditions if they don't suit you. In my case, I think the time victory is boring, because it happens too soon. Or if taking over the world is your style, you could turn off all the other victory conditions and force the opponents to fight you. Good game options Find barbarians annoying? Turn them off. Don't like the spy system? Turn it off. There are many good options to tailor the way you prefer to play. You decide what to do You're not forced into anything. You could put your focus on military, expanding your lands, upping your culture... basically, it is up to you. Some games I have not focused on winning overall, but getting revenge on an opponent that has been a thorn in the side. What I dislike Others leaders usually have resource advantage There's no way to know where some resources exist until very late in the game. It's very frustrating to have played 300 turns and then realize all your neighbors have access to uranium, but you don't, because that resource was placed near all their starting cities. It allows them to use nuclear weapon on you, but you can't use it on them unless you can convince them to trade it with you. Which leads me to... Other leaders are cheapskates Whenever the other leaders make trade offers with you, they offer 1 gold for a rare resource they don't have. When you want a rare resource from them, they expect you to give all your other luxury resources. What gives? Sometimes you can trade luxury for luxury, but they will always try to offer you a bad deal if they can. I do wish there had been a game option which would let you refuse an offer forever until set to accept it again. I do not want Attila to have an embassy in my city, because I know the first thing he'll do is attack me with his army. That doesn't stop him from asking fifty times.
Tsirk;-;This is one of the great turn based RTS that I ever played with. Owning this Game will never make you regrets because the every game you start there is a different situations that you might encounter and always not predictable specially if you are playing deity with 12 or more Civiulizations to compete. The only thing that makes my game hard to finish is to win Science victory in Deity level. its very hard and awesome. 9/10
jubilant;-;"Just one more turn" - 30 turns ago
[T.I.] Zexion;-;A beautifully well-made, turned-based strategy game, Civilization V will capture and enthrall you for hours on end. Even for someone like myself who has never played another civilization game before, this game had me addicted about 10 minutes into it and I've played for several hours nonstop, only stopping for real-life necessities. You create your own world, own maps, own cultures, all from scrap and then try to see and make them rise to greatness. I cannot implore you enough to acquire this game. Note at 7/14/13: Some people on tf2op are selling it for 2 keys so dont miss this oppotunity to pick it up! You will NOT be disappointed if you love creative, strategic games of any kind. This is a top-notch 9/10 game or higher easily.
Tounge Tattoo;-;Just Yes
Harri;-;great with friends
Vadim Cool;-;If you don't have the Brave New World expansion, then you're playing a broken game! BNW has leveled out the difficulty level by adding new economy system of international trade route features. Unlike in previous versions of Civilization, BNW is not too easy and not too difficult. For the first time in my life I REALLY enjoyed playing Civilization!
warden;-;You'll make the choice to play for a single hour, then before you know it five days had past and your girlfriend left you, but you're on the brink of killing Ghandi is doesn't even matter.
Fluffy;-;"Okay, I've got to be at college at 9AM tomorrow, I'll just have a quick game on Civ before I go to bed." 2 Hours later "Damn it Ghandi! YOU WILL PERISH!" 5 Hours later "Ah , 3 hours sleep it is" True story. Happend to me the day I wrote this review.
JackBoosh;-;Hours and hours of fun, totally addictive, love it.
LFish <^)))<;-;Once I begin to play it I can't stop. Never start to play "some rounds" when you have to sleep soon!
Kage;-;Its good
Mississippian Zombie;-;Love this fantastic game. May seem hard at first but when you get the hang of it it becomes an obsession. There should be a better tutorial to teach new players more about the game itself and some of it's mechanics. The Adviser Counsel is very helpful and new players should always ask the Advisers on suggestions to improving the empire.
WolfSamurai;-;It's digital crack. There's no other or better way to put it. Managing your empire and dealing with the other civilizations is fun enough to make it difficult to put the game down. It always makes you go "just one more turn" long after you originally planned to save and quit. There's lots of different goals to achieve, which just makes it that more difficult to put down.
recsynthesis;-;great game
Colin's New Mixtape Is Fireeeee;-;Easily an amazing strategy game. Highly suggest trying this game out when you have the time. If anything I'd give it a solid 9.5/10. I truly have loved strategy games and this one is quite possibly my favorite turn based game besides strategy RPGs. If you're looking for a good way to spend your time playing a game, this one has lots to offer and is simply stunning. The graphics are fine for me, but the gameplay is what makes it great. The classic CIV gameplay turnbased whether you're playing against the computer's AI or your friends on Steam, it is a well balanced game and there are plenty of difficulties to choose from. You can 1v1 or 1v5 etc. Trul remarkable! I would highly suggest playing this game whether solo (my personal favorite) or with friends to give them a nice challenge!
Lewd nuclear bird;-;Don't trust Gandi, he'll enslave everyone! And lewd days will come.
D4nnyy;-;It's good until a tourism victory comes out of no where from Napoleon
Khalil Khadafi;-;Do not purchase this game. It has ruined my life
Corridor;-;Building  and killing Gandhi, 9/11 would blaze again
Michi The Slime Girl;-;i have no sex life but at least i have civilization
Captain_Aggron;-;Those Pikemen are there to trade. I swear.
Dr. Joseph Furrah;-;fantastic game W/ the brave new world DLC http://store.steampowered.com/app/8930/ http://store.steampowered.com/app/235580/
Cinna;-;If you are considering playing Civ V, give in, and you might as well give up what's left of your social life. Worth.
Albi;-;Was savagely murdered by Gandhi. 10/10
Chickadapus;-;Best turn based strategy game out there, a definite 10/10. Just never let Gandhi play with nukes...
BTDubs;-;its a good game
Maddog;-;10/10 Worth the money
Medeiros (   );-;An awesome strategic game with an endless number of things to do on it. Yes, I said endless. It has nearly 300 achievements.
Tsumugi Kotobuki;-;If you are looking for a review, you have come to the wrong place. However, I do have a very good casserole recipe, these are the ingredients: 1 pound dry ziti pasta 1 onion, chopped 1 pound lean ground beef 2 (26 ounce) jars spaghetti sauce 6 ounces provolone cheese, sliced 1 1/2 cups sour cream 6 ounces mozzarella cheese, shredded 2 tablespoons grated Parmesan cheese Directions: 1. Bring a large pot of lightly salted water to a boil. Add ziti pasta, and cook until al dente, about 8 minutes; drain. 2. In a large skillet, brown onion and ground beef over medium heat. Add spaghetti sauce, and simmer 15 minutes. 3. Preheat the oven to 350 degrees F (175 degrees C). Butter a 9x13 inch baking dish. Layer as follows: 1/2 of the ziti, Provolone cheese, sour cream, 1/2 sauce mixture, remaining ziti, mozzarella cheese and remaining sauce mixture. Top with grated Parmesan cheese. 4. Bake for 30 minutes in the preheated oven, or until cheeses are melted. 5. Take out of the oven, and eat while hot.
KING ADHB;-;I was playing as the Japanese just trying to build the Eiffel Tower and then... The Chinese and Iroquois declare war on me Top Kek Then the Iroquois made fun of my puny army, At this point I halt my production of the Eiffel Tower, Then commit mass genocide and eradicate the Chinese from the earth, Then nuke the Iroquois' capitol, forcing his units to die from radiation. Yeah the game is pretty fun...
I play on Mac with Trackpad;-;My foreign Advisor Recommended me to build an Atomic Bomb 11/10 Would nuke again
Stear;-;I've had this game for three days and I've played for 56 hours... Now that's saying something.
AnotherCastle;-;The only game where a nuke wielding Gandhi will threaten to wipe you off the face of the planet.
Razgriz;-;Built a massive technologically advanced army, and did nothing with it all game, later I watched Ghandi nuke Russia into submission 11/10 would watch Gandhi destroy the world again.
Duszynski;-;It's kick-. The improvements from Civilization IV to V are totally worth getting this game.
wangsta72;-;Great game I have tons of hours on it. The only thing I have to say bad about the game are the countless nights i have lost sleep over just because I couldnt put the thing down. Tons of interesting civilizations to play as and the maps are always stunning and 100% unique. The multiplayer can take a long time to find a match unless you have a preplanned thing with friends which is were you probably get the best multiplayer experience anyway. Not any bugs that I have run into frequently especially in the single player which is polished to perfection. Any strategy fan could easily get lost in this game play for hours on end. On top of that all the dlc add a whole new dimenson to the game. Buy it you wont regret it.
Nonnel;-;Simply the best world domination simulator on the market.
Jahmo;-;This really is an addicting strategy game, and one of the best I've ever played. It has an interesting gameplay system and a fun multiplayer section. While it may be an old game by now, it still has the useful replayable feature. Pros: - Addicting, and the urge to keep playing in order to win is always there. - Different playstyles as different people, according to how you want to play. - Mods section which allows you to customize your game using the Steam Workshop. Cons: - AI which can be really irksome, especially in the multiplayer section. Leave them for 5 minutes and all your money's gone. - A tutorial system would be really handy, as for some new players it can be hard to get used to. Overall I would give this game a 9/10, as while it can be fun to play, there are still some features that need some work.
Q8foxx;-;If you like knowing more about history and enjoy playing strategy games, then you must get Civilization!
Sanic;-;Get it when its on sale.
Loghorn Feghorn;-;Wave goodbye to your social life
Buffalo Custardbath;-;Haven't played it much. I guess it's ok.
BronyMiner;-;Civ V is a great way to understand history, believe it or not. You understand the importance of luxury items in economy, the tech race, the need to imperialize and explore the open seas, and basic military strategy. You learn real city names, real wonders, and real units / buildings that have evolved the world. It's also really fun to play, especially with friends!
Shiny_Sheep;-;Having Spent about a thousand hours of the game, I can strongly reccomend this game but only if you buy the compete edition, I still have nightmares of vinalla civ......
FrankTheDankStankMemeTank;-;My God. What an astounding game. At first, I would have merely glanced over it. "Eh, it's just a strategy game; they're not my kind of game anyway." Well, I'm happy I'm wrong. This game is one of the best games I have ever played, and one of the main reasons I'm a PC gamer. This game runs well and plays well, with many different styles of victory you can achieve. I have spent countless [maybe not countless, but quite a few] hours playing as different world leaders and either uniting or crushing the world. This game is also deeply involved in history, and will teach you much about different events, people, and locations. 12/10 believe the hype.
Snati;-;This game really drove the Sid Meier experiance home. Sometimes whille playing I really did feel like I was becoming Sid Meier. It's hands down the most realistic simulation game since Fez II so it was basically real life. At some points of game play I literally thought my name was Sid Meier, so that means the graphics in the game look so real that it makes you feel like you're in real life...for real. Thats why I give this game: 8 cans of Mountain Dew / 3 Family sized bags of Doritos. Graphics:Real Life Gameplay:1 Commentary:63 Directors Cut:9.9999999 Story: Dank/10 Verdict:Yea
CelJaded;-;For all of its more controversial elements and related failings, the hours Ive spent playing Civilization V make it quite obvious; this is still one of the most varied and consistently satisfying games that Ive played to date. With dozens of different civilizations to choose from (America, Mongolia, China etc.), each with their own unique abilities and bonuses, no two games are likely to play out quite the same way and as such, Civilization V is a tough game for strategy fans to get bored of. As Arabia you might seek to establish a lucrative trade network and buy yourself friends using your mountains of dosh, as England you might construct a powerful maritime nation and go on the offensive with enhanced frigates and longbows, and as France you may instead choose to wow the world with your awe-inspiring culture and devotion to the arts; ensnaring people to your ideology with that time honoured brand of polite terrorism that is tourism. The two official expansions to the game only seek to refine it further with the official releases Gods and Kings and Brave New World both adding a raft of additional features including new civilizations and wonders, religion, espionage, trade routes and an expanded culture game including great works and archaeology. In every new game I find myself drawn not to the most powerful strategies, but instead to the ones that intrigue me the most. Its a testament to the games diverse palette of boardgamey elements that make every setup so unique and rife with potential. Ultimately, my favourite aspect of Civilization V is the mere fact that its a game you can get really good at by using your own approach. This is a game that just keeps paying off as you come to appreciate the finer aspects of tile yields, unit movement and preparing for events that will come hundreds of turns from where you are now. An essential title for fans of 4X strategy. Read the full retrospective at my blog [www.celjaded.com]
Roy Boy;-;One of the greatest games I've ever had the pleasure of playing, a great improvement over past renditions. Each expansion pack adds to the level of fun and tactics potentially involved, and given this is a strategy game, it truly does bring about amazingly nail biting moments, either in a fantasy world, or reliving/rewriting history.
milkkore;-;Definitely not a game you should start up when you have something important scheduled. You know, like... sleeping or eating. The "just one more turn" syndrome will keep ordinary things like these well out of your mind. Try the marathon mode if you dare... The multiplayer mode used to be bit wonky but it pretty stable after the last patches. Definitely get both expansions for the best experience (the Complete Edition is usually up for 10 bucks during the Steam sales).
The_Xekromancer;-;This game is so addictive i have played it so much and is really replayable as every game is different
Total Gamer 345;-;I wa having a nice playthrough as the English and i met the french. Then gandhi met me. I quit the game instantly. Gandhi Hating Simulator 2010, 10/10 would avoid gandhi again.
Spud;-;Far too much fun. Basically has all the buildy up games you loved as a child and then combines them all into one huge sploof of awesomeness :D
Fugloyfreak;-;This game is a playground for modders. Im Sparta kicking Kanye West's rear in Iceland :3
=TTB=andrewlewis88;-;Maybe I would go to college, maybe I would have a family, maybe I would have a life... but everything changed after this. 10/10 would totally play this again if I have a second chance of life
Bleach martini;-;Nuked by Ghandi 10/10 realism
[MS] Toa Jerahd;-;#1 most okayest Civilization V.
ultrawubsgaming;-;Worth the money and a must have for strategy fans.
Efrafa;-;It is just so satisfying seeing your city go from a small cottage to a city complete with walls, farms, mines, skyscrapers, and opponents and other disgraces challenging your empire. BTW Sparta has been changed to Rainierville so now on it will be "THIS IS RAINIERVILLE!" ;P Amaze other emipres with your technology, military power, resources, and yur D. Ummm take the last part out. Completely diminish your neighboring empires or betray them. Your military is up for seiges and nailbiting battles for supremacy. Once you take over an empire its hard to stop and i find myself making war plans on who to attack first. When your armies surround a city and you know your enemy is all but done for its hard not to smile. Rewrite history making the Zulu Empire bigger and stop the spreading of the British. Team up with Native American factions and stop the Seven Years War from ever existing. One last thing. The soundtrack has me occasionally jumping out of my seat and dancing BEWARE. Final Verdict: 8/10
leeeejun;-;Genghis Khan called me uncultured 10/10
Birdibrain;-;Gave Gandhi some Uranium and he used it to nuke me. 10/10 All jokes aside this is an amazing and addicting game that you HAVE to play if you like strategy. You can make your own stories and tales by your choices. You can win by war or peace. If you do want to buy this game i recommend getting the expansions as they help balance and create more opportunities etc. Real Score: 9.5/10
woost;-;death to china
Radishboy;-;I nuked other places as Gandhi. 10/10
Kaikar;-;Great game, but be ready to spend much time on this beauty. 10/10 wouldn't trust Gandhi again.
Somalian;-;This game, just this game. :D
Another_Italian;-;I mean, it's really decent, but i couldn't get into it 6.5/10
Adda Boi;-;Very educational game but at times not historically accurate such as( a nortedame in bismarks empire located in india) It is very fun adn u can spend hours to days just playing this and with a friend it is fun its a fun command and conquer game or u can choose many diffrent victories with many diffrent civilizations
Ofsayt | Osman | 38;-;Do you like strategic games? Then this game is a must have!!!
Muck;-;Best turn-based strategy game I've ever played... Reminds me of risk. 10/10
Ed999Uk;-;This game is awesome. MUST BUY!!!!
Flappy;-;This game is just straight up brilliant. If you can imagine it, my first ever Civilization game was Civilization Revolution on the Xbox 360, which compared to this game, is terrible. On that game I raged so much from the amount of random loses (E.G my 72 attack tank army getting taken out by freaking 42 defense pikeman, me and my friend called it 'Civi Logic') and this happened so often often, I rage quited sometimes. And I never rage quit in my other Startegy games (Rise of Nations, Command and Counquer etc). But then one of my friends out of the kindness of his heart gifted me this game, and I must say this is one of the best stratergy games I have ever played. I still haven't finished a game yet, because I love making new games with new nations, but you don't have to finish the game to enjoy it. It's immersive, has great balance and makes you think up stratergy after stratergy to try and take down Gandhi as quickly as possible. You will also sink a lot of hours into one game, my longest is about 7 hours, and as i have said, I havent finished a game yet. On the downside, there are some annoying things. Like some workers who ask you what task to do, even though you've already assigned them to make a mine or farm, and keep resetting every turn. Countries bonuses (Like Japan's Bushido in which your troops fight at full strength even if they are damaged) seem to fade quickly and seem to make no impact later on in the game. I also wish there was a way to change the city names (There probably is, I just have been lazy and not looked around for it) and a few more unique units for each civilization. This is the game for you if you love stratergy games, it is a wonderful bundle of goodness that makes you feel like you are controlling a nation, it's awesome, and it's definately worth your time. 9/10
J_duff44;-;This game is fun, possibly too fun. I loved it, really. I would turn on my computer first thing in the morning because the night before i'd come up with a new "scenario" (way id like to play). Then i would proceed to carry out the actions nessasary to bring said senario to it's climax. The premice in my mind was to take the question "how can i bring about this one specific moment, and play it out effectively?" After said moment i rarely had the stomache to "grind" through to victory. Who cares though, i had gotten what i wanted, but not exactly as i had planned... The AI ruthlessly manuvers its-self to victory. Are you weak? Your getting attacked bro. Are you strong? Your getting out teched Sis. Stray too far from your capitol for an expansion, good luck. The good lands are coveted by all, and any excuse will do for the Ai to war with you. Especially land. Manage an increasingly complex empire to your mental drugery breaking point. Don't get me wrong, this game is a masterpiece, but any egoic desire to win will ruin all the fun. Just play how you want, die, learn how to play how you want effectively, get lucky, celebrate your advantage as long as its still fun. Then start another one. And another, and another. In short, lots to learn lots of tweaks to improve gameplay a game that is litterally endless (see if you can get all your 30 second ideas played out over the months) All problems can be managed Nothing an autosave cant fix ;) Great distraction from any otherwise productive use of your time Buy this game, play this game, love this game, and at the end of the day get your irl priorites strait through that sinking feeling in your chest that says my life is meaningless, but don't put a gun to your head. Remember its just a game, youll get through this. Are you a Civ-aholic? You could be! It's that good! Like all good things in life, if you arent carefull it can ruin your life. I suppose its healthier to learn this from a game as opposed to drugs and alcohol, but those things will get you laid more thats for sure. Even moderation in moderation, go on blow a month or so on a Civ binge and learn how to manage your life, via the loss of every minute of time you can spare to the monkey overlord on your back. Do yourself a favor, get your video game addiction over with. Thats what this is gonna do for you, nothing will ever be the same.
Blackbox;-;One of the best.
mem;-;Small pox, malaria, AIDS? All of the many things you will be diagnosed with after playing this slow as ing boring as  game. Cool Firaxis, I get it, you're ing stupid and want your dumb iPad game to take forever to boot up so that you can take the syringe while I wait and inject your cuntiness intravenously. In this game you control a bunch of sand er/europoor savages while Sid Meier takes a fat  on your computer monitor. It tastes like Wild Cherry and Wild Cherry sucks . 9/10
Gibby;-;Can you create a Civilization to stand the test of time? No. Because Gandhi will nuke you. 10/10.
Kat {WfPk};-;Because Ghandi is the most likely to nuke you. c:
Goose;-;one of my favourite games!! 100% recomend you buy this game!
drg87;-;I love this game!!!
IDiivil;-;Because who doesn't like dominating the world? Seriously, though, the game has great AI (and even better if you randomize the behavioral patterns and make everyone unpredictable), an interesting progression of buildings, armies, and otherwise... and the animation is very nice. I don't mind the music either - they chose a well enough melody line for leaders to make it blend in the background rather than clash in your ears.
SpikyMango;-;Desperately waiting for a package to arrive? Longing for your upcoming holiday? Just play this game, it'll turn seconds into hours and hours into weeks faster than you can list all of the DLCs available. 10/10, where has my life gone?!
Buttholecommunist;-;Probably the best game i own. Many hours spent on this wonderful game. Not only the gameplay, but also the amazing community. 10/10
pvt_pyle;-;be hitler
Hughesy;-;One of the best games ever made, bit like pringles once you pop you can't stop. Kiss your social life goodbye a game takes all day. Even more fun playing with your mates. I reccomend enabling the turn timer though even if your slow  noob mates whine about turns going too quick. You'll be glad you set it in the end (60 second turn speed civ FTW!). The brave new world expansion fixes a lot of the issues the original had and the tech tree is a lot more balanced, get it. You need this in your life, well at least untill December 2014 when Civilization: Beyond Earth is released.
Rev;-;Ask for peace, attacked my scout... 10/10
Alan;-;Civilization V is a game where you make your own civilization and then win.. or lose. When I bought this game one of my friends told me not to do it, I'll lose my family. Well... he was right. (Only as a joke, I didn't actually lose my family) WARNING: This game is a good game. You WILL lose many hours of your life to it. I recommend this game for you to play, but make sure you get the complete edition for alot more fun. 10/10 What more could you want then to nuke barbarians?
Shoe;-;>Played as Jose Rizal - Philippines (Mod) >Made friends with Spain and Japan. >Gandi befriended me. >420 NUKE-scoped Spain and Japan. >Gandhi Nukes me. >RIP in Peace Pilipinas. >feelsbadman.jpg >went to bed crying. >can't control my emotions >palms are heavy >mom's spaghetti
yolodankbruh;-;>plays as Alexander the Great >settles first city in what should be Beijing >Greek Empire is now originated in Asia >playing with 11 other civilizations on large map >kills off 6 of the 11 by modern era >becomes "Alexander the Terrible" >adopts Autocracy >becomes the third reich >enslaves world >learns Alexander the Great wasn't so great 10/10 would bang
TINGTING;-;Made deals with the Barbarians America didn't like it Forced me to pay 20 gold a turn to stay alive Barbarians thought i was paying America for protection from them Barbarians got upset and raided me Took all my women Couldn't reproduce Died of extection 5mins into my game Good game Realistic 9/10
Matthew;-;Your turns should play like this: Check to see which tiles you're working and which specialists you have assigned. Make the decision on whether to buy new units or tiles with your cash, or spend your money buttering up city-states or smoothing over deals with other nations. Check to see how close you are to your next Social Policy, and attempt to decide which will be most advantageous. Focus every move on a particular victory, especially on higher difficulties. Beware of neighbors, friends, and then enemies, in that order. Civ V standalone is an okay game, but you must meet two criteria: 1) enjoy micromanaging city development and 2) not want the punishing difficulty or complexity of a Paradox game. Without the micromanagement, the game is a bit overly streamlined, especially for fans of the incredibly punishing and un-intuitive Civ IV. If you get Gods and Kings, the additions are absolutely game-changing. Religion can confer huge, if non-easily seen advantages, perfect for the more in-depth player, and spying provides a rather satisfying risk-reward payoff which becomes ever more important near the end-game. The expanded city-state quests spice up diplomatic play and can give the game a story-like feel, where your goal is to fulfill missions (among the grand strategy, of course). Brave New World kicks the complexity up a notch, but cannot be as strongly recommended. BNW adds trade routes (a lovely, dangerous system which can make barbarians even more infuriating) and totally revamps the culture victory. The best part of the expansion is an improved UI which somehow feels far more intuitive, but otherwise, only buy if you've played 60+ hours of Civ V + Gods and Kings. For the base game and expansions in a megabundle, I would recommend this at the price of $40, maybe optimistically $60 if the player is sure they'll adore every second.
Vigilante;-;Best Strategy game of all time. I love this game because of its replay value. And tons of good mods. Another highly addictive game.
notthecamper;-;This game is like the bridge for advanced strategy games. It has such a complex, yet easily accomplishable setup. This gives Civ 5 an inumerable strength as a game. It provides you with over 30 civilizations to play as(DLC included). Each of them with a diverse yet interesting skill to go along with them. you could play as spain with a double bonus to all "exotic" tiles in the game. Or switch to carthage, giving you the ability to Cross mountains. Both long time strategists and newcomers will love this game. As well as its historical units will excited any history buffs out there. and any game you play in it will always challenge and amuse. if you have not already bought this game, you should right now.
Waffle Iron;-;Is good game. I play much. Such fun.
SwearingManager;-;Civ is love, Civ is life.
Erich von Manstein;-;BRATE PA OVO MI SE MASU DOPADA JA BI RAE IGRO OVU IGRU NEGO SE OPO SPIDOM KOMPA MOJ PA JEBE MATER KURAC U POSRKAT OVOM JEBENOM LIKU KOJ JE OVO NAPRAVIO I KUPIT U MU KONDOM DA ME MOE SILOVAT U BULJU
~Hyatt;-;Civilization is simply a game that if you were stranded on a desert island you would want to have. There is no game I can think of where the replay value is so high, multiplayer or no.
Phantom Child;-;I recommend this game because (look at my hours spent on it).
smokyisgood;-;Awesome game, wasted 140 hours of my life fighting Montezuma!
Mint-als;-;The best game outta my collection atm, i recommand it to evryone ^-^
RustedRail;-;now that I've played over 1000 hours of Civ5 I feel that I should probably write a review. I've played the CIV franchise since CIV2 and I think that CIV 5 is by far the best. The game becomes more and more complex (especially with the expansion packs) and there are still a number of scenerios that I have barely touched. The game can be played from a number of different angles including cultural or military depending on your preferences and the leader you choose. The mods provide additional enjoyment from the ones I've tried. With my system, I tend to run the video options in the mid-range and have never crashed the game. This is using a Dell laptop. I hope they continue to release expansion packs as I'd like to see additional leaders offered going forward.
[SKELETOR] Mother Banger 73;-;Civ 5 is good game where you can become either powerful nation or desperately trying to defend your capital from both China and France. Be warned however, once you enter the rabbit hole 2 hours will feel like 30 minutes and you will waste hours building an empire which could fall so suddenly. Good game.
gtz;-;don't trust egypt when he says that he doesn't think it's in his best interests to be friends
No^Z33;-;Without a doubt the best strategic game Ive played so far. The options are nearly endless with so many different options to win by. An extremely well made game in my opinion
El Prannet;-;Do you ever look into the mirror of a morning and just admire the person staring back at you? I don't. I can't remember the last time I saw morning. I can't remember the last time I saw a mirror. All I remember is buying this game, thinking "oh this'll be cook. A quick game before bed." Then it was 12.43pm the next day. I didn't think it worth moving so I quit my job and set about dominating as Elizabeth, reigniting the glory of the Empire. Every nation would bow down to me, even Ghandi wouldn't dare throw a nuke at me. Washington begged and pleaded for me to not destroy him when I discovered nukes. The might of Rome cowered in Elizabeth's presence. This was three weeks ago and I can't remember what day light looks like. Please send food, help and a chemical disposal team to clean up the mess I'm currently swimming in. Dear god help.
Chaoz;-;really great game to past time!
Josh;-;Totally addicted.
Datch [dt];-;One of the best games I have ever played.
Gibby;-;Can you create a Civilization to stand the test of time? No. Because Gandhi will nuke you. 10/10.
mem;-;Small pox, malaria, AIDS? All of the many things you will be diagnosed with after playing this slow as ing boring as  game. Cool Firaxis, I get it, you're ing stupid and want your dumb iPad game to take forever to boot up so that you can take the syringe while I wait and inject your cuntiness intravenously. In this game you control a bunch of sand er/europoor savages while Sid Meier takes a fat  on your computer monitor. It tastes like Wild Cherry and Wild Cherry sucks . 9/10
RustedRail;-;now that I've played over 1000 hours of Civ5 I feel that I should probably write a review. I've played the CIV franchise since CIV2 and I think that CIV 5 is by far the best. The game becomes more and more complex (especially with the expansion packs) and there are still a number of scenerios that I have barely touched. The game can be played from a number of different angles including cultural or military depending on your preferences and the leader you choose. The mods provide additional enjoyment from the ones I've tried. With my system, I tend to run the video options in the mid-range and have never crashed the game. This is using a Dell laptop. I hope they continue to release expansion packs as I'd like to see additional leaders offered going forward.
[SKELETOR] Mother Banger 73;-;Civ 5 is good game where you can become either powerful nation or desperately trying to defend your capital from both China and France. Be warned however, once you enter the rabbit hole 2 hours will feel like 30 minutes and you will waste hours building an empire which could fall so suddenly. Good game.
gtz;-;don't trust egypt when he says that he doesn't think it's in his best interests to be friends
No^Z33;-;Without a doubt the best strategic game Ive played so far. The options are nearly endless with so many different options to win by. An extremely well made game in my opinion
LittleMissA;-;Great game love it!
Thanks for everything, Iwata.;-;Great game. Played a short time and I'm convinced I'd like to play it a lot more. Not only do you get to conquer the world in multiple ways and in different senses of the word, but the road to that victory is eternally customizable. Runs great, only a few graphic glitches and almost never has performance lag. The audio isn't bad at all, and the sountrack adds a rather great touch. Smooth gameplay allows for coordinated or improvised moves. The entities and environment both look amazing. Definetely something to consider buying for both strategy and non-strategy gamers.
Osama Bin Murphy;-;Civ 5 is a fantastic game. I've been playing it for a while and have no bad comments about it whatsoever.
Shazzar;-;you can drop nuclear bombs on america
Gilgamesh;-;This game is for patient mortals, great game if you are a visionary. Good active coommunity and some nice mods. I reccomend this game to anyone who like oxygen.
MDfromEP;-;Goodbye social life, hello pony rushing.
pielovinkyle;-;I spent 5 weeks without internet and all I did was play this game. My wife left me (mostly because I lost my job and quit paying bills like the internet) but that's all behind me all that's left now is conquering the worlds as every civ in history and then slowing killing myself through many years of drinking hard liqour. Buy this game if you hate yourself.
TrailGod;-;This game is amazing! 10/10 would sacrifice first born.
'JC'Mr Mouse;-;Why havent you bought the game yet its fricking amazeballs
Admiral Proudmoore;-;if you want to ruin your life, buy this game 10/10
jo.walker08;-;Most addictive game ever!
Iridis;-;Great Game all round and why shouldn't it be?? Great visuals, sounds, and elements
Nigel Farage;-;Declared war on Ghandi because he wouldn't give me any free horses. 11/10.
Dichard Chixon MVP Dodecahedron;-;Best nuke your friends simulator
Staid;-;America is in this 10/10 would play
Why You Kill John Madden;-;if you like geometry then this is the game for you!
Trambampoline;-;I played it so much, my uterus exploded.
Neville Bamshoot;-;Da bomb! great game, hours of enjoyment.
Bear;-;I have achieved absolutely nothing for several months thanks to this game. 10/10
Bizzy;-;Civilization 5 is a worthy successor, and I've really enjoyed my time with it. The overall depth of the game is the main strength, and anyone that has interest in history and turn-based stragegy will find it engrossing. Really, the array of possiblities of eventual life is infinite, and this game allows that presecent to breathe. The major downside of this game is the marketing. It's the DLC concept that makes me mad. It's a great product, but they want you to spend like $100 dollars to get the full thing. I waited for sales, but still it's the same. Back to the game, it's good and fun and you will waste hours where you say in your mind, "Well, just one more turn." If you can find a good sale, get this game, otherwise I would wait before simply getting the base game. I can't think of it without the DLC.
[WGG] Dr.Evil;-;I got into a war with ghandi over uranium or spies or something. I dropped a nuke on him. He thought he was winning and demanded horses and pearls for a peace treaty. I dropped another nuke on him and demanded 2000 gold for a peace treaty. He refused and I had another nuke. 10/10
SVK PETO;-;Best turn based strategy game ever.
Jake the Dog from State Farm;-;I built the great wall of America so Gandhi declared war on me after being passive-agressive since the year 1900 BC, so I took his land. 10/10 for realism.
Ketchipes;-;This is one of the best and addictive games i've played. It keeps me occupied for hours and i never get bored of it because each time u play its a totally different experience
OlorinTW;-;Skynet will dominate the world with this game. Seriously. 10/10
beauxors;-;Oh, how time flies!
{PS}Sneakyme11;-;Very good and fun way for you and your friends to have fun on an afternoon, but i would get the DLC's as well, makes it more fun.
Autistic Mongoloid;-;Start a game on quick pace, game takes a week. I HAVE NO REGRETS 11/10
Jim Rapman;-;I don't know who this Sid Meier's person is, but he stole my copy of Civs V.
Da Increibale Halk;-;bismark declared war on me while i was in the atomic era and he was in midevil 10/10 would nuke medevil germany again
Nathan;-;Ghandi=Scum That is all...
Rozenmaiden21;-;Blew my mind, loved it right away when i learned i could create Chaos.
Dr.packman5000;-;Great game Pro's: -Addactive -The Euphoria from a victory (and not founding a religion) -You can literally play as the Rasta God (Haile Selassie of Ethiopia) -Good interactive with the AI -Good voice acting (1000+ points for Haile Selassie) -Civ related units -Diverse range of options of Civ's to play as -Arab money as either Arabia or Morocco -The Greek City state advantage, to show those Malaka's who really invented Democracy -Found a relgion to pray to the based God! Cons: -Why the HELL did the Devs choose Queen Dido, instead of Hannibal or Hamilcar Barca, for the leader of Carthage? And who the  is Dido anyway? -No British Civ -No Kingdom of Israel Civ -Ghandi -Too adictive -No animated interface when speaking to the AI when playing with Other people -The inclusion of Civ's such as the Shohone and Polynesia, which are hardly even as relevent to history, as say Israel or Britain are Overall about a 9/11, so i would pick it up if i was you, and you don't own it as of now.
Stapanovitch;-;Ok... One last turn and I go to bed, it's 4am after all. *10 minutes loading time because of modded map with 15 civilizations and a map representing Earth* Wait, Bismarck? What the hell are you doing?? I was supposed to betray you later, not you at this very bad moment! Oh, it seems your nuke killed a Gandhi's civilian... Good luck with that. Now, let's move this troop, this one, this one this one too... *8 minutes later* ... aaaaand this last artist I cannot use yet because I don't have any slot left for his painting in my museums (but I may still need him someday, I think). Now, let's see how they will react and I save and leave. *10 minutes and 30 seconds loading time* What? I won't tolerate this! Repeat until dawn.
cybera NQ;-;Well this game is pure awesome. Ever had a fantasy of conquering the world? Step right up! The game puts you in the shoes of an immortal leader with full authority. Forge the destiny of your chosen civilizations with every choice you make.
SovietKamikaze;-;-Plays as Babylon with intensions of getting a Science Victory -Plays on Earth Map -Starts on South East Africa -Pretty good start I got like 3 Silk -Wonder Spams for the entire game -Finds Brazil as North West Neighbor (Situated in West Africa) -3 City States in Central Africa -Finds China situated in the Middle East -Forms a Triple Alliance with Brazil and China -Finds Zulu's in West Europe -Finds Poland in East Europe (Like European Russia) -Explores World -Forms Quad-Friendship with Poland China and Brazil -Finds Denmark bordering Poland, finds Greece in Russia (Western and Eastern Siberia) -Finds Spain in ALL of North America -Finds Netherlands in China, Finds Aztecs in Thailand -Finds Huns in all of South America (Once i found it, an unknown civ lost it's capital and was elminated, it turned out to be Mongolia) -Proved the world was round. -Forms Friendship with Spain -Settles in Sahara (Cotton, Gold, Marble and Salt gg) Names the city 'Sahara' (Wow Soviet so creative) - Polish Chinese Brazillian and Babylonian coalition 'Crusade' against Zulus -Does nothing but has strongest Military -Zulu's give me Western City (Situated in France/England) -Renames the City 'Crusade' -Danish Greek Zulu Invaision of Poland. -Greek invaison of Denmark -Denmark is an enemy of Babylon, China, Brazil, Poland, Spain, Greece and Netherlands -Denmark eliminated -Chinese Babylonian Coalition against Aztecs. -Does nothing -Tries to bribe Netherland 700 gold to fight Aztec, I wasnt friends so I accidentally gave them al my gold per turn(lol) -Declares War on Netherlands to get money back -Aztecs give me southernmost city -Destroys Dutch Navy -Dutch Price of Peace 70 gold perturn -Gives Aztec city it to Netherlands for 35 Gold per-turn -lolol profit -Friends with Brazil, China, Poland, Spain, Netherlands -Enemies: Aztec, Zulu ||| Neutral: Greece and Huns (They were friendly but im not falling for that ****) -Greek Invaison of Poland -Poland Forwared settled on China so China Invaded Polish forward settled city -Spainish, Aztec, Dutch and Babylonian Forces declares war against Greeks -Does nothing against Greeks except some Navy skirmishes -Greeks give me Danish City. -Dutch and Aztecs Forces clear Austrailia Greek Forces. West Austrailia is Dutch, East Austrailia is Aztec -Liberates it -Denmark wants to be friends -Accepts -China gets  -'Deal with it' -Second Coalition-Zulu War -Gets a city due to peace terms, razes the city in Scandinavia -Was top for everything except Land, Crops, and Manufactured Goods (Those things were topped by Greece) -Adopts Freedom -Sets and invaison force to Huns because Spain asked for assistance -Allied with 80% of City States -Greeks hate me -Invades Huns via City States -Razes 2 cities -Gets a temporary city for peace ( I didnt get Mongolian cities so I was gonna prepare for a more stronger invaison) -Brazil, Spain and China Adopt Order -Netherlands and Greece get Autocracy -Second Hunnic-Babylonian War - Embargos Aztecs, Greeks and Zulu's -Liberates Mongolia -Mongolian-Babylonian Friendship -Spain are enemies with Mongolia but we're chill -Gives Mongolia another city I took -Hunnic Peace. Sets most of military forces from South America and some forces from the homeland for War against Greece -China invades Dutch-Forward-Settled Colony in Egypt and captures it -Decides not to Forward Settle China (Never planned to lololol) -Aztecs Adopt Freedom, Huns adopt Autocracy -Sets freedom for Wolrd Ideology -Friends and enemies get  at me -Proposition passed -Multiple Wars against The Aztecs and Zulu's. Gets a further flourishing happy empire as a result when they finish. -Cue everyone except Brazil switching to Freedom -Greek City in Asia rebels and joins my empire -Gives it to the Dutch for 50 gold per turn -Dutch razes the city -lol wut profit? -Gets Nuclear Missle (Spain, China, Poland, Mongolia and Denmark are scared) -Brazil turns Guarded (why ;w; you were my major trading partner) -Turns on Netherlands because they denounced me and turned all mean because they become friends with Huns -Aztec China Babylonian War against Netherlands -***** up a big chunk of Dutch Navy before my one Nuc. Sub. was overwhealmed -Vancouver is Captured by the Dutch (No my city state ;w;) -Spain is still at War with the Huns and the Greeks -Danish-Babylonian Allaiance vs Greeks starts (Fourth Babylonian-Greek War) -Denmark dies again ( ugh ) -Liberates Warsaw (Poland was mainly screwed by the Danes and then the Greeks, They had two cities sandwiching Warsaw before the war) -Liberates Roskild (Gives it to Denmark) -Spainsh-Dutch War -Spain looses its only Asian Colony (Fun Fact: Spain also had a Colony situated in Spain lololol) -Greeks capture Brussles(lol it was in sandwiched/encirlcled in Greek Territory, goodbye my city state ;w;) -Captures Tunsburg (planned to give it back to Denmark after I upgraded my miltary) -Looses 1 XCOM Squad and 2(all) of my seige units while healing and upgrading -Turns out Citadels damage/kill your units even if no enemy unit occupys it and if your units are next to it -Welp, I cant liberate The Danish Cities/Brussles anymore, but I wont give up -Accidentaly gave Tunsburg to Poland -Whoopsie ugh -Tries to Demand/Trade it back, but fails -Ugh -1 part away from a Space Victory even though Greece won the ISS Contest BECAUSE HE USED ALL HIS CITIES FOR PRODUCTION THAT WIDE-BUILING WH- - (Fun fact: Had 3 Cities stituated in East and South Africa, 1 city in North Africa (Situated in Morroco, Western Sahara, and Mauritania) and 1 city in Western Europe ( Situated in England and France). Greece has 20-30 cites spanning/situated from Western Siberia to Northern Japan. -[Another fun fact: I like using the word situated] -Wins a Diplomatic Victory even though I only voted 42 (all of mine) Delegates and you need 47 to win -Denmark and Mongolia voted for me -Are you serious -Ugh -I haven't won a Science Victory yet (Only victory I didnt get) One of the best and hilarious games of Civ I played but it was kind annoying at Late Game because of Brazil and I WON A STINKING DIPLO VICTORY AND I WAS 1 PART AWAY FROM A SCIENCE VICTORY Yeah you get Civ, you can form your own world, form your own history in this game. You get to find out if your civillization can 'Stand the Test of Time', and if you can lead your people to glory It's really fun
InsaneManiac;-;Possibly the best turn-based stratagey game I have ever played. The complete pack is definitly worth the $50. 10/10
Eightball;-;This is the game you've been waiting for, even if you didn't wait for it, your soul did. 666/69 Illuminati AF.
ZooZer;-;It's pretty fun.
[$AG] FuriouslyFast;-;Literally the best strategy game I have ever played. You can never get bored with this as there are endless ways to play and a ton of mods to improve some aspects of the game (UI, Units, diplomacy stuff) 9.5/10
KaosTheery;-;More fun than the Black Plague.
Sa1F;-;I was gonna play this game for a while and go to bed at 10 pm, a few minutes later i could hear birds chirping outside.. 10/10
Hingle;-;So this is basically how a game of Civ goes. Start up the game. Meet Ghandi. "Oh thank god Ghandi is suppose to be peaceful in real... Wait... Ghandi what are you doing?" Ghandi captures your capital and wins.
ivory;-;This game is way too addictive and worth the money, even at a full price because the play time you put into it balances it out. Even when you take a break from playing it, it's always fun to come back to and it pulls you in each time. Definitely an amazing strategy game.
Turtle;-;Get Nuked By Gandhi Simulator 2015
MEDIC!;-;Turn based RTS with real historic nations/leaders (note controversial chatacters like Hitler's Germany isn't present) Great Game Requires patience Never Trust Gandhi
feesh;-;I really like it! Especially the part where I can nuke everyone, and backstab allies ;P
BlouBlou;-;Very good Game, Gods and Kings expansion and Brave new World expansion are a must. Steam Workshop offers a vast choice of Mods that can enhance your experience. Steam Workshop Personal mods: http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=82028925
Anal parkinson's disease;-;in get this ing game you ing s.
[DOM] SgtKibbles;-;Conquered the Iroqois in the modern era while using infantry as Carthage then got half of my cities nuked by Gandhi and all the city-states declared war on me. 56/10
Greenleader;-;This is an addicting game, I definitely recommend it.
JohnDft;-;When I first went on this game, I nearly had a panic attack because of how many buttons and choices there were. It was like walking into McDonalds and them informing you they have just put 50 million new items on the menu.
Tushar;-;Spawned near 7 cities/city-states. At war with all of them. 10/10.
Molinar;-;Ever since I bought this game, I have not slept. I lost my girlfriend and dropped out of school. I am living in my parent's bathroom and I order mcdonalds to the house twice a day. I pray to civ 5 every morning and night, and I am devoted to destroying empires. civ 5 is my life 11/10 would play more
they be hatin;-;cool game
DxunGreen;-;I played Civ V for 4+ years before I got the expansion packs. I love the game as a whole, but unfortunately the expansion packs have taken away a lot of the fun that I had while playing Civ V. There is quite a lot more going on than there was in the original game, so much so that the it is almost too much to handle. I'm sure I'll get used to it in time, but, as of now, I would recommend either only buying the game and not the packs, or buy it all, but play without the packs until you get the hang of the game. EDIT: It has been several months since I posted this review and I can honestly say that I enjoy the game more than I did without the DLC. The learning curve is still a lot steeper with the expansion packs, but it might be a better idea to play with them so that you are not confused and have to relearn stuff like I did.
FontanaTheGreat;-;A moment comes which comes rarely in history but we step out from the old to the new when an age ends and a soul of a nation long suppressed, finds utterance. Build courage when courage sees to fail, gain faith when there seems to be little cost for faith, create hope when hope becomes forlorn and remember....the future belongs to those who believe in their dreams....I have to say, this has been the most fantastic, most amazing game i have ever played. Especially when you get the DLCs that can be be bought to go with it. A generally good game with regular Civilization 5 but the excitement and intensity of it increases when you get BNW and G&K DLCs. Definetly consider getting this game if you havent already and be sure to get the DLCs!!!!!!
BartorKrajczyk;-;Good game, makes wasting your whole day very easy.
[HSOWA] Chip of Dell;-;The only game where you can get bombed by Gandhi
numptius;-;>be me >play as washington >name your capital bashington >ferkyea.jpg
Refrigeraptor;-;My friends now hate me 10\10
Sun Tzu;-;I like role playing as the glorious female leader of Carthage.
nice funny;-;Ghandia is a warmonger and nukes everything. 8/8
Refrigeraptor;-;My friends now hate me 10\10
Titanium;-;I'm sorry washington.....
Blue Dory;-;The first time u play this: brain.exe has stopped working
chad kenny;-;a horse, my kingdom for a horse
[KoR] Caliber;-;Ghandi is a nuke master. Enough has been said.
PrivatePeachyButt;-;10/10 Would nuke hiroshima again.
Oerios;-;Ghandi told me my army was a laughing stock... I came and kill him. Ez ghandi
Benpie;-;Plays with a friend against AI Plays as America and friend plays as Russia With the help of friend becomes most advanced civilisation beating the AI by 2 whole eras and reach the modern era in the 19th century Friend makes massive army and declares war on every other civilisation I become most inactive ally since italy in WW1 and WW2 Friend conquers most of the map with only two civilisations left and having enough happiness to keep all cities he claimed, whilst i struggle to maintain happiness with my own cities. Produce atomic bombs Friend nukes my capital (Washing town) I wait patiently for next turn so i get two nukes and ignores war with AI civilisations Next turn arrives and i nuke his capital doing more damage than him Begins to lose connection with friend Next turn arrives and friend wins cultural victory 10/10 would wage war against AI and ignore them later
Demoness Skye;-;It's a good game, just don't play it before exams! You'll be playing all night! :D
Bread.;-;Beginning to ruin my life. 11/10. Would nuke Ghandi again.
elMuro;-;Its nice
Ante je zakon;-;This game real good like but 'tis kinda empty without the DLC #sidmeierisEA
Glacher Lardnab;-;I lik sid meir, his pen15 was very nice as I wated for turns.
Mohs;-;Doobie in my hand, Rollie on my wrist Got a bottle of that thousand dollar champagne in my fist Women of in your dreams sleep in my bed So I don't need your brains I need my  kissed But all my homies like give me some head Smoke joints till our eyes turn Indian red Takes shots till our chests burn We got papers, bottles, mollies, all this let's get it started The bigger the bill, the bigger you ball The bigger the watch, the bigger the car, the bigger the star The bigger the chain, the farther you go, you already know The bigger the bank that's more hoes, a And I done spent a quarter milli on clothes Coppin' them oldschools and puttin' foriegns on the road Real talk and if my fuel get low I roll up another joint take a shot and reload, pow
PossumMagic;-;Got nuked by ghandi. 10/10
The Wise and Cunning Gabe;-;Have you ever eaten a rainbow, and soon after you go into a diabetic coma due to how sweat it was? Plus the only way to get out of the coma you have to eat more of the rainbow. That is what this game is, it sucks you in and never lets you go. While you are taking over in game cities Civ V is taking over your life. Score: 5 Nukes/Gandhi
BreezeTuxedo;-;Just like Endless Space but not in space. Read my Endless Space review to understand what I mean
Hatate Himekaidou;-;Me: I'm just gonna play for about 2 hours. *FIVE hours later and game ends* Me: Well,  AND I DIDN'T EVEN WIN 10/10 would kill off montezuma first
Cap'n Sonja;-;Oh this game...I poured so many hours into it. Its nothing like attacking the enemy, sucessing and then repopulating their entire territory with your own population. watching their cities turn into your own. I LOVE THIS GAME! Negative sides are...The siege units are pretty useless in the early stages and the early units are...pretty useless, especially the special units which are shown up early in the game, because you can barely make enough of them that it matters any, because the progress in technology are faster then your cities.
Jaws;-;There is no other game on the market where you can wage nuclear war against 11 Gandhis simultaneously.
Based Wrayz;-;It's alright.
The ZooZ;-;For those who like the genre, it is a step-up on the previous installments regarding (obviously) additional options, especially with the 2 expansions, Gods and Kings and Brave New World. The social policies changes and the introduction of religion options and city-states and interaction with said city-states, were the biggest changes in the game in terms of different things to do. That said, i think there's still room for improvement on additional options you might have in terms of policy choosing, etc. The economy system is also a bit different from previous installments, a bit richer, and i think the military aspect of the game improved a lot in terms of tactics. Granted, still room for improvement there, but much less 'cheesy' tactics like stacking 20 units in a tile, for instance. You now really need to know where to position your units, and use choke points, etc. to your advantage. Much more 'chess-like' than 'win-by-more-numbers'. Some of the different win conditions have also gained more depth, especially the diplomatic / cultural victory. The mods from the steam workshop are also insanely rich, giving you even more customization / replay value to the game. Lastly, the graphics have obviously also improved a lot, with a lot more detail, even though, at least for me, that's the least concerning aspect of a game such as this. Its downsides (as usual) mostly revolve around the need to have a sufficiently good pc to handle the burden of loading times, etc., as it is quite heavy on your pc. Most games also tend to have a mid-game era which is quite stale, where pretty much nothing happens regardless of whether you're far ahead, far behind or even with the majority of the other civs. AI is also something that still hasn't improved as much as i would have liked. It is either too aggressive or too passive, but not really playing intelligently, regardless of difficulty level, but rather as usual, gaining more bonuses to make up fo the lack of actual Intelligence on the Artificial Intelligence part. So, breaking it down: Pros: - Even more tech / social options, richer interaction with city-states; - Religion now plays a big role in the game; - More depth in cultural / diplomatic win conditions; - Improved combat / tactical aspect of the game; - Improved mod / customization in steam workshop; - Lots of replay value; - Better graphics. Cons: - Game can be quite the resource-hog on your pc, regardless of having or not a good one. - Some games can turn out to be stale for quite some time, depending on specific spawn points, etc. - Could still have improved social policy choosing, despite the huge improvements on that aspect. - AI's actual intelligence part hasn't really improved, in my opinion. TL;DR: A solid 8.5 out of 10, whether you're new to the franchise, or have played them all since the very first pixelated Civilization 1, like myself. Would honestly give it more, if the loading times were faster. I don't mind putting in the hours playing the game, it's just a bit bothersome knowing that a somewhat significant part of those hours are spent waiting, rather than playing.
SideR;-;It is a game
Flame;-;Nuked all the male leaders and made friendship pacts with all female ones. Japan has a harem of female leaders now. 10/10
Stephen hAWPking;-;awesome game 8/10, but if u could jihad some american buildings would be 9/11.
[NQ]That_Raider_Xavier;-;it's not Civ: Beyond Earth. Aka "The Great Mistake" Civ 5 is a great addictive game, with endless replayability.
IM NOT DEAD YET!!!!!;-;yeoooooooooooooooooooooooooooow  it gah gah gah gah gah gah gah gah yeah i  it oh oh i yeah i  it in the  so so so step back now ya'll boom boom boom boom karate chop!!!!!!!!!!!!!! ohhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh(growl) yeah yeah yeah so be walkin down this street what what i see this gaem what yeah thats right what yeah shut the  uppp uh uh uh so i brek ur nipple in a million little pieces cause ur playin as china yeah ur playin as china break break break break ohhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh(growl) yooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooo yeah! uggs are ugly uggs are disgusting yeah i ing hate uggs they are bayd so so so here we go so so so here we go oh oh oh oh oh oh oh so i be playin as india and in things up but then i see CHINA dey so agressive dey so cheap dey  u up and then yout die the end
hyperbola;-;ok for a few hours
Renttukessu;-;After 500h the game really opens up.
rjb1110;-;Well, I just blame one of my "good friends" for ruining my life.
Neismo;-;If you like turn-based strategy games, this is for you!
Lordofthetv;-;This game will take hold of your soul and force you to play it for hours.
chocolatepie2;-;I have to admit-I was a little offput at first by this game. I was familiar with the concept and a very basic idea of how to play, but some things about the game seemed downright strange the first time I played. The hex tiles, the belligerent AI (yes, you Montezuma), all of it kept me somewhat uninterested in this game for a while. But after a while of thinking, I started to understand the game more, and the more I understood it, the more I liked it. It is a complex game, and I certainly don't understand all or even most of it. But nontheless, it is a highly replayable game of great value that I enjoy greatly.
Compressed Fart Tycoon;-;One of the best game out there, the soundtrack is second to none
Karl;-;POLAND CAN INTO SPACE! 10/10
DataSage;-;Civilization V is the epitome of the Civ series. I know many Civ fans would say they think IV edges it out, but the additions in V combined with the faithful execution of the core Civ formula puts this one on top. Hex-based tiles make it all the more awesome, and the elimination of doomstacks with the "one unit per tile" limit makes the game much more tolerable and strategic in many ways. With the expansions, there is a whole lot of content to see, and the best part of the game is arguably what's great about every Civ game: flexibility to play the way you want to play. Different victory types will keep you interested for mulitple playthroughs, and, like all Civ games, you will find yourself laughing when you find your civilization on the brink of destruction at the hand of Ghandi's army. Just be warned: the Zulunation probably hates you.
East End Ron;-;Played 180+ hours, didn't realise mods disabled achivements. 10/10
Potatobearz;-;This game has everything a strategy game needs to be a good one. It has easy to understand controls which can later on develop into more advanced controls, it has extensive gameplay, and it makes you use your brain. I would suggest this to anyone who likes games such as Age of Mythology, and perhaps Starcraft II.
Mr.Makk;-;The best turn based strategy game ive ever played, normallly im a C&C fan myself but ever since i played Civilization: Revolution, ive been addicted to the civ franchise. Its useful if you want to go ahead and test you're strategic planning skills or if you just have alot of time on ur hands with not enough stuff to do :P i give it a 4.5 out of 5 (4.5 / 5)
Marcuz|-BuyingSkins/Knives;-;Being a veteran in the Civilization series, Civilization V is definitely the worst in the series. That being said, it IS a good game, but compared to other civilization games (such as civ iv and civ iii) this is no where compared to them. Civilization IV is still the best out there. I've been playing civ since 2001. And for me, civ iv and civ 3 is better than 5. I've played over 1000000+ hours on all civilization games (including the expansions) so ignore the time count i have here. I just got civ v this late november of 2014.
Turticus;-;Got nuked by Gandhi. 10/10
awesome flying pig;-;Ok so I got one big gripe with this gsme: its got more than 5 civilization!
Landmaster;-;Waiting for players, the game.
whodat.joker;-;IS the shizniss
[ISFYLG]HeyItsMe!!;-;I recommend this game. 8.5/10. This is MY OWN OPINION but im sure you will like the game too. Based on only serval hours of gameplay. Pros: -Good A.I -Realistic Gameplay, [not the graphics but the demand for resources, Combat, Engine etc.] -Fun overall for people who like strategy games. -Fun to witness your very own emipre grow to be a great civaiition. -Great game to pass the time. -Im an honest guy, so im telling the truth when i say this game is good. Cons: Multiplayer-multiplayer crashes often and players immediately gets kicked. -Almost everybody uses DLC. -Sometimes takes a while to process turns so you need to be patient. -A little shocking to see all your work be demolished by a huge war. [wars dont happen often but can still be fatal.] -A little hard to master but practice maskes perfect.
BoKa1337;-;Brilliant fun online and most in depth but simple mechanics in a turn-based strategy.
Wamlab;-;Singleplayer: Fantastic 10/10 Singleplayer with mods: Amazing 11/10 Singleplayer with dlc: GOTY best game I have ever played 20/10 Multiplayer: Broken 1/10 Multiplayer with dlc: Horrific 0/10 Singleplayer is revolutionary but multiplayer is just broken
Toranaga Yoshinaga;-;Definitely my favorite game, for many reasons. Nostalgia (Civ II was my first video game), fun, addictive (Oh I'll just play one game of Civ befor I go to bed, next thing you know it's three days later)it's versatile (so many different strategies) and most importantly it is game that challenges you (you have to make tough decisions, plan a strategy, think about the big picture). I'd give it 4.75/5 stars.
the magic conch;-;Excellent game! Great for fans of long lasting strategy games. DO NOT USE WINDOWS 8 TOUCH SCREEN! Its not only completely useless but it also crashes the game so much so that it isn't enjoyable anymore. You should be completely fine otherwise though. By the way...don't trust Gandhi. He will nuke you so hard.....
SubourbonWhiskey;-;7 hours. All in one sitting. If you value your life, then don't buy.
Ser.Pippenpadlopsicopolis;-;I retract my previous statement and apologise to Firaxis, this game is lightning in a bottle, don't bother with Beyond earth, this is the best strategy game you will ever play.
Hells;-;This is an amazing strategy for anyone that likes this genre of games. This game defines and sets the bar for all game like this. A masterpiece and delight the games features make you feel like you are creating that civilization. If you do not own this game than you are missing out on endless ways to rule the world. Multiplayer can support up to 12 players (I think) which can make you turn on your friends or make new ones. This game has hours and hours of fun and I wont be able to stop playing for a while. 9.5/10 bad things are the cost and the DLC price $50 for BNW :(
JoaLoft;-;I didn't really know what to expect when I picked up Civilization V a few months ago. I had heard a lot of great things about the franchise up until the point of my purchase, and I was not disappointed when I bought it. Those first few days were unforgiving: I played it non-stop, and when I was done with my first campaign, I wanted to do it all over again. Civilization is a turn-based strategy game where you take control of a historical empire and steer it through the choppy waters of evolution, competing with other civilizations. I love how there is a very balanced feeling to all the aspects of the game: diplomacy, war, culture, religion and science all factor into who will finally be victorious. And even though you'll inevitably get in touch every single one of those areas, there are multiple paths to victory. You can just as easily try to annihilate every other civilization as you can lead a peaceful society, focus on exporting your goods and reeling in cash to be the very first one to launch a rocket into outer space. Furthermore, you can easily set up a game to your own desire, choosing how long you want a campaign to last, how many city-states and competing civilizations you want to rival with, etcetera. Civilization V is at the same time a challenging game with a lot of depth, as it is a toy box: you can fiddle around with everything, try out new things, play on different maps, use fresh strategies and never play the same campaign twice. And if you haven't delved into the vast amount of mods out there, hang on. The possibilities are near endless with the toolbox they're giving you. I do want to recommend one thing: make sure you also buy both main expansions "Gods & Kings" and "Brave New World". They're quintessential to having the ultimate Civilization V experience, as they add new gameplay mechanics and a whole bunch of new civilizations, greatly expanding on everything that the base game already offered! It's simply put one of the best and most addictive strategy games of all time, and deserves a spot in your collection. Period.
Reverend Rumble;-;This game has a lot of turns
Federico;-;Suffice to say that I played this game from dusk till dawn (damn that "only one more turn" addiction level), to proof that Civilization V is a great game, especially better with all the DLCs. I just love to build up my civ, advance tech, produce war units, and conquer every other civilization out there :) There is only one thing I dislike, the optimization. To make it to the next turn, it takes a long time, unless I disable animated movements and attacks, and the "wait for orders" option too. I have good specs, and it stills annoys me to some degree.
xXMr.SchombsXx;-;I love the multiplayer game play in Civ 5 and cannot wait for the new version of Civilization. I think more things should be added to this version like options to kick rude player by the host or least explain how to kick a player when you are hosting a game.
[VitaL] Elriotjuice;-;it's one of the best turn based stratey game out there, I really enjoy it and great way to kill time or multi task at the same time!
SystematicPonies;-;I bought uranium from the japanese and used it to build a nuke and used that nuke on them, god its good to be an American 10/10.
Suhn;-;"Just one more turn"!
Travis Bickle;-;Addiction ... Redefined
J(awohl).Cole;-;If I had to choose between Civilization V or 3 wishes, i would choose the wishes. That way I could get the game and both its DLCs. Civ is love, civ is life. 10/10
The Pussy Wizard;-;Very Addictive. It's like a board game with awesome graphics. I have already sent hours playing and I will continue to do so. Not many games fully support mods and "Civ 5" has a bloody fantastic modding community, just adding to the hours.
Turtool;-;This game is beyond words!
Assdwellingmnky;-;Easily the most fun I've had with a turn based strategy game. I honestly thought that I had exhausted its fun potential way too quickly, then I realized that I've played 50+ hours. It's that addicting.
Gravelord the Dancing Neko;-;Don't miss out on this great game it will keep you entertained for hours almost every day. I have been a fan of the civ series and this is my favorite one. I would reccomend the expansions with it they add so many things to the game. If you enjoy a nice turnbased strategy definetly get this one. There are so many reasons you should buy it but it would take to long to make a list. If you want to be entertained for hours get this. Though there are some drawbacks. Each of the two big DLC's cost a lot together + the game. The multiplayer can be rough, but when it works it will be a really fun time. If you came just expecting to play multiplayer think about it a little. Those are the only two things I do not like about this game. I still highly reccomend to add this game to your pile of steam games that are played.
mattsmart;-;if this was a potato, it would be a long potato
hilman101;-;As a person who normally doesn't like strategy games this game was fantastic! Simple to play but really hard to master. Everything looks and feels very nice but the multiplayer could be better with the freezing but is fun with friends if it run smoothly
Hestia;-;A classic that would stand the test of time
Vengyr;-;Firstly tried vanilla Civ5, meh, it was so dumb, casual and weird sometimes. Didn't like it. But the addons made this game incredible, both deep and logical. For instance, cultural and diplomatic victories now actually make sense and are not a no-brainer at the same time. AI also got better, he still sucks at fights, but at least his diplomatic skills became better. Love the new civilizations added by the add-ons. Now this game is much better than previous ones. Just buy a full one.
dave97996;-;A fun and strategic game that allows you to build an empire though time. I highly recommened this game. It's worth the money
Koame;-;Missionaries of Biggus Dickus have spread their seeds through the world. 10/10
darthcyborg;-;This game has added a new element to combat different to other civ games which is the innability to stack troops which i find adds a fundamental strength to the strategy of units
JC_Monkey_Man;-;I think everyone should play this game because it is the best game on earth.
Kalamees Toivo;-;the best game ever
thebrandonbrownson;-;SWEET MOTHER OF GOAT ! You see this  right here? This is  CIVILIZATION V, AND AFTER PLAYING THIS YOU WILL WANT TO SWALLOW EVERY DROP OF SID MEIER'S ! So, here's the skinny,  ; You pick an ancient (or not-so-ancient, I don't ing care) civilization leader and your job is to become the best  civilization that the world has ever seen! You can win this  by diplomacy (), culture (all the mothering paintings, !)... oh, who am I kidding, YOU WANT TO TAKE YOUR ARMY AND  EVERY ORIFICE OF YOUR OPPONENTS!!! GIVE THEM THE HOT, THROBBING ROD OF JUSTICE YOU SON OF A MOTHERLESS !!! THIS GAME WILL GIVE YOUR MEANINGLESS LIFE SOME PURPOSE,  SPELUNKER!!! PUT SOME HAIR ON YOUR BALLS (OR VAG, WHICH-THE--EVER) AND CIV THAT  OR SO HELP ME GOD I WILL EMPREGNATE YOUR MOTHER AND PUSH HER DOWN A FLIGHT OF ING STAIRS!!!
kuru;-;You can fight Gandhi. I would fight Gandhi.
Vladimir Pootis;-;Anybody who likes strategy games of any kind will love civ 5. The graphics are serene, and the gameplay is flawless and addictive. Just don't expect it to be historically accurate- you'll soon find that Gandhi is the most aggressive AI in the game. Never buy the game at full price though, there'll probably be a sale on a week later.
angel-molina;-;Civilization 5 is like the digital equivalent of marijuana and sugar mixed together... You just have to pass one more turn, you say it will be your last. Only now it's 3 am in the morning and you're starting to bump your head on the keyboard as you try to fight the sleep.... just one more turn. But seriously, Civ 5 is one of the most fun games that I have had the pleasure to waste hours and hours on it. I would highly recommend it to EVERYONE, weather this is the first game they have ever played or if they are the most veteran of hardcore gamers. The only people that I would not recommend it to are those who can not expend any more than a few hours or just really don't like turn based strategy games for whatever reason. Otherwise it's simply one of those games that nearly everyone has at least tried or heard of, like Skyrim, Minecraft, or the CoD franchise. Now, if you have no idea what Civ 5 is actually about, then don't worry because I have got you covered here. Civilization 5 is a essentially a turn based 4X (explore, expand, exploit, and exterminate) game. You always play on a map of your choosing, which can be can have randomized or very customizable settings. Then you choose what civiliztion you want to play as, with each having special bonuses or attributes. Starting with just two units, a settler and a warrior, the player founds a city which will be their starting point and expands from there. You must reseach new technologies, expand your deplomacy, and build armies to defend yourself or attack other civilizations with. There are can be several ways to win a match (which can be also be customized), usually either through researching ahead of the other civilizations, uniting the civilizaions through deplomacy, or conquering other nations. Now don't get me wrong, Civ 5 isn't perfect and there are a few things here and there that will invoke some frustration. In particular, the AI (or other non-player civilizations) is very lacking. There is little to no tactices in how it wages war, unless you count clustering random units at you in random formations. It's deplomacy is extremely predictable and nearly not worth caring for: if they have more troops than you or you are so much as slightly ahead of them in research, they will inexplicably wage war with you... This happens ALL the time. Nearly no civilization is willing to find a diplomatic solution and they focus on bringing down other civilations before brinning up there own. Now don't get me wrong, the AI isn't broken, it is merely serviceable. So if you don't mind, then you won't get too frustrated. Other than this, there are only a very few minor complaints that aren't too big a deal. Sometimes you can get screwed if you don't precure a certain amount of specific resources like happiness, gold, or reseach. You might start somwhere that won't allow the player to really expand and the other civilizations could eventually snowball you... Or over time, the player could snowball the other civilizations easily if they get those resources (and then the game becomes too easy). But most of the time the game is fairly balanced and very much worth playing. Again, I would recommend this to almost anybody and everybody. Now if you don't mind, I need finish conquering France with my giant death robots.
Dragim;-;Really good 4X game. Once you get in the game you will play for hours at a time without realizing then boom, there goes your day. I recommend getting it with both the expansion pack because they fix a lot of the problems in the game while adding a lot of content.
Knox;-;Truely a pc-gaming masterpeice. It combines world history and addicting gameplay into one. What more could you ask for?
missionaviat;-;Very fun game to play with friends.
JohnnyG1823;-;Get the DLC its a great game.
kenkku;-;with brave new world simply the best, better than all the rest. 5/5
acrippledmonkey;-;One of the best strategy games of all time, nothing more needs to be said.
Kirizt;-;Endless fun. 959 hrs on record and I'm still playing.
Basically Casanova;-;This game is Potato/5
CisWhiteMale;-;Great game with tons of replay value
DarkAngelPL;-;This game is really addicting is all i can say. First day i got it around 7 PM i played a total of 8 hours straight. This game is way to fun so buy it. But i would recommend you to wait until next sale like i did the game then costs 7.50$.
Nope;-;This game is a good game. I still believe Civ 3 to be the best, but this game does a good job. I would love to have the dlcs that people demand to make this game better, but the dlcs cost more than the game and that seems ridiculous to me. Positives- its a Civ game. Good Graphics. Plenty of options. Negatives. Expensive DLC Broken AI, supposedly fixed by dlc. Horrible Multiplayer setup system.
CoronaBear;-;You will lose
Psychedelic Adventurer;-;The quintessential 'turned based stratagy game'. At it's launch Civ5 was a bare bones shadow of it's earlier sequels. However, through the power of free updates, paid dlc, and 2 expansions, it become the best of the series. Insanely deep mechanics with a rich historcial background to enjoy. Be warned; Ghandi is not the type to your imperialistic **, he will nuke your . Absolute classic. Be sure to pick up the second expansion 'Brave New World'. It adds so much more depth to an already bloated game.Top tier Indispensible gaming title.
The One King To Rule Them All;-;This, is one of the best video games, I have ever played
Neddy;-;A fitting sequel to Civ IV. However, quite simplified and more in the vein of Civ 1 than the increasingly more complicated and intricate Civilizations. The one-unit-per-hex system, while cumbersome at first, makes combat interesting and more than simply a stack-and-drag extravaganza. Definitely worth it if you're a fan of the Civilization series.
The Great Pope of All;-;This is a basic, easy to get into, strategy game that allows you to create your own path instead of starting in a set historical point as most strategy games do. Although it is quite easy, compared to some other games. But still one of my favorite games. 10/10 would play again.
Dong Expansion;-;You buy this game. You plan on trying it out for about an hour or so before going to bed. Fourteen hours later and you come to the conclusion that this game is far more important to you than sleep. 10/10 basically the crystal meth of the video game universe.
SimpleLuck;-;I've only played this game with the Brave New World dlc and I have stayed up several nights cause I would just keep hitting next turn. 9/10
andydrew920;-;Needless to say i have a few hours in this (over 600 as of when this review is being written) that should tell you how awesome this game is. I just love this game, it is one of the very very few games I have bought brand new, the other one is SW: BF2. So Sid Meier owns my wallet and my time. Now as for the review, the graphics are good, game play is smooth and clean, there is no story line other then the one you want to make. and the mods are amazing
John /S/;-;Like previous Civ games this one has the most updates and features. Can be bought cheaply on sale, complete edition goes for about $20-25. Play with friends! Games can last the whole day... or longer.
Peruse;-;Lost days in it. Playing it normally or with the DLC is great. You can't lose. It's beyond addiction.
ChimiCherryChanga;-;This game is dope.
Noob;-;Cviliztun fiv sux, Is to slohw, I left teh gaem for an our an nothin' hapened Jk it's awesome ;)
Janathin Joestare;-;The Pyramids were built by the Swedish people... in the ocean... Historically accurate, fun, and is addictive to play.
Noel;-;Epic Turn-based strategy game. Build your civilization from anciet era to modern era. It's not just about war and battle, there are many ways to win through science, culture or diplomacy. Take a long time to finish a game, around a day but that's why it's epic.
cristian.medina03;-;It feels very good to decimate and obliterate the inferior civilizations that stand against your glorious reign.
ScottW;-;SId Meier's Civilization V the current leader in the 4X strategy and with good reason, it is extremely simple to get at least a basic grasp on without paying too much attention to the more 'hardcore' aspects of it by managing resources and cities much more deeply, which are there for those who like more of a challenge. Civ V also features prominant civilizations (who knew?) through time and mixing these all together makes a very compelling experiences where you can mould your own countries' history into something completely different to what happened in real life to this point. It is also worth mentioning that I almost always play with mods from the workshop that really add to the experience, such as my favorites being the real-world maps so I can spread my new English empire across a far more accurate world after being ever so nice to all my neighbours before taking their land away. Civ V also looks pretty nice in 3D, which is rare to come by and I doubt many have attempted it. The game runs quite easilly with the exception of turn changes so most systems should handle it and there is a very fufilling sense of awe in being able to see the details of lighthouses and birds seen in 3D. Overall, Civ V is a great experience to any history nutt or gaming strategist of any sort but make sure you get all the expansions alongside it because you'll kick yourself over your lost civilizations and features that can improve the game and overhaul your approach to it.
Tyy1117;-;Stay Calm and Don't trust Ghandi Or Hiawatha You'll pay for it if you do 10/10 30 mins becomes 4 hours "Just juan more turn" you say, that becomes 2, then 5, then 10, then before you know it 100
Catman;-;I've played a couple times, you kind of loose track of time while playing, 7 hours later you are king of the world. 10/10
CounterDC;-;This game is just awesome, addicting and adorable to watch. Civilization is a turn-based strategy game where you can play as a world leader of nation or an empire. This game has 2 expansion packs who are worth it's money. The soundtrack is just plainly beautiful to hear and it will never be annoying after hours. The character models look great and sometimes also intimidating. I haven't played multiplayer yet but the singleplayer is how it should be. Civilization 5 belongs to one of the best strategy games of all time. Singleplayer Rating : 10/10
Octorus;-;5/5 A classic for anyone's strategic game library, "One more turn". I recommend getting the two expansions.
Derbear;-;Saw that there could be an option for "raging barbarians". Turned it on and disabled all other civilizations....me against the non-governed world, just how I like it :)
Jakey-poo From StateFarm;-;Get the game. Just get it
TastesLikePanda;-;One does not simply dislike this game. Addicting, massive replayability, especially with DLC's like Gods and Kings and Brave new world, and amazing gameplay providing hours of fun no matter of age, 6 or 45...
echo;-;It's fast, it's fun.
Doug Dimmadome;-;9/10 It's OK
Pyroskies;-;This Game was a big improvement on the Civ series although it had some problems it left some characteristic out it was a great experience.
mattable;-;I've spent hundreds of hours on this game and it's still extremely fun. Definitely one of the easiest strategy games to get into but there is still plenty to learn and get out of it. Two major downsides are that the multiplayer is unreliable and you must have all the expansion packs in order for it to be a high quality game, as vanilla is terrible.
Alrighter Babber;-;Having out over 1000 hours into Civ V, if you want a good turn based strategy, this has to be the one.
King Kanye;-;Let's face it, you need to own this game
dassyboy123;-;Civ 5 is an amazing game and I thouroughly enjoyed taking over the world, if there are any of you who have a hunger for world domination, then this is the game for you. The graphics are brilliant and the strategy needed will quickly make you into a better player. The countries and/or factions are amzing as well.
adam clark;-;hours of play time, high replay ability, wont get bored of it very fast, overall great game and the expansion makes it even better. highly recommend buying
AW AW aaaaww;-;U must ask? it is sid meier civilization! take my money! (tell humble bundle to do it pretty please? :) )
Common;-;Play this if you can afford to become a NEET. It's a very fun game, but far too addicting to the point that your first gameplay will last you at least 10-15 hours. That's only the tutorial. I would give this a 10/10, but this game takes you far away from friends, family and loved ones to the point of no return. 8/10 - Would play it never again (unless I suddenly had no one in the world)
Not a Weeaboo;-;Great game
Jimmy;-;Very addicting game!
gkaran89;-;Love the series! I am very happy with the linux port as well! A must have game.
ceej12;-;Civilization V is based around international diplomacy. It is a turn-based strategy game that allows you to make alliances or enemies; peace or war. You can play as various empires, from England to Rome, America to Egypt. Each nation has a couple special things, such as a special building and a special unit. You can expand your empire by building cities and buying "tiles". You can go to war with nations to capture their territory, or you can be neutral and never go to war. You can start the game just after the invention of agriculture, and from there you research new technologies, starting with things like "animal husbandry" and ending with things like "nanotechnology". Each technology unlocks new things to build and use; for example, researching "mining" allows you to build mines, while researching "industrialization" allows you to build factories. There are various difficulties to choose from, so no matter your skill level, you should enjoy the game. The win conditions are various "victory types"; for example, you can take over everyone else through military and win a domination victory, or you can launch a rocket to Alpha Centauri, winning through a science victory. There are other ways to win as well. Building "wonders", major buildings from history that each give unique bonuses and advantages, allows you to dominate the score board. There are many wonders that could be built, such as the Great Library, Stonehenge, the Great Wall, the Statue of Liberty, and the Hubble Space Telescope. There are two major expansion packs that you can buy, Gods & Kings (allows you to found your own religion and spread it around the world, among other things) and Brave New World (allows you to build trade routes and get involved in international diplomacy through the World Congress/United Nations). Other more minor DLC are available as well, such as Polynesia and Korea. Civilization V also has mod support, and mods are quite easy to make using the included Civilization V SDK tool. Using this, you can make new civilizations, buildings, technologies; the possibilities are almost endless. You can also download other people's mods through the Steam Workshop. My rating of it: 10/10 + Enourmous fun, with a bit of history education hidden throughout. + Permits endless mods and mod possibilities. + Unbelievable amount of replay value. - Can be hard on the computer in the later parts of the game.
MrRobotFalcon;-;One of the greatest strategy games I have ever played! I recommend it to anyone interested in playing strategy games!
The White Man;-;this  ballin
when ur pizza rollz r dun;-;I forgot about my Life..... 10/10
Fluck!;-;Hello, Civ5! Goodbye, weeks of your life!
ArcticX9-poi;-;Just... One... More... Turn...
Prof. E. Cartmenez;-;marathon mode beste
Jensen;-;New dehli is the new world capital. Ghandi killed my kids. 6/6
Ulysses S. Grant;-;This game is fun
darkstarzx2;-;Wonderful game that holds your attention and is a perfect game for relaxing and wasting time :)
Keane;-;1 of the best games ive ever played 95%
canman1222;-;Love this game. Great graphics and strategy. 5/5 Furries recommed.havefundrivesafe
Voyageur;-;Any essence of a life I had this game has taken,,,
Josh;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V Is a strategy game, If you like games like Age of Empires and Command and Conquer this is definately the game for you, It requires thinking and time. It's a very good game, I have playyed it for 4 hours straight with friends who wanted me to get this game, Hope by this review you will get it too! I rate it a 8/10 Because the graphics could have been a little better. But the gameplay is just fantastic!
Apolo;-;Great game, easy to play and very fun. After playing too much it starts getting boring, maybe the multiplayer it's a great thing to try. 8/10
Z_I_B;-;Great game.
Swag'Mal;-;A great game in almost all possible ways, a must have!
L Ron Wiener Dude;-;This game is just like the movie Lincoln...Really boring and goes on for ing ever.
BackdoorInvader;-;Works well on linux!
OlavDeng2(PCMR);-;Go out on an adventure, be honerouble, get resources, build armies and wage war. Or go diplomatic, make deals and get rich. You controll your civilisation, you decide what it does and it is your mission to bring glory to your people. The game is amazing and you can play it thousands of times over and it wont be the same thing again, you can play it alone or with friends, if you play it alone you will find your self in situations where you say "just 5 minutes" and then 5 hours later you are still playing this game taking over your next city. The possibilities of what you do are endless, the nations you play are plenty full and the fun you can have is limitless. The game has its problems though, it is very CPU bound and when you have a large map upon discovering everything there is almost a guarantee that there will be graphical glitches(tested on both a r9 270 and a hd 6870), the AI are predictable, they almost always end up denouncing or attacking you even if you are on extreamly friendly terms with them, which makes playing with friends more fun as they are less predictable but playing against AI is still good. Do i reccomend this strategy game? absolutely. Is it worth the money for the DLC's? 100%. however if you don't like turn based strategy games you should turn around now since this is it, it is turn based which comes with its advantages and disadvantages.
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
RecedingAxis;-;If you already don't have a life, you've got nothing to lose. Get it already.
exaenae;-;It's alright I guess
TwittleTwat;-;This is one of the best games I have ever played. Creating a civilization from scratch and building up an empire so overwhelming that every other seems inferior. If you are the type of person to dominate the world with your own empire, in every political way possible (cultural, domination, etc) then you should get this game! Personally I prefer to take over the world with the brute force of my army.
TrippyMaster;-;Probably the best game in the Civ series so far. I enjoy playing it and everytime I start the game it's hard to quit. I would recommend this game to every fan of the civ series and to everyone searching for a challenge and good gameplay.
<-------- My Waifu;-;Fantastic game, it's a shame that the base game itself isn't the best. The DLC (G&K and Brave New World) are basically needed to get the full game experience, which ramps up the price quite a bit. Still, one of my favorite games of all time.
JohnPinto;-;An excellent strategy game, but be aware that the hours fly playing it.
jo-osullivan;-;Seriously addictive, you'll play for 1/2 an hour and end up stopping 3 hours later.
~Day-Man~;-;11/10. It's ok
EctoSha;-;I can't stop... this game's a tad bit too addicting. You can win with science. yay...
Atriux;-;Always fun. Can put it down and pick it up whenever and I'll have a good time
Eidorian;-;Basically, cause there are nukes n stuff. Plus it's extremely moddable
Shroomie;-;The Celts started a nuclear war with Germany and Russia. 10/10
Archangel;-;There is no instance of a nation benefitting from prolonged warfare, except India -Civ V
scarlettcrush;-;"everybody wants to rule the world" I consider this the new age gamer version of chess. Totally addicting, I've been up for hours and hours for that one more turn. I do wish for more victory types, only because after playing every version of this for way over 500 hours there comes to you a formula for winning certain types- that said...I still play the hell out of it.
Captain Doraemon;-;Great work that worth your money and time.
ZephyrAM;-;Best Civ yet! Only being allowed one unit of each type (combat/non-combat) per tile really changes the game from previous entries, and while the multiplayer mode right now may feel a bit slimmed down, it's still fun with friends! Definitely suggest it if you're a fan of turn based strategy games.
Scared_Sasquatch;-;This game is amazing, it never gets old!
Parvawn;-;Civilization 5 is one of the best strategy games out at the moment. It is very addicting, I'm constantly saying, "Just one more turn." and suddenly it's been twenty turns. Although the game is pretty slow, when conflict happens between your nation and another, it feels extremely fast and every turn feels extremely valuable. I suggest looking into the workshop for some extremely fun mods for CIV5, as these add much much more to the game.
Shin_Ryu;-;simply put this game is amazing Soundtrack 9/10 Graphics 8/10 or about the most you can ask for from a strategy game Gameplay 10/10 The UI and the overall breadth and depth of this is outstanding Fun factor 11/10 This game can be a serious productivity killer and you can easilly end saying "Just...one...more click!" If you don't have this game you are missing out
boboo47;-;really fun
joekage;-;"I intend to rule this land"
Halfling;-;Now I understand the "one more turn" saying that I've heard associated with civ 5. Didn't study for 3 tests cause of this game. Great and addicting game. TL:DR Sold soul to devil for another turn, was worth it.
ivanoski;-;Advance Wars + Settelers of Catan = Great Game
Frame;-;Decide to play for 30 min, snap out of it 1 week later, realise you failed medical school, go back to Civ V. 15/10 Would buy again.
GCMaster;-;Jeez this game is addicting. Civilization 5 is a really fun game with fun, interesting leaders and countries to choose from. If you've never played an RTS (real time strategy) this is the place to start as it is easy to learn, but hard to master. PS: dont trust Ghandi he might seem nice an inocent but he WILL nuke you! :D
Tuandor;-;I keep coming back to this game. Hours and hours and hours. It's hard to stop once you start playing - just...do...one...last...turn... Responsible for many too-late nights.
MrCamber;-;its a good game i find it really fun to play, i recommend this great game
POTSTICKERS;-;Great game! It is fun multiplayer and singleplayer! It goes on sale all the time as well, so practically nobody has to pay full price.
darthspectrum;-;An excellent game, i'm mainly doing this for the badge. This game has served up hundreds of hours of my time, and if you enjoy strategy and intelligent playstyle, this game is for you. Although playable by the laidback consumer, the game truly shines when one is a hardcore strategist and can enjoy exploring the mechanics of the game.
joesant84;-;This game is crack addicting. GET IT! ... Dan!
The Clestiall Medusozoa;-;i like this game because its fun and a stategy and shut up
The Baptist Baby;-;America sucks in this game, so no historical accuracy, and Brazil is never in  jungle, and diplomacy is royally ed, but still an immensely fun game
Master of Execution;-;This game are fun and all the achivment you can get do it more intresting game. One of the best game ever created in this kind of games ever.
gob0b;-;This game is by far the biggest time suck I have ever installed. I've been playing Civ since the first one came out on my dad's Pentium and have probably logged more hours at it than at any job I've ever held. Not that I haven't worked full time, just that when Civilization takes over, sometimes is 24 hours a day for a whole weekend. Not a game for the feint of heart or those with many commitments and tight schedules.
Crimson Sands Gaming;-;It's Civilization V... Theres not much left to be said other then that... If you dont have it, or have played it Your not a True Strategy gamer.
Jaromero435;-;You will say "Just one more turn" and suddenly it's 2 hours later.
Freedom;-;My mom told me I would never be successful enough to be the President, but now I CAN!!!!
Razei Volegase;-;My buddy and I were playing together in a game with two of us and twelve computers. The game took four weeks to complete as we slowly, politically and militarily, took over the world. Together we defeated the Celts in the beginning to find out that our countries were on the same continent. Slowly, I amassed a massive navy of Submarines surrounding the entire world. My friend liked aircraft carriers more, so he traded and muscled his way into owning about 15 of them, all equipped fully with fighters and bombers. At the end of our weeks of play time, we stood at the pinnacle of civilization. Then I got bored and randomly attacked my friend. He scoffed at me, bringing his massive number of aircraft carriers and planes to attack my capital. Then my submarines struck. In two turns, I had destroyed all of his ships. Every single one of his ships. Every. Single. Aircraft Carrier. Died. At the end of it, my friend gave me a look of pure terror. My Submarines had won. Then he nuked my Capital and won the game. 10/10 would get nuked again.
Sacchetti;-;Is it good .....Yes ..... This 9 hours is form 1 day of playing Im ashamed.... 10/10 like crack
sergeant117;-;it's the best strategy game on the market
StraightSavageHippy;-;Really fun game and has a very user freindly control and task bar. I was excpecting a really confusing stategy game but I ended up getting a highly-addictive, awsome game if you love to conquer, build, and explore.
HumpoHippo;-;Really good game with a great community!
An Independent Young Black Woman;-;This game is just like a dose of crystal meth. You take it once and you can't simply stop. Your kids start starving, your friends start leaving you, and worst of all is that Gandhi hates you!!! I just got the game yesterday and I already have 8 hours played on it. Yes, I know I'm a sad individual. It is really fun and it is an awesome strategy game (especially for 7.5$; thank you gaben).The only downside is that the game freezes 45 minutes in a multiplayer game (hopefully it'll be fixed soon). 10/10 Would Marry. Oh yeah, and say bye to your life while you're at it.
TacoBomber;-;It's pretty fun and the start of the game is fun and a little nail biting but once you get really late into the game, say 250 turns, it becomes fairly obvious who is going to win and becomes pretty boring. Other than that, awesome game
Rubicante;-;"Just one more turn and I'll call it quits" Next Turn "Just one more turn and I'll call it quits" Next Turn "Just one more turn and I'll call it quits, I mean it this time"
Kun Aguero;-;Fun game to build your civilization and watch it fall apart. Very Good 10/10
Ryukaino;-;I have been a fan of Civilization since the second game. (Never got round to playing the first one but I do hope I will one day.) This is a game where the style and pace of the game is entirely dependent on the player. You can play like and take my time in the beginning so I can make lots of money and then engage with the other civilizations, either politically or war, depending on how they treat me and others. Or you can go for the all-out war method from the beginning and try to conquer everyone immediately. Or you can try to expand by building lots of the cities. There are a number of ways to actually play and win this game but even if you have the best city, there is never any guarantee you will win if you are playing on any difficulty the is 4 or above. And its this thrill of not knowing that really lets me enjoy the game. Even with the numerous strategies a player can choose from and/or alternate between, there are also a number of side activities to do such as building up the cities themselves with new architecture or researching technologies to give yourself an edge via the most high tech gadgets a person can have. You can also interact with city states and build relationships with them for passing their borders or getting resources from them and some resources are only gotten from these city states. I have put over 100 hours into this game and although I am not playing this game at the current moment (got exams and new games to play), I will be sure to get back to this game when I have time to do so. All in all, this game is an all-rounder when it comes to playing with your own rules. Once you start playing this game and really get into it, you won't be able to stop even if you win. Beginners might take a few hours to get used to the interface and the features, but the "Advisors" who guide new players through the game are a big help on this part and the tips they give you depends on the setting the player has chosen for them in the options.
infamouslars;-;Took over America. Renamed Philidelphia Flip-a-delphia and Washington BYYYAAAHHH!!! 10/10 would bang again.
Captain Creatine;-;One more turn...
TrueDeathGM;-;This game is really fun and you can spend hours playing a single round. I reccoment getting all the DLCs when their on sale, the DLCs are really good and add alot of content. The only thing I don't like is that the ai isn't very agressive.
Orpheus;-;Wow, this game is SOOOOOOO addicting! PLAY IT, PLAY IT NOW! (i sold my car to buy the game and expansion packs)
A1ch3mi57;-;5/5 and 10/10 simply amazing game
Vagrant|Naxx;-;Wonderful game. hours of playability.
Housey;-;Civ V is yet another incredibly addictive, entertaining installment to the Civilization franchise.
Cronal;-;This game is worth your time. All of it. When there's one thing this game teaches you besides some minor facts about historical leaders and buildings, it's how global politics would work without morals. That annoying Inca has become way to powerfull? Nuke him to the stone age and grind his remains. Stupid Ghandi finished a wonder one turn before you? Nuke him. Persia has Uranium but you don't? Blitzkrieg him and then nuke him. Besides that, CiV achieves a great, yet not to complex balance between research, culture and economy, although diplomatic options are not the most advanced in the series. Still a fantastic game that managed to make me play it for over 1000 hours. And i don't regret a single second of that time.
KillSword;-;This is A LOT of fun, but be careful or you might spend too much time on it.
Leandro;-;Extremely addictive, it's mostly worthy of carrying the Civilization name. The hexagonal grid doesn't change the game dynamic much, but being limited to one combat unit per tile does. If you're used to solve your Civilization games by conquering everybody else, be advised that big battles take a lot longer to resolve, and cities are much harder to capture at first.
che3z;-;You can build Notre Dame in Tokyo! It's great!
KelvinScone;-;No words. Just play.
Walkman42;-;I've been a fan of the series since Civ. 3. Sure, thats not a long time, but I still love the series. I highly recommend this to anyone.
Sidez123;-;So addicting!
PieCakesCookies;-;Long Gameplay but never bores
the_kevinchi;-;Easily one of the best TBS games available
Ikrandas;-;This is a truly great game. One of the best. At times it may be slow but that end reward of destroying all of your friends long and hard work is extremely satisfying. The soundtrack is stunning with cultural music made specificaly for Civ. It is one of the most intense games i've ever played. The split second desicions that can affect the rest of the game are perfectly placed. This is one of my favorite games. If you like any sort of strategy you will fall in love with Civ.
The Saboteur;-;The only game where Gandhi betrays everyone with war elephants and nukes. 10/10
JP;-;good, but you need the DLCs
<TkN> Samsung;-;[Rome] Ceasar: -*le Tries to negoitiate peace. [Mongoria] Gengish: -Me no want pece [Rome] Ceasar: - damn mogorians
BartFTW;-;Just one more turn!
mojopojo;-;this is a amazeing game that is all i have to say
Creamy Supreme;-;its like civ 4 but terrible 10/10
Hells Pastry;-;Fine way to make you hate other countries.
Mr Ad3;-;I like this game becuse it makes gandi look like the biggest warlord in history
DizzyDinosaur;-;Awsome! :D
|RW|Sinko;-;Fantastic! A very in-depth game with a variety of ways to win. You will find yourself in many different situations that require decisions that are both difficult and unique.
Cole;-;Yes, in the vanilla version it IS clicking the next turn button simulator 2k14, but if you click the next turn button enough you can nuke everyone (including that smarmy jerk who's been insulting you the whole game) back to the stone age, then win a diplomatic victory. 11/10.
StynaMN;-;Civilization V is among the top of my list of favorite games. It's strategy demonstrated through gathering resources and expanding your empire reminds me a lot of the board game "Settlers of Catan". The primary concepts focused on are very in-depth, and it takes a great amount of skill to learn the premise of the game in its entirety,
ghostman587;-;This game keeps on crashing saying there is an error with running it help?
hithisiscandra;-;Frankly this game keeps me hooked longer than i thought one year later I was astonished to see how much time I've spent on this game
Pandas in Panzers;-;I've spent nearly 200 hours on this insanely briliant game! Is it good? YOU BET YO  IT IS!!!!!!!!! But if ur getting it buy the complete pack
SIR VEDEL;-;Clearly the AI is this game`s greatest weakness but overall it`s a great game. The graphics are nice and the strategic aspects increased with the dlc`s. Great to play with friends or other human players -> less AI and it is very addictiv if you start playing and intend to stop, it s just one more turn.... and another hour has passed or you start to realize that the sun just rose even thought you started playing at night
Clement Attlee;-;I was playing this the night before an exam. At 11pm I thought 'Just One More Turn', 'cause that f'er Casmir betrayed me and sided with China. It seemed as if only an hour later I had taken over Poland, China, Indonesia and Venice. It was 9am. 10/10 would fail an exam again.
The Gavel;-;Steam wants my opinion. Ive seen empires rise and fall (mostly mine). I tried to stop. One more turn I will say for 80 more turns. Then bam it's 4 a.m. the world has forgotten about you. you have a final in an hour. You know? The final you said you needed a break in studying? But you know what? One more turn? 10/10 would conquer Germany with Poland again highly recommended
SilverExpo;-;The game mechanics of Sid Meiers Civilization may be a lot to take in for people new to the franchise, but it's definitely worth buying and learning to play. It takes time, but once you figure out how the game works, it is EXTREMELY fun and addicting. I've played Civ 3 and 4 as well and also recommend those previous versions too.
ABtheMD;-;The game is very engaging. Others can probably give you a much more thourough review, but I will say that, if you are going to pick this up, get the expansions. Brave New World really adds a lot to the game.
Hewui;-;What a game! Brilliant, pretty much one of my best game purchases on steam. Whether you play single player or multiplayer this game is for anyone!. But be ready to be , you might be enjoying 300 turns of peace and you bullying small city-states, but then BAM, BOOM, BUTT, Your greatest ally backstabs you and destroys a game you have been playing on for a while. Usually this makes me uninstall the game and give a  review. But this game is different, you are not complete until you buy this game, and bully civs
Ozzyocca;-;Getting to nuke Ghandi, what more could you want? Cruise along and take your time playing this game, build up massive armies, conquer the world. Turn based, go to war with or trade with opponents. One of my all time favourite games, looking forward to playing Beyond.
Darkrai's Victum;-;Amazing game with infinate replayability. The game if very fun to play and is interesting to learn about the different cultures. I recommend getting into singleplayer more than multiplayer, because learning how the A.I. work in the game is very thought provoking and can cause some really funny moments. Also the workshop has some of the best mods in anygame I've played, I highly recommend getting the LS civilizations mods to add many other unique Civs to the game.
redbuck1;-;This is a turn-based settling/fighting game in which you are a random world leader from a random time period and you build an empire and then you kill each other. What more could you want from a game? COMPUTERBOARDGAMEWOOHOO MINE MINE MINE MINE MINE MINE ~seagulls (finding nemo)
BIG FAN OF GAY ROCKS;-;Look, if u don't think being able to wage war on Bismark as Alexander the Great using stealth bombers is literally the raddest thing then get out of my face + i h8 u
Menstrual Crabs;-;Live the life of scrooge mcduck and play as Venice
Pandude;-;its good if you are up for a game that lasts for a while and constant initial lag when u rejoin later in the game.
SirSpeakingPineapple;-;i absolutly (pretty sure im going to spell stuff wrong but whatever) love the gameplay and the history aspect of the game. people who like turn based stratagy games like "Xcom: enemy unkown" would really like this game exept in civ you have more control of everything that is happening unlike Xcom. i bet some of you guys watch youtube vids on this and look at it thinking it is a very complex and hard to understand game but it is a lot simpler than it looks. i have over 100 hours on this game and i have even gotten some DLCs. i even got some of my friends to get the game and play with me. in all i find it a really fun game and i give it a 10/10.
The Doctor;-;... Stay back.... get away from this game... once you pay the money to buy it you will download it... start it.... pick your favorite civ... after a couple of turns an hour or two pasts by... you don't realize the time..... next thing you know your being attacked by China because she is a  who betrays good friends of her and then try to kill you. STAY AWAY FROM THIS GAME DO NOT BUY IT IF YOU DO YOU WILL GO CRAZY AND START TO MUTTER ABOUT IRON AND URANIUM TO NUKE CHINA UNDERBREATH EVERYDAY.... WATCH OUT FOR GHANDI
Mallard1938;-;An awesome game! Highly recommonded from someone who has spent maybe a little too much time on this game...
weaseL [no mouse];-;great micro-transactions. But rather poor cutscenes. 69/10 420
Segrist;-;Excellent game to play with a group of buddies.
ExtremeKid;-;Its a good game....'nough said.
Supergoldboy;-;This game is extremely fun its one of those games that you say "Ok its 9:30 Am I'll play for a little then I'll do something else." When you look back up its 5 Pm
Sumerian;-;This game is the best game ever made! Chose what sort of game style you want to have, diplomatic, trade or use brute force, to gain control over the world. This game i came back to many times. It comes many new games, to to try out. But if you buy this game you have a game that you always will come back too. If you are new to this sort of games, just play it on a easy difficulty, and you be just fine. This game gets new DLC all the time, and its community, build new maps, challanges for you to try out. Its always something new to come back too. Build an army of warriors, or convert the world to you're religion to get the upper hand. Its the best game here on steam.
Cyber-Psyco;-;Great game
omgggg clarissa;-;This turn-based strategy game is reasonably deep and very fun and has tons of value behind it. As far as strategy games go, this one is definitely one of the most accessible. Learning how to play is easy and rewarding. The Brave New World expansion is a must-have as it adds plenty of gameplay elemetns that truly enhance the game altogether. A couple minor gripes: The AI is too easy, and on higher difficulties they are only given advantages like money or science boosts rather than actually playing the game more intelligently and strategically. This is pretty unfair. Essentially they are just given cheats compared to you. Tons of fun if you have eight hours to play a game with friends in a LAN setting (don't let those conniving s peek at your screen though). Anyone who loves this game would do themselves a service to check out Civilization 4 which is actually more in-depth than Civ 5 in many regards, because in making Civ 5 more accessible it was dumbed down a bit.
[INACTIVE til 08/24] Payne Train;-;If you travelled back in time a few years and told my past self I'd be interested in this game, I'd probably think you were crazy. I'm not one particularly fond of strategy games such as Civ, but this game has given me many hours of an enjoyable democratic and peaceful bloodthirsty and back-stabbing game. The base game, Civ V, on its own is enjoyable. Although, what really gives the game some "flavour" are the two DLC packs released. Altogether these create an enjoyable gaming experience. The gameplay and strategy is a "easy to learn, hard to master" style that in as little as a few hours you'll be chopping Ghandi's armies to your left and developing Nuclear Fission to your right. In multiplayer, this game is Monopoly with friends on crack. You'll find yourself making alliances and checking your backs every turn until the game is over. You may lose a few friends in the process, but hey, all is fair in love and war. Definitely recommend getting the entire game + DLC.
Bigest noob and platypus :3;-;i did play this game for a free weekend so what did i think i loved it i played it for hours and hours so i had lots of fun with my mate it was great
iTiamo;-;This game is a must-have, absolutely amazing.
Andy da Alpaca;-;Just. One. More. Turn......
Vladimir Lenin;-;For anyone who wants to conquer the world, to make it a better place, or bring peace to a war torn land. This is the game for you. Running your own Country is unlike anything to come to the market.
Syloria;-;The good news is that I finally slaughtered Gandhi. The bad news is that in doing so I forgot to feed my cat three days in a row. I now have several half-eaten bird carcasses on my front porch; I named them all Gandhi. 10/10.
Solipsist;-;Still the best long-run turn based strategy game series in existance. This version perfects many of the issues the prior iterations had and adds a ton of new content.
super_tiger_90;-;I like the large maps and exploring new territories. I love that the other civs are random and you never know who you will run into. I became quite addicted to this game and have over 6,000 hours of game play. The graphics and AI are good and I can spend several hours per day playing.
SonofaBuch;-;Hours of fun both against AI and against friends. Great for casual and more competitive gaming.
Legolas;-;My favourate game. Awsome tile graphics and great game interface whether you want war, peace, or something else. Thiss game has it all!
Hobolarry;-;On diety (The hardest difficulty) I used 29 nukes on Gandhi's army..... another 8 on his capitol just so I could win. And guess what..... It was a hell of alot of fun.
Tran Narius;-;This game is my favourite when it comes to the Strategy genre. Get this with the expansions, especially Brave New World and you will quickly have 100+ hours of fun.
Riotmann;-;played this game for 12 houts straight
gosubilko;-;Not only the best turn-based strategy out there, also one of the best game overall. Pressed Play tutorial and played for 5 hours!!!! That's just the beginning.
Froski101;-;Quite possibly the best and most complexly amazing game I have played! 250/100!
Tripas;-;Just... one... more... turn!
Beardednomad;-;Love this game it's my first of the series i put the 50 hours into it in the first week. It's a great strategy game I recomend it anyone looking for a great game.
ronak00000;-;It's Civ 5. What else needs to be said.
Defcon5gaming;-;This is a great game for the those who love Civilization. The tool works and the community is interested.
Silver;-;I get to kill any of my citizens that think it's a good idea to rebel against me and I get to nuke cities without anybody questioning my decisions. I love Dictatorship V, 10/10
Lord_Brenton;-;A fantastic stradegy game that allows you to take the role of almost any civilization and allow your to take them thoughout the entire history of time. Its very avaible for newcomers and even caters towards long time fans. Its appeal it aweosme it its almost impossible to stop playing. Howeve the only issue is that the expansions are waht really makes the game fantastic. The base game is godd but it doesnt compare to the amazingness of the expansions.
Caferacer21;-;I have lost days and nights playng this game. It is the only game i know of that i can spend hours apon hours at a time with no food or drink. Strongly recomend this for anyone, trying to no study for finals, lose some pounds or are suffering from a physo x girlfriend and cant leave the house for a few days
sabbo2001;-;I'm not a fan of turn-based strategy so I was going to be quite a hard sell on this. However, in the 50 hours I've racked up in the first two weeks of owning the game, I'm fairly thrilled and enjoying it. You can tinker with a single or multiplayer game for days on end and just calmly murder that bloody irritating Ghandi in your own time. I've barely even touched the available mods for the game, so I've still got that excitement coming to me. All in all, a nice timekiller, and can even be played while you're doing other things.
Joshor;-;This is the best turn based stragety/world building game I have ever played. If you like turn based stragety or world building pick this game up. Then let me know if you want to play online.
SAMWISE;-;What an amazing game. The time flies by while you just keep telling yourself "Just one more turn"
Poland;-;Like: Great Game, easy to learn how to play the game to the fullest, looks great Dislike: Gandhi.
Zero;-;This is me and i approve this recommendation
Balf;-;loved it it is my favorite game i have played for weeks with it not geting boring
gaem.Josh Buddy;-;Where did those 5 hours go?
Danny2007;-;Its really fun to play with friends
rawii;-;Dis game such good very epic
Sociopath;-;As I sat there. I thought to myself, "How did this happen?" It was me versus my friend. He had pikemen. I thought "Uh oh" And then suddenely out of nowhere my fighter plane came and shot at him then I nuked all five of his cities at once. He cried for three days after that. 10/10 would nuke again
Nikola Tesla Profesional Wresla;-;Never trust the French. Or Rome. Or India. You know what, you're best off just going it alone.
demonkillr1;-;Long time fan of this series. With the new expansions it feels complete.
Hayley;-;Brilliant game, so much fun
~=II_TESLA_II=~;-;Tons of replay value, great if you love TBG's!
fsanchez;-;I love this game so much. If you are going to buy it, buy it with all the DLCs. It so worth it! 10/10
ReliantGuyZ;-;In short, Civilization V is a delightful game of world domination. Anyone who enjoys board games such as Risk will enjoy the strategy in the game. I found plenty of complexity in the game, allowing the freedom to do pretty much anything that I wanted to do. The many different kinds of victory, whether it be through a blast of your military might, the triumphant noble plight of science, or via the slow creep of your empire's cultural dominance, allow for various options in deciding how you want to win. I haven't played any multiplayer, so I'm not an authority on that, but the large range of Civs included in the game allow for nearly infinite replayability, especially with the complexity-infusing expansion packs. I can tell you one thing though, the games are LONG. I literally blew threw 6 hours playing this game at one time, and there is no end in sight for that save. But yeah, wonderful game. Well thought through, well implemented, and always interesting. Highly suggest!
sarsy;-;Fun game, that is simple at the surface but can become increasingly complex in a good way for Civ veterans.
Backpain;-;One of the best games ever made.And mods make it even greater.
Popowerst;-;Great game. It really does give you a good way to spend your time. Easy to pick up and fun to master, Civ V is the best Civilization to date!
Arthro Welf;-;Civilization 5 or how i like to call it Civ 5 is one of the best strategy games I have played like The Total War franchise this was just amazing and addictive what more to say other then this game should be on your wishlist or shopping cart.
PotatoesMotion;-;Hello I am a fan of games such as Civ Games and Age Of Empires etc etc... and I can say for sure this is a good game. I have played it for about 100+ hours, not much for some people but for me it is. At first I experienced some problems with the multiplayer but I think they fixed the problems that could ruin the experience. Buy the vanilla Civ V and then buy the Brave New World if u don't mind not getting some civilizations but if u have the money just buy the Gold Edition. Well that's it, that's one of my first reviews, plz don't kill me. And sorry if I misspelled something, I am Portuguese... Thank You.
General Franky;-;I've played this enough to fully appreciate the quality and depth of this game. It is well made an a worthy installment to the Civilization series. It isn't perfect, but diamonds in nature don't come clean and cut. Graphics are solid at max settings. Water effect is dazzling at times, and watching my slaves, er, I mean unionized workers hammer away to build my roads always brings a grin to my face. Combat animations are fun and unqiue to unit types, but occasionally they do get repetitive especially when there is one stubborn barbarian using your soldiers' heads like golf balls. One animation I really think they did well on is the atomic bomb although I may be biased because watching that go off on my foes capital does make me chuckle heartedly. I swear I'm a nice a guy. Gameplay is exquisite I find especially after the inclusion of Brave New World. There is a game style for almost any type of player as well as a civilization that goes along with it. You like to be aggressive and burn down your friends countryside and country people? Well the Zulus are for you. If they're your neighbour you know you need big walls. Is building large empires and just blobbing out your thing? Well I'm certain being the Emperor of Rome is the job for you. More of a hide-behind-big-freaking-cities-and-laugh-because-your-ideology-is-destroying-enemy-happiness-and-purpose-in-life type of person? Well you still have a hard time because troops win games, but you can definitely be a big world power throwing your propaganda at poor unsuspecting Civs with the Bearded-Brazillian mind control technique, or tourism as this game calls it. The amount of dynamic things you can do and experience with this game is great and I would say it is defnitely worth experiencing for everyone. A sidenote on gameplay is especially if you dont like to build many early units is always be prepared to be suddenly sad in the early game most of all. Play this game like simcity with disasters turn on. Hide your workers, hide your great people and hide your settlers because barbarians be pillaging your improvements out here. Interface can be a bit confusing if you're not used to it but seeing as you are with it most of the game it gets pretty convenient to use. And the controls are intuitive so I dont see too much mucking about happening if you're getting into games like this. This is probably one of those games I would love to play on a touchscreen that I converted into a table top. Be all futuristic commander-like. Anyone else? Mom? Just me. If you're looking for a great easy-going time-spending game this is a great one for that. It also has some nice multiplayer so it can be a party! The replayability is very vast due to the immense possible combinations and randomly generated maps. The mods also add a fantastic singleplayer experience. Conquering Virtual Westeros has never been more fun. I give this game two thumbs up sadly steam only lets me do one. I probably forgot to mention and go over a few things, but just felt like doing this on the fly. Hopefully it's bearable. Thanks for reading.
Heezus;-;10/10 Would buy again (if for some strange reason steam doesn't exist in the future)
Alastair;-;I love this game but I suspect it may be a time machine. I have started many a game before bed and before I even have the chance to notice it is already morning.
Oota;-;This game takes time and bends it in every way possible. Wake up at 8am and next minute its 8pm. :)
ashmonkey1;-;This is a fun game when played with friends, easy to learn and set up multiplayer games.
Dromedary;-;Fun game, haven't played a multiplayer (with people) game yet but have still put in many hours conquering the world!
Alsec;-;Quit your job, drop out of college, have one last night of fun with your mate, and say goodbye to time -- this game will bring you into a new dimension. Play at your own risk.
EvilClone28;-;Although sometimes it may be a bit slow at times, it is incredibly fun alone or with friends.
[MNI] LMS AC3D;-;A great game! Don't listen to anybody else, it is a great game!!!!
TreeBear;-;Civ 5 without DLC is very fun but once you get all the DLC, there's no going back. Having all the DLC maybe expensive but it's 100% worth it. Civ is a great, fun stragetegy game. You can play with friends, random people or just by yourself. There are 8 different difficulties so you can choose whether you want it to be easy or hard. There is a "campgain" so to speak that you can do. They don't follow off eachother but they're fun. So to conclude if you like strategy games I HIGHLY recommend getting Civ, lots of fun!
Ovonpo;-;Game is great but happiness isnt the best way to stop your civilization from growing.
bard;-;Win with Science, Culture, Napalm!
-YETI- Paula Deen;-;For a real time strategy sim, this game sucks. For a duck song replica, this game ing rocks. This game not only took me to the lemonade stand, but THE DUCK WALKED UP THE LEMONADE STAND! THE ING LEMONAID STAND! This game is going to get a 10/10 ducks.
BakaBlue;-;I absolutely love this game. Best spent $30 in my life. 10/10
Tudhalyas;-;If you like strategic and management games and you're willing to spend some time to learn how to play (and that means, playing a couple of test matches just to understand the ins and outs of the gameplay), *please* get this. It's very rewarding and deep, and you will always curse at the clock, because you don't have the time to play "one last turn".
DrewTheDemon;-;Probably one of the most addicting games I have ever played. I dont know about the new beyond earth coming out here but I guarentee this is the best buy I had in the last 2 years
Bluebird;-;This game is like heroin, you just can't stop playing it. You'll tell yourself "Just one more turn and then I'll quit" but later realize that you've sunken six more hours into the game. You'll alienate your friends & family just so you can teach those dirty Huns not to  with your cities while Gandhi nukes your  of the planet. So yeah, get this game if you like doing hard drugs.
Faze Tilston;-;A nice game. Features Germany. 63 69s out of 69 69s.
Bitch Fuker;-;This game made me giggle my , if you catch my drift.
Kingblob531;-;love it basicly you are a successful hitler 10/10
Killinator33;-;One of the best games I've ever played!
mordred;-;This game is my whole life.
Linux Immortal Penguin;-;Sid Meirer's Civ is prolly the best TBS ever
BobTheSkaFish;-;God this game will take up so much of your time! If you only got about an hour of time available, i wouldnt even suggest opening it as you WILL be late for whatever you had to do after! Excellent jeu dans son ensemble! Je le recommande a tous et chacun, pour les fans du genre et les nophytes, a vaut le dtour!
GoldWolf;-;An Amazing game, worth the money 100%!
Daily;-;awsome strategic game! you can spend hours playing it...the multiplayer is not bad! this is probably the best strategy game after empire
eva;-;dont talk about this gam or ull have endles discussion about how civ4 is better
best poi NA;-;Probably one of the most addictive nation-managing strategy games I have ever played. Would definately recommand to people who enjoy building empires with vast varieties.
StalkingDucks;-;This game is the .
ODi.PAULSITVITY;-;This is a really good strategy game. I bet the expansion packs make it even more epic. Somewhat challeging to learn, but there are advisors that help you along the way. Also, there is a good multiplayer option. I would totaly recommend this if you like stragety games and even if you don't, I would still recommend it.
Hi I'm Ca11um;-;Definatly worth getting if you're a fan in Stratagy games! Can't stop playing just one... more... turn...
Haylee;-;This game is magical. Too often I find myself taking "just one more turn" and then a time warp activating as a direct result of this game, sending me from 11pm to 6am. I don't know why, or how, it just seems to happen only within this game and XCOM.
Smitey McSmiterson;-;This is the first strategy game I played in my whole life and overall one of my favorite games on Steam. Appealing, Addictive and accessible to gamers of all skill types, a must own for Steam gamers. nuff said.
Peach;-;i am not good at this game but it might be fun when i am good :)
[73rd] MonotoneCreeper;-;Melbourne demands Brad Pitt. Yes, you can name your religion Brad Pitt.
azrael.;-;Building nukes with King Kamehameha of Polynesia and scare the  outta America. 11/10
Ridiculed Phantom;-;I saw this game, and was willing to give it a try as it was cheap in the 2013 christmas sale on steam. Man am i gald i did buy this game, if you are looking for a fun to play and interesting strategy game that you can stress over and sink countless hours into, then this is the game for you. Oh and one last thing, DON'T TRUST GHANDI, you'll thank me later.... 8/10
Jerry Seinfeld;-;Very good game so far, after .7 hours of play time so far. However, in the two times I've had to make a new game, it seems to crash after only a few turns.
Kyle Sees;-;Destroying entire civilizations with your sheer willpower and military strength is my specialty... why? because this game just is here to let me do that... Destroy Ghandi?! HELLS YES!!!
SpaceCow64;-;If you start, aint you never gonna stop.
MyPizzaHut;-;Only game where you can actually repel two empires (French and American) via espionage, technological superiority, and economic might. I made them my es with only a small military :)
BriscoeDack;-;I have been a loyal fan to Sid Meier's since I started playing Civ II as a little kid. I have easily logged thousands of hours on Civ II, III, IV, and V, with my brother also matching those same kind of hours in game. If you love turn based strategy, this is seriously the best money can buy. Civ is the one game that calls me back every time. It has the best replay value of any game I've ever played. It is a different monster every time I play a new game. The only thing I would warn players about is saving to the steam cloud. Early after I got this game, I saved directly to the steam cloud to pick that game up on a new laptop. Somewhere along the way, Civ freaked out, and now it will only allow me to play offline. I don't get to earn achievements and steam doesn't log how many hours I've put into the game since then. Don't let the 86 hours I have racked up fool you. I usually play at least 10 hours a week. I'm probably somewhere around 400 hours at this point, and many many more to come. Don't trust the steam cloud. Other than that, enjoy this beautiful masterpiece.
Absolutely Disgusting;-;If you always dreamed to rule feudal japan as Nobunaga, building the great chinese wall to protect Notr Dame in Kyoto, from the threats of the great Inca's navy and the respectable swordmen army of the baron Von Bismarck, then this game is for you. ..... Yeah i know right?
[KUG FAMILY CLAN] taylor;-;like skyrim with giant death robots 10/10 would probably email to my grandma and a few friends
Tiur;-;Hours of immensely deep and fun tactics.
Alex Aghartastudio;-;This is civilization at its best. (with all addons) What else can be said? The geographic importance of landscape and non stockable units make this version a lot better than other episode in my opinon.
Commander Vex;-;It's good, not as good as Gal civ 2, but very close, though dislike how i can't see the 3d of the unit till i build it. Get this and gal civ 2 :) :) :) :) :) :) :) :) :) :( :( 8 of 10 stars
Tlmader;-;Civilization V has transitioned from a lackluster sequel to my all-time favorite strategy game. With the Gods and Kings and Brave New World DLC's, playing the game with difficult AI's or against friends keeps me on the edge.
Gandhi;-;Great game, don't have Gandhi against you
Literal Trash;-;You think you have only been playing for 2 hours when in reality it has been days since you have showered and you are on a diet of doritos and ice tea. 11/10 would bang game
HypoCritical;-;This game is AMAZING. I have not slept days and Ghandi is always spying on you so go to war on him ASAP. Plus the mods are great.
HoosierRage;-;While the vanilla version is certainly lacking for someone who has played previous Civ titles, the expansions are truly worth their money and enchance the game far beyond what the vanilla version is. I highly recomend getting the expansion Gods & Kings if you are considering purchasing Civ V. It will take the game to a new level. Without getting the expansions, I believe you will feel slighted if you've played a previous Civ game. Newcomers to the series may not mind though. I would certainly recomend this game if you are willing to purchase Gods & Kings.
Sollok;-;Now Civilization Beyond Earth is released I just want to pitch Civ V. What I like about this game is the reference to world history with people and weapons being real. Don't get me wrong - I also like fictional games but Civilization V is just superb and if you for some strange reason haven't played one of the games in this series you NEED to pick this one up. Of cause after playing Civilization V you want to play Civilization Beyond Earth......
Newtime;-;I can't recommend this enough. Very addicting!
rueben82;-;This is by far one of the greatest games i have ever played. 10/10 for me
DrHaste;-;As addictive as heroin (designed during The Great War as a safe substitute for morphine), as informative as an Encyclopaedia (but not a very big one).
Woogie;-;9/10 The game has its fair share of bugs a little more than the game should have has only happened in its multiplayer singleplayer i have yet to come across a bug. A lot of good strategy in the game with a lot of choices to make. I would recomended having an expasion at least Brave new world as it comes with all of god & kings features except the scenarios and civs from gods & kings all gameplay features should be included. Each game can take a while to complete but that is where it gives good strategy in. Remember to build an army or you will just get crushed all the time and trust no one as they could easily come to stab you in the back. A great game i would recomended to a lot of people.
VG.Mandragon;-;MMmm, yes Civ V, feed my god complex!
Breakfast King;-;Great, strategic way to waste your precious time on this earth. Also,  Ghandi.
Hugi;-;With all the expansions it is truly great expirence, hours go like minutes.
captaindrunk1111;-;its fun fun fun and more fun. you will play the whole day and you will still want more siv.
MulchBucket;-;SARCASM WARNING Do you hate your friends? Do you want to hate your friends, then buy Civ V the greatest hate fuel of all. Watch as you and your friends scramble to build the best cultural buildings in all of history only to be beaten out by the AI players. Enjoy the rage between all of you as you try to move through borders and pledge war on eachother. Witness the expanding nations slowly taking over the map as you are raided by raging barbarians. TL:DR 10/10 would ruin friendships
Eck;-;The greatest video game ever made.
SchuetzeP;-;One of the greatest games I've ever played, and of the Civilization franchise it is certainly a great follower to Civ2 which was and will always be my favourite Civ!
Andu;-;Good game. Dumbass employees cant even ing fix the "not starting "  this game i had it with this  learn to ing fix your
Sonlen Ward;-;A great combination of strategy, management, and mayhem, Civ 5 is a phenomenal game for both the casual and hardcore strategy gamer. Fun by yourself, even more fun with friends, Civ 5 offers endless replayability and challenges even the toughest gamers. A must buy. PS: All DLCs are great additions, get them all!
SPEEDWAY;-;honestly best 4x game ever i love playing this with my buddies multiplayer 6+ people or just finding out cool ways to use the civs
Angus Patty;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is the game that you play in the morning, laying in bed, sipping a cup of tea, and laying in bed. However, you will look up after a couple hundred turns and realize that you have been playing for 3 days. As I always say, if it's on sale buy it. If it isn't - wait. Cuz it will be.
Tyrannosaurs Rekt;-;One of the best co-op games around. It is very much a strategic game while being fun all at once. You get to rule an empire while attempting to crush the other ones. It's great.
BigBarazi;-;One of my favorite series of all time, this game is what strategy games should look up to, it covers humanity's progress from the stone age up until their first starship to another galaxy (and Mechs!). the scope here is unparalleled. there is an argument that this version is worse than 4, and that might be true, however, there are aspects here that have improved the game overall, the AI for one, the diplomacy is much more balanced, the Hex grid adds a superior layer of strategy to the previous square one, and the fact that you cannot stack your units anymore eliminated that dreaded attack with all units tactic. I would also recommend playing this with the Brave New World expansion, which adds several elements to the game (especially social and trade) and to a lesser extent the Gods and Kings expansion that adds religion and add to both the new civs and wonders which also add a new layer of strategy. this is perhaps one of the best strategy games of all time and is highly recommended
Gandalf the White;-;As a new Civ player, I must say that I used to hate this type of strategy games (Turn Based) and considered my self an RTS player instead. now that I tried CIV 5, I must say that I'm hooked to the game and its innovative mechanics. Playing against the AI is alaways fun, and the multiplayer experience is fantastic. The amount of customisations you can do to the game is great, especially with the addition of community content. The sound track is brilliant and the options menu has way more options than you could possibly need to tweak. If you are considering giving turn based strategy a go, I defiently recommend this game.
Titowam ~ TheSillyPotato [TA];-;This game is amazing. I started a quick game on a small map with 3 other people, 5 hours in and I only have half the map to myself! Really takes time and it keeps you occupied, but it gets a bit annoying in late-game when you have many units and cities and you have to maintain all of them by building stuff, assigning tasks when you just wanna kill stuff. Other than that, great! 9/10
The Falcon;-;Continues the Civ tradition of being dangerously addictive. Fantastic game.
Skylar2300;-;This game is awesome. I would recomend to all ages. Keep up the good work Civ fans!
d.divalentino;-;Do not buy this game if you like having free time. It's not a game one simply picks up "for an hour or so". It is the video game equivalent of heroin: it will suck away hours of your life at a time, leaving you in a stupor afterwards, thinking only about when you can boot it up next and finally knock off that a-hole Suleiman for good. It's terrible but, it's so, so good.
gribblefrax;-;Excellent, although without G&K and BNW, Civ 5 feels more like a demo.
Ulquiora;-;This game sucks hours of my life 10/10
Xerrojaz;-;This is one of THE most addicting games ever. You don't have to like it, it just sucks you in, and refuses to let go. And it's a perfect homework game
Lisa;-;I love this game! Its easy to approach but hard to master, its thematic, the replayability is great as you branching paths and policy trees can be varied from the very start. Striving to get the best, most successful historical civilization is truly addictive!
MasterOfPuppets;-;This game is incredible, its fun and addictive, theres soo many different civilizations avalible to pick from. The civilization i prefer to go with is Napoleon or America.
TheHunterJr;-;Good Game looking forward next one
Ant-Man;-;Really great game, it requires thinking and strategy and it's massive. Online is fun and with your friends it's even better, even when your friend backstabs you(grumble grumble) I can't wait for civ 6(or civ xi) The only problem is the fighting, their is no real strategy to it or deph, but it works and can be fun if your winning :P
Clement Ivanov;-;Best game you will ever buy
Darth Adobo;-;You get to conquer the world as a Mongolian nuff said
Scorpion_X;-;Great Game! Can't wait for Beyond Earth.
Lebron Druce;-;Civilization V is a turn based strategy game in which you control a single civilization, competing against other civilizations to win the game. These civilizations are controlled by either the AI or a human player. To win the game you need to acheive one of 4 victorys, Domination victory, Culture victory, Science victory or a Score victory. This game has endless replayability which will keep you hooked for many, many hours in which you will never get bored. Singleplayer is exellent, multiplayer is flawless and the game gets even better with the expansion packs ! Also lots of support from the steam workshop. To sum it up Civilization V is a amazing game is by far the best game I own and I would reccomend it to anyone. It is definatly worth the money even the expansion packs (would reccomend buying gold edition). rating: 10/10
peptoshotz;-;The original Civ 5 was... okay. The first expansion was a nice improvement, but nothing special. The second expansion (Brave New World) blew my mind. This is now, in my opinion, the best Civilization game ever released. There's extremely satisfying depth and variety (lacking when the game was first released) without the need to micromanage every minute detail as in previous versions. The premade scenarios are varied, challenging, and enjoyable. There are also hundreds of (often obscure) achievements to obtain from all facets of the game. If you enjoy turn based strategy games (or think you might) there's literally hundreds of hours of enjoyment to be found here. One of my favorite games ever.
GizmoEra;-;While this game has extreme depth, tons of replayability, endless entertainment, strong rewards for strategy... I can't help myself from building nukes and destroying the most passive country on the map. Every game.
stopkillingrory;-;My computer is incapable of running this game, so I have to steal my friends' computers any time I want to play it. It is so very much worth it. Prepare to give your life over to it.
Tim Farron, MP;-;Brilliant strategy game. Surprisingly fun and startlingly addictive.
Firez;-;Great strategy game, family friendly and if you have a bunch of friends, go get Civ 5 and join a game together. The multiplayer is the most enjoyable I've experianced in a while, with the exception of a few games. The single player, still amazingly enjoyable, lots of detail, different ways and a whole load of reasons to buy this game.
Tonybam7;-;I liked the part where I reenacted the bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki. 7/10 Admiral Snackbar.
SlanderDoom;-;An awesome stratagy game, for anyone, even if you are bad at stratagy. Tons of civilization to play, for hours of fun. Diplomacy is critical, and can determine the outcome of the game. Multiplayer is hard to do sometimes, when people disconnect, etc. Lots of features are for skilled users, like the City menu screen, where you can control everything the city does.
Steeler;-;This game is great if you love strategy & if you love to back stab your allies, enemies, and aspecialy friends:)
The Red Conquerer;-;I LOVE THIS GAME! This is the best game to pick up if your new to the Civilization Series
King Daniel II;-;Great game if you are prepared to put the time and effort in!
Not Shrew;-;Civ 5 is my life now 10/10 swag yolo 420-
Tom Clancy's twin cousin;-;Can't say this is my favorite franchise of strategy game (I'm more of a Total War man myself), but Civ V is a triumph of its kind. The game features a superb soundtrack, beautiful visuals, responsive menus, intuitive pop-ups, and eternal replayability. It may not be the best game for "me," but it is definitely worth investigating to discover if it's the best game for "you." :-) You will not do wrong in purchasing this title. I guarantee you that.
Trawets;-;Great game in a long chain of great games. Looking forward to Alpha Centauri 2
Tee3XD;-;Proves that Ghandi isn't so peaceful...
TheD3rp;-;Bismarck is worse than Gandhi, don't trust him or he will "Redefine your friendship".
RedBoy262;-;it is good, but on mac it really needs mod support. aspyer, please put your act together, otherwise it is a great game
LM-TRANS Oliwier EB [NTA Transl];-;What a game, hugely reccomended to people who are interested in historical games, for me its like the Total War Series but you can start from the beginning, and that's what I enjoy, manipulating technology! But warning Gandhi.
Kasouken;-;I may be slightly addicted. So much to do! Love how in depth this game is. I am engrossed from the moment I load a game :)
photoguy229;-;This game can either build friendships or tear them apart.
Don't Look At Me;-;I played this game for a little while and i loved it. There is a lot of strategic gameplay and several different ways to win and many foes to face on your adventures.
Archen;-;Great game
awesomeofawesome;-;MOST REALISTIC GAME EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! YOU CAN BUILD THE TAJ MAHAL IN USA PRESIDENT WASHINGTON IS BORN IN 4000 B.C. AND LIVES FOREVER ( NO BARACK OBAMA FOR PRESIDENT IN 2009) GERMANY CAN BE IN BRAZIL GHANDI CAN NUKE YOU 9000/10 MRGOTY 2010 (MOS REALSITIC GAME OF THE YEAR) seriously though this game is still pretty cool i recomend it. Buy it at walmart or wherever because its cheaper then buying it on steam
o0rumplestiltskin0o;-;I love this game. I love history and it lets me change history. It's great! :)
Hitlers BFF;-;this game has very fun single player that i have spent hours on my only complaint is the fact the multiplayer is very weak
Vengentz;-;It took a while to get used to after Civilization 4. Once you get used to the changes. It really is the best one yet !!
Neil;-;I played and loved Civilizations III and IV...but for some reasons, I prefer V better. Get it now!
Eggplant;-;Would recommend if you have 30+ hours for one game and like taking  at the top of a desert hill in Mumbai 3/10 (Draw in the left side so it's an 8.)
doerk73;-;Absolute favorite for a long time. In spent over 1200 hours for this one. Every game plays different; very challenging on higher levels.
PVA Glue;-;I slaughtered every one of my enemies through the medium of Culture as a family man Gengis Khan 11/10
Bilbo Stabbins (Otaku Gamerspy);-;10/10 Long Live Bismarck!
A demigod called Jesus;-;one of the best games that i've ever played, addictive as hell and never gets old even when you play in the same conditions everything seems new
Crescendo;-;Great Game but you need the DLC
evangutter;-;Takes a playthrough or two to pick up, but definitely worth it. Very time-consuming, but fun if you get the hang of it. Highly recommend if you have plenty of time to kill.
[PG] OthosTheRavager;-;It's an amazing game! If you're looking for a good long turn based strategy, play this game!
Bucko;-;I swear to god I've only played it for about 15 minutes, but it claims I've racked up about 30 hours. The game lies, obviously, but its lies are sweet. Like the finest honey. I recommend this game; although it's terrible for your sleep pattern, social life, and your ability to hold down a job, you'll soon come to realise the higher truth. Which is that you don't care about any of those things- all you care about is getting revenge on that treacherous dog who declared war on you and building more giant death robots.
OpTiC_DoGe;-;69/10 would get killed by Ghandi again
Wayne;-;Bloody amazing, just buy it already!
Dr. Element;-;It's an exhausting game to play, but once you have the BNW expansion, it's also one of the best strategy games you'll get your hands on. **Edit:** I have now played the game long enough to know what all my quirks with the game is. I still believe it's a really good game. For a future Civ game, i'd LOVE to see a pitboss mode that allows you to use a shared steamcloud save, and gave steam notifications when it is your turn, rather than having a dedicated server running hosting the game 24/7 while it is played (which could be months potentially). A pitboss mode like this would be even more attractive if a future civ game was focused more around optimization and lightweight-ness than pretty polygons. The perfect civ would be an epic game spanding several months, where it'd take you 20 seconds to sign in, take a turn, and leave the game again.
Mr. T. W. Walrus;-;A game that makes me feel great. Creating the single most authoritarian superior Atheist society on the planet, while I send my Crusade of Euphoric Intelligence across the planet in a stream of blood, tears, and nukes. All in the name of Chairman Walrus. ALL HAIL THE HAIL THE MASTER OF EUPHORIA 7/10 It was okay
Sibeko;-;Get the ing game!
Kolonel Shlomp;-;the game is realy cool. it's need to have a long time to play but it realy fun for strategy lovers and history lovers. goes well with the bnw expension and the g&k.
Mobius One;-;One more turn.
-=BG=- MaGiSkA JeJe;-;very game good "Sid Meier Civilation" influence great aspect life bring nice innovation much like thoren school. such is game. 9.4/10 - IGN
Phantom-Rex7;-;Great game to have. You can spend hours upon hours just playing this game.
Benno;-;The descendants of the Thumpasorus Peoples knew Funk was its own reward. They tried to remain true to the pure, uncut Funk. But it became impossible in a world wood by power and greed. So they locked away the secret of Clone Funk with kings and pharoahs deep in the Egyptian pyramids, and fled to outer speace to party on the Mothership and await the time they could safely return to refunkatize the planet
Mason [BDZ];-;CERTAINLY ONE THE BEST STRATEGY GAMES CREATED..... THIS MANY YEARS IN THE INDUSTRY, THE CIVILIZATION SERIES HAVE ALL BEEN TOP NOTCH GAMES FOR ANY STRATEGIST AND THINKER...... THE EXPANSION OF THE MICRO MANAGEMENT OF CITIES AND CIVILIZATIONS, SUCH AS CULTURE, SCIENCE, HAPPINESS AND THE LIKE ALL ADD MORE DEPTH TO AN ALL READY ROCK STEADY FRANCHISE. TIP OF THE HAT TO THOSE WHO KEPT THE SERIES ALIVE AND INNOVATIVE
Verranicus;-;This game kicks . Good luck getting people to play it with you for any length of time, though.
magicoupons;-;"One... more... turn..." the wiseman said at 5am...
<<HSALF;-;Bid farewell to the soon to become obselete phrase: "I'm bored".
Angelic Kiwi;-;I love it. I love it. I love it. Thank you for making this game. 10/10 makes me wanna go out and command people to move a tile forward
ThrillingHeroics;-;Played for 8 hours aiming for a diplomatic victory only to have gandhi nuke my capital...12/10 would buy again
WickedWolf;-;Great visuals and fun game. Not as difficult to understand as predecessors but still lots of fun.
The Bacon Bard;-;I'm a long time lover of strategy games, but I'm new to the Civ franchise. I picked up the complete edition so my first experience was the whole package at once. The game was easy to pick up, and aesthetically pleasing. From the opening cut scene I felt I was watching a documentary. It does a great job of making the history of humanity feel more epic. I was staggered by the number and variety of civilizations to pick and use. Recently I moved up in difficulty to the level which the general public would consider "normal" (the in game definition of normal is rather easy in favor of the human players). I find a great challenge and really enjoy building a narrative out of every random mission. The modding world is amazing! From convenience mods to full conversion mods and everything in between, there is something for everybody. If you find yourself burning out and wishing for a little spark to keep you interested of months of playing: definitely check out the workshop content. Flaws? Well, once you are learned in the game the difficulty needs to be ramped up quite a bit just to give the AI a chance. And harder AI difficulty doesn't make them "smarter", it just gives them an early lead. So a high level game is more of an uphill battle rather than a game against a more ruthless opponent. I recommend this game, and to get the complete package as the expansions to contribute to the whole experience. I am happy I finally began enjoying the franchise.
Sir Puzzled;-;Fun in depth game. If you dont like turned based games then this isnt for you. The DLCs expand the game alot and add alot more to it. You will learn to hate the world congress if you do not own it. And no matter what you do on the higher dificulties like imortal and diety, you will struggle. But you will go out with a bang. Or you play lower level and are equal to everyone. Or basic and destroy everyone
Leonardo;-;Damn it Rivalz civilization! When I snap you are going to be the first to go!
Logic;-;Great game, one of my favourite Strategy games of all time. I highly suggest playing this game with the DLCs as the vanilla Civ 5 is not as fun as compared to it with all/most of the DLCs. Perfect for all lengths of play. You can win through various ways such as complete Domination over everyone. I wouldn't suggest buying it at its full price, although the game does go on sale often so just wait for it go on sale and snag the DLCs along with it. You'll soon see yourself spending hours on this game.
doctor jalapeno;-;Mongolians. Enough said.
GuessWhat;-;This game is GOOD I mean like GOOD good. 19/giraffe.
Josh;-;One, if not my favorate games of all time. Highly entertaining statagy game that is fun to play with friends. Just wish there were less bugs D;
Vulpes;-;WOAHHHHH WTF YOU CAN PLAY AS A LEADER IN HISTORY THAT IS THE COOLEST THING EVER SERIOUSLY LIKE WOAWAWHWAHAHAWHAHWAHW BE GEORGE "THE REALEST" WASHINGTON OR CHEIF SHOESHINE, LEADER OF THE PANINI TRIBE AND
Spartop;-;Just play it. No words can describe this game. Just. Play. It.
bapenguin;-;If you've never played a Civilization game before, the fifth iteration is a good place to start. A "game" of Civlization is similar to a board game. There's no campaign or overarching story. You simply have one goal and that's to "win" a match. To do this you have many options that involve brute force, economical strategy, scientific advancement or some of the newer methods like influence and trade. The game is one that's easy to get lost in, before you know it, time has simply vanished. To me, that marks a good game.
Padawanimous;-;This is just one of the most awesome games, can't wait to the next one
The Average Overlord;-;This game has and always will hold a special place in my heart and steam collection. It is one of the best games I have ever played and it is such a major time hole that you may start the game and never return to reality.
Septimus;-;I started this map, right, and it was me (as Mongolia), and Siam, and Japan. Japan declared war on me in... oh, must have been 1000 BC, or thereabouts (unprovoked, by the way). Siam joined forced with them, and they started to bully me. I pushed them back, and fought with Siam, which was nearest, for around 2000 years before I finally conquered them. Japan was still at war with me that whole time, too, although their attacks were infrequent and kind of pathetic. But when I took Siam down, oh NO, they weren't gonna give in. 1000 years of bloodshed later I discovered nukes and wiped them off the face of the earth. Which in hindsight might be considered insensitive, but, hey, they started it. And so ended the THREE THOUSAND YEAR WAR. 10/10 would take over the world again Seriously though, what the hell was with that?
PEREZ;-;great game, addictive, whatever all the other reviews say is true... at least for someone like me. my friends get bored with it easily, but this is my perfect kind of game. i played it non stop for a week the first time i discovered it. i was so eager to unveil everything about the game, like the technologies, units, how cities work... everything. i was like a little kid learning about the world for the first time. i just wish i could find a multiplayer game that wouldn't end after 30 minutes.
Adolf Critler;-;AMAZING game! a must have for almost anyone
Thedarkarmadillo;-;Love it! lost waaaaay to many hours to this addicting game
Laplace;-;Want to make history? Want to have your own empire? Need to be worshiped like a god? Need to nuke someone today? Play this game and all your wishes will come true. Express your inner king, whip those lazy peasants, rule the world! Beautiful game with amazing game mechanics, now even better with the 2 expansions, makes you want to play all day long.
Zomgrofl;-;My friend took Newyork from me so I couldnt have the fountin of youth, decided he didn't want the fountin so he razed the city and demanded 2 gold and 1 horse for a peace between our nations. 10/10 would lose again.
InfiNit_;-;10/10 would nuke civs three eras behind in technology again!
Ladiyus;-;This game can become very addicting.
tbrown5;-;The coolest thing about this game that sets it apart from other games like it is that you can take a civilization in any circumstance while you are playing, compare it to real world history, and get a parallel, which connects Civilization 5 to the real world. History geeks like myself might enjoy such a feature, whether intended by the makers or not, but that is certainly not the only aspect that makes this game golden. I can't even tell you how many times i have been awake at 3:00 in the morning playing this game, realizing that i have elapsed about 8 hours straight playing Civ 5. This is THAT kind of game. The music, the interactive leaders and the strategies you must devise to advance your own regime immerse you fully into the game. Once you are immersed, good luck continuing any obligations you have in your real world life. Besides the absolutely wonderfully fun gameplay, there is a potentially infinite replay value. The different circumstances you can be put in are endless, not to mention different rulers with different special abilities as well as 5 different ways to win. Everytime i come back to Civ 5 after a period of playing a shiny new game, i always get the same feeling i got when i first bought it; the feeling of playing an outright fantastic game. The replay value magnifies the quality of Civ 5 tremendously and makes it a must-have. 10/10
Basoom;-;Started playing at 10:00 PM. Played for one hour. Watch said 4:00 AM. 10/10.
jiggaman51;-;Title says it all.
Litizia;-;The rarest achievement? THIS: "Invincible. In the middle of the game just stop and go to sleep because you ought to."
Ghost;-;Good game but not quite complete without DLC. Overall an amicable continuation of an amazing PC game series.
Aseldi;-;A hugely immersive game with endless replayability. I can't say much for the single player as I've barely touched it, but as a multiplayer game, if you have a solid 12 hours to spend with a few friends it's a truly incredible experience of bonds formed and broken within the space of a mouse click. Though plagued with a few problems, such as games larger than small running very slowly to begin with, and annoying restarts, it still lends itself to being one of the deepest, exciting and tactical games I've ever played. The DLC massively adds to it too.
FrostFire;-;A fascinating game with a fantastic gameplay. A strategic and very beautiful game filled with different Empires and Civilizations. As I say to my friends "It's like chess but more advanced!" and that is what it is, as nobody makes peace with the person you are playing chess with for money etc. It's also amazing due to all the mods that're VERY easy to download to the game, that's where I usually find realistic mods, like true start locations for real world, global warming etc. and then I play as Denmark and go full Viking all around the World! It's an amazing game that one can use too many hours on.
Siberos;-;Was my first game in the Civilization Series will be looking forward to future installments.
S_R;-;100 Hours yet Only played few civs its never ending fun also always nuke ghandi
JARJAR;-;Really, really good game!! Worth every dollar!
Tyrantis1991;-;It's a great game. Takes forever and a day to finish a game even though you can save at points. the maps are huge and strategical planning is vital. Its very entertaining. Fun with friends if you plan to have a couple days to play it.
Devilhamster | PawzZi;-;Quite a chill relaxing game which takes alot of thought to it quite fun trying to alter history like having the Pentagon in Russia or having "The Great Pyramids Of England"
Hitlersaurus Christ;-;played 11 hours from 4 p.m. to 3 a.m. and then woke up hen next morning and played it till around 2 p.m. so I guess you could say that it is an okay game...
Pancakesls;-;This game is really fun and really historical. It was voted both the Game of the Year and Strategy Game of the Year by gamespy in 2010. In a nutshell, this is the best strategy and historical game ever. I would recommend that you play this game.
Clayman897;-;Really good game! Keep up the good work
L'Kapetron Dookmarriot;-;Best turn by turn based game ever.
benny breadKapp;-;I am more of a multiplayer kinda guy, with that said i fould this game very entertaining and fun with freinds. there are a few bugs with the base game though. such as when you send a trade offer to another human player, they cam modify the trade in their favor.still very fun with trustworthy freinds ; )
A-No. 1;-;Never trust Gandhi, that  has nuked me way too many times.
Hipster Hippo;-;Played it for days, never gets old.
Razlance;-;This is probably one of my favorite games of all time. "Just one more turn" you will be saying that until the late hours of the night. So complex but easy to pick up and learn, each game you will get better and better. And there are so many ways to win. So many different strategies to try, you could do something traditional with your favorite civilization or do something unorthodox with them: either way you can win if you stay with your plan and dynamically keep your rivals in check. I recommend slowly increasing the difficulty while slowly increasing more civs to compete with. Try random maps and add in raging barbarians to make it more chaotic at first. I would argue that this is perhaps the best turned based strategy game of all time.
Charlie;-;Hello everyone, i'm gonna try to be fair on this one. The game is good. Not marvelous, but good, it can keep you entertained for many hours. It has flaws though: the IA is utterly stupid, which is quite ridiculous because the time it need to process its turns isnt exactly short, even on the most powerful PCs (it gets worse as the game advances, and gets even slower with more civs). In comparison with the previous games in the series, this one is more simplistic, in both good and bad ways. I think the combat is better, but the game lacks complexity in other aspects. In the end it's only a matter of taste I suppose. The real problem is the multiplayer. Its poorly implemented in so many ways i'd need a much longer text to describe them. The worst of them is that DLC crap though. TL DR; not a bad game by any means, but would only recommend it to people not interested in playing it online .
Kharzak;-;Just one more turn.......
N0_GRIEF |4F|;-;Kind of slow to get into but once you start a game with a few friends, it's very hard to get out of XD i highly recommend this game!
The Derpasaurus;-;An excellent strategy series got even better with V's hex based maps that allow for some fun military tactics. This is the best civilization yet, as you no longer have to put together unrealistic stacks of doom all on one tile to take an enemy city. There is no one right way to play the game and after almost 500 hours I still find ways to sequence differently and change my playstyle. You can be an aggressive military powerhouse, a prosperous economic nation, a cultured nation, or even a religious one. With many routes to victory, you won't get tired of doing the same thing over and over. The base game has lots of unique leader bonuses, unique civilization units and buildings to explore, and the expansions add even more. I'd strongly recommend getting both expansions to the game as they add so much that is indispensible to the main experience. It's a game that you'll lose track of time, and 1 am will suddenly become 3 am when you promised yourself to quit after one more turn twenty turns ago.
Dr. Pubert;-;An extremly addictive game.
BillyWilson;-;My favourite game of this genre, I can play for hours on end and when I'm finished with one game I can jump straight into another without getting bored. The gameplay is amazing and your experience can differ every time based on the civilization you choose and the ending you try to achieve. Civilization V - 8/10
Bubs Folks;-;I love this game
nwndarkness;-;Just one more turn... This game is near perfection for the RTS genre.
Lone_Eagle21;-;Great for those who can stay focused for the long haul
Gresmandoodle;-;Civilization V is one of the best turn-based strategy games I've ever had the pleasure of playing. Whether teaming up with my friends for some multiplayer, or simply losing a whole night of sleep to the game's endlessly replayable single player, this is one game that any strategy enthusiast should play.
Shawn;-;Many hours spent on this great game
Devlin2004;-;very good game that i recomend for gamers it is a game about history
MaslovRG;-;This game is one of the coolest strategies.
Nikostallvic;-;Ghandi is a  in this game.
[PCMR] SpartanSK117;-;Fantastic fun, you could spend hours playing it. Inituive gameplay and tutorials to help you get started. The addition of famouse historical leaders also enhance the fun. At the moment I'm trying to recreate the great British Empire! I highly reccommend !
Raging_Blades;-;Pretty good game, and the DLC'S are a must in my opinion. It got a little boring, but I kept getting back into it, lots of things to do, and different ways to play. Especially fun with friends!
Mighty_Tank_Engine;-;A super intense enjoyable strategy game. Don't even think for a second just buy this game immediatley!!!
Aztec;-;best game I ever played, I used most hours playing this than any other.
malicc08;-;Its all about the pawns!
[C++]Just a programmer;-;This game should be rated 18+, it is way too addictive. 10/10
snowdawn;-;Civilizaion V is probably one of the best TBS game I ever played. The addition of Gods and Kings and Brave New World makes the game better and adds many features. Civilization V is a 10 out of 10.
Stewie;-;Really nice game, could play for hours. Graphics are nice, learn a bit of sketchy history while you play. Has a multiplayer version which is great but after playing for a couple hours the games sometimes break and go out of sync and start crashing.
moose group;-;Hi, my name is raisin and I'm addicted to Civ V.
Biased Milk Hotel;-;I was the leader of a peaceful, prosperous empire. We had a small military dedicated to only fighting off barbarians and we tried to stay on good terms with all, helping those who needed help with a small piece of our treasuries. Then one day our Egyptian allies declared war on us. We fought bravely and despite heavy losses we managed to fend them off.Meanwhile, our American neighbors were growing more and more dangerous. Rumors were circulating that George Washington was planning to "introduce democracy" to our vast supply of natural resources and building a city in the middle of one of our main roads. War was inevitable, and we sent an artist to "culture bomb" the border with them alongside our greatest soldiers. The Americans immediately responded, sending in soldiers armed with advanced weapons that my science advisor calls "firearms". My men fought bravely and managed to raze the troublesome city, but they were no match for the minutemen. They destroyed our greatest armies and layed siege to our capital Moscow. Then the egyptians declared war...again. This is when we realized that the Egyptians were an obvious threat to world peace. Attacking allies? What ever happened to declarations of friendship? This time the Egyptians were prepared and they cut through our defenses like a knife through butter, seizing one of our colonies. We requested assistance from another close ally, the English. All we got was a letter saying "No. Absolutely not". The egyptians were unstoppable, taking all of our colonies until reaching the ocean. The concept of having to send an army by sea was incomprehensible to Egyptians, and they stopped. (never officially making a peace treaty. I write this because I fear my days as the leader of the Russian Empire are numbered. My men have managed to fight off the Americans so far, but for every minutemen squad we kill 5 take its place Our "allies" have refused to help us despite all we have done for them in the past. We have attempted to conduct diplomacy with Washington but he refuses to make peace. My people grow restless. If the Americans don't overthrow me they will.
Benny Lava;-;Yup, lost many hours with this game! Will be losing many more, too.
hallben19998;-;Great game highly recomend it. Be aware that you will be adicted
Grape me Silly;-;This game is the .
Dusk;-;Worth buying at any price!
Herrow_;-;"RECOMMEND" 'Don't critisize until you've played it' Good overhead strategy game which involves planning and thinking ahead of the game. Graphics are fairly good for a game of this genre. There are a few bugs (mainly on multiplayer) none too noticable.. I can't go in full depth personally since I don't have a great amount of hours playing. Have Fun.
Hymen Buster;-;I would definitely recommend this game to anyone who is interested in history and/or wants to learn about historical figures and events. This game allows the player decide the politics of the world you are in and that is why it is one of Steam's best selling games.
Gros Shadok;-;My favorite game of all times. Is it really necessary to explain why ? If you like 4X game, this is THE reference, often copied but never (at least not yet) beaten.
Pink Horror;-;In the end, I got enough enjoyment out of this game to recommend it, though it still feels off and game-y - it really punishes you for doing things the wrong way, and I never really feel like I can attack anybody until civilizations have guns, when most of the appeal for me is playing as ancient empires like the Romans. But anyway, it's still worth playing.
Fire is Cool;-;A good improvement to the Civilization series. Streamlines the gameplay while still requiring good strategic thinking. Very easy to lose a lot of hours in this game.
manic mike;-;This game is good!
Meester.Roar(AWAY FOR 6 WEEKS);-;guys dont get this game is you have a life because this game will ruin it.
Fluffy;-;This is a great game.
Red;-;Great strategy game, looking forward to the next one in the series.
Phystherapist;-;Luv this game so much recomend to anyone if you love any type of stategy even if you arent into turn based it is soooooo adicting. definitly get the complete edition definitely worth it. you could hate video games and fall in love with Civ V
McGonigal;-;Easily one of the best games i've ever played. I Played this game on single player for days without getting bored and could play it almost endlessly with friends on multiplayer.
Turnip;-;Amazing game, gameplay time lasts for 100 of hours and the game improves greatly with the expansion packs G&K and BNW so you can replay again and again and again.....and again.
Kuro (Nexx);-;Rather honestly, this is my favorite game to play. Both with and without online players, I love to play. The freedom to do what you wish and the repurcussions of those actions just make the game that much better. Plus it's not like the third game where you could practically pump out anything you needed, but the computers could always pump out more troops to you no matter what.
Xten;-;This is one of the best games i have ever played!!!
Joe;-;Civ is that game you play with friends, play alone, anything at all. It's fun, you like it, you buy the DLC. You then find a new Civ that you like, great. But then you play a game, theres something special about it and you can't quite tell what is so awesome about it. It consumes you for a few days, it'a all you can think about, all you want to do. Then you win/lose and you feel as if you lost a part of yourself. Because Ghandi is a .
Dr. Clueless;-;Just. One. More. Round.
reffreff;-;great game
Cpl Bloggins;-;The kind of game you can spend hours and hours on and not get bored.
jacksian3000;-;It's hard to explain in words what really makes the Civ series so special, maybe it's the easy to learn complexity, maybe it's the charming visuals, or maybe it's the huge array of Civs, units, and techs, but Civ V is no exception, buy it
Calishio;-;The best game there ever was, Congradulations
L B R S;-;I highly recommend this game if you really like to kill time, literally. Just so you know, this is a real time strategy, similar with Age of Empires, but this one is in turn-based system which I think have made this game much interesting to play. And the AI is hard enough to beat if you didn't set up your strategy well. The best thing that makes this game one of my favorites is Civilization V is not all about war, war and war. You can try nuke, nuke and nuke for fun. (note: this is "a game" which could kill your real life.)
hater26;-;love the game a little bit hard to get use to but its bottyful
dragonoide40;-;This game is insanely awesome. Sid Meier's is an inspiration to the gaming world. i have never said anything bad about his work and i never will!
Psychotic Bitch;-;The game does have it's ups and downs, like how the AI cheats and somehow gets way ahead really early on, but in general the game is a great game.
Brink;-;If you hate seeing the outside of your room and want Ghandi to ing kill your  with nukes and tanks this is the game for you
Darth Akira;-;makes my nipples hard! true story
Strawberries;-;Everyone spells "Gandhi" wrong. 5 stars
Jub Jub;-;I lost friends to this game
Hiesenberg;-;I love this game so much that I want to have sex with it!!!
Millions of Peaches;-;This game has no relation to history, besides the playable societies in it. That being said, building the Great Wall of Mongolia is hilarious.
noblesix31;-;First time playing. Persia doesn't like where I settle city. I got bored and killed him off. 10/10 would play again.
Innocent8ystander;-;it is a game that you will waste das on for no real reason. it is great
Geith Kan;-;It's fun to play.period
TheZapDude;-;9,5/10 nukes and battleships screw everybody
RonynCato;-;If you can get your hands on this game with all expansions, by all means do it.
ervinconnor123;-;This game didn't look good at first but after I played for about 30 minutes I was hooked. The amount of different decisions you can make and the fact the game outcome can change with just one decision make this game a very fun one to play.
Millennium;-;Its alright.
Jason McCloud;-;One More Turn.......
Levitate;-;Very nice, especially the quotes!
parallelLynx;-;Most addictive game that I've come across in a while. Each time you play it, you're playing a different game. 10/10
MasterDave;-;This game is emaculate in my opinion, par the ocassional issue with playing with people across the pond... Whether you enjoy smashing the AI or making alliances and betraying your friends.. this game is one of the best strategy games out there for it.
The Zombie Christ.j2;-;Amazingly fun and addictive. Splurge yourself and get Brave New World. It's seriously the best.
Cloud88;-;Very fun and easy to get into stragety game. The only story to speak of is your own. Civ is know for being addictive and having that one more turn moments in gaming and CIV 5 is no different. If you get into a really good game it cane have those moments, but a boring game not so much in my opinion. Managing you nation and interacting with the other nations is the thing i enjoy most about Civ 5. Choosing to eather have peace or got to war with the other nations is what give this game the one more turn moment. The A.I. can also be challanging at times but can be kinda dumb on lower difficultys lucklly this game is easy for new- commers and can be hard for veterans. I'll be honest I suck at Civ before i played Civ 5, now i understand the mechanics that to the advisor systems and also help for some friends, and that the biggest reason to get Civ 5, Multiplayer. Get some of you friends into this game and some fights are aruments are bound to break out along with some great fun moments of working together to solve other issues that you nations are having. My biggest complanit with this game is how old it gets. After about 10 or so games, you have a set stragety for sucess and I find myself doing the same thing over and over agian which can get borning. Also if your with friends expect to wait what can seem like forever for them to finsih there turns and hear them complain about you when your take too long with your turns. Biggest issue is the bugs that can be annoying expetictly when online but there not game breaking. Get this and a couple of friend any you will have some funs times. Like I said, I found it to be repeative at times but still very addicting and fun. 9/10
Samurai Walrus;-;If you want to create a nuclear wasteland, buy this game. If you want to have massive battles, buy this game. If you just want to watch the world burn from your safe empire, buy this game.
ElectricBlue1234;-;ONE WORD EPIC / EPIC WITH MORE EPIC ( i named i city EPICA ) !!!!!
The Swaggy D;-;if you have no social life and hate the sun and dont want to move for days on end get this game
[HDG]Hammer;-;Civilization V is in my opinion the best 2K game published, not only is it a amazing strategy game it incorporates so many aspects which are lost in so many other games. I have to date played 789 hours on this game and whilst I have not played in a while that is purely due to scaling down my gaming time. I cannot recommend this enough, I mean who doesn't want to nuke some random civ whilst they are in medieval era and your in future era?? It's fantastic in every way. Pros: AI is awesome (few if any glitches) Steam workshop Wide variety of civilizations Many different maps Not focused solely on combat AND EVERYTHING ELSE ABOUT THE GAME Except: You aren't playing it right now like you should be! 10/10
rathy;-;i love this game buy it and fall in love with the power and control
blackendermen;-;Amazing game! Good graphics, amazing gameplay and a great time killer! Must buy!
krogandhi;-;all-time classic. each installation in the series has been a welcome change and re-balance to the consistently addictive gameplay.
wjkdarbyshire;-;Just the best
Jack;-;Great game! Has to be one of my favourite games of all time but I suppose that's obvious from the ridiculous play time. The two most recent DLCs; Gods & Kings and Brave New World are a must have, the extra gameplay they implement is incredible.
Yolgie;-;Just ... One .... More .... Turn ...
Canter;-;Absolutely worth the money ! Make sure to get all the expansions though, they improve the game in so many ways.
TheDeathanimator;-;Yes... please buy this game... CONQUER THE WORLD!!! It seriously is a TON of fun to paly if you enjoy strategizing and planning out your attack. And also being able to see your army grow and crush everything.
Shoemaker;-;It's Saturday and I decided to take a quick jont building up a civilization across Europe. Just scouting around, looking to dominate the continent and all. So there I am, laying seige to Warsaw, and some broad named "Attila" starts texting me. "Hey, want to route Russia with me guy? C'mon, it'll be fun." I just ignored it because I was already busy with this other gal. I figured if I didn't respond, she'll see me out near Vienna and take the hint. Fast forward a few hundred years, and it's deja vu. I'm bringing the thunder to Paris, and AGAIN Attila won't stop blowing up my pocket with "I hear Egypt looks awesome on fire" and "what I wouldn't give to pillage Venice with you." I had enough when she decided she wanted to move some of her stuff into an embassy near my place. "Nope nope nope," I said. I cut all ties, ended all of the trade routes and got my friends to stop talking to her too. "Finally," I thought out loud, "I can be done with this dramatic nonesense and really plow Madrid's v-hole." Turns out Attila is actually a dude, and doesn't take rejection well at all.
Dubayoo;-;Civ 5 - the only game when you can play as Socialist Realist Russians against your stubborn Muslim neighbors who won't open borders because they hate buying your blue jeans, so you tell them to "tear down this wall" by declaring war, sending Hero of the People rock stars on tour, spreading your ideology, and influencing them with a cultural revolution to win without ever firing a shot. 10/10 - would civilize again... except it goes up to 11. http://civilization.wikia.com/wiki/Ideology_%28Civ5%29#Order http://civilization.wikia.com/wiki/Religion_%28Civ5%29 http://civilization.wikia.com/wiki/Great_people_%28Civ5%29 http://civilization.wikia.com/wiki/Diplomacy_%28Civ5%29 http://civilization.wikia.com/wiki/Tourism_(Civ5) http://civilization.wikia.com/wiki/Cultural_victory_%28Civ5%29
DiarrheaMonsteR;-;Bought it about a week ago,can't stop playing.BTW,damn u Ghandi!
gabe2014;-;To be honest, this is one of my all-time favorite games. Many mechanics are different than Civ 4, so do your research first. In my opinion, they are all for the better. For example, cities can actually attack units. Furthermore, you can no longer stack units. Civ V now uses hexes for movement instead of squares. Both of the expansions change the game in several ways. Gods and Kings adds religion and the ever-so-fun espionage. Brave New World adds "ideologies" (which can become powerful enough that you can convert cities to your empire), revamped-diplomacy, revamped trade, and encourages working with other civs (not that you have to). The base game itself is fantastic, and each add-on only makes it better.
Comicmischief;-;You need to understand that when I "recommend" this game, I do it as one "recommends" heroin. Don't let the hours logged fool you, I have another 150 offline at the bare minimum. This is one of those games where you don't stop playing once you've started, the turns are so deliberate, one miscalculation can cost you anything in this tense, albeit slow-paced game. This game can ruin your life if you let it, but it fills that gaping hole in your heart that the death of board games like Risk has left.
kala captain;-;An undeniably good game. Best thirty bucks I ever spent! Historical reality coupled with endless map scenerios, complex and varying AI, and remarkable strategy for the playor in both military and domestic and foreighn play makes this game headline right into my favorites category.
ThatCompany24;-;It is probably one of my favorite games EVER!!! So, with the mods, I can just about do anything with this. This game is super fun, eventhough i play on the easy mode. I love the game b/c of the wonders. I'm a wonder-freak, so this game provides it. The graphics and game-style make it to the point that it isnt the regular boring turn-based game. This game ROCKS!!! 9.99/10
ImmortalPenguin117;-;Built the Great Wall of Mongolia, the Eiffel Tower of New York, nuked Chicago, and went from being besties with Bismarck to wanting his head on a plaque hanging on my wall... All in one game. Oh, and all that scientific research being done on the possibility of time travel? Just play this game, you'll jump forward pretty quick. 10/10 would nuke Chicago again
Franke du Fiesk meg;-;I once injected 2 marijuans and this is more addictive than that
Desert Stargazer;-;A great strategy turn based game, and a personal favorite of all time without a rival. I have spent more hours on this game than any other. I recommend Civilization V to anyone who is interested in strategy games. Crafted in an educational beautiful theme, the game can serves as the ultimate chess-like strategy experience of this generation.
cblount98;-;You can get nuked by Gandhi 10/10
Halinic;-;Wasted my life Blame Khan 10/10
-=[]=-|Twistedforest|;-;This game.... just wow AMAZING!
Jo;-;Best stratagy game ever! plays really well and great with friends
Tramper15;-;I love this game. Have spent way to many hours falling into a land of I'm the queen and you all have to bow before me.
pbuttercup;-;My all time favorite strategy game. I'm a FPS and Strategy person. The additions that Brave New World provides are worth the small bit of cash it takes.
purpleandgold419;-;Civ V is the only game where your friend's civilization can have nuclear weapons, while your civilization has just learned the great enlightment that is manure. 5/5 Stars
Shegwa;-;1 71Ke 1t 15 Th3 Bes1
Ael;-;Civ 5 will teach you that the world is not fair at all.
TheDramaticBuck;-;Even though I'm a begginer. This game makes people smarty-smart. Awesomeness and addiction to the max. 'Nuff Said.
Mr. Shire;-;Played as Hiawatha of the Iriquois and killed Queen Elizabeth with Nuclear-powered robots. 10/10
bigfootv519;-;Get ready to loose all other goals in life. This game is surpsisingly addicting. Its a pretty easy to get the hang of too.
Trozz;-;Its Civ what do you expect
Muju;-;Great Game
jcf981;-;Best game ever ! I could ruin my life with it.
[CQC MLP]Nuclearkatana;-;This game is so addicting, it's definatly worth it.
KissMyAxe;-;Love the game, can sit down and play for hours without realizing.
Dave Grohl (Alex);-;Civilization V is a great game. Buy it as soon as you can, you will love it!!
Connie's Massive Sword;-;You get to nuke the French 11/10
The Flying Ham;-;I only played 1 match, why is it dark already?
friday6;-;World History: Ultimate fan fiction edition. "Those damned yanks," snarled Ghandi. The world congress had recently met in the United States and had voted to ban gold as an immoral resource. India's trade completely revolved around trading gold with other nations, but since its ban, trade was prohibited. "The caste system will collapse, my people will starve and we will go bankrupt. There's only one thing left to do. I'll show those communist American's the consequences of interfering with the Indians." Suddenly, Ghandi's secretary walked in, with a hopeful expression upon her face. "Lord Ghandi, I have great news! I bring good tidings from Macedonia! President Alexander the Great has agreed to our proposal! He wants time to mobilize his forces, but he has agreed to join us in the war!" A devious grin appeared on Ghandi's face. "Excellent....since a hunger strike didn't work, let's see how you deal with a nuclear strike....Premier Washington!" Ghandi pressed the red button. The secretary dropped her papers and a single tear ran down her cheek. "Mother of the flying spaghetti monster," she whispered, trembling. "What have you done?" "Justice, milady. Cold, indiscriminant justice. May His meaty goodness preserve us all," Ghandi whispered softly, as missiles filled the sky.
MICOO;-;Such an addictive game
Dan_Dizzle;-;Good old fashioned fun! Watch the time go by while playing this fantastic game!
Robotfungus;-;What can i say that has not already been said about this game. It is the best turn based strategy game ever. Having played civilization from the first release, it has certainly stood the test of time and evolved to become very enjoyable in both multiplayer and single player modes.
TheStoryBro;-;really nice :)
Milkman;-;I'd put my  in it.
Zaalah;-;Brilliant game. Best enjoyed with a group of friends, vying for power and influence while simultaneously backstabbing. I've spent hours and hours with friends on this game and would highly recommend it for a LAN party type deal.
Aaron;-;Great game, highly recommended. Spent my college life playing this .
Frodo Baggins;-;I liked the game. I didn't not like the game
FightingFerret52;-;If you like turn base strategy games, this is one of the best i ever played. I reccomend this to all Steam players
Dark Jakkaru;-;Civilization V updates the series to a hexagonal board that feels natural to play on. The rich style and artwork along with the graphical uplift provide a sense of maturity to the Civ Series. Recommended to those that like Era spanning strategy games as Civ V finds the right blend and variety to provide endless hours of strategy.
Green Heart |  | Hentainator;-;Civilization...my first Civ Game was Civilization II for the PS1 (running on PS2...:D). Back then, everything was quite good and I enjoyed every minute of it. Then my friend told me one day that Civ V is buyable for 10. I bought it because I knew Civ II. Until today I don't regret buying this game. Why? Well, you will see... But let me start from the beginning: Civilization V is a game you can't compare to other games. You have to experience it for yourself, otherwise you can't really say something against it. Basically: You choose your leader and civ,You have settlers and a warrior. You build your city, you make your civilization the strongest, meet other civs, you make war, you can make peace, you even got several types of winning this game! Beat everyone, be the most curtural civ, be the mega-scientist, and so on. Let's talk about the "others". It it clear, that Oda Nobunaga isn't like Ghandi or like Bismarck. Everyone got his own abilities and own special units/building. Japan have bushido, which makes 1 samurai strong like a whole f****** troop of samurai! After you meet the "others", the game starts getting interesting. You can declare them war, trade with them, start getting BFF or asking them if they could fight with you against someone you don't like. But watch out: Even a BFF can backstab you. (ODA NOBUNAGA, Y U DID THIS TO ME? WE WERE BEST FRIENDS!) The cities are interesting too. You got 5 (with the DLCs 6) things you have to look at: Food, production, gold, culture, believe and science. Food makes your city grow (faster), production shows how fast you recruite/build something, culture is good for social stuff, believe and science...yeah :D You can even tell your people what to focus on and which field has to be harvested! (my slogan: What is a city with much food against a city with much productivity? nothing, because the productive city makes units like a factory :D) Oh, and this games has a f****** big variation of mods. I have about 10-20 mods useing right now and it doesn't stop getting bigger (That's what she said, hahahahahahahha...haha...ha...). Anyway, you can have a custom civ or map or even changnig some things in game! It's like getting free mini-DLCs. on mass. The game even got some FUNNY bugs. They don't get on your nerves, but they make you smile or laugh. You will see it when a brigde is in your farmhouse and you start thinking how your people get across the river. Or there's a sightseeing tour thorugh your Pyramid because your Great Wall of China was built through it. Or even your houses fly on water. Like I said, pretty funny, look for them ;D Well...what else can I say? If you look at the hous I played this game, you see that I have VERY much fun with this game. Alone: VERY GOOD. With a friend: MEGA-F******-SUPER-DUPER-ULTRA-BABOONISTIC-GOOD. Are 30 worth it? yes, but try getting it cheaper. Are the DLCs worth it? Of course, they make the game much better, but really try getting them ceaper, they're a little bit too expensive. Oh, and set a timer. Once you started you can't just stop playing. I started once with my friend at 3 pm. we stopped 6 am in the morning and were fast enough to get in bed before parents got us ;D And watch Ghandi. He is the pure definition of betrayal. Seriously. If you p*** him off he will throw nukes at you. He will. Oh and how he will. I didn't experience it, but enough friends told me not to p*** him off. I saw videos. I watch out. I don't lie. I give this game a 10/10. This usually means that a game is perfect, but I can't say something with 9, because it sounds like it is worse, which it isn't. It got some things that bother me, but they're not worth it to be mentioned. I wish you a good time and buy this game. It's baboonastic aweseome. Your Alfons4481 aka [put in current anime character name] [Anime]
TokyoUD;-;Civilization V is easy to get into, but takes time to fully master. It's an addicting combination of empire management and hex-based unit combat. The basic premise is that you lead a civilization from its nomadic origins through the ages. You'll found cities, build grand armies, and interact with other civilizations over epic games that can span tens of hours. The game's greatest strength lies in the emergent narratives that you, the player, will form as you lead your empire to greatness. You will love, curse, and despise your fellow players/AI. In some ways, Civilization is indescribable. This is one of the gaming experiences you must try at least once in your life. I recommend also picking up the expansions Gods & Kings and Brave New World for the most complete experience. P.S: Make sure you set aside a few hours for this game, because you won't want to play anything else for a while.
|PLA| mFrog;-;Playing to lose or barely survive as a weak civilization in the high difficulty settings is actually quite interesting. With scenarios, real world positioning mods, and AI enhancement mods, survival through defense and diplomacy against dominant civilizations creates a different gameplay from trying to win. Too bad multiplayer isn't quite feasible due to constant screen jumping to allied battle...
Shorty;-;Never before have I played a game as majestic as this. The graphics are simply amazing, the soundtrack immerses you in the whole experience, and it's the kinda game where you sit down to play, and the next thing you know it's 4 AM.
Jinalpa;-;My dad and I used to play Chess. My son and I play Civilization. It's the new strategy game.
null;-;Awesome :D. Best Strat's game i have ever played :D 10 outta 10
Xaviien;-;Awesome game! Just be careful not to start playing if you need to do ANYTHING else that day, and absolutely DO NOT start playing if you would like to sleep anytime soon! Highly addictive, beautiful graphics and an awesome community. If you haven't already, check out the CivFanatics Forum [forum.civfanatics.com] for strategies, mods and more.
Mod0;-;Civilazations has always been one of my favorite games. Do what you want, command armies or grow a culture the world will never forget. Research technology and race to be the first to build monuments to your own greatness. Civilizations is a game where every move you make from the insignificant to the vital changes the game, and writes the story. There are no crappy one or the other ethical decisions in this game. You choose what is right. You write the ethics and judge only yourself. Five ramps all of that up a notch adding cultural bonuses and legitimate cultural gameplay (at least with Brave New World) If you're new to Civ, this is a great game to get started on. If you've played Civ before, this game is going to present new options, new challenges, and a whole new way to write your story. Truely a masterpiece of modern strategy.
Polocatfan;-;Civilization V is like if Risk and a Tycoon had a baby. No I have no idea what I'm talking about. Just play it
Azrael808;-;What can I say about this game? If you've ever played previous iterations of this game (I started with Civilization II), then you're probably already addicted and own it. For newcomers, I think Firaxis have done an amazing job simplifying the UI and providing useful prompts for new mechanics as they appear, so this is a great version to start with. Even with the simplifications, all the depth you'd expect from this game is still there and you can expose it easily (the city management screen for example). With the Gods & Kings and Brave New World DLC, Firaxis have made what I think is by far the most entertaining Civilization yet! So, to summarise: buy this game if you have any love for strategy and a w streak. Just be prepared to lose entire days to it.
Ryogeta;-;This is a game you can easily lose a day too. 4x games always look incredibly boring too watch but once you start playing one you just can't stop. Gods and Kings and Brave New World are pretty much required too get as the base game was a little too basic. The five different victroy types make finding new strategy's all the more fun.
XRAYSIR;-;its great
berto98;-;I whole heartedly love this game the first day i got it i spent the whole day with my friend playing it. Stayed up till 6 a.m. This game is one of my top 10 its easy to pick up and play .The games are long but you can change settings to make it shorter this games makes me feel like the creator had the consumer in mind while creating this game 9/10
Melkor;-;I really enjoy the coop of this game. My brother and I play as often as we can.
Coach;-;i dont understand how this game can be one of the most popular strategy games... its S-H-I-T... im not kidding, awful hexagone-style gameplay, didnt like it AT ALL, but i have to admit that in the beginning when i first tried it out, i liked the diplomacy aspect of the game... the rest.. no so much
KatanaWarrior007;-;One of the best 4X strategy games out there
Liev [Milla];-;One of the best turn-based strategy games I've ever had the pleasure of playing. Whether teaming up with my friends for some multiplayer, or simply losing a whole night of sleep to the game's endlessly replayable single player, this is one game that any strategy enthusiast, or, hell anyone strat-curious should check out.
Braigh;-;This game... Well... It's just... I... I'm lost for words... 9/10
.jaCUBE;-;...one more turn and I will go to bed...
Lord Cadwan;-;the best game the only game
Totally Gordon Ramsay;-;This game is good. I mean if I, Reggie Fils-Aime says it, it must be true.
calebwright1;-;I know I'm late to the game (ha, literally), but I bought this game last week, and I haven't been enveloped by a game this fast since Skyrim. It's probably not a good thing because my grades are absolutely going to tank in my last year of undergraduate studies, but IT'S WORTH IT. I'm going to drop out of college and hide in a basement playign CIV 5 until I STARVE.
jakub;-;fun to play with friends!
Glaran;-;Extremely addictive and extremely good.
j0llan;-;Bought this through humble bundle and enjoyed it so much i added the extra ~5$ to get the full tier. This is my first experience with a civ game and i have passed on them before because i thought it was to complex. But starting from the lowest difficulty and work your way up seems to have worked this far. The only negative i can think about, except the AI's evil trading, is that it magically turns "one more turn" to 3AM in the morning.
Rust boy;-;Don't do it, you have better things to do
God;-;i beat ghandi in a nuclear war but lost to korea in science...FML 10/10
Tbonehec28;-;As much replayability as TES Skyrim (Witout needing any mods) this game is seirously worth the money. The game is fun, and extremely coustimizable. Only downside is that the DLC is expensive
RedRaw JAW;-;Try not to consider realife logic, for example how would your jets be damaged while attacking stone age babarians other than that kiss good bye to your life
Gor;-;Opened game at 6 in the evening, looked at the clock when I finally took a break, 4 in the morning. 10/10 would lose social life again.
XXLandorinXX;-;Loved everything about this game. There's enough diversity within the game on how you play based on your civ and your enviornment, yet it's grounded on enough constant features that keeps each gmae consistent. Speaking as a person who has every DLC, it provides hundreds of hours of intertainment that i still find enjoyable with my friends even after my 300+ hours playing. The AI difficulty scale is wide enough so that someone who has never played a civ game before can win on the lowest difficulty, yet if they want to win on the next they need some better management skills, to the utterly brutal that still can act as a worthy opponent each time. Also if you are playing at the right difficulty level, if you lose, its mostly your fault. Maybe you didnt expand enough, or maybe you expanded too much, but generaly you can see where you went wrong or what the AI did right so you can learn from it. Overall, this has been one of my most enjoyable games i have played to date and have loved every second of it. This gets an easy 10/10
MegaDeath1981;-;A must have.
Hobbesasaur;-;True Korea trumps all
alangtjoplin;-;I have played civ v over 3000 hours since its release. I find the initial discovery of each map to be the first of many pleasures from this game. The ability to form your civilization to any victory condition and the progression towards that end are wonderful. The only lacking part is that the ai warfare is sometimes simplistic and therefore slightly less of a challenge than you would like at times. Still overall an excellent game.
Dress;-;An amazing game. Totally worth the price!
ClaptonIsTheGodMan;-;I have put hundreds of damned hours into this game and there is still more stuff I can do in the game. I've played plenty of games in my life but this is the best one out of all of them.
2Pro4UStudios;-;Pros: Fun, addictive, steam community support, mods Cons: Online multiplayer is a bit buggy, it will suck your life away
Dank Erection;-;Great and, in my opinion, best strategic game I've ever played. 10/10 m8!
Rangstar;-;This game isnt a game, it is a masterpiece.
zjin;-;Civilization V is a great game that you can play for over 250+ hours and still not know every tactic or strategy and you'll never "beat" it. It's a strategic game where not building that one military unit could be your downfall. Overall a solid game. 8/10
poisoN;-;Denouncing simulator. 10/10
doomdydoomdydoom;-;Highly addictive.
Rantti;-;Ever wondered if you could go back in time and change the past. Ever thought about how did earlier major civilizations rose and fell as soon as they were in power. Or do you just simply enjoy watching paint dry? Then this is the game for you! Choose your favourite civilization over a vast collection and find out why they started sucking so hard before entering medieval age. Witness how an ally decides to stab your back after being best friends for a over centuries just because you didn't answer their demands. This game offers a great opportunity to feel like being in charge of everything inside a civilization. And if the computer AI started making you mad, try out the multiplayer and invite your dearest friends! Soon you'll end up having vicious fights about someone making their decisions for hours. You will love getting revenge on those wasted minutes. This game is A 5/5 and a great pick for some mild LAN parties.
pedro;-;Its not as bad as hitler
Lisa;-;I love this game! Its easy to approach but hard to master, its thematic, the replayability is great as you branching paths and policy trees can be varied from the very start. Striving to get the best, most successful historical civilization is truly addictive!
MasterOfPuppets;-;This game is incredible, its fun and addictive, theres soo many different civilizations avalible to pick from. The civilization i prefer to go with is Napoleon or America.
TheHunterJr;-;Good Game looking forward next one
Ant-Man;-;Really great game, it requires thinking and strategy and it's massive. Online is fun and with your friends it's even better, even when your friend backstabs you(grumble grumble) I can't wait for civ 6(or civ xi) The only problem is the fighting, their is no real strategy to it or deph, but it works and can be fun if your winning :P
Eddy;-;Dont play this with the lights off. It's scarier than Amnesia
Matte d[-_-]b;-;Every time I recommend somebody this game, I just tell them the story of the guy that played a single Civ II match for over 10 years! In the far future, the game has been able to reproduce all of the details of a distopic sci-fi future world. All but 3 cultures have survived, and these 3 has become super-nations in a constant war against each other lasted more than a 1000 years. Most of the lands were devastated by the post-nuclear war fallout, and the people of these superpowers were starving, because their leaders were spending all the resources available in war efforts. Even when the player was willing to withdraw from the war, it was simply not possible because of the greed and the need for resources of the other two nations. So, when I fire up my Civ game... I always deactivate each type of victory... I wanna go see the future!!
ironblademetal(lonely);-;Nothing like it, best strategy game on the market right now! 100/10 would get nuked by a  off Ghandi again
Star Commander Billy Mays;-;This game is absolouteley recommended and super fun. There are still a few bugs but i will talk about that later. If you turn the graphics on high it all looks so good it's amazing. The animations , fighting, running, moving, are some of the best ever. The only bugs i have found are the workers sometimes will build things and they never show up and i have to restart the game.
dan;-;define fun and boring at the same time.
Brassm0nkey;-;Great strategy game for wasting hours on end. 10/10
Hjc135;-;it's a good game but if u get it make sure to get the dlc otherwise its not worth it
BobTheSkaFish;-;God this game will take up so much of your time! If you only got about an hour of time available, i wouldnt even suggest opening it as you WILL be late for whatever you had to do after! Excellent jeu dans son ensemble! Je le recommande a tous et chacun, pour les fans du genre et les nophytes, a vaut le dtour!
GoldWolf;-;An Amazing game, worth the money 100%!
Johnny;-;It's a great beginner strategy game.
CchRaven01;-;I've played Civilization 3 for years, Then about a year ago I got more into games and I got Steam. A few months later I got this game, I love the community, the DLC's, and I love the game. Civilization has been an amazing game series. I can't wait to see more games like this come out. So check this game out and have fun. (10/10)
Ded_P1xT0;-;Sid Mieir's Civilizaton V is one of the best strategies, BUT you should buy Gods & Kings DLC ( I think that Brave New World is too difficult for newbie )
IamPlayNormal;-;Great game, lots of content and huge replayablitiy. Some minor problems, not anything to worry about.
Jim;-;This game sucks my . 10/10
Nirvash;-;this game is awesome, maybe is cuz im Sid Meier's follower, but im also sure that if u like the strategy by turns u love this game too
Kurobue;-;One of the best time wasters of all time. Don't play if you don't have a lot of time in your hands. This will get you hooked.
[73rd] MonotoneCreeper;-;Melbourne demands Brad Pitt. Yes, you can name your religion Brad Pitt.
azrael.;-;Building nukes with King Kamehameha of Polynesia and scare the  outta America. 11/10
Ridiculed Phantom;-;I saw this game, and was willing to give it a try as it was cheap in the 2013 christmas sale on steam. Man am i gald i did buy this game, if you are looking for a fun to play and interesting strategy game that you can stress over and sink countless hours into, then this is the game for you. Oh and one last thing, DON'T TRUST GHANDI, you'll thank me later.... 8/10
Jerry Seinfeld;-;Very good game so far, after .7 hours of play time so far. However, in the two times I've had to make a new game, it seems to crash after only a few turns.
Kyle Sees;-;Destroying entire civilizations with your sheer willpower and military strength is my specialty... why? because this game just is here to let me do that... Destroy Ghandi?! HELLS YES!!!
MyPizzaHut;-;Only game where you can actually repel two empires (French and American) via espionage, technological superiority, and economic might. I made them my es with only a small military :)
BriscoeDack;-;I have been a loyal fan to Sid Meier's since I started playing Civ II as a little kid. I have easily logged thousands of hours on Civ II, III, IV, and V, with my brother also matching those same kind of hours in game. If you love turn based strategy, this is seriously the best money can buy. Civ is the one game that calls me back every time. It has the best replay value of any game I've ever played. It is a different monster every time I play a new game. The only thing I would warn players about is saving to the steam cloud. Early after I got this game, I saved directly to the steam cloud to pick that game up on a new laptop. Somewhere along the way, Civ freaked out, and now it will only allow me to play offline. I don't get to earn achievements and steam doesn't log how many hours I've put into the game since then. Don't let the 86 hours I have racked up fool you. I usually play at least 10 hours a week. I'm probably somewhere around 400 hours at this point, and many many more to come. Don't trust the steam cloud. Other than that, enjoy this beautiful masterpiece.
LucidMomentum;-;This game is addictive. Really shallow without G&Kings and GOTY edition, but with those two DLC's it's incredibly complex, educational (I know!) and all in all, fun. Get it on sale as it's a popular sale title. Prepare to lose hours without even realizing it.
Lord Padraigal of Longtheme;-;Fantastic game. Expansions add moreplay through possibilities.
Do You Accept The Summoners Code;-;Civ V is for gamers. Civ 4 is for lamers.
Fargengru;-;Incredibly addictive and very fun to play.
Stuge;-;this  right here a
sirtubby1607;-;One word: addicting.
KONY 2014;-;OH GANDHI CONGRATULATIONS ON BUILDING THE MANHATTAN PROJECT I WONDER WH-
Brandon;-;I have never played any games in this series but honestly, I think this is my favorite strategy games. you take contol of you own civilization and choose if you want to be a militaristic empire or if you want to become allies with all the city states you find. I recommend this game to everyone. I've been hooked ever since I started playing.
The Akashain;-;This game is suck worth is. Now it is not as much worth it if you don't get the gold edition. Anyway if you like RTS games and don't own this, OWN THIS!
Jagius;-;This is an excellent game. buy it twice, just so you know whats what.
Storieboy;-;Mom said 'don't ing play before you feed the dog.' Dog's dead now. Buy this game.
TaLoN;-;Civilization V is the sequel to the immensely popular and reigning champion of the Civilization franchise: Civilization IV. With the Beyond the Sword expansion that game was almost perfect, so the fifth game had some serious shoes to fill. The biggest and most controversial change in Civilization V is the change to a hex based system rather than squares. They also removed the ability to stack units, so one unit per hex is the limit. This completely changed combat, mostly for the better. The game was plagued by serious, almost breaking, issues at the start. The AI had problems figuring out how to work the hex combat system and was mostly completely dumbfounded in battle. The removal of the religion system and the addition of some features claiming to make the game more accessible to newcomers lead to the accusations of a dumbed down game that didn't hold a candle to the mighty Civ IV. Most of the issues were addressed in the Gods and Kings expansion which also added religion back into the game and expanded upon it well beyond what Civ IV did. The latest expansion, Brave New World, finally made the game all it could be and now it is accepted that the game is on par with or even beyond Civ IV. If you wish to pick this game up, then you should absolutely pick up Brave New World as well, as the game is no good without it. Brave New World also includes all the changes from Gods and Kings, so you don't need both expansions. The only thing you get from Gods and Kings is a couple of extra Civilizations to play and that can safely be skipped. Even with all the improvements, it has been said that the Civilization series plays more like a board game than a grand strategy game. We agree. For people who want something a bit heavier on the strategy side, we recommend Europa Universalis IV
Blue Drink;-;The perfect game for the sort of person that's always wanted to found Sikhism in Stockholm, then conquer Kyoto and build the Mosque of Dijenne there in 1456.
apollozchild;-;this game is great sept the AI they are all s.
Blackswordsman3;-;This game made me learn...and I wanted to learn... 10/10/10/10/10000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000 Let's just say infinity.
Excstazy;-;Wow, i don't know where to start. If you have ever played any of the CIV games before, then you are in for a treat. I've loved this series since i was a little kid and it only got better with the years, CIV 5 is amazing in every single aspect and a must play for anyone that enjoys strategy. If you've never played a CIV game before then youre in for a treat. This game is incredible and i can asure you will probably ask when did all those hours flew by playing this game, i just can't stop playing it. 100% recommended, must play.
Imrik;-;Best 4X of all time. OF ALL TIME!
swarzee;-;Very complex and time consuming game that is quite in depth in many ways... Took alot for a first timer like myself to learn the ropes, but once i did this game become a lot more fun. I would only recommend this game to RPG/strategy ethusiasts as i still find it to be quite a hard game even on the easier difficulty settings. This game is also what is called a "turn based" game, which at first i found a bit boring. Once i adapted to the games style though, the whole turn based system becomes very relevant and added another level of strategy to it all. Overall, the game is well thought out and very in depth making it simply put "epic".
Abigor;-;A very good turn-based strategy game. You will start by choosing you civilization, each one of them comes with different civ bonus, unique unit and unique building/improvement or second unique unit. By choosing different research options, expanding your borders, making you city grow, recruiting an army and balancing between different aspects to keep you civilization secure and happy, you will lead your civilizations through many eras to victory. The AI in the game could be better, while it may help you in the beginning and even will seem to be your ally, they can start hating you because you have too big or too small army, they will yell at your warmongering even if you are fighting again a common foe, they will settle their cities near you and expect you to move since it`s "their territory". While you should start playing with AI to learn about the game, it`s strongly recommended to play with other people since game can become boring an predictable after some time. You should also buy complete edition of the game since G&K and BNW dlcs change gameplay a lot in a better way - you will be able to participate in world congress, create trade routes, found religions and much more.
PFC Pe'er [29ID];-;great game! lot of things to do! 10/10
Erasus-Skirlex;-;Very Good Strategy Game and Good Graphics
jfilip;-;the best game ever
ArkhamCityGamer;-;The Ultimate Strategy Game. Nuff Said.
Lopenguin;-;This Game is a great game if you like being in control, this games lets you control a civilization that faces many threts, including other civiliations and barbarians, this makes the game a fun role playing game while including lots of different features to make it a great game.
Claim Your Free iPad Now!;-;Wow! Much strategy! One more turn! Pokemons Countries! Such Sid meier! Wow!
OldManMac;-;The first time I played this game I thought I'd only play for a few hours to check it out. I started at 8pm. The next time I looked at a clock, I did so because I heard birds chirping and the sun was coming up. This game is a time machine.
Redfred808;-;This is amazing with the DLC.
Mustaine;-;One more turn please
swagsire;-;I have no friends because of this game. We all hate each other now.
Capturing God #newmonitor;-;Very addictive game. Don't be surprised to find yourself playing until 7am in the morning because you just need that... one... more... turn... The 2 dlcs "Gods and Kings" and "Brave New World" are also very worth if you can afford it.
HeroCC;-;Civilization V is a great game. It vaguley reminds me of a Tycoon, but yet so much more! The standalone game is great, but if you get the DLC, you will be supprised how much better it is. Overall, I give CIV a 4/5. Great job, Devs!
Scumlord;-;Very good sequel, still liked Civ4 and Civ3.
Blue Dick Cheese;-;I've always been a fan of the Civilization series and in my mind, this is the best in the series. I think that the new game mechanics are for the best. This is a great game and is extremely addicting. I love this game, and I hope you do too.
Mikey.;-;Tons of replay value - and just playing through all the scenarios included in the base game will take quite a bit of time. Still lacking the mod-scene that was there for Civ 4; but it's getting there.
STriderFIN77;-;Just bought Gold edition upgrade, and no, 2.5 was not hard, and now i got all the good stuff 8)
'Arik <3.;-;Time flies with this game
=(eG)= VoxNeutron;-;Basically my favorite game ever. At the moment i've clocked 277 hours, I intend to get Waaaaaay more.
TheAntiNero;-;A great update to a series with incredible history. The hexagon map and one-unit-per-space add a lot to the strategic depth
rob;-;Meets Ghandi. 20 turns later invades city state. 60 turns later Ghandi declares war. 200/20
Three Fingered Polack;-;The diplomacy come up
The_Broseidon;-;This is one of the most addicting games I've ever played. There's just no way of stopping unless you have an insane amount of self control. Definitely one of the best games I've ever palyed.
Razznak;-;This review is for those who are completely new to Civilizations. The sun rises. You emerge from your cave with a new mindset, a goal to achieve, something no one has ever experienced before. Expansion. You build a new home to you and others when the time comes. And yet this hunger still remains. You explore the vast surroundings and find many new resources, unkown to you. You experiement and realise, this clay can be used for pottery! Fast forward 300 years, your once small town has now expanded into 3 cities, all of which are feared and respected by the surrounding neighbors. Yet they require more. Shall you attack and conquer the weak? Or befriend and parter up with the strong? These are the choices you make in civilizations. Choose wisely.
Aiterra;-;Hours and Hours of Replay Value; Best Strategy game on the market and can't be beat 11/10 would buy on iTunes
rookie2222;-;Fantastic both as single and multiplayer, so many civilizations for infinite replayabilty, definitely would recommend.
Dante;-;Ghandi nuked the  out of me. 10/10 Would get nuked again.
Dinkleberg;-;Started with two units near no resources at all, only barbarians. They  and pillaged the start of the Aztec empire and the Aztec empire ceased to exist. 10/10
IttzRyan;-;Bane says of course this game is good.
MaliCZ;-;Maybe the best title of the Sid Meiers Civ series. Simplifying game mechanisms of CIV4, it makes it easy-to-understand/play, and makes even bigger happiness from choosing your favorite nation, researching techs, making diplomacy resolutions, constructing wonders and defeating your enemies on battlefield/diplomacy - really stunning gameplay. Great plus to this game is also its soundtrack, making it even more playable. 92 / 100
Adolf Hitler;-;10/10 get Jazzy With Germany
tbrown5;-;The coolest thing about this game that sets it apart from other games like it is that you can take a civilization in any circumstance while you are playing, compare it to real world history, and get a parallel, which connects Civilization 5 to the real world. History geeks like myself might enjoy such a feature, whether intended by the makers or not, but that is certainly not the only aspect that makes this game golden. I can't even tell you how many times i have been awake at 3:00 in the morning playing this game, realizing that i have elapsed about 8 hours straight playing Civ 5. This is THAT kind of game. The music, the interactive leaders and the strategies you must devise to advance your own regime immerse you fully into the game. Once you are immersed, good luck continuing any obligations you have in your real world life. Besides the absolutely wonderfully fun gameplay, there is a potentially infinite replay value. The different circumstances you can be put in are endless, not to mention different rulers with different special abilities as well as 5 different ways to win. Everytime i come back to Civ 5 after a period of playing a shiny new game, i always get the same feeling i got when i first bought it; the feeling of playing an outright fantastic game. The replay value magnifies the quality of Civ 5 tremendously and makes it a must-have. 10/10
Huffle Puffle McGee;-;Yes, this game is absolutly brilliant, it has beautifull graphics and the gameplay is smooth. The loading screen takes an age but it is so worth it. Very few/no bugs that ive seen are in the game. 10/10 GET THE GAME
Gay Bacon;-;This game is the sh*t 10/10 Worth every penny. And also ruined my life
_loco_;-;An amazing, well-thought out game that is extremely fun and replayable. Although it has its flaws, the game is still great.
Jake The Dog;-;This game is one of the best, single player is fun due to the many diffrent ways to win as well as the diffrent leaders own abilitys which makes you change strategy. Also there are many map types and can make is more challeging with the manyh difficulties. Varity of mods you can add and multiplayer with your friends is always a laugh.
Fluttershy;-;IA have some problems, but, its civ, its cool, is amazing, maybe the best strategy game ever made. so, buy the game, make they profit so they can make the civ 6
SirDJ;-;10/10 One of the bests strategy games out there and the dlcs are great too you must play it
Pepsi Man;-;A caveman destroys a tank. 10/10
Sasha Grey;-;love the hot seat mode
Benny;-;A very nice strategy game, very simple yet so complex. It's a very fun game, and you can learn a thing or 2 about history from it, which is a bonus (I guess), and even though it's not Civ 4, it's actually pretty fun.
SportyTheGamer;-;This game provides a very different form of entertainment than most other simulator games. Sid Meier has captured the perfect combination of war, science, culture, and economy. You can win by taking over the world, reaching Alpha Centauri, sending a space shuttle into space via the Apollo Program, or by building the United Nations. The only word that I can possibly sum this game up with would be "Wow".
stingstrike;-;i strongly recomend getting this game, gandhi needs more haters
Mr.Mongoose;-;Oh dear god, where did all my time go? Where am I?
redrum91825;-;WARNING: Highly Addictive. Sid Meir's Civilization V is a turn-based strategy game designed to take you through the eras of mankind while you expand your civilisation. There truly isn't another game on the market which delivers an experience quite like this. The game features no story driven campaign mode, the closest being scenario games through DLC, Instead you set-up your game preferences and launch. The game typically begins with one combat unit and one settler unit who will form your first city. This is where your story begins, the game will always offer a completely different experience from the last match played due to its random seed generator, different civilisations personalities and resource placement. Personally I feel what can limit a good experience of this game is a lack of imagination. One match I formed an alliance with my neighbour Rome early in the game because of Mongolias warmongering and mass expansion of its territories. So together I the Ottomans and Rome formed a coalition military and advanced on Mongolia to knock them down a peg or two. Soon after we declared war on Mongolia and we sustained a few loses Romes forces pulled back. I could only assume this was due to their economy being in recession and couldn't afford to train new troops and risk Rome being defenceless. My economy however was booming due to my northern trade routes with the English, so my forces pressed on, determined to liberate the captured city-state of Monaco from the blood thirsty Mongolians. My troops succeeded at a high cost, losing many regiments and more men being crushed by the Mongolian might on their journey home back to the capital. It was at this moment Rome stabbed me in the back and invaded my lands with a huge force, destroying my trade routes with the English and bringing my income to its knees. The rest of the game and my relationship with Rome turned into a back and forth battle of gaining and loosing territory from each other, while my relationship with Mongolia grew stronger. Why did Rome do this I hear you ask? Because they were simple being racists. Or at least thats how I interoperated it through a politicians indirect use of language. Unlike many strategy games, turn-based and real-time Civ V can be picked up pretty quickly. If this is your first Civ title you'll be familiar with the formula in not long at all, its a very easy game to learn but can be a hard game to win. Sometimes it can feel like the AI isn't even trying, other times you can come under constant invasions. If I had to pick the worse point about this game, itd be the AI in diplomacy isnt perfect with a few of the dialogue options making no difference to what the outcome will be.
Bob;-;Such a brilliant game. Go get it now.
Beaker;-;pretty beasty
Dinki;-;germany isnt hitler 0/100
YOLO JESUS;-;dota2 is better though why do we russians love these strategies anyway?
Hortator;-;Yeah it's... It's good... Wait, why has it been so long? 2 hours? Just... Just one more turn...
XCruzzerX89;-;This is game is simple amazing, never gets old. If you love History and being creative this is the game for you.
[FASA] Hasse Kongo;-;This game is worse then drugs! If you start playing it.... you cant quit!
JoeRyland;-;Brilliant. I forget to eat/sleep. This may be killing me, but I don't care
Zakattacka;-;Very good strategy game, most fun with a group of people. You can run and lookover how the human race has progressed through times and the troubles it has gone through. 8.5/10
TheBraveSirRobin;-;A great game for anyone that can enjoy slow paced/turn based strategy games, even if you aren't that into the genre.
C9 Griefin;-;so let me walk you threw this game. you start as a leader of some  and you try to nuke everyone on the map. that sums it up nice
tje500;-;Best city building game which evens out between fighting for your cities and fighting to take over the world.
Rishiswaz;-;Good Game. Would buy again 10/10
Billyguy;-;It is a really good game. I love to play it with friends. If I were you I would get the game. It is amazing.
awesomeofawesome;-;MOST REALISTIC GAME EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! YOU CAN BUILD THE TAJ MAHAL IN USA PRESIDENT WASHINGTON IS BORN IN 4000 B.C. AND LIVES FOREVER ( NO BARACK OBAMA FOR PRESIDENT IN 2009) GERMANY CAN BE IN BRAZIL GHANDI CAN NUKE YOU 9000/10 MRGOTY 2010 (MOS REALSITIC GAME OF THE YEAR) seriously though this game is still pretty cool i recomend it. Buy it at walmart or wherever because its cheaper then buying it on steam
o0rumplestiltskin0o;-;I love this game. I love history and it lets me change history. It's great! :)
Hitlers BFF;-;this game has very fun single player that i have spent hours on my only complaint is the fact the multiplayer is very weak
Vengentz;-;It took a while to get used to after Civilization 4. Once you get used to the changes. It really is the best one yet !!
Neil;-;I played and loved Civilizations III and IV...but for some reasons, I prefer V better. Get it now!
Eggplant;-;Would recommend if you have 30+ hours for one game and like taking  at the top of a desert hill in Mumbai 3/10 (Draw in the left side so it's an 8.)
doerk73;-;Absolute favorite for a long time. In spent over 1200 hours for this one. Every game plays different; very challenging on higher levels.
PVA Glue;-;I slaughtered every one of my enemies through the medium of Culture as a family man Gengis Khan 11/10
Bilbo Stabbins (Otaku Gamerspy);-;10/10 Long Live Bismarck!
A demigod called Jesus;-;one of the best games that i've ever played, addictive as hell and never gets old even when you play in the same conditions everything seems new
Crescendo;-;Great Game but you need the DLC
evangutter;-;Takes a playthrough or two to pick up, but definitely worth it. Very time-consuming, but fun if you get the hang of it. Highly recommend if you have plenty of time to kill.
[PG] OthosTheRavager;-;It's an amazing game! If you're looking for a good long turn based strategy, play this game!
Bucko;-;I swear to god I've only played it for about 15 minutes, but it claims I've racked up about 30 hours. The game lies, obviously, but its lies are sweet. Like the finest honey. I recommend this game; although it's terrible for your sleep pattern, social life, and your ability to hold down a job, you'll soon come to realise the higher truth. Which is that you don't care about any of those things- all you care about is getting revenge on that treacherous dog who declared war on you and building more giant death robots.
OpTiC_DoGe;-;69/10 would get killed by Ghandi again
Wayne;-;Bloody amazing, just buy it already!
Dr. Element;-;It's an exhausting game to play, but once you have the BNW expansion, it's also one of the best strategy games you'll get your hands on. **Edit:** I have now played the game long enough to know what all my quirks with the game is. I still believe it's a really good game. For a future Civ game, i'd LOVE to see a pitboss mode that allows you to use a shared steamcloud save, and gave steam notifications when it is your turn, rather than having a dedicated server running hosting the game 24/7 while it is played (which could be months potentially). A pitboss mode like this would be even more attractive if a future civ game was focused more around optimization and lightweight-ness than pretty polygons. The perfect civ would be an epic game spanding several months, where it'd take you 20 seconds to sign in, take a turn, and leave the game again.
Scorpion_X;-;Great Game! Can't wait for Beyond Earth.
RichBitch;-;Amazing, im totally addicted... the DLC is heaven, its a recommended for new and old civ players :P
JazzBlaster;-;An excellent update to the classic series. The gameplay is streamlined but not simplified, and the hex-based map makes exploration easier and less time-consuming. The AI is a bit lacking, but Civ has always worked best in multiplayer. It also feels like this game lacks some of the character that Civ IV had. The soundtrack isn't as good and it's missing those classic Leonard Nimoy tech intros. All in all, a great game, but I'd stick to IV for single player.
Senor Freshco;-;I haven't showered in a month because of this game. Turned steam offline to avoid annoying conversations. Only slept 4 hours a night. Got a full caveman neckbeard. Got 32D-Cup man . Only ate Doritos and Mountain Dew for six months. Wore a fedora to protect my hair from too many oils. Called all female AI's m'lady to prevent wars. Watched anime with English subtitles between turns to understand the Japanese Civ better. Lost all friends, fitness and family. 10/10 recommended.
Sky Song;-;Great game and very easy to lose track of time while playing. Started playing a game at 4 PM and ended up not stopping until 3 AM, causing me to fail a test and then having to stay after school. 10/10 would recommend.
jawtheshark;-;The only other Civilisation I have played was back in the DOS days... You know, "Civilisation" or civ.exe. This is game is exactly as I remember it from back then. Even the controls seems to be the same "F" fortify, "space" skip turn, etc... I'm ecstatic. My wife much less, though I haven't seen her much since I started playing...
avhensley;-;If you can play a game where you can play as the Cherokee and conquer Great Britain out of context of history, you play the game
MUredhawk41;-;Love it! This detailed turn by turn strategy game is hours upon hours of fun!
Queen Horseytime;-;Great game for anyone who likes strategy. Pretty addicting too. Overall, great game.
[CB] Cookie the AFK Freezer;-;One of the better city building stratagy games out there, and there are quite a few. This game is great for anyone that is a fan of stratagy.
YOLOOOOO;-;Good game tho
MooJackMoo;-;maybe i think its dear for dlc but realy fun :)
BlauweYoda;-;Its an amazing game its just so fun to play as one of the nations that exsited in the worlds history and play it over in your own way. It is well improved from Civilization IV in a lot of ways. I defenetly recommand this game.
pogue;-;Just... One... More... Turn... This game is amazing but if played multiplayer you will learn which of your friends are warmongering ninnybunnies.
[TheRabbieSquad]CrRabbie;-;very good fun teaches stratagey to adults and kids
Cookies And Cream;-;10/10 Play Babylon Rush Great Library Win
Faze Tilston;-;A nice game. Features Germany. 63 69s out of 69 69s.
Bitch Fuker;-;This game made me giggle my , if you catch my drift.
Kingblob531;-;love it basicly you are a successful hitler 10/10
Killinator33;-;One of the best games I've ever played!
mordred;-;This game is my whole life.
Linux Immortal Penguin;-;Sid Meirer's Civ is prolly the best TBS ever
<o> Aaron 42 <o>;-;Great game for history nerds and future tyrants. I personally had no experiance on how to download or use mods, however Civ 5 made it easy and fun. Hundereds of hours my life were spent on this game, and it was all worth it. 10/10
BRAINfreeze;-;I get god complexes playing this.
tankman000;-;If I had to tell anyone who wanted to know why they should play Civ 5, this is why. A lot of people, including me, find the game really fun, addictive and even interesting in some respects, with all of the historical content. Metacritic even gave the game a 90/100 avarage score rating for goodness sake and it's consistently one of the most top played games on Steam. Yes, some people might consider the multiplay not as good as the single player, but even then, it still has it's moments and as you are playing with people, the challenge is possibaly quite high. Finally, as AngryJoe said in his review for Civ 5, the game is more focused towards the non and casual gameing market and was made for people like me, who hadn't played a single Civ title before, as it is supposed to be more simple for non and casual gamers to play. However, this doesn't mean that the game is easy, as the game is still very challenging and with all the mods and DLC which come with Civ 5, this game is sure to make you exited on your next playthrough! If I had to rate this game out of 10, I would give it a 8/10 for the standalone game and a 9-10/10 with the Brave New World and Gods and Kings expantion packs/DLC! As of yet, this has been the most played game I've played on Steam, having played it for around 224 hours, according to Steam, and is one of, if not, my most favorite games of all time!
|MLGEESUZ| Soul-Eating Sergeant;-;20/10 Nuked everyone until they gave me all their oil This is the best game ever
BRINGBACKMP5 #ATJLuko;-;Best game in the world! <3 Worth every Penny :D
Stylether;-;I highly recommend Civ to anyone who likes to build their own history a little. It's a game that shines when you invest yourself in it and explore the possibilities. As any avid civ player can tell you, you will truly form a symbiotic (or perhaps parasitic) relationship with your fellow players and AI, all the while it being virtual and fictional, and feel like history is really progressing inside your little realm. As every player schemes their way forward, that one settler takeover 200 turns earlier might be the reason why you decided to decimate someone's Civ. Or at the very least embargo them. Do you expand rapidly, or keep it calm and small? Do you initiate combat with your neighbours, or leave them as a safezone for potential invaders at the other end. Puppets and city razing, science and faith, everything is a factor in your ultimate victory... or very untimely demise. In short, if you don't mind sinking hours into a virtual world and rant in frustration as your neighbour finishes your favorite wonder first, a good casus beli for war if I've ever heard one, then you shouldn't really be searching for anything else, because you found exactly what you'd want just a buttonpress away. And probably a lot of cash.
Paul Plasmus;-;Excellent. Great improvement on the original, and new modes of combat and victory conditions make the game more strategic and diverse than ever before.
Milf or Wilf;-;One of the greatest strategy games I've ever played. I've played this game for over 100 hours and can still play it.
ThaBossOfYou;-;MAke sure you plan to get DLC's. Still playable without them, but definately get them.
da;-;It is a game.
Cpl. O. Melnyk [1st MRB];-;A great turn based strategy game, tons of different civlilizations to play. Good depth and replaybility. Can customize to have games long or short with different maps. Supports multiplayer with frriends but i would recommend getting the brave new world expansion pack, adds trade routes, religion and much more. Overall my favorite strategy game out of all the ones i played. GET IT!
MR SQUIRREL;-;I'm still learning the game, it's only been about 3 days playing, but I gotta say I reall quite enjoy this. I come from a LONGGGGGG (giggity) background of Age of Empires. But this is not like it. Civ 5, is like a SUPER LONG (giggity) version of the board game Risk, that's more interactive and detailed. The evil dictators can rule the land, the friendly weirdos can chop down some trees. The world is here for the taking. 4 1/2 out of 5 Acorns. Update (6 Days Later) I now own all of the DLC, and it's just amazing. Lots of really cool and neat extra features. It is overpriced in my opinion, but it's completely worth it (if that makes sense). Also after aton of hours I've come to the conclusion that the dev's put the barbarians in the game just to troll us. Rating Increase 5 out of 5 Acorns.
I is for Igor;-;you cand spend weeks on this game and still have lots to do. a great game overall in my opinion.
princess_ck84;-;addictive
AndeeRoemoe;-;This game is super fun! It takes a while to play each match though so if you don't want to spend a lot of time playing, I wouldn't suggest this game. However, if that's not a problem, definitely worth the buy!
A Pill of Malice;-;If you wanna build a nation from BC, but not worry too much about strategical army setup, then this is the game for you... Coming from one who has played this a massive amount of times, It's a great game...
The Wilfinator;-;Loved Civ 4 and finally got a new graphic card. So far it is a definate improvement to the previous games in the series. I cant wait to spend countless hours on this game
onlyoneq;-;Overall, I've spent over $100 on this game due to the fact that I bought it close to the day of release and have all the expansions.. This game is by far top 5 PC games I've ever played in my life.. And I play a lot of games. Absolutely amazing. Worth every penny.
Anonymous Sandwich;-;Addicting Mods Multiplayer Good multiplayer very very long play time quality DLC price easy to run approachable
MyAngryPanda;-;Awesome game, spent many hours playing and hopefully many more to come.
Batty;-;Real fun game, much enjoy, wow
nicolai73;-;this is an awesome game recommended for players looking for fun
Lemon 'chink plinker' Lube;-;i can play as Russia and take over the world with a millitary 6X larger than the other civs. 11/10, i am hard.
Johhny Goodmeme;-;10/10 would trust Ghandi again.
JuiceHouse;-;Just....One.....More....Turn...............
PH03NIX96;-;Civilization 5 is the next installment in the worldly acclaimed Sid Meier franchise. There are several difficulties to challenge new and old players alike. Battle it out through the ages starting at 4000 B.C. or higher and working yourself up to atomic bombs and space travel.
trickse;-;Awesome game. 10/10 would recommend.
Hextastic;-;Addictive, 'nuff said.
EL JEFE;-;The ultimate strategy game. The good: lots of strategic choices, stunning graphics, culturally very rich. The bad: too long games.
flacidgman69;-;Gandhi is warmongering phsycopath. 11/10
Bullschromp;-;Very fun game where you can command one of many civilizations from around time. Go to war with Montezuma as George Washington with Genghis Khan at your side, or generate tourism for your civ. Fly into space, or be elected world leader. Infinite replay value. The expansion packs and civilization DLCs (Korea, Polynesia, Babylon, Denmark) add a lot to the game, and made my playthroughs a lot more fun. Brave New World, the second expansion, really fleshed out cultural victories. Mods add a lot of content to the game, including maps, civilizations, and scenarios. Anyways, this is a great game, and I personally cannot wait for Civilization: Beyond Earth next fall. 9.5/10
JAMES THE MAD ROBOT KILLER;-;GOD HAS GIVEN US THE GLORY OF BRETRAYAL AND NUCLEAR WAR WITH GANDHI, thus i give the title of funniest/ funnest game to civ 5, but realy its an amazing game and worth the money.
Muffinman;-;There is many things wrong with the world. It's your job to fix it. GET THIS GAME
kaoschosen;-;This is a game you may not play too often, but when you start a game, be prepared for the next 5-50 hours to be solely focussed on wiping Gandi off the face of the planet with nuclear weaponary. Your visions of being a peaceful civilisation are shattered by your own self greed for world domination, your small tribe of simple warriors have evolved into super death machines that march from London to Tokyo (perhaps because Japan settled too close to you and the city is only 2 turns walk away). DESTROY, CONQUER AND REBUILD! *ahem* A few downsides to this game is that you may never return to an old campign, each session generally feels like its time to begin anew. Also, no one watching over your shoulder will understand how fun/addictive this game is, You just need to play it to understand.
carcinoGenesis;-;PLAY IT U WAFFLESSSSSSSS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#RoS. SniperJoe;-;It is very fun game to play. And on higher difficulties a challenge to win the game.
multiman2;-;Its a great strategy game where you start off as a civilization of your choice and you battle for victory against many other civilizations. The game has different modes and scenarios so no match is the exact same.
SillyKitty88;-;Quite possibly one of the best games ever :D
Conditional Love;-;Another remake of Civ. still the best non-space 4X. Sound, Soundtrack & Visuals are all great (although i prefer the Lenard Nimoy voice-over mod). Advisors are back better than ever (now with good tutorials if you need that). Now that units stacking has significantly changed how wars/combat playout (and with this change they kinda ruined the great generals/admirals). I like the new Civ-o-pedia. Culture & Social Policies are a welcome addition. You must use G+K or BNW expansions, preferably both, for the game to really come alive through all ages. Not sure that religon is all that influential in terms of the game outcomes. If you won't get CIV5 with expansions or DLC all on sale, and you aren't modding (steam workshop), then don't bother and get CIV4. Get it when CIV5 is on sale with the expansions, don't bother with DLC until you have played through at least once (unless the DLC comes as extras such as in the Gold pack).
Internal_Inferno;-;the only game where i can shoot down jets with arrows and destroy tanks with spears. 10/10
ToasterGhost;-;Started off rough, but after patches and DLC is a solid entry. If you like Civ then buy it for sure.
Homer J Pimpson;-;ME like yes good 4 stars out of 2 thumbs thanks obama
Smokey420;-;A great game for anyone that wants to burn a few hours. Its a game of wit's and brute strength, Forging allies and waging war all to gain a foothold over your rival's. Many or few, every game is different with a huge selection of map types and playable factions. I have played multiple run's of this game and still it is my favorite Civ from Sid so far. I'm sure i'll have many more hours in this game as the acheivment list is 200+. Multiplayer has a little to be desired as the matching can sometime take awhile and games tend to get overpowered one way or another rather early on. Finding solid players that can last a match is uncommon. With all being said the game is definetly playing.
Dirk Decker;-;Great game if you like being a boss.
ComputerNerd92;-;My favorite games are simulation and open world, and this game is both. Online matches get very competitive, and can last for many hours. The fact that you can build your civilization anywhere you want and as long as you want makes this a game I will always come back too.
AiliaBlue;-;One more turn. Just one more, then I'll go to bed.
hazeleyedfae;-;So, everyone pretty much has at least one game that they go back to, over and over, when other games have lost their novelty, or have been completed, or all the achievements earned. For me thus far, this is that game. I could play a game on the DS, or go back to the XBOX, but this is my favorite go-to after the kiddo is in bed. Better yet, it is easily explainable and fun to play with friends and family. Worth it to have in your library (especially if it's on sale).
Wuce Brayne;-;This game is amazing, just buy it if you haven't already. Even if you don't like turnbased strategy games, you won't regret picking this up!
Senpai;-;I love this game. Theres never a boring instance when playing and i like that its progressive so you cant just get nukes 5 minutes and kill everyone, you have to wait until you unlock it. Another things thats cool about it is the length, while this might be a problem for some people i find that it makes you more attack to it because of how much time you put into it. it becomes more a matter of actually protecting your capital at all costs rather than ill just lose and start a new game.
MrMokka;-;I really like this game. So much fun to play with friends!
Purple Ranger;-;one more turn
{[GG]} Peruvian Bird;-;This game is for all players, wheather it is Trolly,Strategic, Or laid-Back. Rise to power with you empire, and dominate the scoreboard!
labrador_5;-;I really love playing this game of the amount of strategy involved. Do build up your army or your towns? What do you research to put your civilization ahead of the others? Do you march into war or be a diplomat? Do you make allies or isolate yourself? Whatever you choose will determine if you win or loose the game. If you don't have a lot of time I would suggest playing against bots as you can pause the game. Multiplier games take a lot of time but are fun if you can afford the time. So go ahead and spend your money on this game!
ronnagin88;-;Civ 5 standalone was a 4/5, and I honestly preferred Civ 4 to it. Civ 5 with the Gods and Kings expansion was a 5/5, and took the game past the threshold. Civ 5 with the Brave New World expansion? 999/5. Why don't you own this yet?
Schorcher;-;Gandhi world domination simulator. Get the complete pack when its on sale and enjoy endless hours of single player and online with friends.
Munching Bromelon;-;PLAY THIS GAME ITS REALLY FUN AND ADDICTING. AT 1ST YOUR LIKE ILL JUST PLAY FOR 30 MINUTES, BUT THEN ITS 3 AM.
The Hentai Librarian;-;YES I RECOMEND THIS GAME
xM3RKY;-;I waste a lot of time on this game. 10/10
ryan_cos;-;It's sooo FUN! Try it out and you won't be disappointed.
Sir Brendan;-;Great game, very addictive; I've played countless hours on this game. Even when you think that you have mastered the game, there are new ways to play and win. The animation is amazing and the AI is smart. There are plenty of civilizations and policies to choose from. If you haven't played this game theh you've never experienced true fun!
dj clifford hentai;-;I've never finnished a single game 10/10
NyanMan567;-;I love this game. It is great if you are a nerd like me and love screwing with history. It also requires strategy and thinking. Again, it's not for everybody, but it is 100% for me.
No This is Patrick;-;Contemporary Roman Empire New Religion Started: Caesarianism Nuked Washington (Take that Murica!) Russians didn't agree. International outcry. Still wins all votes in World Congress because city states don't care. 10/10 would nuke Washington again.
Dr. SandwichMuffin;-;Definitely. Install it and murder India.
Freedom;-;My mom told me I would never be successful enough to be the President, but now I CAN!!!!
Razei Volegase;-;My buddy and I were playing together in a game with two of us and twelve computers. The game took four weeks to complete as we slowly, politically and militarily, took over the world. Together we defeated the Celts in the beginning to find out that our countries were on the same continent. Slowly, I amassed a massive navy of Submarines surrounding the entire world. My friend liked aircraft carriers more, so he traded and muscled his way into owning about 15 of them, all equipped fully with fighters and bombers. At the end of our weeks of play time, we stood at the pinnacle of civilization. Then I got bored and randomly attacked my friend. He scoffed at me, bringing his massive number of aircraft carriers and planes to attack my capital. Then my submarines struck. In two turns, I had destroyed all of his ships. Every single one of his ships. Every. Single. Aircraft Carrier. Died. At the end of it, my friend gave me a look of pure terror. My Submarines had won. Then he nuked my Capital and won the game. 10/10 would get nuked again.
Sacchetti;-;Is it good .....Yes ..... This 9 hours is form 1 day of playing Im ashamed.... 10/10 like crack
sergeant117;-;it's the best strategy game on the market
StraightSavageHippy;-;Really fun game and has a very user freindly control and task bar. I was excpecting a really confusing stategy game but I ended up getting a highly-addictive, awsome game if you love to conquer, build, and explore.
VanHart;-;Definitely a Must Buy as it really worth the price you pay for. A game that uses strategy and planing in order to conquer or achieve a certain objective. Isn't it everyone dream to take over the world or being the leader of an advance nation? well at least for me :). If single player is just not your thing, get a bunch of friends and start teaming up or backstabbing them in the back to gain control in Multiplayer :) do remember is just a game though dont get serious when one bite your back haha. Great game, for those who enjoy turn base and strategy game :) . it so interesting till you don't realize you have played it for hours haha
Wheels and the Legman;-;Brave New World Expansion just made this game even better. Ever wanted to play and take part in a subtle satire towards western worlds policy of subtle collonisation? Finally I can be a coward and hide behind trade sanctions and luxuary bannings. Starving millions and salting the earth of my enemies Take that Darius!
gam3r3xp3rt;-;If your looking for a game that let's you literally rule an entire empire againest other empires through the test of time, then you should give this game a go. It's very addictive and will make you keep going turn through turn, only to look at the clock to realise what felt like and hour, turned into seven instead.
Red Tonic;-;BE VERY CAREFUL PLAYING THIS GAME!!! You make think you know what time it is, time to nuke Gandhi, but you realize that 3 days have passed since you have started your game and you haven't drank or ate in the last 18 hours. This game keep you saying "Just one more turn!" but don't let it make your decisions for you, like when you should use the bathroom or when you should get another sandwich. If you see this game on sale buy it immediately, oh and Brave New World did amazing things for this game, buy it as well.
Tti;-;With gods and kings and brave new world, this game is the finished product. Cant recomendi it enough for turn based stragety fans. A giant that will be hard to beat for 6.
steve harvey;-;great game, has its flaws but makes up for it with its great replayability. its even more fun if you play it with friends.
BenFort Mk. IV;-;Civ V is a a great game, provided you have the Gods and Kings, and Brave New World expansions. Vanilla Civ V is clunky and incomplete. But with the addition of the two expansions this game turns from a dud into the best game in the franchise. I highly recommend buying this with the two expansions, if you can afford it.
Archangel00;-;One of the best, long running franchises in gaming history. A must have title for gamers of all types.
Toraqi;-;This one perhaps the greatest strategy game of all time. Strategy is indeed a huge part of the game, but psychology also is, especially when playing with friends. It has enormous depth, gold edition, including science, economy, happiness, combat and so on. The game is fun singleplayer, but online with others, preferablly 3 or more, it becomes one of the best of all time. Nothing is more satisfying than leading your people to a glorious victory, by conquering others in the process or researching the most of the world.
Tavarian;-;Great game, will kill time immensily. Great replay value a def. must buy.
Unspecial K;-;Washington should have conquered the world IRL.
hK;-;It is possible that you disliked Vainilla Civ5. But trust me on this, after 2 expansions the game has become a truly masterpiece.
Ransomvik;-;holy crap this is awesome
N7_Sire;-;This game is great and is fun to play with friends.
MilkAndLettuce;-;Expertly balances the grand majesty of human accomplishment with the cartoonish evil of nuking Mahatma Ghandi into the stone age.
JoeJoeMoJoe361;-;Great game
nikita698;-;i like the game very much, is realistic and enjoyable. 9.5/10
Rick;-;Coming from a guy that never really was into strategy games. This has to be one of the best buys I have ever done during a summer sale! A must have game!
mhmhm-YNY (57);-;An excellent game! Great graphics and gameplay
Karl;-;Do you like having no clue what you are doing, while thinking you might actually be doing something? You would love this game. So kawaii
zENOzs;-;A hardcore starcraft 2 play lose himself in a turn base strategy game.....
Phoenixflower;-;One of the best strategy games I have ever played! The turn-based gameplay might not be suited for everyone, but you get used to it very quick and the gameplay is just awesome. There are unlimited ways how to envolve your culture and rule in peace or conquer wit the iron fist.
Lord.Friendzone;-;This game is AWESOME!!! Not as awesome as Civilization 2 but still , will beat any TBS game any time of the day.
Metatronaut;-;One of the best games I've ever played. If you get the chance to buy this game, do it. You'll pay for every move you make, weather it be good or bad. Also, playing as different civilizations gets you special rewards and perks depending on how you like to play. Pick it up now!
Phantom;-;I pour hours and hours into this game at a time! I get so distracted and sucked into, I have no idea why.
Cressy;-;yaw dis shizz be a pretty good strat 11/10 would play again
oh no not JILLI;-;THIS IS FUN.
Animal killer;-;I Love this game by far the best game you can get for wartime fun. The strategy that goes into building your Empire up and making everyone happy and fat with food. after you build it up i normaly shot for a Fight to death to see who wins and it's Epic the way you feel after Beating the  out of your Bff in Multi player.
Lord Crushtanius;-;95 out of 100 I definatly like the turn based play because it gives a refreshing change from the real time stratagy games I usually play. It can be a little repetetive playing against the computer though so try playing it with others for variety.
Ryanator97;-;This game is very entertaining, and i recomend it to anyone. I dont like turn based games, but this game is so well done and so entertaining that i never even notice that i have to wait for turns. The npc's move so fast, its almost like you never stop being in control. There are so many unique strategies to follow and the outcome of any two games are never alike. This is a spectacular game, and if i were you, i would seriously consider getting it.
Geoffrey;-;One of my favorite games ever. Civ V features such great variety that you can play for 600 hours (like I have) and it still feels fresh. The game is well rounded and each of the victory options is obtainable in an enjoyable fashion. Each Civ for the most part feels different, and most are tailored to a specific victory type. The AI is strong and on higher difficulties very capable of beating you, however its through boosts not skill.
frozenclarity;-;A somewhat flawed diamond in many respects, currently lacking some of the multiplayer features one would expect from the latest in the series. The expansions help soften the blow, adding much depth to the game. Plus, in regard to multiplayer, the service provided by Giant Multiplayer Robot allows the asynchronous play sorely lacking at this time.
Ucantalas;-;This game is amazing. Great strategy and fun gameplay will leave you thinking "Okay, just one more turn." ...and that's my biggest complaint: If you play this game, you will probably get sucked in and spend hours upon hours playing it. If you're going to buy it, make sure you have the next day or two off work.
Okinz;-;Sick game, has me hooked for hours every time. Alot of depth to how it work.
Danielkaas94 -;-;I Love it, my friend love it. And now I persuaded my girlfriend, she loves it too now! We had a lot of fun with it, good graphics and the talking portraits of the different civilizations, they are cozy and looks like a true copy of the real thing :P But i'm from Denmark, so Mister Bluetooth voice is really weird and un-viking-like.
backnine31;-;I've barely played this game so what do I know but.....it pretty much fits the bill for whatever style and whatever level you like to play. If you're meticulous about creating the perfect city(s) in the perfect spot(s) then this works extremely well. If you like to mad-rush and conquer, this is your game. If you want to manipulate the world around you without ever firing a shot, that can be done, too. Builder, pacifist, warmongerer, merchant, diplomat, or any combination thereof, they are all available here. As I read in a previous review, Civ V, when it first came out, disappointed me. The Civ IV iterations were definitely more immersive and, honestly, flat-out better. But with the expansions into Gods & Kings and Brave New World, Civ V has surpassed that great game and now is the jewel of the series. They all have their worth but, if you spend any time at all learning the depth of this game, you will be rewarded with many hours of time you'll never get back and you won't regret it. But, like I said, I've hardly played this game at all so, what do I know?
bloodorange17;-;This game is worth it! Buy it now!!
darthjaws;-;sweet jesus this game is addictive.
Childish Brandino;-;All in all it was a fantastic game, i loved every minute.
Mr.Mercer;-;Warning side effects of playing this game include: 1. Not being able to stop 2. Racism
GreenPlasticSpoon;-;Sid Meier's Civilzation V is one of the best stratagy games I have ever seen. And I am not the only one who thinks that. Mulitple players and IGN said the same thing. Civ V is a turned based game where you try to conquer your entire map. But if that seems too hard you can either; be the first to space, have 5 diplomacies, research everything or have the most points when 2050 comes around. You play one of many famous conquers in history and try to build a civilization that will stand the test of time. If you don't want to do this alone, you dont have to! You can make helpful city-state (random civilization) become your ally and they will reward you by sending you gifts of gold, resources or even army units. If that is not what you thought I meant by "not alone" don't worry, you can play with other people and take down or befriend their civilzation. -fiddlesticks 9/10 review
[MNI] RB | Rasputin;-;Do I recommend this game. Hell yes. This is one of the greatest games I have played and playing it with friends is even more fun. You can choose from many civilizations from the Aztecs to Russia and almost anyone else you can think of. So in total. Yes I would reccoment this game to anyone and everyone.
nopr;-;Civilization has ruined, and continues to ruin, my life. Would recommend.
DeltaHotel;-;Awsome game can be simple or complex as you like at the easy diffculty. But at the top levels you need to be on the ball every move. The game allows you to be in control as much as you like from choosing citizen output. All the way to let me make the key choices. It simply is one of the best strategy games in my opinon.
Applepooh;-;This game is awesome, and for the next 30 hours you can get it for 75% off. Get this if you do not already own it.
HABS-FOR-YOU(CANADA);-;Civilization V is a great game but with out the DLCs is a unfinished game that may disappointfans coming from civ IV. But of course with the DLC it turned this unfinished game into a spectacular experiance that any Civilization fan should have. It has a dumbed down UI from Civ IV but thats what all the games are doing so you gotta deal with it. The main point is you have to get the DLC to see the full potential of this game or else you may be left unsatisified with the gameplay. Pros: -Good gameplay on single and multi -Easy to UI for new players -Great DlCs that are worth the $30.00 -Constant replayebility -Great community content on workshop and easy to use map editor Cons: -Dumb and random AI behaviour -Multiplayer session lag and disconnect oftan making it sometimes unplayable -To easy to play in even the hardest modes - Not enough stratigic resources 8.5/10 "Get this game Civilization fans!!!"
Zorglub;-;Very good game. Good value for the price. I have been playing several full games with different starting civilizations, trying new tactics each time. Each type of victory is a goal to achieve in itself and some can be harder to achieve than others. The AIs are not super smart, but can still be provide a challenge sometime.
Sligh2;-;great game!
vladimir;-;Takes time to love, and loves to take time. The world is a mess, and I just need to rule it
Nipul;-;Wow... this game has infinite possibilities and play time... tons of hours of fun incoming!
DJ John F. Kennedy;-;This will give you tons of fun. Very addictive game, the single player is awesome and the multi player is even more awesome. I can promise buying this is NOT a mistake. # Graphics :: 9/10 # Sound effects and sound fitting :: 10/10 # Story and lores :: 10/10 ### Overall :: 9.5/10 - definitely will play again!
mv21st;-;Great game!
||The Vendetta;-;truly a great game.
bosmosis;-;I like the new hexagonal layout of the map. Overall, solid gameplay. A few littel things I wish they would change tho: I still find it ridiculous that melee units can shoot at planes.
JayToThe-R-o-C-;-;One Of the best strategy games ive ever played hands down ,one of if not the most playable strat game ive played, deffinately reccommend this to anyone who likes strategy games
Huernando;-;Much play. So Civulizashion. Such Addict. Wow. 10/10 Doge aprooves.
Juraj;-;Great game
Falkuric;-;Great game for anyone looking for either a casual game to have fun in, or a bit of a slow paced, intense strategy game. Able to play for countless hours in one session and it never gets boring. I would comepletely reccomend this game for anyone interested in this style of game.
solid;-;Addictive like previous Civ titles, I've easily spent more time on this than I would ever want to admit. Does take a little bit of getting used to though, as you can no longer stack units. Still a ton of fun though, and I'd highly recommend it.
MetelStairs;-;Ceaser got mad at me and his legionares destoryed my longswordmen but when i got my minutmen out i wiped the floor with him.I made a peace treaty with him to have a age of peace if he would give me all his cites but his current main one (which was not Rome cause i took it from him) and i burnt down the cites he gave me and then started a siege on his last remaining city (destroying the truce) that was the end of Ceaser.But Egypt got mad and called me dishonorible after the actions i took.Then i pause and saved and never went on it again.Ask Jordan Nutkicker if you dont belive me!
Lvchaos;-;Time flies.
Revolverhelden;-;A fun game to play.
Fool's Errand;-;Great for a quick game if you've got 5 minutes to spare and don't mind winding up cancelling the rest of your afternoon.
cheeseBEAR;-;Easily best turn based strat game on the market.
mr_mikeman;-;This is one of the most addicting games I have ever played. It litterally forces you to play for hours and hours if you want to finish a game...
ArcticMew;-;Dem civiliations.... much civ... many v
NoTailedSquirel;-;Greatest strategy game i've ever played, so detailed and submerssive.
pandaman2001;-;One of the best games i have ever played
Varner "Revan" Hilts;-;Wonderful, very addictive!
Mid Or Feed;-;It is good
Perry;-;it's pretty cool...
SDVanilla;-;it is a game
sixshooter19;-;Great strategy game, and you might learn some stuff too.
50Shades;-;gg very nice yes in syria this is very good use of program when terrorist.
[Lone] Wolf;-;Civ game spend 9 hours in a game then die from a nuke yet you still go back for more.
valueasset21;-;one of My favorite RTS game
Napoleon Borntoparty;-;Found first oil as Arabia, got attacked by America; they pilliged my oil and got out. 10,000/10 for realism
teh_pwn;-;Civ V is amazing. Highly recommended.
Keita;-;To like a startegy game is one thing but this, this takes it to another level of strategy especially when you say to yourself one game or ill just finish my research then your head to head with your biggest rival with greece or something like that and realise i think i've been playing for 6 hours
Probably Masturbating;-;Literally hundreds of hours of potential gameplay and content in here, and it only gets better.
WinoGamer;-;This game has changed my life - I no longer watch television, that time is now dedicated to playing Civ 5. Endless hours of fun, and I had put a decent amount of time into the game before I ventured into learning micromanagement of cities. That opened up a whole new facet to the game that showed how versatile and fun it can be. The only downside to the game is the AI crunch time in between turns and the lag with multiplayer.
Redwire;-;Alright, this game has received more hatred than any other version of Civ. Ever. And, given the Civ III "purist" campaign for the last installment, that's saying something. As usual, though, most of the reviews given are comparing the game to civ IV. With all of its expansions. And Rhy's modding. So, just to add my two cents: The game is a whole different animal from IV, with new unit rules, (no stacking), embarking immediately available for all land units, and HEXES. (WHAAT???). That's right, the game uses hexes rather than the traditional squares for the grid. These all take a while to get used to for players of the earlier versions, but are all in all, very fun. The workshop content here is incredible, I highly recommend jumping into that immediately, (for experienced players) and trying out the new customization tools. With BNW and Gods and Kings added, the game really shines. PROS: -New look, same civ feel at heart -Love the civs available. (venice particularly.) -Cities given defense of their own, even without troops stationed in them. -Music is so-so, but doesn't detract from the game in any way. -Multiplayer, as usual. -Workshop content is awesome. CONS: -Most glaringly, the AI is incredibly easy. I reached Modern Era as Venice against five prince AIs a full 20 turns before any of them. This is my one real con for the game, but I bought for the multiplayer anyway, so... Not that bad. -Wish that the maps generated more evenly, with regard to resources. I took over half of a large map early in the game, only to find that alll the coal was on the other side. :\ Honestly, this is an incredible game with a bad AI. If an enemy with an army twice the size of yours allows you to take a city from him with nearly no fight, something's wrong. If said enemy then begs on his hands and knees for peace immediately afterwards, something's very wrong. If his peace treaty offers literally everything he owns, save his capital city... I have no words for it. I give this game a 8 out of 10, however, despite this issue. I play for the multiplayer, so the AI doesn't effect me that much. It is still an issue, though, so the die-hard fans may want to reconsider this purchase if you're expecting a high-risk single player duel. If you want a fun experience for multiplayer, though, or are learning the game, I can't recommend it enough. As more has come out for V online, it has grown greatly, as did IV. And III. And II. Best of luck, all!
Judas (Vamps);-;Quickly build your empire up, make allies, declear war, reign supreme!
CocaineGrizzly;-;Don't play with Danny unless you're willing to go nuclear.
SIHuze;-;Love this game though the multiplayer can be a lil buggy at times
Lemur_mat;-;i Recomend this game if you own atleast one of the Expansion if not it's a pretty good one, but you get more conetent with the Expansions. IF you like World map Strategy games it's the SERIES for you, this game has deep gameplay and mechanics and oh so good Multiplayer if you are a Strategy fan or Civ fan your PROBABLY going to like it.
Secundus Interpares;-;This is very good game that gets boing after like 300-400 hours of play time. biggest drawbacks are: - AI of units - ai can build, win with you by science, but if you have like half a brain you will never lose by militarty conquest, it is most apparent in ai moves accross ocean - even having submarine don't help them, because they dont use them! AI had my battleship on plate, with two submarines in range, and it just moved it, without shotting at my ship. it was like most WTF moment in game, and i understood that unit moving was done by some half wit and not a programmer. other that that game is well balanced, i think it can be very entartaining form multiplayer purposes.
Panda robba;-;Amazing everything: graphics, gameplay you name it and it has it. Win a Peace, Science, Culture, or even a War victory. This is the game for you if you love these command, and strategy games. But the game does require an exceeding amount of patience as one game can last hours and still end up in loss, But it is absolutely one of the funnest things you can do on your devise and i would highley recommend getting it
* ']['ffL;-;a wonderful game since the first release. civ 4 was great. civ 5 is great too but it comes with better graphic and the hex grid with a different combat system. i really enjoy this kind of game ... lets do another turn ... oh another turn ... wait one more turn. to me its a real keeper once started u cant stop lol. it offers so many depth in politics, economy, trading, research etc. which is welcome by old players but it might be hard for new comers.
Aquaman;-;It's allright yeah...
AssBackWardWolf;-;Asked Alexandra for some wool, the whole world declared war on me... Lesson learned don't ask for wool.
bipfosho;-;Hope you can make a quick decission
Step Daddy Goob;-;Very enjoyable gameplay. Intense when other top Civilizations declare war on you, but if you can pick up on things quickly, they can be easy to beat.
Holiday Heavy;-;Look I'm reccomending a game.
WILLIAM AT WIV;-;Great game
Crimson Crisis;-;Good game to play with a some freinds. Better with the dlc
Mincci;-;I've spent so much time in this game that it's not even funny. At least when noting the fact that I've yet to actually finish a game. Seriously, I love this game though it can get a little tiring in the later stages of the games.
LuckyReden;-;This game is great to play with friends and is extremely enjoyable. Its a blast to play with others, as you make alliances, trade with other civs, and race to make the best civilization. Single player mode is also quite fun, though some of the AI's are strange and the diplomacy is awkward. Still though, the higher difficulties can pose quite a challenge. I would definitely reccomend it to someone else as a game they could get sucked into for hours on end.
The Good;-;one of the best strategy games of all time !
AtomicHashtag;-;When I purchased Sid Meier's Civilization V I had no idea what I was getting into. **NOTE** People have said you need the complete edition (DLC's and such) to make the game better, and they're soooo right. Being someone who has played with and without the dlc's I strongly reccomend buying the complete edtion over the standard edition. I played 7 hours in my first real sitting of Civ V, and started out as playing Alexander, Ruler of Greece, which was fun and all, but I didnt really enjoy playng as him. After that I convinced some friends of mine to get the game (since it was on sale) and now I'll mostly play multiplayer with my friends. They all now love Civilization V also and they always thank me for having them buy it. Graphics - 8.5/10 Gameplay - 9/10 Replayability- 9/10 Personal Rating - 10/10 Game! PS Never Trust Ghandi
OdhrnTheWizard;-;For a buggy mess of a game, it is one hell of a fun ride
Commodore Manzaza;-;You cannot end what you have started. The game will glue your  with the chair for 3-16 hours. Personal Experience: > 10.9/10 Would neck-hurt again everytime. > Every single freaking AI leaders won't accept a FAIR trade. All they mind about is "profit". > Never trust Catherine, Montezuma, Bismarck, and everybody else. Especially when a large group of unit is within the edges of your borders, and sends a request for an "Open Borders", gaah! Refuse it like you do it for life. And, better prepare as it happens. To be honest, Sid Meier's Civilizaton V became one of my favorites since my first three hours to the game. It perfected 2 aspects, The Chess-like-Turn-Based-Casual-Tycoon-Strategy-Game, and the Historical aspect. Both are perfect. I love history, and that gave me enthusiasm to even play the game even further. Final Verdict: + History + The Strategic Gameplay + Well made, and detailed historical figures (Gandhi, Oda, Washington) + Many possibilities, and wide range of.. yeah. Possibilities. + The Narrator + The music that fits the Civilizations respectively. Asian for Asian, Party rock Skrillex. - Annoying bots that won't accept a Declaration of friendship, and a fair trade. 10/10 Neck-hurting Simulator (Possibly because I play it for 3+ hours? Oh god.)
D4rKT;-;The best Strategy Turn Based I've played.
Caboose UK;-;bit unstable on multiplayer, but otherwise a great game
Coffi Bean;-;My review of Civ V: This game is amazing!! Basically what you do is: Grow your empire, make friends with other empires. And when the time comes, you could fight with all the opposing empires once you have built your army. It was surprising how each country had different looking military, this game is unique and fun! Definitely recommend worth your $30, go check it out it's awesome and epic and is the best strategy game i've ever come across in my life. Not even exaggerating, this game is so beautiful and just EPIC GO FOR IT
Katalyst;-;I dig it. An excellent (if not overly effective) way to pass an entire day without realizing it.
Icy Uranus;-;Just... One... More... Turn...
JLimbeek;-;It's a Civilization game - with the expansions, it's one of the best the 4X genre has to offer. Must-play!
tatu.iivanainen;-;Certainly one of the best games ever made! It keeps me coming back time and time again.
[FIOF] Skarpa;-;I really enjoy this game, it is a worthy addition to the Civilization series
ROME;-;One of the best games I have ever played!
Kadry;-;Its a very fun strategy game! I haven't had fun playing a strategy game since Warcraft 3: The Frozen Throne.
why not zoidberg;-;This game is great! A lot of people claim to like Civ 4 better, but I kind of like 5. It is a little simpler to manage your empire, city-states are a great addition, and the new combat system requires a bit more skill (no more unit stacking). If you have played the older versions, you'll love 5... and if you haven't, I would probably recommend started with 5 over 4 :)
Bakel;-;This game is one that you will not want to play, but once you do, you can't stop for eight hours.
TikiCoder;-;Largest tiome sync in the world and I mean that in the best possible way!
The Shameless One;-;I am the king of siam and I pay everyone to be my friend, A+ game if you have brave new world.
Wizard with a Floppy Hat;-;Civ 5 is a game that is as deep or shallow as you want to make it. At it most basic, you build your city up and attempt to be the worlds number 1 super power through military, culture/religion or science. This is really easy to get into and eventually youll be managing cities individually, and assigning special people how you see fit, knowing which techs are absoulte needs (writing, civil service) useful monuments (Great Library). The game has two expansions (Brave New World / Gods and Kings) they enchance the game greatly polishing off to make it the best 4x stragtey game on the market. This isnt to say civ5 isnt without its faults. Harder difficulties arent really more difficult, the AI just starts out more technologicly advanced and thats not really a greater challenge. As you pretty much have to rush certain techs and wonders to have a chance. I persoanlly dislike city states, they never really develop into anyhting intresting other than "side quests" to sell resouces too and save from barbies, sure you can win the game by befriending them, but most likely you just want to conquer them. My problem with the victory conditions are its possible to win while trying to get all 3. Its not uncommon to be working on a culture / science victory while going for military and the science happens first. But these are mostly minor details as completeing full games takes a long time depending on your time setting and youll always be saying "one more turn."
MothaFux;-;this game has eaten up my life. Ive lost everyting my wife left me but in the end i still have civ the love of my life
ladueit;-;Great game, just what i expected. Series hasn't lost a step since the 90's
ladueit;-;Great game, just what i expected. Series hasn't lost a step since the 90's
frozenglass;-;10/10 Great gameplay, fun with friends and incredibly addicting.
Whakan;-;one ofthe more possitive time consuming games i have ever played, though its still lacking in some areas.
Wilbal (The Realest Kerbal);-;Don't buy it. It will consume your life Jk It's a ton of fun...until you're up until 3AM saying 1 more turn
Yolomr;-;I recommend this!
.png;-;THIS IS A FUN GAME AND I ENJOY IT
Jago9002;-;Just... one... more... TURN!
Goblins Blasting Off Again!!;-;This game is amazing. It offers a unique blend of strategic gameplay and cleverly paced action, I encourage anyone out there interested in strategy to try this game, also, even if you have never been into strategy, this games crowning achievement, in my opinion, is it's accessibility, I never played a Civ game before this one, but I'd like to think I'm decent at this game. BUT I do have one criticism about this game, if you are going to get this game, get it with either BNW or G&K, both would be great, but at least get one, because I think they left a lot of stuff out which is added in the DLCs which are necessary to a good experience (religion, good trade etc). So there it is, I hope you enjoyed my short and I hope informative review of Civilization V. Thank you for reading!
Elly Honda;-;I come with warnings. This game is addicting. If you have a job, a family, or anything that requires any type of attention, I recommend you don't play this game. Its amazinga and I think I've wasted entire summers just sitting here with the, "Just one more turn" virus. I bought this game years ago and still can't stop playing it....and I don't want to stop.
dAnK TuRtLEKiiNG;-;Great game for anybody, definitly worth your money
Orange Flow;-;So this one time i played this game with a guy named tiesto, and he was awesome, but he has gone to better things now. RIP tiesto. Thanks to this game you get to meet cool people like dad tiesto laurie dunn dunn and more. If you like strategy or online games in general you will love this game
Fluck!;-;Hello, Civ5! Goodbye, weeks of your life!
ArcticX9-poi;-;Just... One... More... Turn...
Prof. E. Cartmenez;-;marathon mode beste
Jensen;-;New dehli is the new world capital. Ghandi killed my kids. 6/6
Ulysses S. Grant;-;This game is fun
MacheteRurisk;-;Remember the good ol' days of playing Age of Empires for hours on end, and still barely scratching the surface? Well now imagine that you do the same thing but you haven't even seen the surface yet. Civ V is one of the best, and in-depth, strategy games I've played. It's a classic example of "Oh I'll just play for an hour or so" and the next thing you know the sun is rising and you've been up all night declaring war and toppling empires. Highly addictive, enormous fun, and multiplayer is brilliant, even locally. This game is worth whatever the price tag says.
designated entryfrag;-;Good game, excuse me but it's my turn again.
Riley;-;This game will destroy your social life.
Eatingasspatties;-;Incredibly addicting.
darksilents;-;it an interstating game to play i enjoy it
DrFrankenBalls;-;Civilization V is where you come to pour tons and tons of important hours of you life into an amzing game. It's worth it I promise. This is basically a electronic boardgame about the revolution of civilizations. You can play as any world leaders or your own character, and develop through time goes. Each turn equals to a year. And this game is very interesting, you can either be a warmonger and claim all the land or be friends with everyone and be very kind and work deep into politics. Declare war and trade all day and build until you fly into space itself. Civ V is a good game. So just buy it already. 9/10
ZZMitch;-;No other game feels as epic. The feeling of building a great Empire that can stand the test of time is really where Civilization 5 shines.
fireandhappiness;-;You get addicted, but it's a good addiction, and you should accept it
zapherix;-;Spectacularly fun, ridiculously addicting - you should just get the "Brave New World" expansion to start out with; the original and 1st expansion (Gods and Kings) still left the game a bit crippled with frustratingly random AI behavior, but the gameplay feels very solid and complete now. HUGE time sink :D
Professor Hudnall;-;Worth it, GOTY of the YEAR OF THE GAME IS GOOD BUY IS GOOD I PLAY YOU PLAY? YOU PLAY YOU BUY... YOU BUY.
Dr Penguin;-;It is amazing there is two DLC for it and that adds so much, but even with out the DLC It is still amazing you can play together to who will win. You can Amercia rule money and many Armys also so many other Countrys.
Hackstraordinary;-;This is an incredible game with a nice user-friendly interface and complex strategies. A lot of fun in multiplayer...defiently worth every penny :D
Koh;-;I love this one over all the rest, you cannot just stack your troops into an unstoppable one tile wide army, you have to use strategy. That being the main difference in the game, the rest is all Civilization, boot it up and kiss the next 24 hours goodbye as you time travel.
Alzern;-;great game
Jawzilla1;-;This game is ridiculously addicting. Would definitely recommend as it is a great strategy game.
31lh the Conga Dancer;-;I love this game you should get all the dlc
fisheadkds;-;This game is awesome!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Rachel Maddog;-;i made a civilization in this game. a civilization of fun!!! (not the band)
Aggressor(SOO GUD);-;good game if you have time for one game.
lepurcon;-;Three words best game ever!! Great game to kill time.
ace2445;-;Great game but will take a some time to finish it...
Temporalis;-;Highly recommended for 4X game lovers!
Idioglossia;-;One of the best incarnations of the Civ series. I know a lot of the hardcore players mourn the loss of the unit stack, but I prefer the one unit per tile style, even if the implementation has a few issues. With so many difficulty options, I recommend this to just about anyone. Start on the easy difficulty and work your way up. I'm still missing a win on the absolute top difficulty, but I'll get it eventually!
Samham;-;If there was a potato civ, I would be it.
Rajnovich;-;This is a very entertaining game. I find it very challenging, though that may say more about me as a player than it does about the game. It's a very good game from a genre I don't typically enjoy.
Georgia_is_a_Country;-;Get it.End of story.
Darth Revan;-;I will say this once, GET THIS GAME, realy fun with or without friends, great strategy game. all around 9/10 stars. Has some multiplayer bugs with the more people/bots in the game.
Krugy;-;Pretty fun game if you like building a civilization from the ground up!
shdwlr;-;I play this series since Civilization 2. It's worth it - trust me.
Mr.Thomson;-;Very good game, I advise everyone
IllusionMachine;-;Time consuming, but totally worth it.
Colin;-;Great turn based strategy game. Very in-depth with lots of worthwhile DLC available that adds significatly to gameplay.
Chameleon Man;-;Hands down the best strategy game you will play. Given the complexity of the game, the learning curve is steep, but not THAT steep. I've invested 200+ hours into the game and am still learning new things. Many improves in V make this game not only more approachable, but tactically different than it's predecessors. Various victory conditions and civilizations to play make this game such an amazing feat by Firaxis Games. A must buy!
gatorguy356;-;Never played a Civ game before I played this one and it is a lot of fun. Even without the DLC I played about 40 hours and with the expansions it is even more addicting. I bought it when it was on sale, but it's definitely worth full price.
pyto;-;Civilization series were always the most addicting, difficult and rewarding games ever. Civilization 5, alone or with Gods and Kings & Brave New World is the most time consuming devil that posses your time and will never give it back. Although your only way to resist is to click NEXT TURN and bring glory to your civilization. Most complex game with many victory types, strategies, difficulty levels (from easiest for even strategy noobies to most experienced generales who were raised with RTS by their sides), units, resources, everything... This game has everything that us - 'nerds' love. And you can read a book in one time while playing on Huge map around Atomic Era :D
8-Bitcarrot;-;That ghandi guy is really helpful.
Dragonvoka1;-;Amazing Game that forces you to balance between being nice with others and destroying your enemies to expand your empire.
ctrl-alt-del-u;-;Awesome game with the DLC but the standard version is missing a lot of stuff from older civs. Buy in bundle if price is reduced, but not only main game.
70sdude;-;It's like Risk, but no one is liable to flip the table on you! The DLC is must have and the Workshop community downloads are great for improving or mixing things up!
Hank Schrader;-;Really enjoyable game, extremely easy to sink hours and hours into it thanks to its good replay value.
kono;-;Solid strategy game, but make sure you have time on your hands if you want to jump into this game. Although it is quite time consuming, the size of this game is just unbelievable. A whole variety of civilizations, maps, victory types and military units cause you to mix different strategies to best conform with the current world, which is pretty swell.
Ginger;-;Great game for people who enjoy strategy games
FORGAN MREEMAN21;-;This game is an incredible game that appeals to those who love politics, strategy, and ideals of world domination. Build a nation from the ground up and conquer the world with your military, your nation's culture, or your amazing diplomatic powers. One of my favorites ever this game has certainly made me into a Civilization fan.
Der Soldat;-;Amazing. That's all I can label it as. Nothing is more fun than watching your enemies capital be ingulfed by a mushroom cloud from your nuclear arsenal. With plenty of modding capabilities, the possibilities for this game are endless. This game overs a great variety even without mods too! Will you be a kind and benevolent leader, or a merciless tyrant? Will you be a religious fanatic, or a rational heretic? Will you pull the World into Nuclear Conflict, or make World Peace? Will you stomp upon those weaker than you, or will you make allies and fight the neverending war machine? WIll you build a nation, that will stand the test of time?
fury;-;The best strategy game ever created! It is extremely fun and interesting, you will find yourself playing it for hours! The possibilities are endless in Civ 5. It is beginner-friendly as there is a bunch of hints and information that the game provides you as you play. Setting up a game is easy, there are also many options you can tweak to make your world what you want it to be. The DLC for this game is awesome and it adds even more variety to this game. Steam Workshop also adds mods to this game that you can download and have even more fun exploring Civ 5. Make your civilization grow from the ancient era to the future! You will find yourself addicted and going to the next turn and then the next turn. Multiplayer with your friends is very fun and you can team up! Overall, this game is worth it and I recommend Civ 5 to everyone!
PouffySubset;-;This game is amazing!
Dr.Rockzo;-;Honestly, if you are fan of Stategy games, CIV 5 is for you. Bots can actually be a challenge sometimes, but by far the most enjoyable way to play CIV is with friends. A huge selection of Civilizations to choose from, all with their own perks and specials. Game mechanics make sense to the idea of the game - To lead a Civilization throughout history. Better yet, like many steam games, the workshop for this game is great. Makes it just that much more replayable.
Why u heff to be mad??;-;Best Gandhi nuking simulator out at the moment. ++ Can nuke the Gandhi ++ Addicting -- Gandhi can nuke you
ryel97;-;I purchased this game for me and a friend, we went on multiplayer and it was feckin' awesome. This game will never get old and can be played over and over again for endless hours of fun.
stool;-;DON'T TRUST GHANDI
scout197;-;Best game has a lot of strategy and you can learn a lot and have a lot of fun
DKLarsen;-;This is a fun strategic game that will give you hours of fun gameplay for you and your friends.
Daniel;-;Amazing. multiple civs to play, multiple maps highly recommend that you try out some mods
MF-Satsum;-;Gods and kings really fleshes the game out. AI is better with the expansion, also.
Johnny Clocks;-;Very depthful game, worth the money and with so many ways to win and play out your games, you'll never get bored. Several means of winning, several means of those means of winning, difficulty ranging from a joke to PC defenestration, tons of empires available through DLC, plenty of multiplayer options and amazing visuals, from the world to the leaders. Comes with a massive Civilopedia explaining everything and in-depth game customization to make whatever you want out of it.
UPPY;-;This game is so addictive!
Magical Cactus;-;Civ 5 is (in my mind) a greatly improved version of Risk. I highly suggest that you buy and doanload all the addons/expansion packs for a more in depth playing experience.
diggles;-;love it!! definitely worth buying!
mynameisSMITH;-;Very fun game, this game is perfect for you if you love strategic games!
thebronzebiscut[US];-;great game! good graphics and gameplay!
ChargerNation;-;I thoroughly enjoyed this game. It is very fun and engaging.
MR.UNICORN;-;ITS AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
-AtF- Exh3r0;-;Great game just make sure you have all day to play a match.
Sam;-;If you're going to buy this game, buy the two expansion packs. They drastically improve gameplay. But, overall, this game is a great game and it will suck the life out of you.
[NMC] PluckDuck;-;I've been playing Civ since Microprose's first game. Boy, since the second one, Civ V is the most inovative yet loyal to original game general dinamics. Purists will initially dislike the abundance (or mere existence) of City-States, but once you start playing you'll see they contribute enormously to the game balance and a more dynamic early game stage. If wou like Turn Base Strategy games, Civilization V is mandatory.
Koen2000xp;-;Hands down an amazing game, with hundreds of replayable hours to be had. Each play through entails something different, sometimes providing frustrations (i.e wonder stealing and barbarian raids) but most of the time giving a very enjoyable gameplay experience. Online play is where this game peaks, get together with friends and have sessions as you advance through the ages and have a very good time. A definate jewel of a strategy game.
Eugatone;-;awesome game spent many hrs destroying civilizations and completing the space race...
CheesyChaplinator;-;This game is AWESOME just AWESOME, I've currently played it for just under 100 hours in a few weeks and I am completely addicted. 10/10 Easy.
Garreth.Vlox;-;Great game, best empire building sim I've played in a long time, and the DLC adds an amazing amount depth to the game making all those boring turns where you had to wait more interesting by giving you spies to control, a religion to build, famous works of art to create and collect and dozens of new buildings, multiple changes to cultural unlocks and culture trees a complete re-work of the culture system, and several new units that fill gaps that never should have existed. (No more 300 years of archers followed by 500 years of crossbowman fights.)
SilverSamurai;-;This is an excellent video game with lots of replay value and it's actually pretty quick to get the hang of things. I found that the advisors helped me to find my way quicker. You really have to think hard on the different choices you make so that actually adds to the fun I find. For instance you can make an error in the beginning of the game that can affect the whole outcome. I made a lot of mistakes my first playthrough (accidentally nuking the wrong person, attacking an ally, challenging a very powerful and well-armed Washington) and I think a lot of people will, but it really just helps you learn how to handle things next time. I recommend this to any gamer looking for a test of strategy, or just looking to have some fun.
Lt. Labcoat;-;In my opinion, it's the best of the Civilization series - and pretty much one of the best strategy games of all! ...or so I thought, until XCOM came around. Still, very fun, and everyone recommends it. The expansions are totally worth it as well! And the DLC... is pretty much as you'd expect - you'll know if you want it or not.
Able Jones;-;4/5 Endgame without DLC becomes Snoozeville. Buy.
larss.ogren;-;Excellent game, better with each installment!
[FBNOps]UncleDrax;-;ciV (civ-V / civ-5) with all the DLCs brings back everything you had in Civ-4, but with a bit more polish. If you can score this with Gods & Kings together on sale, grab it if you like the Civ franchise.
Siduakal;-;Sid. Meier's. Civilization. I think that just about sums it up, doesn't it?
Captain Vesta;-;10/10 Would Civ Again!
RHCP_Lickyz;-;Looking to waste your life away? Better get this!
Cerberus626;-;Incredibly in-depth, tactical experience, unrivalled by any game I've played to date. It's epic in scale, fantastic in gameplay and huge in scope and size. Purely magnificent.
Kaelypso;-;Great game. Make sure you get all the expansions in order to get the best out of it :)
Harold;-;This game is highly addicting and insanely fun. 1000/10. Advised to buy on sale as it's pricey as fudge.
Kosh;-;Good game, still miss some features 4 had though.
A band of gypsys;-;If I had to be fair, to play this game you should have six or more hours to spare. The time goes by fast but the game it's a blast. Do not trust Ghandi.
DyingBloodbirds;-;Boring kelley a$$ game that is only good for one playthrough. Don't regret the purchase though.
ScottishQualificationAuthority;-;Great Game!
Gene Creemers;-;Games sucks. 10 out of 5
Related Brick;-;This is an amazing game, I would recommend buying it. If you do buy it, make sure you have friends to play it with as it is much more fun with friends.
yang;-;amazing game. addictive and really fun. don't start playing right before finals week
Bree Valentine;-;Ghandi is a mass murderer in Civ 5, a game in which you sit around for 30 turns to make a single building. It's a fun game but even on the fastest setting makes "casual" a thing of the past, watch your armies crumble to shreds, your villages pillaged and destroyed, and learn to hate everyone around you today, In civilization 5.
Zeonic Muppet;-;Nothing beats taking over the world
Cap'n Turtle;-;Very fun game.... and you can optimize the options even for a crappy PC...
Jenlukepetemack;-;I freakin recommend this awesome game, buy it NOW!!!!!!!!!!!!
iiAVENGERii;-;Absolutely stunning game, battle with history's greatest leaders !!!
Weeaboo4L1F3;-;This game when it came out back in 2010 I went out immediately to buy it from Gamestop because I wanted a hard copy, since it's release they have added great DLC and we can expect more in the future. One of my favorite turn based strategies. Just like I would recommend before making any purchasing of a game watch a video on YouTube and get an idea if you would like to play what you're seeing in the video. I would recommend this game to really anyone it's just a great time wether you're just playing singleplayer or multiplayer.
Zoo256.plr;-;Great strategy game, especially if you've played any of the other Civilization games.
Kernel;-;Gandhi is the worst.
Blazer2K;-;A++ would play again
erb4t;-;It will take over your life
Kaashar;-;Excellent Turn Based Strategy game, can't recommend it enough.
trippy;-;Great game! 12 + ppl makes it redick
mglan80;-;Good game, but seems a little lacking in the replayability.
tigerninja44;-;Awesome game, very addicting. Lots of ways to win and love the real historic figures in the game.
Hot Lips;-;Today I went to Starbucks with my genderqueer non-binary friend. I had a bagel, green tea with honey and a late to go and xi had a salad and a water because xi is watching xir weight. We were sitting eating and talking quiet happily when suddenly we heard a little child speaking to his/her brother/sister (my apologies for not knowing these kids real gender identities; their father called them boys but you can never be too sure, considering the white cissexist  that was about to come out of this fathers mouth, I wouldnt be surprised if they were girls). Kid B (the younger one) says to kid A, youre a lesbian! and quick as a flash the father lies, Boy cannot be lesbian, drink your lemonade! WTF JFC! I WAS APPALLED! This is horrible! I almost jumped over the table and across the chairs and punch that  in the face! I mean SO MANY THINGS WRONG with what he said to the poor child. Boys CAN be lesbians if they identify as lesbians. I have a number of cis male lesbian friends. He was blatantly erasing their entire lived experiences with such an ignorant lie! I couldnt believe what we were hearing (xi was in the brink of tears). The kid was 4 years old. How does that father KNOW that his child wont grow up to identify as a lesbian! s like this is why I firmly believe cis s are scum! This is why I believe in Tumblr Feminism!!  THE CIS HETERO PATRIARCHY AND  CULTURE!! I should not that during all this time, the mother was sited next to this man. She kept quiet all the time, no doubt she was abuse by the bruise marks on her face. I know most people in Tumblr DONT believe in the patriarchy,  culture, or equal rights to non-cisgender people. However if you do as I do, and you seek justice as I seek it, then I ask to please reblog! In this game, you can make your Civilization identify as whatever xi wants to.
Vedrana!;-;lost hours of my life
Peter Gremmy;-;This game was worth every penny.
jsalat403;-;Addictingly brilliant. I've lost entire days playing this, and I have no intentions of stopping anytime soon. Each playthrough, leader, map, and (perhaps most wonderfully) mod, presents a new an unique experience.
<Screaming Internally>;-;I really went out of my comfort zone when i asked for this game as a gift, and i must say that i love this game. Fairly engaging, good depth, and countless ways to go about tending to your civilization. +++ Recommend buying for all types of gamers!
Desuberniis;-;One of the best games ever if you have a nice group of friends to play with. Me and my pals play all the time. worth the buy. also note YOU DO NOT NEED GOLD TO GET BRAVE NEW WORLD
Sahara Smoke;-;Love it you all should play this great game.
TIStiles;-;Great game that you can play multiple times and each time is different.
Murder Claus;-;this game is good everyone should buy it
TrueDeathGM;-;This game is really fun and you can spend hours playing a single round. I reccoment getting all the DLCs when their on sale, the DLCs are really good and add alot of content. The only thing I don't like is that the ai isn't very agressive.
Orpheus;-;Wow, this game is SOOOOOOO addicting! PLAY IT, PLAY IT NOW! (i sold my car to buy the game and expansion packs)
Vagrant|Naxx;-;Wonderful game. hours of playability.
TheMrR0wan;-;Im not a big stratagy guy, but when i was told to purchase this game i've never looked back on the decision, worth every penny 20/10 IGN
Pirate_Pete;-;Quite hard but is fun
gingy_94;-;Nothing like earning the trust of a civilization in the game, to then backstab it with trebuchets and cannons and conquer over half its cities. Or impose your religion over others. Or lose your friends forever. 10/10 reccomended
Deoxys;-;Great game! Reminds me of Age of Empire.
Rezxure;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING!
GrizzlyGru;-;Ghandi is a massive
DoGe;-;It's a great game i recommend it
Chawls;-;Such expansion, much content, so depth, wow.
Indigo;-;This game is very addictive. If you thought Civ 4 was good, you should give this game a go. It really is fun.
Austen;-;Awesome game! I normally have trouble focusing for more than 5 minutes but I've logged 60 hours already. A lot of game mechanics to learn, but overall it equates to a very fun game.
That_Guy;-;A turn based strategy game that has held me in its clutches since the 4th installment. It passes my time much too quickly.
Enbagel;-;I could have mastered any skill of my choosing but instead I play this game. If you want to lose hours upon hours of your life play this vidja game.
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
AlaskaGames;-;This is a great game! I haven't played for a long time, but so far, I love it! The graphics are great, it runs perfectly on my laptop, the worlds randomly generate, making it a different challenge each game, the AI is amazing, the robot turns don't take long at all to generate, and the game goes from Easy to Hard at just the right speed, so you can learn how to play before the AI's destroy you(or before you destroy them). Probably hundreds of different buildings to build, a lot of stuff to research (from discovering how to farm to Giant death robots and nukes), plenty of different army choices, and... and... and..... So far I can't seem to find any flaws in this game... I might find one or two later on, but so far it's just awesome. I'm gonna be playing this for a while.
Protoman x Wily;-;Quite possibly one of if not my favorite games of all time. Having grown up with the series, I feel Civ V takes the very best of the previous games and makes it more consice and streamlined. I highly recommend this game to those who have never played any of the previous games and enjoy strategy games as it is an excellent place to start. 9.7/10
|OVG| Syfur;-;Civ 5 its expansion packs and DLCs are simply the best of the Civ series. Each adding a slew of new features to the base game. If you like strategy games, Buy it now!
skydriver559;-;Prepare to have huge chunks of your life waste away! Sleep, you wont need that! Have snacks close at hand and many hours available away from freinds and family...nothing will matter whilist in this game! Enjoy!
kenazdraco;-;I can play this game for days straight without eating or sleeping.
Literally;-;I spent around 3 hours making a society, and then Spaniards just bulldozed it all. Needless to say, game is good.
rdM.Monstar;-;Fun as . dope as  shawty
ryan.jav;-;most awesome things ever
SirShotgun;-;Does time pass by like its a rocket ship on cocaine? Do you wonder where the past 2 weeks have gone? Do you ask yourself why can't you go to bed? If you answered yes to these three simple questions than you are either on cocaine, or playing Civ 5. This game will literally make you advance into the future at a rate of 2-5 times normal time speed* and will also cure un-insomnia. This game is great for anyone who is on cocaine and needs to stop. *Time Speed not an actual term
Angel With A Shotgun;-;Sid Meier's Civilization is one of the most enjoyable games ever designed. It runs smooth without glitches, and has an amzing soundtrack to acompany the amaing gameplay.
Alias: Pickle Train;-;This game is immensely fun. There is nothing like building an army, attacking a weaker nation and then conquering them. However, in civ, you have to be able to take losses, because you will take a lot of them as well, but thats half the fun. Civ also puts a lot of stress onto resource management and city placement, because a good first city can give you a tremendous head start, while a poor one can stack the odds against you before you even begin, and trust me, the AI can smell weakness.
Eclipse;-;This game is endless fun, you can create an empire and be friendly or destroy everyone you see
Benj;-;An ace game, not bad for a fiver
vanderveldenaj;-;I really enjoy playing this game. There are lots of ways to win with great replay ability.
MadZep;-;This game is the best game I have ever played.
Sir Tadmos;-;This game is rather exquisite. It inspires me to raise an army and conquer the world with brute force. Thank you for your time.
jmart0325;-;Full of Entertainment, best thing is that every game is different.
what is love;-;bichass game 10/10
Barack Obama;-;Very amazing game.Online could use some work and i feel like you have to buy the dlc to get into a online game sometimes but its really fun when your in one.One of the best Strategy games i have ever played.Its not like Total war though,their is a strategy to military units and how you use them and place them but its not complex or anything.Its mostly about growing your civilization and becoming number 1 through military,diplomicy,science,or cultural.Each civilization has its own "perks" and had advantages.For example,japan military units fight at full strength even when damged or russia gains double the amount of strategic resources when harvested. Its also very cool to see time go by and how your civlization changes especially in the modern age.When you get really far in the game you even get to nucular weapons which is when it gets really crazy and the space age etc. If you get gods and kings,which i highly recemend also,it adds religion and the modern age is split it to more ages and last allot longer which is a good thing.You also have vast game options for what you want your game like,you can decide if theirs barbs,how many city states,what type of map you want to play on (Around 25 or so map types.Example:pangea,continents,small continents,islands,europe, etc.)you can set at the pace of the game to make it go faster like building and learning stuff faster,you can set turn timers for online games,set the age of planet,amount of resources on map,and allot more crazy stuff like sea level and more! Anyone who is a fan of strategy games,this is a MUST buy.Though its not perfect,military i feel like could have more strategy but theirs enough to make it competive and to where you can beat a civilization with a much stronger military if you have good unit placement and where you maek them attack etc.Without gods and kings some civilizations are a little overpowerd like france and ai can be s sometimes which is why i play online.Overall this game is great and one of the best strategy games i have ever played,better than total war in my opinion.
MOwensGaming;-;Challenging and crazy fun. This game makes time disappear.
Trojan Panda;-;This game is very addictive and is very fun to play. And I higly suggest this game. This game gets even better with the big and small dlc's like Brave new world and Gods and kings and other dlc's and expansions
SAWinters;-;Let your imagination flow and empire grow.
Greenchan;-;This game is the best strategy game I have played ever! You should get it NOW!
xsandman32;-;Excellent upgrade to the previous release of Civ.
Owlet;-;I got this game with my pre-order of XCOM Enemy Unknown. And I have played it almost twice as many hours. Alright, so the net code is largely wank. Hamachi can fix that. With steam workshop support it's very easy to mod, and can greatly enhance your experience.
peon;-;amazing game to play with friends or single player
leth4lerr0r;-;If you like long drawn-out strategy games and building things, then this is the perfect game for you. The biggest difference of Civ V with its predecessors is immersion. When playing Civ V, it's very easy to become emotionally attached to your civilization. Be ware, however, that Civ V is long and drawn out, even on quick mode. A full-scale game can often last weeks and even months, and it's difficult to keep your body alive while partcipating in a game of Civ V.
Originalyeti82;-;Run. Look away from this place. If you delve deeper, you won't escape. The only thing worse than a wonderful game, is a wonderful game that never ends. Now if you'll excuse me, Ghandi's totalitarian regime is demanding Brazil's sacred Jewel mines.
Havelmonster;-;Very good game. Title is deceiving though, Sid Meier is NOT a playable leader.
Mr. Shens;-;Class.
wy789;-;This game is AWESOME if you like strategy games... Wish I had someone to play it with...
Fazzie;-;This game is a game. A good game.
Corthlan;-;It's really quite a fun game. You can choose whether to make it fast games or epic long games. plus the modding community seems pretty large.
lewie;-;If you've ever wanted to be Ghandi, build the Great Wall of China in the middle of Africa, or blow the  out of George Washington with a Nuclear bomb, you should play this game.
cooliocaptin517;-;This game has no relation to the sloth named Sid in Ice Age.
Sneebly;-;Just to give this review some perspective, I've been playing the various iterations of Civ for a very, very long time. I remember playing the original like it was yesterday. Beavis and Butthead on the TV, Nirvana on the radio, and me on my Packard Bell. I spent hours in my mom's basement, wasting away from rickets while the normal kids were soaking up the sunlight, going out on dates, playing sports, and leading generally normal, productive lives. Civ 1 really messed up my life...but in a completely awesome way. I mean, I couldn't get enough. Doubly so with Civ 2. The things you could do with that game. It had...personality. I remember little stuff, like the different architectural styles, that gave the game such an immersive quality. I remember how every time I played, the world had its own story, and how things would seem to take on a life of their own. The endless war with the Mongols, my alliance with the Germans, butting heads with Caesar. I learned more about history there than I ever did in school. It was fantastic. I didn't even play to win most of the time. I was a fifteen year-old kid in a sandbox. I got older, and Civ grew with me. I spend endless hours on 3 and 4, balancing game commitments and my real life. When Civ 5 was announced, I didn't hesitate. I bought it immediately. In short, it didn't take me long before I realized that this new Civ was nothing like the Civ of old. I've never played Revolutions, but I've heard there is a lot of overlap. I don't know. What I do know is that this game is boring. Really, really boring. Never have I clicked the "next turn" button like I have here. Maybe it's because it takes forever to build anything...so long, in fact, that it's easier just to hoard gold and buy things. Maybe it's because expansion and/or conquest isn't really encouraged. The seemingly massive happiness hit just makes it unreasonable. So I sit there, just watching the world slowly go by. And how slow it is...the loading screen between turns has become my nemesis. I've turned the "superb" graphics down to their lowest setting, just to speed things up, and to keep things from jumping from one side of the world to the other every time I scroll my mouse. Just to be clear, I have a computer that can run all the latest shooters, yet cannot run a turn-based strategy game aimed at a mass audience. The AI is dumb and unfinished. If my dog had fingers, he could win on prince at least. I don't consider myself the smartest strategist, but I have never lost a war in Civ 5. Ever. I started on warlord, then prince, then king. Onward and upward I went, until I quickly realized that the AI wasn't getting smarter. It was just cheating. This was acceptable 15 years ago, not now. Why is Gandhi determined to kill me? After 2000 years of good relations, he wants to kill me. Not a biggie, mind you, because all he does is park archers next to my swordsmen, where I can promptly slaughter them. After I defeat his army (without taking any cities), he offers me all of his resources, all of his gold, and all of his cities (except for his capital, of course). He just gives up. I take him up on his offer, because I am obviously smarter than him. But that means my happiness tanks, my production stops, and my steady income stream is now in the red. Whatever. I still have 3 swordsmen and 2 archers. I can conquer the world with that. Screw culture. Did I mention the music? Man, it's boring. No more period specific soundtrack, tribal or classical. Just the turn-based equivalent of elevator music. I'm sure the graphics are the bees-knees, but with me playing on the lowest graphics setting, I will never know. City-states, which were made out to be a big deal, are not. They ask for stuff, you give it to them (or not). They give you stuff (or not). That is the extent of the city-state strategy. Boring. Actually, the city-state thing reminds me of a problem I have that extends beyond the poor quality of this game. Professional reviews. Why did every professional game review outlet give Civ 5 high marks. 9/10. A+. Really? Every review I've seen has been the same. "It has hexes!" "It has city-states!" "One unit per tile!" "Ranged combat!" "Beautiful graphics!" I even saw reviews gushing over how cool the opening sequence was (you know, the one you can't skip). For one, I am tired of seeing the old man in the hut every time I load up. I find it oddly fishy that no "professional" reviewer has brought up the bugginess; the fact that you need an internet connection; the fact that you need Steam; the fact that the AI stinks; etc, etc, etc. Just hexes and city-states. Either they were told to write a good review by the "powers that be," or they spent a total of 3 hours playing before writing their reviews. Either way, I will never trust a professional review source ever again. I gave this game 2 stars, because I believe it still has the potential to be good. After a few expansions, some mods, a Rhys and Fall, a Fall From Heaven. Yeah, it could be good. I've played around 60 hours, and still see a spark of genius here. But it will take an awful lot of work. Right now, it's like watching paint dry.
ScheduledTiger;-;Mods are brilliant
Gusty;-;Honestly a game to suck you in but you will never make it out, as it is very addicting to either see be the warlord you are inside, or the kind hearted diplomat with a passion for victory without violence, or even in some cases the pious religous leader you were meant to be. This game is easily my favorite
Microsoft Word;-;I can't help but recommend this game. Hours of playtime at a reasonable cost.
It's reid;-;I have been using this game to predict upcoming world events, and it has been about 85% accurate in 60 cases. 9/10
Gandalf The Rainbow;-;This is the BEST strategy game ever. I have to admit......... I can't stop playing it. Nothing is more fun than being able to be your favorite civilization, then conquering the world with them. AMAZING GAME! BUY IT!
comandocreeper;-;Very in depth, although there are some massivly overpowered civs like Russia. Just as warning, Ghandi is not your friend past the atomic era
guidex;-;This is a brillant game for people with a bit/lot of spare time, with is beatiful grahpics and amazing featurers, watch your CIVILIZATION grow. sorry for te cheeseyness also if theres any spelling errors.
8Bit;-;One of the best games eveer!
FrightenedInmate4;-;Very addictive
Ser Jorah Mormont;-;Reviews are unecessary. Just buy it, you'll like it, whether if you like it or not.
Ice-T [fukthis];-;g8 gam 4 all of de kiddies these dayz
Sgt. Allen;-;kinda fun to get giant death robots and destroy cities,pillage stuff and get wonders and buldings and bownmans, and more. pretty fun
[RBL]eel_deuce;-;Absolutely love this game. one... more... turn.../10
....G......;-;Wait! Just... one... more... turn...
Rick James;-;Now I understand how that Chinese guy died playing WOW...
Arrow_of_Acid;-;If you like your social life, but you want this game, you have to choose. You aren't allowed both.
[CH] Sr. Defumado;-;"Just another turn, and I'll stop playing" Your mind will repeat it untill you notice you haven't eat for a whole day.
snakepgua;-;One of the best in its class!!!!!!
Zanori;-;This game is my favourite game at the moment, it's a good strategy game with a nice look to it. Not acurate to history at all, (if you don't use mods at least). It's very fun to play with friends, try not to get too competative though.
Darkflameninja;-;its pretty good :)
freshmang0;-;turn based 4x strategy game, is there anything more exciting and visceral nah but really tho this game is well goooooood ive spent way too much time on it it's addictive also flip u henry with ur flippin chinese domination rush also buildin the great wall u scrub
indy19900;-;Fantastic game. Very addictive. Decided to play a few turns then it had been 5 hours
ItalianGuy235;-;One more turn my . Seriously do not think you are going to just quickly make a few turns in this game and go. I once started playing at 8am thinking "eh, I'll play a little bit." and next thing I know it was 2pm and I was slaughtering the Japanese mercilessly. This game will cause you to get fired, fail your classes, get a divorce, and nuke Ghandi all at the same time. I am serious here, the commercials for this game do not lie and I have been apart of a Civ 5 recovery group for a few weeks now. 15/10 would buy again.
Mace The Moose;-;With no prior experience with these games, I decided to try it. I became hooked instantly. Just a couple of hours and you have a basic understanding. I know people with hundreds of hours in this game, still discovering new things. 100% worth it.
Quattro;-;The most fun I've had in a long time. 10/10
purple panda;-;best game to get if you wanna play against mates in a long battle. loads of diferent ways to win and all, you dont have to be agressive. you can do waht you want with your country and i love it!
Russianmonkey96;-;if you like to spend hours playing as russia just to butt  america or any other equally annoying country get this game. you start out as 2 units some  settlers and some soldiers who are ing terrible. then you slowly build your way up to the point where you can Nuke your enemies with little to no consquences. The a.i. will hate you but who gives a , not this guy. So after your done with you little nuclear holocaust, why not start another game. This time you can win a diplomatic victory which will never work out, or you could win as a cultural victory which is boring as , same as the time victory.
Ereber;-;I would recomend starting at warlord difficulty for new peoples
Common;-;Play this if you can afford to become a NEET. It's a very fun game, but far too addicting to the point that your first gameplay will last you at least 10-15 hours. That's only the tutorial. I would give this a 10/10, but this game takes you far away from friends, family and loved ones to the point of no return. 8/10 - Would play it never again (unless I suddenly had no one in the world)
Not a Weeaboo;-;Great game
Jimmy;-;Very addicting game!
gkaran89;-;Love the series! I am very happy with the linux port as well! A must have game.
ceej12;-;Civilization V is based around international diplomacy. It is a turn-based strategy game that allows you to make alliances or enemies; peace or war. You can play as various empires, from England to Rome, America to Egypt. Each nation has a couple special things, such as a special building and a special unit. You can expand your empire by building cities and buying "tiles". You can go to war with nations to capture their territory, or you can be neutral and never go to war. You can start the game just after the invention of agriculture, and from there you research new technologies, starting with things like "animal husbandry" and ending with things like "nanotechnology". Each technology unlocks new things to build and use; for example, researching "mining" allows you to build mines, while researching "industrialization" allows you to build factories. There are various difficulties to choose from, so no matter your skill level, you should enjoy the game. The win conditions are various "victory types"; for example, you can take over everyone else through military and win a domination victory, or you can launch a rocket to Alpha Centauri, winning through a science victory. There are other ways to win as well. Building "wonders", major buildings from history that each give unique bonuses and advantages, allows you to dominate the score board. There are many wonders that could be built, such as the Great Library, Stonehenge, the Great Wall, the Statue of Liberty, and the Hubble Space Telescope. There are two major expansion packs that you can buy, Gods & Kings (allows you to found your own religion and spread it around the world, among other things) and Brave New World (allows you to build trade routes and get involved in international diplomacy through the World Congress/United Nations). Other more minor DLC are available as well, such as Polynesia and Korea. Civilization V also has mod support, and mods are quite easy to make using the included Civilization V SDK tool. Using this, you can make new civilizations, buildings, technologies; the possibilities are almost endless. You can also download other people's mods through the Steam Workshop. My rating of it: 10/10 + Enourmous fun, with a bit of history education hidden throughout. + Permits endless mods and mod possibilities. + Unbelievable amount of replay value. - Can be hard on the computer in the later parts of the game.
MrRobotFalcon;-;One of the greatest strategy games I have ever played! I recommend it to anyone interested in playing strategy games!
The White Man;-;this  ballin
when ur pizza rollz r dun;-;I forgot about my Life..... 10/10
welp...;-;The best turn-based game i have ever played. Loved all the expansions and DLCs. and don't trust AI Ghandi.
NicNukem;-;this game is freaking awesome you can  and pilage anything and everything
yuftynosefish;-;Mildly beast.
SmellOfPetroleum;-;If you haven't already, try looking through the advanced game options. There are some fun combinations that aren't in normal game modes. Also try the mod community for more variety.
elstonko;-;its awsome if you like strategy games
Kuiper;-;I bought this game a week ago, and in that week's time, I managed to clock more than 40 hours. Nearly every waking moment that I wasn't at work was spent playing this game. That's kind of scary, and I think I'm going to uninstall this and not touch it for a long time, but that's in part because I think I've sort of exhasted most of what the game has to offer me at this point. Although the hex tiles are a HUGE improvement over previous games, compared to Civ 4, it feels like less of a strategy game and more of a tactics game, and there are other games that do tactics better than Civ 5. In terms of performance, I've been playing on a Sandy Bridge i3 with integrated graphics, and the game has been pretty smooth when using tactical view (replaces all tiles/units with 2D icons), which is how I have been playing the game for the past 20 hours, but running the game in "normal mode" makes it run like molasses for me, even when playing smaller games with 6 civilizations.
Sukides (sue - key- des);-;The game seemed to lose its replay value for me after 350 hours. But still, 350 hours.
Nero;-;I dont like strategies, but this strategy is beautiful!
Robert Wiesehan;-;I cannot effectively articulate how awesome this game is. Mind the system requirements, but if you meet them, play it!
Axel;-;if you ask me none of the other civs seem all that civilized. gandhi nuking my capital twice screw you gandhi
ToyGoat;-;so fast paced 10/10
Civ5master;-;If you like games where you can go to war, explore the land, create an empire, and rule the world, then you need this. Amazing graphics, cool scenarios, and a bunch of characters to choose from, this is one of the best strategy games I've ever played. Get it. It's worth it.
Harrison_YoloSwag420BlazeIt;-;its not poochies
Black Jesus;-;best sid meiers game by far it is a very fun game and u dont finish games to fast but it dosent take to long
Coach;-;Game is fun.
Goodwin Cockburn;-;The greatest RTS game ive ever played, and considering ive played over 1,000 hours and am still wanting more, i recomend this to anyone who loves the RTS gameplay.
Hansen;-;Awesome strategy game, that gives you the opportunity, to play as you like!
LycaNinja;-;Once you learn how to ing play it correctly... Holy ...
globally;-;just one more hour... oh look, the sun is coming up
flack;-;This Gandhi guy...
Shaddow;-;10/10 would play again.
Raeraethegiant;-;Love this game!
Pete;-;Start with nothing and build a global empire, use diplomacy, trade, economic sanctions and brute force to expand over your foes. Re-enact real life histrorical events such as; Ghandi being a  and nuking your cities in 1700 AD. Queen Elizabeth lecturing you on your expansionist policies. and much much more... Fun game to play, but it's such a time sync it's unreal, start a game at midday on a saturday, and you won't have finished it by the next week. Fun & lengthy gameplay, 8/10 would recommend.
kjmcginnis64;-;Most awesome game ever!
Semke;-;May not seem like fun, but yet it is and addictive as ! Really recommend
PvtFishy;-;Really good game but you should get the DLC because it makes the game a lot better.
Cuuniyevo;-;Justdownload the demo already. Then you can see for yourself why I spent 19 hours on my first match in a single 36-hour period (I'd be more precise if I could remember; it's kind of a blur).
Pizzaready;-;Just wait until I get my B-52s guys! 10 destroyed ryans/10
Chrysalis of Borg;-;It's fun ruleing the wolrd
ys;-;Get it now. Awesome game.
Reaper;-;2 weeks playing one game (max civs, city states) and still not finished!
N1001001S Pews;-;Truely excellent, eventually a marvelous sequel after poor attempts of Civilization 3 and 4. This has the feel of Civilization 2 but with greater depth and more thought put into fighting and cultural strengths and weakness'. Would buy this game again and wouldn't regret it in a heartbeat!
abdhbal;-;That's how you make a game! Epic game playing and soundtracks!
xsubtownerx;-;Civilization V (complete) is easily one of the best TBS 4x games ever made. http://youtu.be/j3wszSU-gIw http://youtu.be/T7niLhVdNUE
bcruze7;-;Great game. Fun solo or with Friends.
Dragoon;-;Much time Such Strategy Wow
Riley;-;A nice game for heavy-weighters and black people!!
SomeSchmuck;-;Ridiculously addictive. I always end up coming back and blowing hours on this game.
Waddles;-;Ruin My Life (Five Star)
Waddles;-;Ruin My Life (Five Star)
Star;-;I don't think I can say anything about this game other than "its great and interesting".
Paladinblood2k;-;Great Game
MaartenGuy;-;This is one of the games that I prefer to play the most. This game is so nice that your expierience is so worth it, that you will remember this game for ages. Thank you Steam.
CreepyMojo;-;Fun, addictive, colorful game. Not perfect, but a lot of fun for everyone.
Fuck Baby Boy;-;Runing a Civilization into the ground is great. Get the expansion packs, or you won't get a nice, full experience.
Llama King;-;this game ia a plague, first it looks fun and harmless but then you get addicted and cant stop playing, save yourselfs
VectorX;-;A lot of my friends, myself included, played previous installations of Civ and fell in love. Civ 5 is the latest installation and, while having a rough start, has slowly progressed into a fun game. I will admit, the change in style was very difficult to get over. I played many hours of Civ 4 and when I started Civ 5 it was a mixed bag. I was so happy at the updated graphics. The game looks gorgeous but it came at the cost of some reworking in the play style. After getting used to the play style, it doesn't mean as much, but it is something to consider for prospective buyers. That also being said, another thing to consider is the hardware aspect. This game is a memory hog and for some reason, really hits hard on non-SSD hard drives. I had to put in extra 120mm fans on my case to keep the heat down. The longer you play a game, the slower the game runs. If you have a high end gaming system, you'll be fine. Otherwise, be prepared to start your game in mid-low settings in graphics in order to accommodate for late game slowness.
mosaicorange;-;I was never a fan of the Sid Meier games, but I guess 200+ hours can change things ;-D LOVE THIS GAME!!!
realEE.;-;I have played a lot of Civ IV (not on steam) and this game is a little bit different. I'd say it's a little bit easier, since multiple religions don't make unhappiness, and ofcourse we have global happiness now, instead of city happiness. Overall I really like the game, it's simply addicting. Though the only stuff that annoys me is that you can't stack military units. I don't say it's bad, it's only that I didn't get used to it yet. Great game a strong 7.5/10 from me. Best of turn-based strategy games.
Zoomee;-;Really good game and very addictive. Once you get the hang of it it becomes a amazing battle between lands
ButtonOfPressability;-;Civilation V
BOT Bruce;-;1700 We blast off into space (Real life) 2000 We're working on it!
ZeroCool;-;One of the games worth playing.
BOT Charlie;-;I liked this game great city management. I liked the hitorical accuracy of the special units great people and leaders.
Seal.jpg;-;Is a fun game if you want to spend a long time to play. If you enjoy management and strategy you will enjoy yourself. There are very little amount of bugs and glitches but the game can run slow if you have a poor coomputer. Overall I would give this a 8.5 out of 10.
Kaiser Wilhelm II;-;Possibly the best game I have ever played
Glollum;-;An amazing, addictive, turn based strategy. Modding and multiplayer are incredibly easy to use. Brave New World is an awesome expansion! If you haven't played it, go buy it. Now.
TehGingerSheep;-;Probably my favourite game to play on the computer. must get.
EpicGaben64;-;I really like this game.
Devas^3.NO MMR;-;Cant Stop Playing After Knew How To Play...+100
Zeh Lothiack;-;Civilization is one of the few games that is really worth it's price. You can keep playing it fo as long as you want and every time it will present you with chalenges and meaninful decisions. Not that 8 hours disposable crap you are used to. BUY IT NOW.
chivajuan415;-;Very fun, just dont promise"one more turn" to anybody while playing.
The Real Patricio;-;One word: Epic.
[29th]WarriorPoet;-;I went into playing Civ 5 with a grain of salt. Civ4 was my very first computer game, and I remember being real excited when its sequel was announced. When I looked at many of the reviews for this game, they were very negative, saying that it was dumbed down and bad. I got this game, and I started playing... If you expect it to be a super-hard strategy game, well, you're going to be disappointed. But I don't think its dumbed down; it feels just like Civ4. There are a couple new mechanics, though none of them really effect gameplay in a big way. However, it's still just as easy and entertaining as 4. The gameplay is simple, (which I found particularly nice, considering that learning new mechanics would mess with my Civ4 habits) and yet is very engaging. I started playing this, worried whether ot not it'd be worth it, at about 1820: I stopped playing it at 2000. I felt like I was playing Civ4 with more countries and some new features. All in all, Civ5, no matter what you here, is worth the money. It has scenarios that I haven't even delved into yet, (in my opinion they were one of the best part of 4 and Warlords) and plenty of mod support. The graphics, obviously, are much better, which gives you something a little prettier to look at as you build your country. So what are you waiting for? BUY IT!!! Actually, buy Civ4 first and THEN buy this.
YamiSnake78;-;-WARNING!- Sid Meier's Civilization V is not for everyone, including people with a sleep schedule, a job, a relationship, or any iota of social-life semblance. Side effects may include sleep deprivation, paresthesia, insufficient/excessive food intake, vision impairment and induced mind-control/soul extraction. Chronic use can lead to visualing costs, turns, and production rates of buildings, artworks, and people, as well as prolonged discussions with your socks, shoes, or other footwear. Occassionally, Civ 5 can lead to implusive purchases of airplane tickets to India; inadvertently causing public disturbances by spewing profuse rage-filled threats of nuclear warhead usage and words of denouncement towards a man who's been dead for 60+ years, followed by detainment under police custody. Ask your doctor if it's right for you!
NUDE DAD SURFIN THE WEB;-;Civ V is not every Civ player's cup of tea because it drastically changed Civ from its original formula. That said, I prefer this formula. No more 'stacks of doom' gameplay, and the new hex grid is much more aesthetically pleasing. Animated civ screens add a lot to the experience and make it feel less like you're playing against board game pieces and more playing against people. Civlopedia is great for people who love reading about any stuff about the civs that I didn't know without opening up wikipedia. Game mechanics are properly introduced to new players.
scarybirdmanfish;-;It is an excellent game! I highly reccomend to anyone that enjoys strategy.
mr shoe;-;Deep and satisfying game, with interlocking systems and overlapping objectives making play extremely compulsive. Factions have enough subtle differences and individual personality that it's always rewarding to replay as someone else, and the way random maps build so many stories of which cities rise and fall through fortunate resources or the placement of agressive neighbours is a delight. Sometimes the excellent sandbox pieces fall just short of fitting into as great a game though. Computer opponents are never really smart enough to impress, and higher difficulties increase the challenge more through unfair feeling bonuses rather than superior AI. For all the intricate depth of the technology and culture paths and alternative victory conditions to aim for it's also a bit of a shame that unless forced otherwise by setting extra rules a jack-of-all trades military strategy alway seems most powerful.
xremix16;-;This game. THIS GAME. I never thought I would ever like a strategic came like this. It ended up being one of my favorites to play this year. It'll have you wondering why Washington was a jerk and why South Korea likes Truffles so much. 10/10. I would buy this game again in a heartbeat.
MineMods24;-;Pure Addiction, like crack, once you start you can't stop.
JaRHeaD / Won't be on till 9PM;-;Always the Best in its genre.
Corrog6154;-;Addicting. That's my one-word concept for this review. Sid Meier's Civilization V is addicting. It's like a drug. You try it for the first time, and you like it a little, and tell yourself, "I can quit any time I want." Then, a week and 5 Civ sessions later, you find yourself spouting the game's mantra, "Just... One... More... Turn." The gameplay is fun and inviting, in the early stages of the game. Lack of proper preparation can get you killed on the harder difficulty levels, but it's pretty forgiving on the easier difficulties. And there is something oh so satisfying about ruling an entire empire, especially in the later portions of the game, when you have the entire world at your fingertips. The graphics are much improved over previous iterations of the game. The new hexagon tile system works better than the old square based system as well. The AI is also better, though still frustratingly simple-minded. The amount of times they've declared war on me for the simple act of making friends with other city-states is astounding. Speaking of, city-states are a worthwhile entry into the series. They add an entire new element, giving you someone to barter with or an extra thorn in your side, depending on how you play the game. They can mostly be manipulated at will, but the ease with which an enemy civilization can bring them into a war effort against you can be alarming. Most of the time, they don't factor into a war very much, but occasionally they will send out a unit to battle. Overall, this game is fun, inventive, and rewarding to play. But all of that only really tells you one thing: this game is... Addictive.
AciDemon;-;All-time Favorite Franchise. Highly recommended.
Alan;-;I keep on coming back to Civilization V for another play, just like I have done since Civ. 1! The expansion packs have added to my enjoyment. It's easy to start playing and to learn the mechanics as you go. The advisors are informative without being obtrusive. It may take many hours to play an entire game on the bigger maps but it's very easy to play a couple of turns when I've a few minutes spare. My only gripe is how long loading a save game takes towards the latter stages of a game on huge maps.
gusarito;-;A great strategy game for singleplayer and multiplayer. Rule the world, build a spaceship, destroy a city with giant death robots, and discover the new world in your first caravel. JUST ONE MORE TURN...
Fatalxheadshotx;-;Great game however i am having a little trouble getting the steam workshop items to work on it please fix that
Kougar;-;This game is addictive for any RTS or world-builder fan. The addition of the Gods & Kings DLC though truly makes this a must-have. The Gods & Kings DLC completely rebalances and overhauls the game in too many ways to list, starting with the wonders, the buildings, the units, the combat system, diplomacy, navel warefare, and adds religion and espionage elements to the game for the truly detail-oriented RTS gamers that enjoy maximizing their strategies. There are few things left to critique with the G&K expansion now added, other than perhaps the sheer length of time a "standard" turn game will require! The only major issue consumers need to be aware the map pack DLC is for single player only, which is unfortunately as multiplayer would greatly benefit from the revised, fixed, or tweaked stock maps it includes.
ExtremelyBrutalZombiePornography;-;Is an awesome game! When you start it, it's hard to stop!
William;-;Brillant game. If you have got the time than it is worth buying it.
Musical genius, Sire Mix-A-Lot;-;Great game! It is fun multiplayer and singleplayer! It goes on sale all the time as well, so practically nobody has to pay full price.
darthspectrum;-;An excellent game, i'm mainly doing this for the badge. This game has served up hundreds of hours of my time, and if you enjoy strategy and intelligent playstyle, this game is for you. Although playable by the laidback consumer, the game truly shines when one is a hardcore strategist and can enjoy exploring the mechanics of the game.
joesant84;-;This game is crack addicting. GET IT! ... Dan!
The Clestiall Medusozoa;-;i like this game because its fun and a stategy and shut up
The Baptist Baby;-;America sucks in this game, so no historical accuracy, and Brazil is never in  jungle, and diplomacy is royally ed, but still an immensely fun game
Master of Execution;-;This game are fun and all the achivment you can get do it more intresting game. One of the best game ever created in this kind of games ever.
Griffolion;-;Addicting
sej drber fugl;-;Awesome game, very addictive! ;D
Happysnacklord :D;-;Lots of Fun. The single player is the best thing ever, even tough multiplayer is even better. You start slow but soon enough you create the greatest empire in the world. Takes a long time to figure out how to play but this game is going to be played for a long time. You will see me play this a lot.
scooter1276;-;That moment you realize that you are next to ghandi.
Pel;-;Blew up an empire with an atomic bomb 10/10
360 no scope dendi hook;-;Complicate .... but if u know how to play dis  , u cant turn off it buddies
S.P.Q.R;-;After 4 years of game play; it still gives the first days' enthusiasm.
Peppers;-;i furtherly enjoy this game. I play it almost everyday with my friend trevor we have played this alot i have like 65 hours on it
Wedod2;-;One of the best things about Civ5 is it's replayability. Advanced setup, randomly generated maps, and dozens of Civs that all act uniquely, this game never gets old. Even in the middle of a game, theres always the next thing to do, whether it's to reseach a new technology, make your cities happy, or nuke your opponents into a firey oblivion. I've spent entire days playing this game. I regret nothing.
kitsune;-;One of my all time favorites.
BlizzardSkull;-;I became a banana empire and it was cool. 10/10
yerrpp;-;An absolutely fantastic and well made game. Hundreds of hours of replayability and fun.
Cris;-;awesome!i can stuck for hours!The best turn based strategy game ever!= so far!
The Messiah;-;this game is so much fun but very addicting. People be like " I wanna play a first person shooter and glak people up, i dont want to read charts and graphs and ". screw people who say that. this game is amazing. you will start and end up playing a 10 hr game which isnt bad considering an average game on fast mode is like 7hrs long. playing is so much fun and you will have a bunch of rememberable moments in every game. playing with friends or random people is fun and competitive. its basically a board game that is a perfect strategy game. buy it because it is a great game 10/10 easily. many hours will be put in and it is worth the pay.
masturcheez;-;This game makes my  rock hard.
furiousmarshmallow;-;A game you'll probably keep coming back to. Replayability over years in my experience.
Xiasmus;-;Civilization is a fantastic series, and V finally adds something the series always needed: hexes. With Gods and Kings it has included many refinements that makes this game the most challenging and difficult of the incarnations of this game. Update: The Brave New World incarnation changes faith and culture once more. Cultural victories are still the most common kind in my games, since I tend to forgo warfare for technological advances. I miss the cultural conversion of enemy cities that was part of Civ IV, but that was a conceit that does not generally fit reality.
Cookiekiller4;-;This is possibly the best strategy game I've ever played I recommend this game to any and all!
Fr4nGt;-;Good turn-based strategy!
dave97996;-;A fun and strategic game that allows you to build an empire though time. I highly recommened this game. It's worth the money
Koame;-;Missionaries of Biggus Dickus have spread their seeds through the world. 10/10
darthcyborg;-;This game has added a new element to combat different to other civ games which is the innability to stack troops which i find adds a fundamental strength to the strategy of units
JC_Monkey_Man;-;I think everyone should play this game because it is the best game on earth.
Kalamees Toivo;-;the best game ever
thebrandonbrownson;-;SWEET MOTHER OF GOAT ! You see this  right here? This is  CIVILIZATION V, AND AFTER PLAYING THIS YOU WILL WANT TO SWALLOW EVERY DROP OF SID MEIER'S ! So, here's the skinny,  ; You pick an ancient (or not-so-ancient, I don't ing care) civilization leader and your job is to become the best  civilization that the world has ever seen! You can win this  by diplomacy (), culture (all the mothering paintings, !)... oh, who am I kidding, YOU WANT TO TAKE YOUR ARMY AND  EVERY ORIFICE OF YOUR OPPONENTS!!! GIVE THEM THE HOT, THROBBING ROD OF JUSTICE YOU SON OF A MOTHERLESS !!! THIS GAME WILL GIVE YOUR MEANINGLESS LIFE SOME PURPOSE,  SPELUNKER!!! PUT SOME HAIR ON YOUR BALLS (OR VAG, WHICH-THE--EVER) AND CIV THAT  OR SO HELP ME GOD I WILL EMPREGNATE YOUR MOTHER AND PUSH HER DOWN A FLIGHT OF ING STAIRS!!!
kuru;-;You can fight Gandhi. I would fight Gandhi.
Vladimir Pootis;-;Anybody who likes strategy games of any kind will love civ 5. The graphics are serene, and the gameplay is flawless and addictive. Just don't expect it to be historically accurate- you'll soon find that Gandhi is the most aggressive AI in the game. Never buy the game at full price though, there'll probably be a sale on a week later.
angel-molina;-;Civilization 5 is like the digital equivalent of marijuana and sugar mixed together... You just have to pass one more turn, you say it will be your last. Only now it's 3 am in the morning and you're starting to bump your head on the keyboard as you try to fight the sleep.... just one more turn. But seriously, Civ 5 is one of the most fun games that I have had the pleasure to waste hours and hours on it. I would highly recommend it to EVERYONE, weather this is the first game they have ever played or if they are the most veteran of hardcore gamers. The only people that I would not recommend it to are those who can not expend any more than a few hours or just really don't like turn based strategy games for whatever reason. Otherwise it's simply one of those games that nearly everyone has at least tried or heard of, like Skyrim, Minecraft, or the CoD franchise. Now, if you have no idea what Civ 5 is actually about, then don't worry because I have got you covered here. Civilization 5 is a essentially a turn based 4X (explore, expand, exploit, and exterminate) game. You always play on a map of your choosing, which can be can have randomized or very customizable settings. Then you choose what civiliztion you want to play as, with each having special bonuses or attributes. Starting with just two units, a settler and a warrior, the player founds a city which will be their starting point and expands from there. You must reseach new technologies, expand your deplomacy, and build armies to defend yourself or attack other civilizations with. There are can be several ways to win a match (which can be also be customized), usually either through researching ahead of the other civilizations, uniting the civilizaions through deplomacy, or conquering other nations. Now don't get me wrong, Civ 5 isn't perfect and there are a few things here and there that will invoke some frustration. In particular, the AI (or other non-player civilizations) is very lacking. There is little to no tactices in how it wages war, unless you count clustering random units at you in random formations. It's deplomacy is extremely predictable and nearly not worth caring for: if they have more troops than you or you are so much as slightly ahead of them in research, they will inexplicably wage war with you... This happens ALL the time. Nearly no civilization is willing to find a diplomatic solution and they focus on bringing down other civilations before brinning up there own. Now don't get me wrong, the AI isn't broken, it is merely serviceable. So if you don't mind, then you won't get too frustrated. Other than this, there are only a very few minor complaints that aren't too big a deal. Sometimes you can get screwed if you don't precure a certain amount of specific resources like happiness, gold, or reseach. You might start somwhere that won't allow the player to really expand and the other civilizations could eventually snowball you... Or over time, the player could snowball the other civilizations easily if they get those resources (and then the game becomes too easy). But most of the time the game is fairly balanced and very much worth playing. Again, I would recommend this to almost anybody and everybody. Now if you don't mind, I need finish conquering France with my giant death robots.
Faravahar1200;-;Very nice game I am not good at it but I enjoyed it a lot buy it you won't hate it you will love it.
Sailor Jockoven;-;i thought i would play for an hour, then got off 2 days later...worth it
Speed Racer;-;Really fun to play
d3vilsheep;-;"This game is the most stratigic game ever, i give it 10/10 the diplomacy, screens where you talk to other civilizations and you get to interact with theam is flawless and beautiful and dont get me started on the battles, The battles are a bit hard for starters you cant march to theam and win you need lots of troops to surround the city and shoot and bombard theam cause this game is like chess, almost you get to attack and move every 1 turn once u move all your armys, and farmers,. There are many factions to play but i recommen buying brave new world next after this for more factions where talking $60 dollors all togather. So i say if you love stratigic battles and bored games of non stop enjoyment then this game is 100% for you"
Burningleaf;-;ill write this review... 1 sec... just 1 more turn...
Dontstealthisname;-;You should buy it
Cookie_Magic;-;The best turn based strategy game
V13dogmeat;-;really cool game
Balrog Son of Nelgar;-;Don't like what some countries have done in the past? Wish some countries died off long ago? Civilization V allows you to play from one of over a dozen civilizations and leaders, ranging from the democratic Geroge Washington to the war hungry Genghis Kahn from as early as 5000 BC. Customize the game as you wish, setting options for random starts, map sizes, victory conditions. Play the game however you wish, whether you wish to rule with an iron fist and dominate all others, build the United Nations and bring everyone together in peaceful coexistance, or sit on the sidelines and either race for the most advanced technology or develop the culture of your civilization. Don't be discouraged from trying to do something, even a militaristic civilization can bring force peace, and a peaceful civilization can bring about destruction. *As a side recommendation: Several mods are avaliable to enhance gameplay, ranging from new civs. to new worlds, to a game editor so you feel like a god. Be warned however, many of the best or most popular mods require the expansion packs.
Reyn time;-;this game is awsome great fun with friends
[Kurosaki] Chris;-;300+ hours played, nuff said. gold edition $20 at EB games yarse (:
Doug!;-;One of the best editions of Civilization ever!
Jamisoj;-;Stop. Seriously. Stop. Think about how much time you've got to play. If you have less than six hours, play something that isn't this game. For your own sake.
Jeffery The Space Worm;-;Civilization 5 is awesome! From becoming the greatest empire of all time too becoming the greatest military force ever known, Cilivilization will keep you entertain hours on end.
Batu Khan;-;Amazing, territorial expansion is slower than civ 4 but it is still great.
Black_Knight67;-;I purchased this game recently because a friend reccomended it to me. I can definately see why he told me to get it! I really enjoy the game and I plan to buy the DLC in the future. While the game takes awhile to complete, it is still very fun to play!
Richard M. Nixon;-;I cannot recommend this game enough. No other game allows you to feel as powerful or amazing as this game. I'd recommend not having a job or anything though, it sucks time into it like a black hole.
sgtshaggy;-;This is my favorite Civilization yet. It's beautiful, fluid, and still retains the "just one more turn" addictiveness the series is known for. The music is outstanding as well, with themes written for each country that shift and change as you progress through the game. The new tactical warfare really makes a difference too; gone are the stacks of doom from previous games. It's a meat and potatoes tactical addition that really sets this iteration apart from previous games IMO. It's a must-own for fans of the series or turn-based strategy in general.
Mendex;-;This game ate up so much of my time it's not even funny. If you're looking for a strategic game to play solo or with friends get this. The civilizations are great and the technology unlocks are just awesome. The biggest feature that brings me back to this game is the fact that each time you start a new civilization you know the gameplay and the way you complete the game is going to be very different to the last game you played. Extremely recommended!
Eidren -errybodi lorvs me;-;Multiplayer with friends: Slow Sim 2014 with fun small talk and great moments. 10/10 Single Player: Nuke gandi 10/10
Gaius Julius Caesar;-;Good Game Nice Replayabilty and nice Military Dictatorships =D
cyrini;-;One of my favourite ways to waste my day
NeneroG [VAC];-;The Flagship Turn-Based Strategy Game Returns Become Ruler of the World by establishing and leading a civilization from the dawn of man into the space age: Wage war, conduct diplomacy, discover new technologies, go head-to-head with some of historys greatest leaders and build the most powerful empire the world has ever known.
ZoraZ;-;The game itself is really good, but if you've never played any Civilization or something similiar before you should've try it out first. (maybe your friend has it?) because, well, personally I love turn-base strategy game, so I thought this game'd be fun. After playing a bit, I can see why people are so addicted to this game, but somehow I can't enjoy it. (probably because it's too slow for me) I regret buying this game but seriously, TRY IT, if you like it, this game is really worth the money
Ixion;-;Fun, but it would most definetly be better with Workshop support for the Mac.
TheChocolateAxe;-;civilization v is one of the best strategy games i have ever played i definitely recommend that you buy it
calendir;-;a great 4X game that just keeps on getting better with each DLC, can't wait for the latest one
Cat of Handegg;-;It's like a RTS. Just with more civilized people.
TheOverlord213;-;This is a fantastic game for rts lovers everywhere. Getting the expansions is a good idea as the majority of mods make use of both of them and really do improve the game a lot. 10/10 would play another turn.
seagod;-;one of the best 4x games o ut there
A Penta-Walra-quark-us;-;For those who like to think
leacheva17;-;To tell the truth this game is just the best I have spent count less hours playing as different CIV'S and having fun with each one and would wish for every one to at least try it!
Ryster;-;One of my favorite strategy games. Worth every penny.
welker124;-;A fabulous game that simulates perfectly how awful ghandhi is
Arinthalas;-;Set a timer when you play Civ V. Too many nights I've gone in thinking, "I'll just play a couple of turns then go to bed." Four hours later I nearly crap my pants because the sun is coming up and I haven't slept.
UKairforce;-;Good for anyone who loves strategy
MemeMan;-;I have two things to say about this. 1. Nuking your friends is fun. 2. Dont trust Gandhi
Jebus;-;Started a new game at 3 pm Monday, 1 hour later it was Wednesday....
ad886;-;Awsome. I got this game for my laptop and its has never disapoited me. Integrated mod tools give me the personal touch I love in a game and the DLC scinarios give me the epic flavor of an expertly developed game
Schaherasade;-;This game will steal your soul.
Joachim Peiper;-;Doing this for badge progress but Civ is amazing regardless
x2w` Valhalla;-;A really good turn based rts game. If you liked the previous civ games or age of empire/ rise of nations you'll like this.
Assault Shaker;-;Civilization 5 is an amazing strategy game with no equal. The game can be played at a leisurely pace and comfortable difficulty all the way up to a mind melting marathon pace and the extremely challenging deity difficulty. Not only are the single player games fun, challenging, and well crafted, but the online multiplayer adds a new dimension to the game with added challenges and excitement. Lastly the scenarios allow you to reenact some of historys greatest moments. 10/10.
letspway;-;Lots of replayability, definitely recommend this!
whatshisface9;-;Pretty fun
McLovin;-;Five seconds in, already climaxed.
Yam;-;Pretty much the best game ever.
ropie;-;Once again Civilization will eat up your waking hours.1
CatFromTheWrongSideOfTheTracks;-;I have over 24 hours clocked on this and haven't even finished a game yet
Benito;-;This game is the reason why none of my friends trust me anymore. 10/10 would buy again
senpai peon;-;when i typed pepperoni pizza, nothing happened and gandhi invaded me 0/10
DrWhippy;-;Abandon all hope, ye who enter here
wedge41388;-;Warning, time does not progress normally while playing this game. I decided to play this game before work one day, ended up losing my job because I showed up about 3 weeks late. Great Game
Gtheft1PS3;-;This is a really fun and addicting game once you get into the swing of the game, i would recommend playing on quick pace because sometimes standard can be annoying.
CodelinkZ;-;this is a great game
katjanhos;-;And old faithful game that gets better with each reworking. I love this game and always have. Who does not like attempting world domination. Great new graphics and civs to play in.
The Murdidlierderer;-;Got nuked by Gandhi. 10/10 best game of the year.
aSuitableHat;-;So addictive.
MiNdtRapPeR;-;As a person who is new to the Civilizations series, Civ 5 is most definitely the best turn -based RTS to date. It is a wonderfully complex game which has you thinking at every step of the way forces you to make the best use of all of your resources and formulate a strategy to to lead your civilization to victory. It is such a diverse game that no two matches would ever be the same. I would definitely recommend this one to RTS fans.
Oisin;-;It is a good game
GlennGJ;-;One of the most addicting games I've ever played
Frostem;-;The best turn-based strategic game that I ever played! I strongly recommend to buy both the expansion, because thay make the game even better
Holt01;-;I've always loved the Civilization series and from what I've played of it, this is a great new addition to the series
biotec;-;A very simplistic/deep strategy game. It's interface is extremely easy to use, but it offers enough choice to keep things interesting. It is also very well polished. All the game's leaders have their own "cutscene" whenever you talk to them in the the game, and they're well animated and bursting with personality. Everything works in the game too - I haven't found a single glitch or bug since I started playing. My only problem with the game is the lack of diplomatic options. Although the game has a decent selection, it isn't as full as you'd expect it to be. For example, you can't threaten to attack other nations unless they give you a certain resource etc. There is also a slight problem with the game's AI in a diplomatic sense, as to avoid the problem of the AI just letting you walk all over them, they've been made to be very picky over what deals they accept. This leads to some unusual situations, like a leader refusing to end a war with you unless you pay them some gold, despite them only having one city left with no troops while your massive army is waiting outside the city walls - waiting to invade them. These are minor problems in a fantastic game though. If you like the strategy games, you'll love this.
Re:Loaded;-;A fitting continuation of the Civilization legacy.
Endi;-;everybody signs open borders in the begining, only to bring 5000 troops in ur capital and to invade u *cough*bismarck*cough*that_sob*cough
dbxrunner;-;Civilization has been a great franchise for a long time, and Civ V does not disappoint!
Ankman;-;Really great recommend for everyone
sugerfreak;-;Will steal you're life.
KoppoLatte;-;This game really makes you appreciate the remaining time you have left in your life, because this game is going to suck the rest out of you.
Planet_Astronox;-;Play this with my friends all the time. If you're not into competetive this is a great way to waste a few hours on thinking of creative ways to beat the AI.
Do You Even Gift?;-;Must have for any strategic game fan or anybody in general. One of the best games on P.C.
You're SHER locked;-;Amazing turn-based strategic game. Think how to play, evolve and conquer (if you want). You can aslo win by dominating another civilization using culture and religion. Raise an army, train it and explore the world. Make deals, pacts and betray your allies. One more turn, one more turn...
helgi_raguel;-;It good but it is much much better with brave world & gods and king
gabeyld;-;Very fun and incredibly engaging. Once I've started playing, I only tend to stop when I haven't eaten for most of the day.
joshuaf76;-;This game has been the best of the series yet. <Y first review so I will just say if you liked any of the series before please try this game there are always specials where you can pick up the base game or even gold edition cheap. You won't be disappointed.
James Wilson;-;This game is highly addicting, where one more turn can quickly become another hour. With a vast cast of powerful leaders from a wide variety of masterful civilizations, this game is a must play for any fan of the strategy genre.
Skaboober;-;Highly addictive game that makes you want to keep on playing
Silverus;-;A game surprisingly more tactical and militaristic than a "civilization" should probably be, especially with nuke-happy Gandhi. Still a fantastic game. Would recommend.
obiwanlotr;-;Best civilization game I have ever played, very very addicting, and above all really fun.
NedTal;-;Peaceful Ghandi of India. He declared global thermonuclear war on everyone. 10/10
TheMysticLemon;-;Just can't get enough :)
mlbcujo27;-;Probably my favorite game of all time and has great replayability. I love the strategy involed as well as the different ways you can win the game. I highly recommend.
Nullify;-;It's hard to go wrong with Civ, but now 2 expansions in, the game has really come into its own.
Doc Rawr;-;The best time suck you can buy. Many hours have vanished while playing this game.
kayotik saint;-;bought it on sale a few years back and wasnt able to play it due to poop computer. I have sense bought a new computer and i can say i will flunk out of my classes next semester because of this game!
nicbeaumont;-;This is a Real time strategy on such a scale I can't even beging to compliment it. The graphics are simply amazing, wonders are well detailed. The histoical information in the civilopedia is great for light reading, and the thought put into the units was wonderful. I mean, how many people knew about turtle ships and galeasses before playing this game. Also the sense of reality in the diplomatic relationships between civs is relativly realistic. It is a challenging game, but not impossible. I like the five ways to achive victory as well. Overall 10/10 stars and I can't wait to see how their latest game Civiliation, Beyond Earth turns out!
Rypekiller;-;A great game, well worth its price. After over 420 hours the game continues to offer great experiences, both in single- and multiplayer. It truly is the best strategy game being offered today and well worth your money! PS: Buy all of the expansions(G&K and BNW) for a better experience.
Dindu Nuffins;-;I try making peace of India but he nuke me. Why is india do this. I suppose to be peace. Please fix but otherwise good gaming. India make me cry at night because many nukes into capital and make me die. One time I contimplating suicide because india nuke too much. And when I vote to be ally, they nuke me because i no make city of mine to them. Very good game though 11/10 will get nuked by india again.
Glyphicalllllllllll;-;Don't play this late at night, or you WILL be up until 5 A.M. Trust me.
ocbd;-;An immense amount of replayability. Any strategy fan will love this game and history buffs will most likely be interested. The only thing that may deter people is the learning curve-- which there is a mild one. I haven't played any previous Civilization games and it took maybe an hour at most outside of the tutorial to understand the deepest levels of the game. That is not to say it is simple by any measure, however. The tutorial walks you through the game and there is even a setting to change your familiarity with the game and even new expansions while you are playing outside of the tutorial in a normal game. This mechanic will be sure to easily introduce you to new game systems through a typical playthrough. I purchased this and most DLC and expansions at full price and it is completely worth it. Any discount on this game and the rest of the content is definitely a must-buy. Amazingly addicting gameplay and a unique and enthralling storyline that is written with every new game that is played. One can never be bored with a game that has a dynamic workshop supported by creative community members.
whomppers;-;This game is my life for at least 10 hours at a time...
NEVERISM;-;Just...one...more...turn!
blase.xla;-;The vanilla Civ V is definitely still a great game, but really only shines with the big DLC (BNW and G&K). The DLCs give Civ V the replay-ability you look for in a Civ game. So, if you can snag the whole bundle in a Steam Sale there's probably one of the best purchaes on Steam you could make.
Gallium-69;-;i woke up in the wrong indian villiage
Bijerun;-;really good
Twarrior913;-;Be prepared to ruin friendships with this game. It is very in depth and dynamic, and can really screw you over in the long run. 8/8 m8's.
Imthatguyhere;-;It's a fun strategy game that is not only classic but worth the large time investment.
-Ian- sERGIO;-;If this game were a man I would go gay and have anal sex with it.
vash_kurosaki;-;Fun and worth getting
friendly neighborhood dunk meme;-;freaking love this game
Goldhorse;-;I love this game. I've stayed up for countless hours just playing away trying to win. It's easy to learn but hard to master especially if the game is not set in your favor. I would recomend this to good strategists and people who just like having fun with there own civilization games.
Synthetic God;-;Great game, got addicted quickly.
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
revealingdarknes;-;Prepare to spend 5-6 hours on this game without realizing you've been on for more than an hour. "One more turn" really does become a mantra that dominates your thinking. That said, the number of possible game setups and possibilities results in nearly endless gameplay.
The Cardinal;-;The perfect game for strategic play!
Papa Swamps;-;One of the best games i've ever played, I should be past 300 hrs now and theres a good reason for that, if you can manage to get a friend to play with you it becomes 10x better, you can help each other and not to mention face each other to see who would run a country better, I can't wait till Civililization: beyond earth comes out cuase im sure ill  aways the hours with that game to but overall amazing franchise with a newer version in the works so get started now if you're still contemplating wether to buy this game or not.
Rap Ake;-;This game is very cool !! When you play it you not waste your time and when you playing it you will get the knowladge and the information about the history and the levolution of the thing.
HADOUKEN!!!!!;-;one more turn
Diretide;-;Easy to get lost in for hours on end.
maxmania007;-;this game is fun and even more fun when you play it with friends and i really recomment it to people that like 4x games
mrtkbnr;-;best turn based strategy game ever
axoftheenglish;-;Great game to spend some time on and think things over. It may take a while for you to develop a strategy, but multiple play throughs and lots of workshop content have a lot to offer.
ister;-;This game is really fun. I've played it for a lot of hours. It is really fun for a game to get addicted to.
Aesth;-;Ghandi will say something about the peaceful indian people. Turn 499 so close to that time victory and then a nuke will hit you.
Soulfox;-;This game is super fun and never really gets old. That may just be because it takes FOREVER, but still, lot's of fun (and I'mnot kidding. I had like 8 hours of gameplay and I still hadn't finished one game). A tip, don't go attacking EVERYBODY, or else they'll all hate you for being "militarily unstable". It wasn't my fault though! America was right below me, and they built Atlanta right next to my wall, and it all sort of escalated I kind of declared war on and off (demanding cities in return for peace) until I took over Washington DC, and half of the city states. Seriously, my Chinese civilization has like 15 cities. Anyway, it's very fun because you start out with so little, and then watch it all grow into this massive Empire of Epicosity.
Delta_JRM;-;Never. Mess. With. Rome. 10/10 Prepare to have your life sucked away.
kinrov;-;One of the easiest games to hundreds of hours of your life to. Start playing at 5 or 6pm and the next time you look at the clock it will be 3am. Almost unlimited replayability with so many vanilla nations to choose from and the mods on the workshop encompass every aspect of the game.
Junebug The Hoss;-;I need to waste more time on this game.
Sardish;-;Say goodbye to your life...
SGT S.Donohue[173rd];-;It's fun and sometimes gets fast pace sometimes. Sometimes though it does get slow and boring but when you go for a domintation victory it takes forever and tons of people hate you. You also have to be careful of a Alliance forming from under you when you do anything.
Dunlapen;-;Excellent Game though at times it gets tiresome when other nations keep goign to war with you. I'm talking about you Gandhi!!!
Swag Tag Majestic;-;sort of hectic
alien_d;-;I have been playing Civilization since Civ 1. This is by far the best part of the series. Though the series is slightly addictive, can not count how many thousand hours i put into it. Best of all, now available for Linux !
elbuenjulius;-;Great game, even for people who don't usually like strategy games (I was one of them). Lots of hours of play, so be ready to sink in some serious time if you decide to get this.
mangoton;-;Great game
Bobfredsony;-;Great game, best Civ yet. But still not as good as Alpha Centauri
Keakealani;-;Civ V was my first turn-based strategy game, and my first Civilization series game, and on both counts, I couldn't be happier. The strategy is compelling and detailed, with many options and playstyles available. The variety of bonuses and unique units available to each civilization allows for a great deal of replay value, and randomized elements in the maps and AIs contribute to a fresh start with every game. There are some downsides, however. Although one of the biggest draws to Civ V is the complex and highly variable strategy options, the AI programming leaves much to be desired, as an AI simply cannot account for the many different levels of strategy needed to achieve victory. As such, the difficulty settings feel somewhat lackluster, as they simply give the AI greater and greater early advantages, leading to a very different gameplay at high levels compared to a truly "even playing field". Combat, like with many games, is clunky and time-consuming, and although there are elements of strategy and maneuvering, it can be boiled down into essentially a numbers game of tech and manpower, rather than true strategic prowess. Multiplayer is also less than ideal, particularly in a mixed human/AI environment, as AI features are severely nerfed or nonexistent. In terms of fluff, I find the pseudo-historical theme to be a huge benefit, as I'm just enough of a history/linguistics/geography nerd to find it interesting, but not condescending or painfully inaccurate. (The "alternate history" line allows for a lot of freedom, when of course the game will not reflect a real-life history.) Ultimately, though, I've sunk many, many hours into this game and I can see myself continuing to play well into the future. Especially considering the price is quite reasonable for comparable game quality and style, I would recommend this game to anyone who likes strategy, history, or just having a good time. I particularly recommend it as a solo game - for those of us who don't care for online multiplayer, Civ V is by far the most rewarding single-player Steam title I've come across.
chandlerpl;-;Civilizations 5 is an amazing game! I would reccomend this game to everyone, it might be hard to start of with but once you know what your doing you will have a lot of fun. Its also got multiplayer so you can play with friends. I've got 67 hours on record of this game and still haven't got bored of playing it.
Mats;-;Each game can take upwards of 6 to 8 hours but you WILL remember your empire days, weeks, even months after you finished the match.
Mark is Ehrett;-;I bought this game recently and already sunk nearly 200 hours into it.. Amazingly well structured sim.
Suren Cao;-;Love playing the ruler over people, then grab Civilization V. Continues to be a great series of games!
Propellergator;-;I was gonna go to work, but then I played Civ 5 10/10
xomm;-;solid game with approachable curve, but needs DLC to achieve same levels of depth as previous games
Flamestryker;-;Excellent game! kept me and my friends going for hours!
heavychief01;-;If you like your Social Life, don't get it. 100000000000000000000000000/10 would lose all my friends again
HeroicWinston;-;y yu no make hotseat multiplayer, still a great game tho.....
The Horseless Headsman;-;Trying to get a summer badge, but either way I would recommend this game.
mathew.strauss;-;Endless hours of entertainment right here.
maxy110;-;Spent lots of time on this and love it!
SirJelly;-;A few significant strategical deficiencies exist in the Base version of Civ V. The game is genuinely unbalanced without both the brave new world and gods and kings expansion packs. If you can get the whole Civ V package for a reasonable price, go for it, but i do not recommend purchasing the base game by itself.
griffjack;-;This is one of the best strategy war games I have ever played. Love the Brave New world DLC adds lots of needed features to the game. Boudica ftw.
EternalEssence;-;This game is beyond amazing. I'm not really into strategy games myself, but this game changed that completely. I would totally recommend this to anyone, regardless of if they're into strategy games.
EcologicalRole;-;Songhai and India cannot be trusted. You have been warned.
Turb0d_Tal0n;-;Such a great time waster, I can get sucked in for hours without even realizing it.
Xkuizitmynd;-;Most addictive game ever made. If you enjoy turn based strategy games this one should not be passed up.
[House Baratheon] Stannis;-;<3 this game
Dragonfli;-;This Game's single player is fun, but its strongest feature is the multiplayer. If you have friends who already own this game, do not hesitate to buy it yourself, as it is a great game to strengthen relationships; or in some cases break them.
Gigadrako;-;Now I am become Gandhi, destroyer of worlds. 11/10
kekemomo101;-;This is one of the best games i have played in my years of gaming, a really good strategy game that is different every game.
Mortini;-;Just one more turn, mom!
Speedylions;-;A fun game that never gets old, even if its buggy. Make sure a couple of your friends have it too and spend a few hours playing with them.
Shadowhawk;-;One of my best purchases this year. It will take some time to get into, but for the price I felt like I got my moneys worth.
Adam Kokesh;-;swiggity swooty do u got the booty?
Kirael;-;Love this game.
Disney's Tokeahontas;-;One of the best games I've ever played! Highly recommended,
Tiddly;-;You can make the little people find bananas and elephants
PCMR - Koletro;-;Seems legit. made me forget a few times that i had this thing called work in the morning...
razor2260;-;You cant go wrong with Civ. Cant wait for Beyond Earth to drop! Hurry up Sid!!!!
Wilbur;-;I was forced to buy this game ok
=^.^=;-;One of the best strategy game on the market
ShadowOp101;-;This game is as addictive as chocolate to a fat kid. You can play for hours on end without knowing time has even passed. It just feels good when you can completely destroy another civ after a hundred turn war. It is a long game with massive replayability. I can't play this enough. <3
BOT Ellen Pao;-;Suddenly the heavens are consumed by an eerie pitch black veil. Rain begins pelting the deck of the ship, shredding the sails. A burst of lightning brightens the dark sky, revealing a modern age gandhi piloting a carrier plane about to unleash his payload on my renaissance era ship. Before I can gasp in astonishment, the timeless warlord reduced the ship to a pile of debris floating down into the depths of the ocean. The last of the rain fades away to a distant rumble, and the dark clouds float away. With tears rolling down my face I describe my exprience in civ...10/10 would play again.
ZachM;-;This game is awesome. If you like thinking, accrueing masses of money, or waging numerous wars for no reason. Get this game
relarson;-;Very fun game, especially with all of the DLC (At least G&K and BNW and the extra civs). Lots of playability and really fun for rewriting history in any way you want.
Ragequit37;-;THis game is amazing. I loved it. The strategy is fun and it is complicated, but not too complicated. The AI are good at playing the game, which makes it alot of fun. There is a lot of depth in buildings, units, technologies, social policies, and civilizations. There is also a great fan base, that create great mods, and are always willing to play multiplayer.
Tatsuya's Penis;-;When I first played Civ5, before all the dlc's and expansions, it sucked... Had nice graphics, the revamped combat system was great (A single square filled with 50+ infantry, tanks, a nuke and artillery? Doesnt make much sense), limited victory options (Amass culture and then build a wonder?), no forms of goverment (ideologies sucked in the vanilla), no religion.... NO RELIGION!! It was a game with great potential and had, sady, fell short. Tried a few games and got bored pretty fast. Then came Gods & Kings with religion and finally the game got back on track. It felt like the old days, as if Sid was back on business (That notion didnt last long since the experience still left me wanting). Steam Workshop was on those days if I'm not mistaken. Nice addition but it was still not enough. It felt like an incomplete game. Then came in the Brave New Word with all its glory, patched up the holes and took the gameplay to a whole new level in my eyes. Cant say I'm not bitter about the whole deal since after getting the expansions it finally felt like a complete and polished game. Still, I'm glad I tagged along, it was one hell of a ride.
Pinepiece;-;Lots of fun. When you start playing though, be prepared to spend the whole day in your chair lol! Every time I play, I end spending at least 10 hours per session.
Lanca;-;Highly recommended. A game that will teach you while entertaining you at the same time. Varied difficulty settings make it a pleasurable experience for beginners and strategy veterans alike.
Dark;-;Endless fun whether you're alone or can convince some sucker friends to play with you. It's essentially virtual Risk on crack. The biggest problem with this game is remembering to get some sleep. Just. One. More. Turn.
Bing the Magic Walrus;-;Takes a long time, but its a fun adventure
Dark3n;-;do you want a really addictive turn based game? well buy this game and you play it... alot
D Radd;-;Great game
KnightAFM;-;If you don't already have this game pick it up! G&K and BNW recommended.
Marquis Lorenzo;-;Don't trust ghandi's lies !! Prick
Eraservedd;-;This is good, you should all buy it. Be sure to get the expansions, they add quite a bit.
im2meme4u;-;This game is incredibly addicting for many reasons. It offers many of the features found in a masterfully designed strategy game, or just any game in general. The difficulty, the multiple ways to win, and the informative tutorial and instruction with little to no hand-holding, and of course legitimate multiplayer. First, in difficulty there are FIVE difficulty levels (I may be wrong but there are at least 5). For the three that I have played (Lowest, Middle, and Highest) I can confirm that they all offer unique experiences and don't just tweak simple stats like increasing enemy speed or strength, it actually changes the artificial intelligence of the game to make the CPU opponents smarter instead of harder. Next, the informative tutorial is litterally an entire dictionary's worth of instruction for each individual thing, brought to you at appropriate times at a player defined rate. It doesn't force you to do anything, it just provides useful insight on gameplay to teach new players how to play and teach experienced players new tricks. Also, there are many ways to win offering the player to journey of on his or her own path. I believe there are 5 or more equally difficult ways to achieve difficulty, offering tons of replayability trying to achieve each goal at least once, and then trying to achieve those goals again at a higher difficulty and so on. Finally, it offers LEGITAMITE, NOT THROWN IN FOR MARKETING(*cough* Assassin's Creed *cough*) multiplayer. Let me tell you, it is so much fun to team up and battle against your friends! Its almost a game in its own. Instead of going into detail, who doesn't want to create your own civilization from a pack of settlers with a buddy or two or ten? Enough said. In conclusion BUY THIS GAME! Seriously you won't regret it the only hidden cost is hours of your time.
Deez Nuts;-;You can be Ghandie the warlord. 10/10
Zatlo D. Dragon;-;One of the best single players games out there. once you get some friends to play with you it is 10 times better, but it's still amazing either way.
Groovy Kyoko;-;This game is so fun! I recommend all of the DLC. They completely change the game by adding a ton of new stuff that will make your experience even better. There are many civilizations to choose from and they all have their unique perks. You can spend hours on this game without realizing it. 10/10 would play forever and ever.
Pappybuck;-;I great strategy game that you chose the outcome of your Civilization and others. I would highly recommend this game to anybody who wants to play a strategy game.
Shrike;-;Play as your favourite civilization through this grand strategy game. Endless fun, it's in the top 10 games for a reason. 10/10, make sure you have the latest expansions they are WELL worth it.
actualwizard666;-;As a huge fan of games like Age of Empires, I figured that Civ V wouldn't be much different. I hadn't played any of the other Civ games when I jumped into Civ V, and boy did I love it. The game play is lots of fun and there is good level of strategy involved, though the difficulty is easy to control when starting the game. There are so many options and variety that it's almost impossibly for me to get bored. Most fun is the ability to play with friends. Nothing says friendship like attacking with the full force of your military! :D
Mattron1;-;I have spent way too much time in this game and have survived the trial and error that was multiplayer. It now works, but put in place a pact to finish games you start and be cut-throat.
Uncle BB;-;Amazing! Loads of fun!
MonolJibberish;-;I've only played about 70 hours but its enought to tell me that this was one of the best buys I have ever made. The Civ 5 strategy may not be the most advanced or detailed but it is definitely exciting and easy enough to adjust to. THe many different legends who command their civilizations to greatness is also a perk. Each civilization has their own distinct advantage that can be used to help in whichever type of win you want. The unitys are well balanced and the gameplay as said Buy this game and all the DLC its a definite buy and if more DLC comes out I will be extremely interested in it. 9/10
mastermind;-;the best game of all time
car.maloney;-;I love all the civilization games. I just....I don't get why turns have to take FOREVER the later into the game you go. WHYYYYY
Captain Crunch;-;this game is the
ElTerriblay;-;lots of fun if u have da hours
General Franky;-;I've played this enough to fully appreciate the quality and depth of this game. It is well made an a worthy installment to the Civilization series. It isn't perfect, but diamonds in nature don't come clean and cut. Graphics are solid at max settings. Water effect is dazzling at times, and watching my slaves, er, I mean unionized workers hammer away to build my roads always brings a grin to my face. Combat animations are fun and unqiue to unit types, but occasionally they do get repetitive especially when there is one stubborn barbarian using your soldiers' heads like golf balls. One animation I really think they did well on is the atomic bomb although I may be biased because watching that go off on my foes capital does make me chuckle heartedly. I swear I'm a nice a guy. Gameplay is exquisite I find especially after the inclusion of Brave New World. There is a game style for almost any type of player as well as a civilization that goes along with it. You like to be aggressive and burn down your friends countryside and country people? Well the Zulus are for you. If they're your neighbour you know you need big walls. Is building large empires and just blobbing out your thing? Well I'm certain being the Emperor of Rome is the job for you. More of a hide-behind-big-freaking-cities-and-laugh-because-your-ideology-is-destroying-enemy-happiness-and-purpose-in-life type of person? Well you still have a hard time because troops win games, but you can definitely be a big world power throwing your propaganda at poor unsuspecting Civs with the Bearded-Brazillian mind control technique, or tourism as this game calls it. The amount of dynamic things you can do and experience with this game is great and I would say it is defnitely worth experiencing for everyone. A sidenote on gameplay is especially if you dont like to build many early units is always be prepared to be suddenly sad in the early game most of all. Play this game like simcity with disasters turn on. Hide your workers, hide your great people and hide your settlers because barbarians be pillaging your improvements out here. Interface can be a bit confusing if you're not used to it but seeing as you are with it most of the game it gets pretty convenient to use. And the controls are intuitive so I dont see too much mucking about happening if you're getting into games like this. This is probably one of those games I would love to play on a touchscreen that I converted into a table top. Be all futuristic commander-like. Anyone else? Mom? Just me. If you're looking for a great easy-going time-spending game this is a great one for that. It also has some nice multiplayer so it can be a party! The replayability is very vast due to the immense possible combinations and randomly generated maps. The mods also add a fantastic singleplayer experience. Conquering Virtual Westeros has never been more fun. I give this game two thumbs up sadly steam only lets me do one. I probably forgot to mention and go over a few things, but just felt like doing this on the fly. Hopefully it's bearable. Thanks for reading.
Heezus;-;10/10 Would buy again (if for some strange reason steam doesn't exist in the future)
Alastair;-;I love this game but I suspect it may be a time machine. I have started many a game before bed and before I even have the chance to notice it is already morning.
Oota;-;This game takes time and bends it in every way possible. Wake up at 8am and next minute its 8pm. :)
ashmonkey1;-;This is a fun game when played with friends, easy to learn and set up multiplayer games.
Dromedary;-;Fun game, haven't played a multiplayer (with people) game yet but have still put in many hours conquering the world!
Alsec;-;Quit your job, drop out of college, have one last night of fun with your mate, and say goodbye to time -- this game will bring you into a new dimension. Play at your own risk.
EvilClone28;-;Although sometimes it may be a bit slow at times, it is incredibly fun alone or with friends.
DaPayn;-;its really good. both single player and multiplayer have mods which make the game wayy more fun and the features are all polished and cool. however there are still a couple bugs which have been in here for soo long and havent been fixed, but all in all its pretty good
Ranflax;-;Simply Awesome
Rajah Bimmy;-;Gameplay (5/5): Builds stress at all the right times, and certain AI add extra flavor Graphics (4/5): Takes a bit of time and tinkering to run smoothly, and your computer definitely will get a little toasty, but this is made up for by the stunning amount of resources the game can handle at once. Design (5/5): The devil is in the details, and Civ is packed with bells and whistles on every tile. The UI can appear daunting at first but in the long run becomes incredibly simplistic. Sound (4/5): The score and narration really enhance the immersion and make your civilization's story all the more epic. Multiplayer (3/5): The only aspect of the game that is just average. The graphics and amount of AI the game can handle take a significant blow in multiplayer, and the way the game freezes entirely if you're at war with another player and it's their turn can be frustrating. The lack of achievement support in multiplayer is also a bit disappointing. PC Factor (5/5): The mod support is absolutely fantastic and propels this game to be a staple of PC gaming. Replay Factor/Achievements (5/5): By the end of one really long game, you will have a full understanding of how to play and be ready to rack up another hundred hours over the course of two days (this game will make you think that's possible) Civilization V is the kind of game that may lead you to rehab, but that'll only hurt your loved ones and you're two turns away from learning how to build a giant atomic robot so who cares? Overall: 8.9
Vinman;-;Great game if you like Turn Based Strategy. Especially fun when playing with friends. 5/5
TenSnake;-;Gud Game >_> unless you play with my friends
Wingzaber;-;Civilization 5 is highly addicting and is a very good choice if you want to make a lot of time disappear before you even realize it was gone. If you've tried the previous Civilization titles and didn't find them fun give Civlization 5 a try, it plays more like a strategy board game then previous titles.
Hooting Up Into The Sky;-;All is fair in love and.. not now you barbarian keds.
EternizMortz;-;One of the best strategy games ever, i never get bored playing this game i always come back and play more of it! I highly recommend this game :)
AreaOfEffect;-;What can I say about the best turn based strategy series? Multi-touch support rocks, hex tiles are great. It's as great as previous versions, offering huge Civiliopedia to teach you actual history, stealing your precious life with never ending "one more turns". Your average strategy game ends in 1 hour, while Civilization might not end in months. Not everyone can play this game, can you build an empire to stand the test of time?
HansAnonymous;-;This is a really fun game, I have had no problems with it :)
The Annexation of Puerto Rico;-;This is one of the best strategy games I've played. It is impressively immersive and quite addictive, so make sure you watch your clock and dont end up accidentaly playing it until 4:30 in the morning.
niclake13;-;Civ 5 is one of those games that you can just never get away from.
Shivers the 3rd;-;For a game that I would think was going to be sorta boring I was wrong. This game provides the fun that I enjoy greatly. I will also add when you start playing this game, you'll lose track of time for real. Although the game mechanics could get better because the same thing happens everytime where you research a thing and then build this and that but its enjoyable. For this game a 8 out of 10 is deserved. Guess I'll start rating games now that I've said that.
c5|Sacr1fice;-;is good game yes?
randomdaydream;-;fun game, but iit's flawed without it's DLC's.
Joogle;-;Great
bananagramz;-;Awesome game to lose track of time and play for hours on end
Kits;-;good game, lots of replay value, and lots of mods in the workshop.
Sexy Orange;-;Great game! It seems like it would be really boring at first, but I ended up playing this for 5 hours straight the night I bought it. As you play, you learn more about the inner mechanics of the game and you start molding your personal strategy for success.
HairyWeather;-;This game has amazing replayability on its own, but woth Steam workshop it never gets dull.
Puckered Star (x);-;A very good multiplayer experience as well as single player, truly worth every penny spent
Dmooch;-;Too many hours spent on this game. 10/10, would waste day on for one more turn again.
thank mr skeltal;-;You can nuke Gandhi in this game 10/10
Boyce Trangler;-;absolutely glorious game to play when your abusive parents lock you in a dark room with only a computer with this game installed 69/-400,000 i burn down cities
Relle;-;Bloody addictive. Play at your own risk!
Krister Maximum skguden;-;it's a great game to play with your friends.
Muadib;-;Excellent game. The best of the Civilization games yet.
Gloaty;-;sush swag very mafia
axander;-;highly recommended if you dont want to go outside ever again
Aceswylde24;-;One of the best strategy games of all times, and the most customizable with the support of a massive player community. See the light from yon window? That's the coming dawn. I hope you don't have work this morning. ;>
thothman666;-;I really like it. My wife and I are waiting for it to go on sale again and we plan on buying it for her to play. Also the DLC looks great too.
Bilabi9x;-;Great game
twobitcoder;-;Having played every iteration of the Civilization franchise since the first one in 1991, I can honestly say this is the best one ever made, and not just because of improved graphics, I'm talking about gameplay balance and the feeling it gives you that this is a huge, deep, complex world. My one and only gripe is the excessively long load times--I had to install it on the SSD and even there it takes 15 seconds to load but that's better than 2-3 minutes.
RayVochi;-;This is probably one of my alltime favorite games. I can spend the entire day playing this game, as you can see I have over 500 hours into it. Easy controls (You only need your mouse!) it is a simple fun fast turn-based military economy nation simulator. With thousands of fun mods to pick from to play with from the Steam Community! I highly recommend this game to anyone interested! Worth the money, and also the expansion packs to this game. It seems like a lot of money to buy it all, but at the end it is worth it!
ShadowSport;-;An awesome game of strategy it can be diffiucult at times but is a fun all the same
N4tticus;-;This game is the epitome of global conquest and strategy games. Although it is turn based, it keeps you interested and intent on taking over the globe. The AI has improved tremendously, and can be extremely challenging. It features multiple difficulties, for beginners and experts, and every type of intermediate out there. This game even has a multiplayer, so buy and we can battle or work together to rule the world!
Deez nuts;-;Aw yiss.
Bantha117;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V. Some of the best money I've ever spent. Hours poured into this game. I do not regret it, and neither will you when you try out this game. Combine it with Gods and Kings and Brave New World for maximum enjoyment factor. Just a warning, the game is rather resource-intensive, so it may lag on lesser computers. Have fun!
Valendren;-;Its a good game overall only problems are that its hard to finish games due to connection issues and the players themselves
McRib 69;-;It makes me horny
Foxy;-;This is the best gamer ever!!!!
Ledshot;-;This is a great game but i think the best way i can describe it as being historical chesswith the a wide range of mods to allow you to play with a wide range races and contries
The Jiggler;-;This a good one. Maybe this is where my life went.
NO BUN, ALL MEAT.;-;Took me awhile to get out of my hilly base. It was looking pretty bleak getting across that valley, but we got it done somehow. But then GG'd out before we could break out our AK-47's to pull out the W. Never even found out who my enemy was. Eventually I renamed my town's name to Tyrezeshiddick cuz it was getting preeeetty boring unreality TazZzyLoosePoundite. I give this game a solid 6/10. It's hard to get a good review out of me. The only games that I have given above a 7/10 are Arma, Day-Zed, Terraria, Zombies: Survival Stories, UFC: Fight Round 26 and Sid Meier's 2. So survive our night guys.
25I-NBOMe;-;And we stunting like Aztec Aztec, Brazil Brazil, London London, China Basic scrubs play that  so I don't even bother I put that on my tech, I put that on my army Korean empire representer, address me as your majesty Yeah you can kiss the ring, but you can never touch the crown I create a million badass Turtle ship I ain't never coming down  you ain't no Ghandi I see you tryin' science No culture, with no parts Hurry up I'm just flyin'
arithin;-;Just one more turn...
Cdoubler;-;Me: Oh man, I had better get to sleep. I have so much to do tomorrow! Civ V: Whoa whoa whoa... how about just... 1 more turn? -4 hours later- Me: !@#$...
iamguyster;-;Most addictive game ever. Set an alarm clock to remind you to go to bed or you will see the sun rise before the game is over,
McNuggets;-;It is a game.
jacobvandy;-;Just... one... more... turn...
Dr. John A. Zoidberg;-;Be me, gamer with friends All buy Civ V during holiday sale because 10foreverything.tif Play it twice in the course of a month, one friend plays it quite a bit and gets fairly decent Host a LAN, friends come over Boot up civ.exe Attempt to recreate all the actions from World War II Something goes awfully wrong when Germany steals nuclear fission from the US MFW In a matter of 6 turns the world is annihilated and the Fuhrer stands tall and dominant 10/10
rockNrobin;-;Nice. Win the world!
Gandalf The Rainbow;-;This is the BEST strategy game ever. I have to admit......... I can't stop playing it. Nothing is more fun than being able to be your favorite civilization, then conquering the world with them. AMAZING GAME! BUY IT!
comandocreeper;-;Very in depth, although there are some massivly overpowered civs like Russia. Just as warning, Ghandi is not your friend past the atomic era
guidex;-;This is a brillant game for people with a bit/lot of spare time, with is beatiful grahpics and amazing featurers, watch your CIVILIZATION grow. sorry for te cheeseyness also if theres any spelling errors.
TheUzbekCorgi;-;did strategy wrong got nuked 11/10 would boink
Ngineer;-;One more turn... just one more turn... Several hours later...
Spaceman;-;Very addicting, due to its unpredictableness and your ability to choose to build your civilization however you want it. 10/10 stay up playing most nights
murph-sean;-;This game is very fun and addicting. I would reccomend it to all those questioning whether they should buy it or not. Best $20 I have spent in a long time.
posko;-;a unit needs order
[Insert Name Here];-;love this game, you say to yourself, one more turn but then it becomes 20 then 100, the only advice I have is to NOT TRUST GANDHI
lduff;-;This game is amazing!!! If you're not playing it you need to!
ExploZero;-;I absolutly love it!! Just such a superb commbination of stratagy, history(sort of) and city domination. In my opinion Brave New World has just made Civ 5 even better with the addition of Great People, Better Trading, and More Civs.
Arrow_of_Acid;-;If you like your social life, but you want this game, you have to choose. You aren't allowed both.
[L13] BlackJackBob #FHRITP;-;Work? What work? I don't have a job anymore...
HellFire;-;Incredibly addictive strategy game that requires a hell of a lot of patience. GNK and BNW are both incredible DLC packs as well. If you can stomach a game that lasts 10 hours but enjoy the freedom and fluidity of the timeline, have at it!
The Firebird;-;There are not enough hours in the day.
a Scary Young Man;-;I'm currently Caesar destroying Ethiopia in battle. I also push my religion of "Three-Legged Man" and my beautiful, massive, market onto every neighboring nation. It's a good way to spend a week.
Cactus;-;Extremely fun but the gameplay mechanics are very buggy For example in multi player when you send someone a Trade offer they can change it before you can say yes or No, meaning that they can take your city.
scooter1276;-;That moment you realize that you are next to ghandi.
Pel;-;Blew up an empire with an atomic bomb 10/10
360 no scope dendi hook;-;Complicate .... but if u know how to play dis  , u cant turn off it buddies
S.P.Q.R;-;After 4 years of game play; it still gives the first days' enthusiasm.
watching popcorn time message me;-;i furtherly enjoy this game. I play it almost everyday with my friend trevor we have played this alot i have like 65 hours on it
Wedod2;-;One of the best things about Civ5 is it's replayability. Advanced setup, randomly generated maps, and dozens of Civs that all act uniquely, this game never gets old. Even in the middle of a game, theres always the next thing to do, whether it's to reseach a new technology, make your cities happy, or nuke your opponents into a firey oblivion. I've spent entire days playing this game. I regret nothing.
vlad the great khan;-;so you like being a leader?How about war?want to found the countries with out history in the real world?Then this your game.But in all honesty this a good game play it now.9 out 10.
Admiral McMuffin Top;-;Highly addictive and would recommend to anyone who feels like they dont want to see the sun for a while. i have had many sleepless nights cursing the queen of England, or the emperor of Rome.
Kevin Bacon's Bacon;-;SO MUCH BETTER THAN HAVING A LIFE
Zleoqx;-;It's just simply a great game. Buy it.
Jeff Goldblum;-;Not historically accurate. Sid Meier won't return my phone calls. Theodora is pretty hot though. Game could use more dinosaurs.
rmlish;-;i love this gamem and make sure to buy the extension if you want the game to be a lot more fun
Big Bubba;-;It sucks when you pay 25$ for it, and then the next day its 12$.
Sidis;-;I recommend this game for my friend Rey the game is amazining and very strategic 10 Cats out of 10 dogs Would play if intoxicated
JerryP;-;Awsome game
Bad Crab Lab Dad;-;I would say "Buy this game" but that would be dumb, then again so is this review, im dumb, buy the game, its fun
Glorgoose;-;I really don't know where to start with this. Being able to put into words how I feel about this game is actually a little bit difficult. But I can say that it is my absolute favorite game. Now, at the beginning, when this game was just released, Civilization IV surpassed it in several ways, seeing as this game was missing some huge features (like religon and the like). By the release of the Gods and Kings expansion, I had grown to love this game as much, if not more than Civ IV. But with the release of Brave New World, it surpassed civ IV, it surpassed many of my favorite games, taking it's rightful place as my favorite game. The game covers the creation of the world, from the discovery of agriculture and the first settlements, to present day. You are the ruler of one civilization, and you start with a settler (who builds your first city), and another unit (typically a warrior of sorts), and from there, you can run your people however you want. You can focus on creating the mightiest military and crushing your foes, you can focus on diplomacy and getting city-states to do your bidding, maybe you want to focus on culture and produce magnificent works of art. There is so much to do, and you can dabble in pretty much all of it. It's really something else. All of this is built around a turn based strategy game. Unlike many 4X games though, figuring out how to play Civilization 5 is fairly easy. The tutorials are useful and easy to read, but even if you don't bother reading them, the UI makes everything quite straight-forward. Describing the game probably makes it sound a little bit dry, and you know what? It may not be everyone's cup of tea, but playing is believing. The game really has an addicting quality of it. You might say "just one more turn and then I'll quit" and then three hours later, you're nuking the Iroquois to stop them from building the last spaceship part before you can win the UN election you've worked so hard to achieve as Venice. Each game is exciting and can be different from the last. It's great! Please, get yourself this game! In particular, the complete edition is fantastic, which includes all the DLC civs and the two amazing expansions. It really is a fantastic game!
I Like Cake;-;It's pretty fun.
VN8R;-;Literally cannot stop playing. A very fun game to play to relax and enjoy yourself. Multiplayer is also really fun with lots of people. I would definitly suggest this game to anyone I meet.
Twon;-;Wasn't too hot on this game when it came out compared to Civ4 but the Gods and Kings and Brave New World Expansions bring it over the top. While the combat grid system is a breath of fresh air to the series, i'm still not too keen on how slow units seem to be generated; it's definitely more of an alt-victory tilted game, which suits me just fine. The variety and subtlety in gameplay definitely gets the "just one more turn.." seal of approval from me!
Kryn;-;If you have 10 hours or so free I'd take the opportunity to have a quick game of Civ.
Lactose the Intolerant;-;Decent base game,get the 2 expantion packs to get the full experience.
Chewylewis;-;Amazing and addicting!
RawArkanis: o Lobo Guaran;-;A grate game. Just lose for Civ II, who was the first civ game I played. This game have a love of community content like maps, civs and game modes. The just one problem is the multiplayer mode who never should exists, this game type won't be made for multiplayer.
DeadShot;-;One of the best games I've ever played. Play it on the weekend otherwise you will wake up late for work or school Scored it for 10 on summer sale, WIN!!!
debra;-;is bretty gud yes
[CH] Sr. Defumado;-;"Just another turn, and I'll stop playing" Your mind will repeat it untill you notice you haven't eat for a whole day.
snakepgua;-;One of the best in its class!!!!!!
Zanori;-;This game is my favourite game at the moment, it's a good strategy game with a nice look to it. Not acurate to history at all, (if you don't use mods at least). It's very fun to play with friends, try not to get too competative though.
Darkflameninja;-;its pretty good :)
freshmang0;-;turn based 4x strategy game, is there anything more exciting and visceral nah but really tho this game is well goooooood ive spent way too much time on it it's addictive also flip u henry with ur flippin chinese domination rush also buildin the great wall u scrub
indy19900;-;Fantastic game. Very addictive. Decided to play a few turns then it had been 5 hours
ItalianGuy235;-;One more turn my . Seriously do not think you are going to just quickly make a few turns in this game and go. I once started playing at 8am thinking "eh, I'll play a little bit." and next thing I know it was 2pm and I was slaughtering the Japanese mercilessly. This game will cause you to get fired, fail your classes, get a divorce, and nuke Ghandi all at the same time. I am serious here, the commercials for this game do not lie and I have been apart of a Civ 5 recovery group for a few weeks now. 15/10 would buy again.
Mace The Moose;-;With no prior experience with these games, I decided to try it. I became hooked instantly. Just a couple of hours and you have a basic understanding. I know people with hundreds of hours in this game, still discovering new things. 100% worth it.
pl2p;-;This games preatty epic. You can win by compleating the Utopia projgect, Compleating the space race, Being the most successful by the year 1900, Or my favorite, BECOMING WARLORD AND NUKING EVERYTHING MWAHAHAHAHAH!!!!!!!!!
Poly;-;If you buy this game you will lose your girlfriend, your job, and all your friends. Be prepared... it's just one more turn...
motownmagic33;-;Great game
ImYoUrFWenD;-;These games take sooo long but you don't realize and suddenly it's thursday. Great game nonetheless and I recommend it to anyone who has friends and time on their hands.
Leyenda #11;-;What do you want me to say about the CIV saga? You MUST buy the Complete Collection if you want to enjoy the full CIV V experience: tourism, trade, religion, new civs... Lots of fun
Atlas;-;When I first got this game, I ended up staying up 2 hours later than I thought I would to play it. Let's just get to the point, this game is fantastic, and you should purchase it. I reccomend you get the complete version - it adds some extra civs, maps, ect, and the two main expansions, Brave New World and Gods and KIngs, add new wonders, units, religion, idealology, and just make the game even better.
keiththesquare;-;great game
ISIS;-;Best game ever highly reccomended to people looking to invest hours into a game.
Friend, not Food;-;In this game, you can build an empire, spread a religion, or my personal favourite, build and use massive stockpiles of nuclear weapons.
jmktimelord;-;This is an excellent game for those who enjoy conquering other countries. I don't know if it's your hobby or whatever- but it should be. Have fun.
Grazen;-;I've put hundreds of hours into this game. It is simply amazing.
Ebola Cola;-;I would definitely recommend this game to anyone who likes turn based games. Whether you have the DLCs of not (although obviously better if you do have), it is still a very enjoyable game with lots of different playstyles that can succeed. A great game in general, 10/10. Also, if you wait for the summer sale, it is usually 50-80% off. On sale or not, it's a great game. This game is bound to keep you sitting for a few hours at least, it's that addicting. Pros: -If you don't like a feature, you can turn it off in the options (for most at least) -The graphics are pretty, but if you don't like it, you can decrease it or go into "Strategic mode" -It's a great way to  off your friends by stealing wonders! <3 -The large variety makes the game unique and each game is different -Different difficulty levels depending on your talent -Maps are generally well generated -Just about everything. Cons: -The games aren't very quick: they take a long time, but they are definitely worth it. Just play over periods of time -Very long tutorials -For slower computers, the game takes a little bit longer to load and open in comparison to other games -The leaders of all the nations aren't that well balanced (i.e. Washington [America] vs. Sejong [Korea]) -Gandhi will nuke you one day
Dylan;-;This game is a confusing game at first, using the tutorial section of the game I was able to slowly build up my skill as a Civ player. I have enjoyed it playing against the AI and my friends. It never gets old as you can make allies and well as enemies along the way to creating your perfect Civilization. Summary; -Fun playing against the AI -Lots of Civs to play as -Easy to get the hang of -Can be a bit stress-full if you are getting beat by the difficult AI. 8.5/10
Yagamire;-;Must play! Just never trust Gandhi...
Ponyboy Curtis;-;Great game for history  like me who just want to soak in all the indulgences of helotic civ
dg16dg;-;beware playing with war mongers fun multiplayer singleplayer boringish 7.9/10 (tip for pros only : rush nuke tech for e z win)
WhiteBread;-;Amazing game. Very in-depth and great game style. 10/10
grandrusenko;-;I love it, very addictive. Very good with all DLC's. All of them.
vemanik;-;Dont trust Gandhi's innocent face, he will shove a nuke down your throat.
Ghost;-;One of the best turn based strategy games ever created!
[354NC] MithrilMike;-;Just one more turn. That's the phrase the has been uttered by almost everyone who has ever played a Civ game. This game is no exception. The music is tailored to the civilization you play, the graphics are beautiful, the strategy is intense. You will find yourself plotting your next victory, whether it is through military force, economic maneuvering, or scientific research. Different ways to win or lose, so position your forces and click next turn.
Boo Boo;-;This game is fantastic! Wether you are playing with or against friends or just playing by yourself, it makes you have a sense of accomplishment through completing the smallest of tasks. This game also does not have a campaign, wich reallly makes the player concintrate on having fun instead of "beating" the game. Also when playing with friends, it does not create teams. You decide if you want to win the control of civilizations through war or diplomacy. The player decides who he wants to befriend or declare war with. I have a fealing that this will eventually ruin a few friendships.
DrexMartell;-;Seriously, have paid pennies per hour for the gameplay I've gotten out of this game, BUY IT
snailpolice;-;Endless replay potential hence the ~1000 hours logged... :/
frenchiemcfrenchman;-;Make sure you do not buy the original game on it's own. Buy the game bundle with all the dlc. Far more worth it and you save a lot of money in doing so. buy the original game and the dlc separately is a major rip off.
DT;-;There are not words for how much time I have spent on this game. It is amazingly addictive. Suggestion: find someone to marry who also plays Civ. It's the only way.
kinderjane;-;So. Addicting. Raising a nation and choosing how you will take over the world is such a detailed process that you can take hundreds of different routes to achieve it in this game. The amount of choices and control you have over every aspect of the game is incredible. Would highly recommend to anyone who enjoys turn-based strategy. 8.5/10
Spage;-;Can't really go wrong with old Sid's games can you?
Metzelda;-;Very good game, but games usually take several days to win.
Tim Horton;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a slightly complex turn based strategy game that can be enjoyed by all gamers. A fun and interactive map allows players to manipulate their surroundings in order to achieve their goal. Teaming up with friends in order to dominate enemy civilizations is a remarkably enjoyable experience.
PALUT0;-;Just one more turn... Completely losing track of time is a pretty strong indication of whether a game is good in my book, and Civilization 5 may be the best by that metric. As a newbie to the Civ series, managing a society through the ages had sounded a bit daunting, but thankfully the game is very intuitive for series beginners. The visuals, narration, and music are all pitch-perfect, evoking a grand ambience fit for a game about world conquest. Individual games can take hours, but it never feels tedious or repetitive. Computer opponents seem to have plenty of personality, and multiplayer with friends is a blast. I realize turn-based strategy games may not be for everyone, but it would be difficult for me to find someone I wouldn't recommend this game to.
Shauku;-;Just one more turn!
Leu;-;Let me get one thing out of the way here at the start of the review, if you dont have time to put hours into a game then Civilization V may not be for you. Heck if you enjoy having a life outside of a game then this might not be for you. I say this because once you sink your teeth into Civilization V its easy to loose track of time and become completely engrossed in your quest to build your civilization. So let me first give you my background in playing Civilization games which is a short one I played the last two games (Civ IV and Civ Revolution) and enjoyed both of them quite a bit. When I started looking at some of the early previews of Civilization V I have to admit I wasnt sure I was ready to put the time and strategy into the world of Civilization. However from the opening load screen and the first few minutes of my first game I was instantly brought back to remembering why this is such an impressive franchise. For newcomers to Civilization, Civilization V may be one of the best games to get into. The game has an incredible tutorial and also will help you in your first games with helpful hints throughout. Either way if you have not played a Civilization game before this game seems well suited to hold your hand and then let you on your way. One thing that I found especially useful for me was the advisors in the game who basically give you tips on areas you should focus on in your civilization. You dont have to take their advice but often times they will all agree on one topic and that usually should be a solid indication that you want to address that area. One barrier of entry that Firaxis broke down in Civilization V was the menus throughout the game. Where in previous games you were often left wondering what to do next, this is by far the user-friendliest experience I have experienced in any Civilization game. Even as some one who has played Civilization games in the past I was very impressed with how approachable things were in this game, everything just felt far more intuitive then in past games. What stood out to me most about Civilization V was not only how accessible it was but how great of a strategy experience it manages to be. There is no denying that you can spend a whole day on just one game of Civilization. In fact unless you really have the stamina to play all day most games will span over the course of a couple of 5+ hour sittings. Civilization V (like Civ games before it) has this way of engrossing you into the story even if there isnt an already established plot. You create your own plot, your own direction, and your own goals. Sure the game does give you hints on how to get the desired outcome but the strategy is so dead on that you have the ability to go your own way to your desired outcome. A lot of the talk around Civilization V before the games release was on the new hexagon setup which to be honest is a change for the game but nothing that really changes the way you play the game. This is a turn based strategy game through and through and to be honest it is one of the best strategy games I personally have ever played. Graphics Without a doubt Civilization V has a much stronger visual presence then what we had in past Civilization games. The graphics have never been a big part of the Civilization experience however that all changed in this game. Visually this is a stunning game, it has a great mechanic to switch from strategy views to just a global view. If you prefer to look at the game as more of a grid you can do that, if you want to look at the game as a living world you can do that as well. This is by far the best looking Civilization game out there and it once again lessens the blow of how expansive of a strategy game it really is. Fun Factor For newcomers to the series there is of course going to be a learning curve no matter how good the tutorial is. However for seasoned veterans to the series you will be able to jump right in and take advantage of one of the most enjoyable games of strategy I have ever played. What is even more exciting about Civilization V is that you not only can play offline but can play online with friends. There is also going to be an ever-growing population of mods to the game that will continue to increase replay-ability. Lets face it though I have not played two games of Civilization that ever felt even remotely similar each game feels like a brand new experience. Overall Civilization V is one of the best strategy games I have ever played. There are some issues but those are so minor in comparison to all the great things Firaxis has done to not only make this accessible to new players but even returning players as well. I can say with great confidence that you will not get a better game of strategy right now then what Civilization V has to offer, it is just that good.
ANNEX;-;Damn, frikin shtty City-states are all like: oh! you better give us money or well end this friendship! Dude, wtf you started the friendship jeeze but good game, just kill City-states as soon as you see them
RainBlast;-;This game is great. I've never played the previous Civ games, so this game was quite intimidating. There is so much data presented, it is hard to figure out which is important and which isn't. It will take you some time to learn how to have fun with this game, as the pacing seems glacially slow when you don't know what you are doing. By the time you've beaten a few games, you'll be having a great time playing. I love playing each new scenario and learning mechanics I didn't understand before. It makes me excited to play the next game to try out a new strategy! Touch Support on this game is really great too.
Mr. pinchy;-;Played tutorial for 2 hours then realized i couldnt save then started a normal match and played for 17 hours 10/10
Codahuni;-;Such a fun game, if you don't have it you should buy it :D
Batesy boys;-;Got trapped on an island and got nuked by Ghandi 9/10
macswyney;-;Civilization V is a beautiful game, capturing the struggles of a leader trying to create a dominant empire to rise above the others. Somehow, it manages to be both simple and complex. It is mostly realistic and offers some humorous irony and increased difficulty in the form of Ghandi. However, it's DLC are way overpriced for the amount of content they actually offer and it gets boring after the first few playthroughs. Overall, it is an amazing game that will keep you invested for hours on end, keeping you on your toes until the last turn. [9.5/10]
Shofixti;-;This game is the best
Javert;-;create nice empire try to win by culture get invaded pwn the enemy ask for peace they want all my cities  you dont they denounce me 10/10
Raoul Duke;-;Super fun game, one of those games you spend all night playing :)
DetectiveDetected;-;This is the first game I tried in the Civilizations series, and it definately will not be the last. Having purchased the original and Gods & Kings DLC nearly a year ago, I will soon be purchasing the Brave New World expansion whenever I find the time. Even if you are new to Civilizations as a whole, this game is still easily adaptable and well worth your time. Civilization V is simple enough to learn in a quick game or two, however offers enough micro-manageable options in order to be completely customizable both pre-game and in-game. This game caters to any play style, and you can adjust nearly anything you want. From game speed, map size, and map type to what resource focus to put your capital on and where to build a city to benefit you the most, the game offers nearly endless amounts of customization and micro-management. I strongly suggest the purchase of the Gods & Kings expansion and/or the Brave New World expansion along with this game. They add much more features to make your Civ 5 experience as enjoyable as possible. Lastly, you do not require any special talent in reaction time, and you do not require "an eagle's eye" to play. All you need is strategy, a sense of fun, and time. Lots of time.
Kazputik;-;I lost my life to this game
Pinhead Larry;-;one of my favorite game, get it if you have the money, but be carefull, if you start pl;aying this game, there is a good chance you will forget ti stop, and then all of a sudden its 11 hours later.
temeritas1-82;-;Played Civ series since the first in the series, especially Civ2. Civ V is very addictive - only play if you don't want a life.
hyozanryu;-;>Am Washington >Build monarchy >Democratic England attacks >Still win the battle for independence >All hail King Washington
Skaboober;-;Highly addictive game that makes you want to keep on playing
Silverus;-;A game surprisingly more tactical and militaristic than a "civilization" should probably be, especially with nuke-happy Gandhi. Still a fantastic game. Would recommend.
obiwanlotr;-;Best civilization game I have ever played, very very addicting, and above all really fun.
NedTal;-;Peaceful Ghandi of India. He declared global thermonuclear war on everyone. 10/10
TheMysticLemon;-;Just can't get enough :)
mlbcujo27;-;Probably my favorite game of all time and has great replayability. I love the strategy involed as well as the different ways you can win the game. I highly recommend.
Nullify;-;It's hard to go wrong with Civ, but now 2 expansions in, the game has really come into its own.
Doc Rawr;-;The best time suck you can buy. Many hours have vanished while playing this game.
kayotik saint;-;bought it on sale a few years back and wasnt able to play it due to poop computer. I have sense bought a new computer and i can say i will flunk out of my classes next semester because of this game!
nicbeaumont;-;This is a Real time strategy on such a scale I can't even beging to compliment it. The graphics are simply amazing, wonders are well detailed. The histoical information in the civilopedia is great for light reading, and the thought put into the units was wonderful. I mean, how many people knew about turtle ships and galeasses before playing this game. Also the sense of reality in the diplomatic relationships between civs is relativly realistic. It is a challenging game, but not impossible. I like the five ways to achive victory as well. Overall 10/10 stars and I can't wait to see how their latest game Civiliation, Beyond Earth turns out!
Rypekiller;-;A great game, well worth its price. After over 420 hours the game continues to offer great experiences, both in single- and multiplayer. It truly is the best strategy game being offered today and well worth your money! PS: Buy all of the expansions(G&K and BNW) for a better experience.
Dindu Nuffins;-;I try making peace of India but he nuke me. Why is india do this. I suppose to be peace. Please fix but otherwise good gaming. India make me cry at night because many nukes into capital and make me die. One time I contimplating suicide because india nuke too much. And when I vote to be ally, they nuke me because i no make city of mine to them. Very good game though 11/10 will get nuked by india again.
Glyphicalllllllllll;-;Don't play this late at night, or you WILL be up until 5 A.M. Trust me.
ocbd;-;An immense amount of replayability. Any strategy fan will love this game and history buffs will most likely be interested. The only thing that may deter people is the learning curve-- which there is a mild one. I haven't played any previous Civilization games and it took maybe an hour at most outside of the tutorial to understand the deepest levels of the game. That is not to say it is simple by any measure, however. The tutorial walks you through the game and there is even a setting to change your familiarity with the game and even new expansions while you are playing outside of the tutorial in a normal game. This mechanic will be sure to easily introduce you to new game systems through a typical playthrough. I purchased this and most DLC and expansions at full price and it is completely worth it. Any discount on this game and the rest of the content is definitely a must-buy. Amazingly addicting gameplay and a unique and enthralling storyline that is written with every new game that is played. One can never be bored with a game that has a dynamic workshop supported by creative community members.
whomppers;-;This game is my life for at least 10 hours at a time...
NEVERISM;-;Just...one...more...turn!
blase.xla;-;The vanilla Civ V is definitely still a great game, but really only shines with the big DLC (BNW and G&K). The DLCs give Civ V the replay-ability you look for in a Civ game. So, if you can snag the whole bundle in a Steam Sale there's probably one of the best purchaes on Steam you could make.
Kappa Keepo Meepo;-;I single handedly wiped out The Americans and my Iroquois brothers as The Shoshone who in historical times never numbered much over 4,500. 10/10 would exact revenge again
yattawan;-;Day 1: as Kamehameha (Polynesian) I've nuked Babilon with my bombers. Totally worth it. WARNING: this game is a hell of a drug. Play responsibly.
Plasem;-;Probably my favorite game. EVER.
Mike;-;Great Game
Morgen;-;It's hard to describe what is Civilization to someone who never played it. Well, it's a simulator of building your own empire in a way that ou prefer - wars, economics, diplomacy, religion. If you are a big fan of strategy genre, you should definetely play this game, it's great. It's also turn-based. Don't rush into multiplayer, try some single player scenarios first to feel game pace and choices that you must do in order to conquer the world. Good luck!
Roaring Lion;-;It's a awsome game.. I played Civ III when i still was a young boy and i didn't knew how to play the game.. A while ago i bought Civ V because is saw some awesome vids on Youtube about it.. It's pretty easy to learn the basics...
HooKed `;-;Played this game so much it destroyed my friendships. Now, I can play without being bothered 10/10.
The Wise Janitor;-;its ok
Sir Brenlar of the High Planes;-;Love this game its where you get to form your own empire and go from the stone age to the space age with so many world leaders and figures like George Washington, Ghandi, Bismarck, and many more. so many different possibilities its just a wonderful game
Slynch;-;11 hour game of domination to conquer the world, ended up losing a 1v1 against Gandhi because he had an army of giant death robots. 11/10
Col. Hammer;-;An improvement over previous Civ games, and twice as addictive
Pulleyhead;-;Great turn based strategy. Very addictive with a lot of depth. A lot of replay value.
Zollgax;-;JUST ONE MORE TURN you yell at 3 am after playing for 5 hours straight on the same game
dosifei;-;At first Civ V was pretty rocky. There were a lot of problems with the initial release in terms of game balance and fun. However, I remembered full well the release of the original Civ III and Civ IV games, and the same was true for their vanilla versions. Both were made immensely more-playable by their subsequent expansions. The same is true for Civ V. With patches and expansions, it has grown into an addictive gaming experience worthy of the Civilization franchise. Almost all of the new game mechanics are winners, from hexagonal tiles to social policies to the culture system... Almost, I say. The big, huge, massive flaw of this game is irrepairable, and that is the 1 Unit per Tile restriction. While I've no problem with implementing some sort of restrictions to limit Stacks of Doom and massive unit spam, the 1UPT system is ultimately the wrong way to do it. Turning 1000-mile stretches of the map into tactical battlefields might be fun for the Panzer General crowd, but it slows the game down and leads to unpleasant unit shuffling. It also doesn't make much sense that Bronze Age archers can fling arrows over hundreds of miles of terrain. If you want a tactical battle system in Civ, then adopt the Imperialism mechanic of switching to turn-based battles on localized battlefield maps instead of having them on the main map. Forcing players to move countless units around the map just makes multi-player tedious as you wait for your opponents to move and move and move... But honestly, even with 1UPT, Civ V is excellent. It has grown to supplant Civ IV as my strategy game of choice these days, which is saying something.
SupaHot;-;I think I may have just found a game to replace TF2...
Sexy_Hick;-;this game is the game that will make you late to work if you play it. right now i'm still getting used to it, will update review later, but right now, 100% worth getting it!
CommanderCurtis;-;I am reviewing this game. You should purchase this game should you possess the required funds.
Michael M.;-;One of the biggest time sinks I've ever had the fortune/misfortune of meeting, Sid Meier's Civilization V is a symphony of strategic awesome as you go up against some great names in history and establish your people. This game is great vanilla, but you enter a whole other level of awesome with the 'Gods and Kings' and 'Brave New World' expansions. History buffs, strategy fans, and just gamers in general will treasure this game.
Slugbreath;-;Lets you live out your inner political critic who says I could do that better, which in the end usually means rush nukes, then drop said nuke on that nation who took that resouce you wanted 2000 years ago. As far as the 4x genre goes I can't see a better game on the market, although the brave new world expansion is essential. I also recommend you check out the massive collection of mods availble from the ingame menu which let you play the game however you want. Summary: Buy this game! (with the brave new world expansion) P.S. Ghandi is a p***k
zcobh1;-;Best turn based strategy game I've ever played, has great game customization with different map types and other preferences and options. Definitely recomend for a game alone or with friends.
billybob-jr;-;Civ 5 is a amazing
Colonel Nappi;-;Its a life style.
snoflake_128;-;great game. can end friendships. 10/10
Jayran;-;Time has the abilty to accelerate at intense speeds due to this game. It also shows what kind of person you truely are. This game is perhaps one of the best stratigie game i have ever played. Ghandi is an absolute evil and vile person in this game
Sellbot 4000;-;Destroyed my life. Ruined my social skills. Spoiled me so all other games seem less fun. Buy it.
LuckyCharms;-;Great game but has a steep learning curve. Don't turn on the tips; they're the most annoying ing things ever.
darkphinix321;-;Build your empire and dominate the world!
DavidBLinder;-;Interesting
dhamdra;-;A great and addictive game! I bought this for 2 days and now I have 33 hrs played.
Chef Boy [RD];-;Love it Love it Love it. A little tough on a computer if you play on huge settings, but other than that, flawless.
doramajoo;-;Time sucking. You'll startat 8 am and next thing you'll know it'll be dark out.
BoPuNk;-;I love this strategy You can Play countless hours for sure...You can Enjoy this game Everyday! Buy it if you like Strategys..! you wont be disappointed..!!! (Sorry for the Bad English)
quetzalzotz;-;This game has become an addiction. It's ruined my life. 10/10
Lifeless_;-;"Your day of judgement will come." -Gandhi
Yung Kenya God;-;Great game, very addicting, very fun, buy it its worth your money.
FlashingOut702;-;Solid game.. lots of fun.. can get lost in game play for hours
kubryan23;-;Civ 5 is one of the best strategy games i have ever played it keeps the ideas of old games but also changes up the game enough so you it will feel fresh when you play it.
Geek;-;Ethiopians beating me to the Great Wall... 11/10 Best history simulator
Xyranoth;-;Turn Based Strategy *Bug Free Overall 4 out of 5 Complexity 4 Graphics 3 Immersive 5 Inovative 2 Game Pace 2 This is a classical Civilization game. Pro : It's a great game, bringing along allot of good suff they come out in the last 20 year. Against : Sid Meyer seam to have adhered to the "hook them with the packs" strategy, giving a very dull game, followed by a package with the good stuff from the past, and then another package with the new good stuff. Just keep in mind that you need to complete version, and you'll have a very good game (if you like the gender).
Huw :Davies;-;Great... When on 75% off
Jia;-;This game is really awesome! Time flies like crazy with it :D
SirButtpirate;-;Literally great
Huynh1;-;Now this is a game to play with friends and ruin your friendship with them.
squrriles09;-;so freakin buene
LOCUST;-;looks really boring but its really fun
Rainbow;-;If you like managing empires, nuking George Washington, and spending 6 hours playing a game you meant to play 40 minutes with, then there ya go.
Literally Chief Keef;-;Make sure you have a clock you can see while playing so you don't accidentally miss out on the rest of your life.
Chicken Pot Pie;-;Great and addictive
Samska;-;One of the most entertaining games I've played in a while.
JerkinJerk;-;Sweet game, definatly worth the money.
dimitriy1986;-;Brilliant, as always from Sid!
pastures;-;Worse than drugs. Do not play if you value real life.
KaiserScootsMcgoots;-;One word: Awesome. Even though it is very fun, it can be quite daunting when you firs turn it on, I really reccomend playing the tutorials, or going on youtube and finding a good tutorial for begginers. Once you get the hang of it it becomes very addictive to build new cities or try to research your next weapon to 1 up your enemies. Also, to me it seems the game has plenty of replay value, while my play time compared to others is small, I still haven't gotten bored. Keep in mind this isn't fan bias, I haven't played a single Civilization game until now, better yet, a strategy game! Although there are some downfalls, the AI can be REALLY annoying to deal with. In example, you can have their entire capital surround with superior military units , (Tanks, artillery, etc) and they will say something along the lines of "are you ready to surrender yet?" even on the lower difficulties! Another thing is, a country you have good relations with will not want to declare war on someone even if the country you want to declare war on has captured one of their cities! Finally, I have experienced some annoying glitches. For instance, an enemy city would get stuck in and infinite attack loop when attacking one of my units, and eventually the game decided the way to end the glitch was to kill my units when clearly the could have survived the attack! Also, when I built the great wall, it simply dissapeared! Overall, the game is a great experience, if you like strategy games try this, and if you don't still, give it a try! (Quick tip! If you are on WIndows 8 don't select windows 8 & touchscreen mode when I launch the game, it caused constant crashes for me, instead chose direct x 10 & 11 mode!)
Captain Omaniss;-;Are you inteligent? No? ---------- Don't buy this game. l Yes? l l l Do you have a lot of time? No? ---------- Don't buy this game. l Yes? l l l Buy this game.
toolfan2k4;-;One of my favorite games of all time. Seriously...just buy all of the DLC because you will want it anyway.
Guile Fieri;-;is rly good
[WPG] Moral Disorder;-;This game gives me a massive history boner.
ryjomanley;-;This game started off great, and with the exapnsions and DLC it has only gotten better. It requires a good chunk of time to get the full experience, so if you plan on doing a playthrough in one sit down, expect o be up until the wee hours of the next morning. This games has taken everything about strategy games, thrown it together, and amplified it. I love the way the game is and i cant wait to see how it grows. If you like strategy or are interested in testing the waters of the stratedy genre, jump right into this game.
Cencu;-;Really great game lots of different things to do so it never gets boring, play through the whole demo before rating the game.
Beican;-;I was in a war against Ceasar and Gandhi and defeated them with a tank... 20/10
Pat Kozmo;-;Washington founded Buddhism and completed the Kremlin. 10/10
BigTonyg2020;-;Very occupying & entertaining
SuperHero Llama;-;One of my favourite games, 200% better with DLC. Civ V is totally a game to get
Mango Guertena;-;Barbarians razed my farms and massacred my citizens 10/10
Trunker;-;Awesome game. The expansions really complete it and make it much better and more complete; I highly recommend getting the expansions.
dagaminglyfe;-;I can never get sick of this game, it's just one of those games that you come back to.
illuminaughty;-;this game is tl:dr in a nutshell
ProfChaos;-;Excellent game! I have played the Civ series from from the the DOS era to today...A must for any strategy player
rathora;-;So many wasted hours
GypsyRoSes;-;do you have hours you really need to get rid of? civilization v best time killer 4000 BC - 2050 AD (more addictive than popcorn)
Colonel O'Beef Dip;-;An excellent turn-based RTS that can be picked up very easily by those not so familiar with the genre or experienced players. As stated in many other reviews, you'll find yourself playing this game for tens of hours without even realizing it, it's that addicting!
miguelalex888;-;About to reach 400 hours in this game. I guess you could say it's okay.
Johnny;-;It's a great beginner strategy game.
Raelfyg;-;I'll get those pearls for you, Sidon.
It's Jvn;-;Nothing better then Sid Meier's Civilization
shugorlr;-;This is a great strategy game, even more so with the expansions. Impressive and well structured, this is a must try for anyone who calls himself a gamer and for anyone... just anyone. Beautiful game, full stop.
Samwell Tarly;-;I had played this game when it first came out and hated it. Now with the expansions and patches it is honestly the best Civ game I have ever played.
Eagledog3862;-;Addictive doesn't begin to describe this game. It is one of the best ways to waste your time. I highly recommend this game to anyone, of course you absolutely need the Brave New Worlds expansion even if you don't buy the Gods and Kings expansion.
Timmotus;-;Good graphics. Good gameplay. Just what I like.
Shimmerstrike;-;Just one more turn should be the motto for this game
bolognasuntan45;-;Awesome game that can be played over and over again.
draco;-;very fun game but it lags alot and often and will crash a bit
!Per antani;-;The civ 5 base game isnt a complete game.... u need the complete game with the 2 big expansion gods and kings and brave new world and now u got a rly amazing game. The best turn strategic game, when u start to play it u cant stop. U think u need another 5 min at 2 am for complete something but at 5 am u are already in game. This big game (all this series anyway is amazing) is a risk for your true life :). For my thing anyway dont go look for multiplayer wth a lot players, because the game come be rly slowly. Play it with 1 your big friend vs pc and u have a rly big fun
OwlL (5) <_420;-;COOL
XXpotatoninjaXX;-;love the versatility and unique play styles of each leader and love the ability to play with my friends online and the drop in drop out is wonderful
Vexillarius;-;I strongly recommend this game for avid strategists. Your objective is to nurture a civilisation and become victorious over all others. There are numerous victory possibilities thanks to a large range of ingame concepts from tourism to science. Each civilisation has its unique units/buildings as well as an ability through their leader. Moreover, the dedicated mod workshop enhances the game further still, bestowing upon it astronomical replay value. Give it a try, you won't regret it !
Jupiter;-;Ever wanted to completely pillage Sweden or make every tile in Tellus full of giant robots? This is your change to do so.
Gemgeffery;-;Because China's icon is a mothering dragon.
Keegan;-;i ing love this game ive had it for 2 months, it runs on any computer
Geith Kan;-;It's fun to play.period
andrewcul;-;I am completely addicted to this game! Would recommend to anyone that enjoys strategy games.
Alpha_Criminal;-;Awesome game. Not for those who don't like slower strategy games, but great nonetheless.
patrickburgess8;-;A huge improvement over Civ IV, especially when you take the expansions into account, Civ V offers a deep experience and addicting gameplay.
Fragnozzi;-;I was able to eat a couple apples. Rate 10/10
gnomenomes;-;Civilization 5 is a game you can play over and over again. There are so many unique scenarios, challenges, and aspects to the game that every play through forces you to encounter something new. I love the complexity of this game, the depth of it's balance (even if the AI is quircky), and the suspense that multiplayer offers.
Jersey Shore Reject;-;Solid, expansive, diverse, and funny at times game, with a great community and extremely diverse and awesome mods.
gunner101;-;JUST BUY IT SO WE CAN ALL NUKE EACH OTHER AND HAVE FUN!!!!!!!!
Medea;-;Buy this game. Just do it. It may ruin your life and cause you to lose all sense of the passage of time, but it's worth it! Also, watch out for Gandhi!
Milkbot;-;turns take horribly long to end, but otherwise a very fun game nobunaga4lyfe
Skratchet;-;Spending my days playing this game. Super addictive.
MICKIOR;-;This game is really interesting to play with friends but playing singleplayer gets boring
Stump Dawg;-;Im reviewing this for the community badge but good game anyway
Andreas;-;like skyrim with hexagons
Voaz;-;Yes people, this is absolutely the best turn-based strategy game to find, it is super detailed within every unit of every civilization itself, all the buildings and everything what comes with it,. Somehow like a boardgame, but also very different. Civilization V ( best played with Gods & Kings and the Brave New World DLC ) is just the best strategy turn-based game on the market and it's worth your money for sure! You start out with a settler ( to create a capital city ) and a warrior, and it's up to you how you are going to expand your empire and how you are going to victory on the map. You can play with really alot of civilizations, from Europe to America to Asia. It's so cultural and big it contains houndreds of hours of gameplay without getting bored ( atleast, if you are into long turn-based matches ) The game itself costs 30EU, the Gold upgrade costs 10EU and the newest DLC: Brave New World ( requires the main game to be installed ) costs currently 30EU. But don't worry, it's worth your money for real.
skullyi1234;-;An absolute must for strategy nuts, HIghly realistic with the technology tree, barbarians can be quite annoying but then again so can most things in many games, I highly recommend this game to new comers in the Civ franchise and the veterans who are yet to play this.
judethe;-;Honestly one of the greatest games I've ever played, far too much of my time has been spent on this masterpiece.
QoMSoL;-;Haven't played Civ since the original and I must say that playing Civ V was a real pleasure. If you like the idea and good old Civ you'll like this. It's neither frustrating nor complicated, it's just fun.
xVautour;-;Much wow, very Civ.
afeher.paw;-;Excellent and vastly time consuming. Great game by itself, but really starts to come into it's stride with the Brave New World expansion pack. Love it!
A Steemy Poop;-;This game is just pure fun. I just picked it up during the Steam Summer Sale and I think it was a great decision. Fun to play, easy to learn, and unique as well. All you gotta do is add to cart and begin having a ton of fun!
dementedgr;-;One of the best turn-based strategy games I've ever had the pleasure of playing. Whether teaming up with my friends for some multiplayer, or simply losing a whole night of sleep to the game's endlessly replayable single player, this is one game that any strategy enthusiast, or, hell anyone strat-curious should check out.
SilverDyrewolf;-;One of the most addictive games I've ever played. Always wanting to go one more turn. A new game every time you play. 10/10
White;-;Washington, Washington, six-foot-eight weighs a ing ton, opponents beware, opponents beware, he's coming, he's coming, he's coming. Let me lay it on the line, he had two on the vine, I mean two sets of testicles, so divine.
Hamster Molester-CSGOGamble.com;-;if your a total  tard like me you wont understand the game untill you lose a round. but its still fun.,
Konrad Kaufmann;-;Probably the best game I own when it comes to quality. Gameplay has been refined due to its age as a series and its graphics are still very good. Not to mention the OST music.
Pelargir;-;Oh why didn't I read the reviews.... It was 9PM and then it was 1AM. GG sleep.
Tiger3499;-;I just got this game and im loveing it already
HovenS;-;I dominated the world because all other countries bought jeans and listened to music from my country. Some dude refused to stop spying on me even though I had four atom bombs stationed near his capital. 11/10
kallistobob;-;Great game which robbed me dozens of hours sleep
Number 2 Pick D'Angelo Russell;-;ther R building n persons they kill enemy. much fun and friends
Vivec;-;If you had a very very good board game that you loved to play all the time and it was made into a video game, Civ V would be a lot like that. Highly recommended strategy game with plenty of depth and difficulty. Pretty addicting though.
ImmortalPenguin117;-;Built the Great Wall of Mongolia, the Eiffel Tower of New York, nuked Chicago, and went from being besties with Bismarck to wanting his head on a plaque hanging on my wall... All in one game. Oh, and all that scientific research being done on the possibility of time travel? Just play this game, you'll jump forward pretty quick. 10/10 would nuke Chicago again
Franke du Fiesk meg;-;I once injected 2 marijuans and this is more addictive than that
Ryskatt;-;Buy this game, and give it a chance. A couple of hours in, and you will be addicted. When you've reached the 'addicted'-stage, it can last for hundreds and hundreds of hours. When the addiction slowly disappears, the game will still continue to give you a fair amount of entartainment for the years to come.
Cdoubler;-;Me: Oh man, I had better get to sleep. I have so much to do tomorrow! Civ V: Whoa whoa whoa... how about just... 1 more turn? -4 hours later- Me: !@#$...
iamguyster;-;Most addictive game ever. Set an alarm clock to remind you to go to bed or you will see the sun rise before the game is over,
McNuggets;-;It is a game.
jacobvandy;-;Just... one... more... turn...
Dr. John A. Zoidberg;-;Be me, gamer with friends All buy Civ V during holiday sale because 10foreverything.tif Play it twice in the course of a month, one friend plays it quite a bit and gets fairly decent Host a LAN, friends come over Boot up civ.exe Attempt to recreate all the actions from World War II Something goes awfully wrong when Germany steals nuclear fission from the US MFW In a matter of 6 turns the world is annihilated and the Fuhrer stands tall and dominant 10/10
rockNrobin;-;Nice. Win the world!
Mobedda;-;One of the best games out there...especially with the Mod of Ice and Fire....outstanding.
Lord Grimsa;-;Fantastic game, cloud storage is an awesome feature if you like me often re-format your computer forgetting that you have saved games :L By it and you won't regret it.
Ronjon;-;Must Own! We all need to play together and run the WORLD!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Spaghetti Golem;-;There is nothing as satisfying as that " all yall" moment when every nation combined couldn't stop you if they tried, whether its through military might or about to launch into space or achieve cultural dominance, it really is a great feeling. Nukes for everyone, its like I'm Oprah.
Ravager;-;hours of fun and diffrent ways to play one of the best games out.
eveame;-;This is the best game ever as much as I'm concern!
dannyboy2016;-;What can I say? I've wasted 600 hours of my life on this game.
Fat Squirrel;-;10/10 would blow Ghandhi up again
WarriorSlime;-;Great game, the best game I have played on steam so far. Get it!
prophecyaudiovisual;-;Get stoned create A Civ and get lost
Synterloper | Just Dying;-;This game is very much worth the money. Its quite fun to play with friends or even with total starngers.
ZACWarrior;-;Pros: I love it, I played it a ton, and I love it, I love how you get to chose your path and interact with others. Cons: I sometimes find it hard to finish the game. Not like difficulty, but continuing the game because it gets a little boring in the later eras (I love future and modern warfare, so I don't know why I don't like to finish). Time- These games take forever, I was playing, and I was less than halfway through the game and it had already taken 300 turns, and over 5 hours. Selection- Your selection of units and civilizations is very limited in my mind. If it were me, I would have over 200 different civs, and as many unique units for every civ as possible, this is close to impossible, but that is just me. Overall: I love it and highly recommend it!
Lazy;-;Don't ever play this  vanilla. That's a mistake. Boy get the Expansions, both if you can but at least Gods and Kings. Now let's build an empire.  your workers were stolen by barbarians. Go find their bandit campm All right, there it is. Let's get our worker back, yeah? Warriors and archers all up on that camp! GET REKT BANDIT NERDS! HAHAHA! Yeah, now we can finally improve some tiles and maybe build that Great Library you wanted.... THE GREAT LIBRARY HAS BEEN BUILT IN A FAR AWAY LAND.
thedcflow;-;I didn't know if i would like civ or not since ive never played a turn-based game. I AM ADDICTED. buy this game
bearfreezing;-;10/10 would raze w/ giant death robots again
Deathelement;-;This game is a MUST OWN for anyone who plays pc gaming.
Engineer_9;-;Middle East is united under the great Harun Al-rasheed. France is underdeveloped country and Englend spreads Hinduism like a wild fire . What more do you want ?!
Mustachus;-;This Is A Really Fun Game I Love It Keep Up The Good Work
Zunderz;-;Addicting, time consuming, immersive. These are words you hear when you describe the Civ franchise and this is no different. While rough at launch, many updates, expansion packs and dlcs have made it a formidable game in the Civ franchise. It still excels at allowing you to create your own stories, and keep you playing "just one more turn!" I recomend buying the expansion packs as they add many new civs and mechanics that add much needed depth that vanilla is missing, the rest of the various dlcs are optional however. Buy this game, you won't regret it, but your to-do list might!
Hot Soup;-;A truly fantastic game, rich in depth and replay value. If you get anywhere near finishing the steam achievements, your a better person than I!
Hellz Storm;-;AMAZING GAME! Spent a ton of time on it. One of my most played game as well. :P The expansions are very worth it adds a lot of extra depth to a game that is already extremely deep.
GriffinMeister;-;It's simply amazing
Fizzly;-;This game is everything perfect in gaming. I tend to be a massive critic when it comes to video games. Especially so to Strategy games as it is my favored genre and, therefore, I am extremely picky about which ones I enjoy. Now, one look at my Steam Library will probably tell you exactly what style of Strategy games I enjoy (RTS). Simply put, I have never really liked Turn Based combat in any form. I can appreciate things like X-Com, and get the appeal to Pokemon and Final Fantasy, but I really just don't like turn based combat in any form. This game, however, has altered my oppinion of Turn Based Strategy completely. I wish there was more to say, but there are just so few words to describe this game well enough. The soundtrack is excellent, the gameplay is truly addictive and has depth the size of the Marianna Trench. The level designs are randomized in most cases, meaning that you'll literally never replay the same campaign ever unless you play one of the presets. The AI can be randomized as well. Throw all this into one bowl, add in rpg-like elements to build an empire that's truly yours, a political and economic system that puts EVE online to shame, and a simple, sleek, beautiful, easy to understand UI that feels like butter on your eyesockets and you still won't be able to grasp the perfection of this game. For those of you blessed to live near an IN-N-Out burger, imagine you've just been told that you can now have free infinite IN-N-Out Burgers and fries for life. The feeling of your taste buds erupting at the thought of all that burgery goodness is the equivelant of playing this game for ten minutes. In summary: Stop reading and buy this game you filthy peasant. And don't trust Ghandi
The Unicorn Oracle;-;basically you get to reright history so you can be Gandhi The Great Warmonger or Atilla The Fun or even have the great wall of America who knows the rome could even go to space and its good and you should play it cuz its good yaay
doctordonut23;-;It's extremely fun and a great way to pass time. Its even more fun with friends.
Brennen Stallmann;-;So much of my life has been lost to this game. 10/10
calantheliadon;-;Just as addictive (or more so) as Civ III, the first game I ever spent entire weekends playing. I am a terribad Civ player, yet get a lot of fun playing it, every time.
Doktor eReM;-;"It's like skyrim with gandhi 10/10"
eugene.and.darlene;-;The demo is great and worth it. The full game however wont start, so take that anyway you want it.
icarusfoundyou;-;Civ 4's friendlier, cleaner and more accessible little brother - still as addictive and damn good fun, as well as being robust in a managerial sense, but there's an air of compromise that long time fans will pick up on.
--<<JEZZAREAPER>>--;-;I have never been a fan of turn based games, but this one is too good to ignore. I love building offensively as well as defensively and finding new ways to out wit my opponents. Great game
ParkerBlast;-;I love this game it is the best strat game in my opinion.
baconbits;-;I have found this is be a fun strategy game. I would thoroughly recommend this to anyone who likes playing turn based based and taking over the world.
Giacomo2398;-;Really awesome game, you'll probably spend hours playing it! P.S. NUKE EVERYONE!!
Salems Rhapsody;-;Countless hours played currently, countless to be played! Love it!
DlondSpiceShaker;-;This game is easily my favorite game in my library it provide all the things i love in a game. A social aspect, great quality, and overall stratagy. Go get it now!!!
Tall_Man_Dan;-;Its fun to play but hard to get the hang of at first
SenseiWu;-;awesome! people who like to take over the world!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
CheapJab;-;The best strategy game i have ever played. Hours of fun.
Potato Salad;-;It's some kinky hardcore
Slave;-;Favorite strategy (after Heroes of Might and Magic 3 and 5). I advise everyone!
Aryan;-;Very interesting game=)
Navier Stoked;-;I avoided the Civ series for years, only recently picking up Civ V as part of a Humble Bundle. Wow. What can I say about this game that hasn't been said countless times before? Tons of fun and crazily addictive. I was right to fear it and, if you value your free time, you should too.
Tazer Swift;-;Worth Buying
Sneakilicious Kitty;-;Ever wanted to just get the day over with? That's simple! Just start a Civilization V game, and your whole day disappears!
The Silence;-;Fantastic game, so addicting
Ninjapearl;-;This game is like monopoly, there is only one guy, that ONE guy, who's hard to tackle. (gandi!!!!!) But when you are that one guy, you WIN! but serious, this game is awesome! Only hogwarts is better.
dirk.dierickx;-;This is a horrible game! You start playing and just can't stop. I played the original, many many years ago when it came on one 1.4MB floppy. It was already a good game then, where i wasted a lot of time on. I bought this when it came available on SteamOS and look and behold, the game is still as great as it ever was, still wasting my time like i have nothing better to do. Man, i hate this game for being so good and not letting me go. What's more, the game creators know this, when you complete a game and win, it leaves you an option of 'just one more turn' ... but it never is just one more turn is it? As with any addictive drug you think you can quit, but you can't. Buyers be warned!
ArenaV3;-;If you don't own this game, then you need to own it. I could literally play this for hours a day and forget that I was even alive. You can play it with your friends, get your  kicked by Queen Elizabeth (she is a GIANT C U N ext T uesday) because she has every ing ship ever made ever, and likes to denounce me all the time because she is an ape, jokes on her when I nuke her  to Sid Meier's basement. Or, you could ignore my useless banter about England (sorry England, I like you in real life), and just buy the game. You can get the game and the DLC for $15 on Amazon, if you're lucky. You want to stop playing this, but "just one more turn." But when that next turn comes, then here comes a ing Barbarian ready to steal your units, or pulling a ship up to your coastal city like it's a ing drive-thru, so you are gonna pull a frigate out of that coastal city's  and send that Barbarian ship to the bottom of the sea where it BELONGS.
SirMilagres;-;If you don't have much free time DO NOT BUY this game. It will ruin your life. It will be 3 AM, you desperately need to sleep and all you'll think about is: "just one more turn". This game is perfect. Its like merging chess with history. Absolutely amazing! I was kidding, by all means BUY THIS!
Zazzles;-;great game get the dlc for full value
Sotakoira;-;Easy to grasp while hard to master. Those words are a great description of CiV and all of its great new features. I haven't played this game as much as I have wanted, but it's only because every time I start a new game, I end up sitting on the PC for 8 or more hours straight, more or less. If you're willing to sacrifice your free time to a game, then go for it. It's a brilliant game.
GrannyHipster;-;Great game but it will eat your life
Sandwich8721;-;This game takes hours before you can finish the whole thing as one person. There are more than one leader you can pick from. This game is fun overall!!!!
Cheeky Nandos;-;good but better with the DLC
Vagonbrei;-;All that you need to know about this game is... that it is Sid Meier's Civilization!! Come on! You don't need more incentive!
Frank;-;It's consistently one of the most played games on steam. I like it. Everybody likes it.
JellyMaster;-;Don't bum rush culture when you are about to get ed by the Portugese inquisition!!
roflcarrot;-;great game easy to get into and yet extremely deep it's a game where you're going to have to take risks and rely on the fact that your enemy takes risks, with great planning and organization and strategy needed
hunybunny1076;-;Glad i finally listened to my friends and gave this one a try. Two thumbs up, love it!
capt swagger;-;best civ game out there i can play for hours
charl.buchler;-;I LOVE THIS GAME ITS FUN THIS IS MY BEST GAME EVER
n7stormreaver;-;Games like this is the reason PC always was, is and will be superior to console.
MizzNivvet;-;A wonderful continuation of the Civilisation saga - as I had previously only played Civ II on my parents' ancient windows xp the complex animated graphics were a nice surprise, as was the hexagonal map pattern which I found allowed for battles to be a lot more strategic than the more constricting chequerboard pattern of Civ II. A very nice turn based game with sufficient 'blood and gore' opportunities for the budding Genghis Khan, while a more diplomatically-minded player can mind their own borders and so attempt a cultural or scientific victory. It has a variety of different win-strategies, meaning that one play through just isn't enough. An excellent game for anyone who likes turn based strategy games.
Aurian;-;Crazy addictive.. just.. one... more.. turn!!!
cutigers;-;THIS GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Cannash;-;Just won a Space Victory as the Persians. Awesome game.
Dave The Kangaroo;-;Dude! This game is beast!
The Real Superman;-;Civilization 5 is an awesome game!!! It is very addicting, I ended up playing this game for 9 hours straight! Although I have to say that the Brave New World DLC makes the game a lot more entertaining!
Cap;-;When you play this game i think you should keep in mind that the game is not that great tbh. If you play it you might like it if you like games but it's only fun with dlc which is like one hundred dollars each way worse than train similate. next time you want to play sind meisr civilization iv MAYBE JUST PLAY IT INSTEAD OF BUYING THIS KNOCKOFF. This game is just a rip off of the new sim city except you can ;'t get the cars. When you bea t it you will be thinking "wow i don't know how to play this game " but its's okay I will train you I have beetan it twenty times on hardest difficulty with a steering wheel controler and no mods because im a purist when it comes to gameon. hvae fun. 0/10 gamfaqs because no way to steal enemy citys with the spy which is unrealistic
megabest;-;great game a little slow but worth the buy
Cluisanna;-;Great game, especially with the DLC. Much easier to get into than other 4X games like Crusader Kings. Very addicting. Also good for hot seat co-op.
Luma;-;This game is possibly the best game ever. It has very deep strategy and the opportunity to play very differently.
Revan;-;Why haven't you bought this incredible game yet?!
Laggy;-;OMG STOP I AM BANKRUPT I WON'T BE ABLE TO BUY ANY MORE EXPANSION PACKS.
Pran TheWise;-;Very good game, and with the DLCs it's even more fun!!!! For a great price so much fun????!!!! And certainly with a sale!!!!
**;-;Nice game, worth it
bungis;-;literally cant stop playing ever
daireon97;-;Brilliant game, wish I had Brave New World though, my only complaint is that the palace view that was in Civ 3 is gone:(, but I gtg and play more Civ 5
flatfoot8355;-;The Best of the Civ series... and with each new expansion it gets better and better! 10/10!
capn_yellowshirt;-;For the person that wants to rewrite history from the comfort of their own home this is the game for you.
Bran;-;what time is it again?
IcyNova;-;Awesome game, the effort put into quitting for long enough to type this comment was overwhelming
Plutia;-;For strategy games, this one takes the cake, and eats it too. The modding community is strong with this one, every game is different, no two are alike. Multiplayer is nice, and with final update smooth, enjoyable experience all around. If you're into building up a civilization from the ground up over the course of 6500 years, making diplomatic decisions with other empires, whilst protecting yourself from barbarians and finding ancient ruins all in the process, this game is for ye.
purpleandgold419;-;Civ V is the only game where your friend's civilization can have nuclear weapons, while your civilization has just learned the great enlightment that is manure. 5/5 Stars
Shegwa;-;1 71Ke 1t 15 Th3 Bes1
Ael;-;Civ 5 will teach you that the world is not fair at all.
TheDramaticBuck;-;Even though I'm a begginer. This game makes people smarty-smart. Awesomeness and addiction to the max. 'Nuff Said.
Mr. Shire;-;Played as Hiawatha of the Iriquois and killed Queen Elizabeth with Nuclear-powered robots. 10/10
bigfootv519;-;Get ready to loose all other goals in life. This game is surpsisingly addicting. Its a pretty easy to get the hang of too.
Trozz;-;Its Civ what do you expect
Muju;-;Great Game
jcf981;-;Best game ever ! I could ruin my life with it.
TheyRLiyng2Us!;-;Works flawless under Arch Linux. Civ 5 is per se a very good game. The only thing i dislike about it is the sound track. But there's an easy fix for that.
Preed;-;One more turn then it's bed time I swear this time.
The Disco Bandit;-;This is by far the greatest game i have ever played. 11/10
theblacklemon;-;I haven't left the room in 3 days 10/10
Baggizine;-;Are you a smart person? Do you like the notion of nuking the hell out of everyone? Then play Civilization V, probably the best RTS game of all time with its stellar graphics AND gameplay.
JussiMuussi | 2/2015 KARPR;-;Civilization is a game that really takes time to learn. It's easy to learn the basics, especially if you have played other strategy games before, but the actual learning begins after that. Turn by turn, everything that you do in the beginning and after that, affects the endgame, so you will have to know right at the beginning what to research or build and so on. And it's not like every game is based on same decisions, because the game is constantly changing and there are multiple ways to achieve victory. Usually, if you play at [/b]normal[/b] speed, the games take >10h to play, so I wouldn't recommend this game to those who like fast-paced action duh . Civ V is a great way to waste your weekends playing games and not doing anything useful, so if you like long term strategy games with plenty of challenge, I think that this is your game. P.S. I would recommend you buy the Gods and Kings & Brave New World (especially the BNW), because those bring new elements to the game, and BNW changes the game dramatically.
XB92AI;-;In my opinion, this is one of the best strategy games around. The base game is pretty bland, however the two expansion packs are what make Civilization V as good as it is. The expansions add new civilizations and great game mechanics like trade routes via boats and caravans, tourism, religion. These can all Impact the game in such a fantastic way and add a little more complexity to the gameplay. I believe that Civ V i best played with friends. We love to pick random Civilization's and set the AI to random personalities. This makes the game pretty muchh different every time we play it. Gandhi may not be a  this time around, Washington might not just continue to expand all over your borders. It is good fun, especially when co-operating with one another about trading, swapping resources and even war. If you have the slightest interest in Strategy games, this is for you. I do recommend both expansion packs, though.
Kony2012;-;Don't play before going to bed. You'll end up....not going to bed for a good while
DNalfein;-;The great life destroyer that keeps improving with every xpac. The game is a true successor to a legacy that started over 20 years ago. Dont be fooled by the date this came out, its still a game with next to no equals in terms of the turn based strategy genre. The learning curve might look steep at first glance but I assure you that mastering the basics game will come faster than you think. For the over 1500 hours of gaming I have recorded in the game I am still someone who barely did any scenarios. To keep the game fun, dont forget to crank up the difficulty as the challenge that is brought by the highest difficulty levels will bring out the true test of your abilities.
Le_Cheese;-;A great turnbased strategy game, really fun when you get the hang off it.
Aflin;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is one of the best games I have ever played, but I would recommend getting the Brave New World expansion as it enhances the gameplay greatly. I have literally spent hours playing with my friends, losing every time, but the experience of the game in itself is what makes this game truly remarkable. A Masterpiece.
A Spastic Squirrel;-;quite possibly the best turn based strategy game on the market
vorpalblade;-;A turn based strategy game, Civilization V continues the classic Civilization series.
BASOLUTE KOMODO;-;Became friends with Gandhi, we made many trades and research agreements. Then he just ran over me with elephants and nuked my capital 10/11
BiscuitSawce;-;Awesome game! Very addicting! One of my favorite games!
Charlie Bucket;-;Nuked Gandhi and the whole world hated me. 11/10
dolsson;-;A wonderful TBS for a group of players
Timmyboi;-;Great game, although Multiplayer can become a tad buggy.
Steiner26;-;This is a great game and can lead to hours on hours of fun.
John Gotti #NZ #CYABOYS;-;10/10 would bang
Klashius_SVK;-;Fine game, I did not get so attached as I was once to Civ 2. It is worth your money when there is a steam sale.
Sainty;-;Great game, but you need the expansions (Brave New World & Gods and Kings) to bring some of the features from the previous title back in to the game. Civ IV was amazing and with a little bit of game time, I've decided that this title is just as good.
Demonic Snail Headgear;-;Amazing game with tons and tons of fresh and entertaining content. Though the game is heavly, heavly improved by dlc. If your low on many Brave New World is the for your interest. With an active modding community and so much content for such a small price during steam sales, it's a great experience! Vanilla Civ 5: 7 out of 10 Civ 5 with dlc: 9.5 out of 10 :{A MUST HAVE FOR STRADEGY GAME FANS}:
Frosty;-;Fun game, but my friends are  and never stick with a game. 0/10
Senor Freshco;-;I haven't showered in a month because of this game. Turned steam offline to avoid annoying conversations. Only slept 4 hours a night. Got a full caveman neckbeard. Got 32D-Cup man . Only ate Doritos and Mountain Dew for six months. Wore a fedora to protect my hair from too many oils. Called all female AI's m'lady to prevent wars. Watched anime with English subtitles between turns to understand the Japanese Civ better. Lost all friends, fitness and family. 10/10 recommended.
Sky Song;-;Great game and very easy to lose track of time while playing. Started playing a game at 4 PM and ended up not stopping until 3 AM, causing me to fail a test and then having to stay after school. 10/10 would recommend.
jawtheshark;-;The only other Civilisation I have played was back in the DOS days... You know, "Civilisation" or civ.exe. This is game is exactly as I remember it from back then. Even the controls seems to be the same "F" fortify, "space" skip turn, etc... I'm ecstatic. My wife much less, though I haven't seen her much since I started playing...
avhensley;-;If you can play a game where you can play as the Cherokee and conquer Great Britain out of context of history, you play the game
MUredhawk41;-;Love it! This detailed turn by turn strategy game is hours upon hours of fun!
Queen Horseytime;-;Great game for anyone who likes strategy. Pretty addicting too. Overall, great game.
nlangstrom;-;Cannot stop playing this game. Its fun to kill time. Good strategy game.
Enz;-;You kill one civilization and no one like you but they all want you to go to war with germany for some reason. most realistic game 11/10
Hammerhead96;-;I have had a lot of fun with Civ V. There are many roads to victory. You can also make a custom game to limit methods of victory. There is so much that can be customized for each individual game you play. Very good replay value.
PaperTax;-;Great game with great replay value. There's nothing quite like conquring the world as Germany to spread Judaism. The DLC is definitely worthwhile.
Puff from SSBM;-;Just... One... More... Turn
BrendonThehuman;-;One of the best turn based strategy games I've played. Buy it.
CPaladino;-;I keep coming back to it, and it always sucks me in for hours.
withans;-;Fun, but long-termed. Plan a day to play the game.
Gingerbread;-;Whenever I try to play it I end up playing it for way to long. Great game.
Duckvader;-;I know for the moment that I only have around thirteen hours logged, but that was one game where I needed just one more turn. I'm too scared to go back... 10/10
Khaosom;-;Ok I'm a bit biased, I love almost all Sid Meier games so this one is a cake walk. No campaign mode kind of takes away from it but with plenty to do its a fun game
Atomic Prime;-;One of the best strategy games I have ever encountered.
[sif.]Coppr;-;A great strategy game. Civilization games have always gotten better every version.
LOLOLOLOZ;-;The days you don't have internet, this game keeps you occuppied
KidPooh;-;There isn't any need to provide a reason
Reilman79;-;Amazing game. Everyone should own this and all of the DLC.
TheSystemAntic;-;This is the premium turn/hex based strategy game. Buy it for the countless of hours you can sink into trying to defeat all of the great nations of our world.
Lord Huntington;-;civ is a great turn based grand stratagy game
BRINGBACKMP5 #ATJLuko;-;Best game in the world! <3 Worth every Penny :D
Stylether;-;I highly recommend Civ to anyone who likes to build their own history a little. It's a game that shines when you invest yourself in it and explore the possibilities. As any avid civ player can tell you, you will truly form a symbiotic (or perhaps parasitic) relationship with your fellow players and AI, all the while it being virtual and fictional, and feel like history is really progressing inside your little realm. As every player schemes their way forward, that one settler takeover 200 turns earlier might be the reason why you decided to decimate someone's Civ. Or at the very least embargo them. Do you expand rapidly, or keep it calm and small? Do you initiate combat with your neighbours, or leave them as a safezone for potential invaders at the other end. Puppets and city razing, science and faith, everything is a factor in your ultimate victory... or very untimely demise. In short, if you don't mind sinking hours into a virtual world and rant in frustration as your neighbour finishes your favorite wonder first, a good casus beli for war if I've ever heard one, then you shouldn't really be searching for anything else, because you found exactly what you'd want just a buttonpress away. And probably a lot of cash.
Paul Plasmus;-;Excellent. Great improvement on the original, and new modes of combat and victory conditions make the game more strategic and diverse than ever before.
Milf or Wilf;-;One of the greatest strategy games I've ever played. I've played this game for over 100 hours and can still play it.
ThaBossOfYou;-;MAke sure you plan to get DLC's. Still playable without them, but definately get them.
da;-;It is a game.
Cpl. O. Melnyk [1st MRB];-;A great turn based strategy game, tons of different civlilizations to play. Good depth and replaybility. Can customize to have games long or short with different maps. Supports multiplayer with frriends but i would recommend getting the brave new world expansion pack, adds trade routes, religion and much more. Overall my favorite strategy game out of all the ones i played. GET IT!
CheapJab;-;The best strategy game i have ever played. Hours of fun.
Potato Salad;-;It's some kinky hardcore
chodemonger;-;erhmahgerhd, i dont even know what this game is about yet, so it begs the question; why are you reading all of my reviews? dont worry, more comedic content is upcoming!
Moe Radi;-;I'd recommed this game. It's really nice but it chrashed 2 times while i was at turn 90 and it doesn't save the game. !
LordFlipFlap;-;This game is a fun game for people who likes strategical games.
Samboye;-;Three thumbs up!
Gargix;-;Great game. So far played it for 80+ Hours. All mods should be allowed for Multiplayer though, not just some mods.
Platapus;-;A fun and immersive game. If you play it prepare to spend hours on it. You will want to stop but what will really happen is you saying "One more turn I swear then I am off".
Duskira;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
Dark Knight;-;I have spent more hours in this game than any other. As amazing as the other games in the franchise are, this is my favorite one. I love the improved graphics and all of the different dynamics that have been added.
Big Dick Patriarch KKK;-;Played as ghandi and nuked china. 10/10
MADADE;-;Don't play this game if you have a schedule tomorrow.
Bot Jerome;-;This game is amazing! GET THIS GAME
Whinf1;-;Bloody fantastic game! I'd reccomend it to people when I've stopped playing it.
Kim Jong Kong Long Dong;-;Do you like good games? Do you like the thought of being the ruler of one supperior country that will enslave all others? Do you like war? If you answered "Yes" to all of these including the last two then you're insane!:D But seriously... this game is so cool!
Laxe.dll;-;can Nuke Moscow 10/10 game
Orl;-;Time flies by when you play this game :D
Hiesenbacon;-;very good game very addictive... will finish the review after this turn
heliostatic;-;There is no sweeter feeling than bringing your last enemy to the brink of desctruction, only to revive all of the fallen civilizations and let them do it for you. 10/10 would conquer again
Faulky;-;Civilization V is a very good game.
Yato_Sakana;-;My Wife asked me what we should get my son for his 3rd birthday, I told her we'll talk about it after this next round. Today he turns 6 years old....
Brutal Goo;-;definatly worth it for 8 bucks if you enjoy turn based strategy, or for that matter any of the other 4.
Gaben Take the Wheel!;-;Next turn... next turn... next turn....... waiting for other players...... just.. one .... more... f****** turn....... omfg... (P.S WATCH OUT FOR GHANDI HE'S A NUB)
Yoav;-;Very good game.
Bill Cosby;-;its goood if u like to kill everyone in the worldddddz!
The Based Ging;-;Ghandi got to the atomic age and turned my country into fallout 10/10
Dreadlordfrips;-;The best game, ever.
ThatsOurJake;-;Cannot wait to sink my teeth into this!
Drakard;-;The gold standard of City Building RTS. This game is visually beautiful and everytime I play it I discover a new strategy to give myself and edge. Combined with multiple ways to win it gives you endless replayability.
Gingo;-;Got nuked by scumbag Ghandi whilst creating Giant Death Robots...... 10/10!
Jamez;-;I was only going to play on it for 30 mins but that turned into 10 hrs! Watch out for Alexander hes really annoying!
Oliver;-;Great strategy, deep and fun, but easy to pick up
dragonsirer;-;i really like and had lots of fundom
CuddlyAssassin;-;This has got to be one the most immersive games I've played. I've spent another 100+ hours outside of Steam, playing Civ 5, trying out a lot of civilisations and such, but I still come back for more. Civ 5, like it's predecessors (Civ's 1 through 4), is a turn-based strategy game where anything can happen. You can create and customise each and every town, from any of the available civilisations. With a variety of maps and playing fields, you will never have the same area twice, or the same set of enemies/allies/idiots you want to nuke, unless you set them of course. The 5 winning types bring a whole new look into how each civ has worked in the past, such as Spain, with Queen Isabella, who is great with Natural Wonders, or Japan, who likes to reck military with the religious view of Bushido. Then there's Gandhi, nobody likes Gandhi. Seriously, get out of my games. 10/10 would bang again.
Ragnar Lothbrok;-;Good game. Wasted my life. Kelly come back to me.
Crossberg;-;It's a Good Game The basic game ain't much without exspanyions though
tripod109;-;Awesome game. Highly recommended
Oaken   _ PRAISE GOLD HELM;-;Best strategy game I've ever played. 9/10
Trynemjoel;-;Addictive civilization building. Win the game before Ghandi nukes everything and dominates you with rock and roll culture.
SniperSenpai (URE);-;If you wanna starve your people and have them  by barbarians, this is your game. 9/10
SENPAI!!!#FreedomForDonkeyPCs;-;Brilliant game. Worth the money. Could have easier controls but otherwise it is just awesome
El Fato;-;very easy to pick up over 9000/10
9/11 Did Bush;-;Beyond addicting.
stokkeboss;-;this game is a really good game you can play it in many hours without getting bored. it is also a very good multiplayer game. you have to use your stratistic mind to win the game wich i like. so it is a really really good game. 6/6 stars
Legoman;-;Vanilla game is good as it is, even better with DLCs. Great Community with hundreds of new mods everyday.
Vq}{ombified|BBinaweek;-;-Bad game engine optimization -Bad A.I. -Tech Tree is not as good as Civ 4 -Spock has a better voice -Lazy patch work -2K -Bad Civ personalities -Trend of removing game content for "DLC" for a extra overpriced amount. Like we don't know. -Denouced by all for being peaceful -Not Alpha Centauri 2 +Good graphics +Good Hud display +Raging barbies should always be checked +Fun Multiplayer options +Good background music +Moddable If you can get the complete edition for cheap I recommend it at 5 or 10 $$$
Bingee;-;A video-game boardgame that accurately pays homage to and makes fun of real-life cultures by quite nearly replicating some of the most believeable and unbelieveable events of human history. Cautionary for the impatient, this game takes a long time to play!
Birdbot;-;Ghandi declared war on me. 10/10
Mawno;-;10/10. Ruined my life.
Ellen Pao;-;Turn back while you still can.
captcdm501;-;I looooove this game! Definitely get it, you'll get hours of play.
The Interstellar Fancy Man;-;I haven't even finished a match, I just keep restarting because I have a fetish for the opening moves. 10/10 fulfills my niche desires
Dr. Mantis Toboggan M.D.;-;I bever have prefered strategy games much but Civ has drastically changed that. It gives the aspect of struggle and fun at the same time because there is so much interaction that can happen with other countries as well as there being replayability.
Fu Manchu;-;I just can't get enough of this game. Over the course of the game, you will find yourself expanding, plotting, warring, spying, reasearching, and backstabbing your nation to glory. Civilization V is extremely addicting and it will leave you staring at your screen for hours while you try to convince yourself that you'll only play for "one more turn." Seriously, get this game. P.S Gandhi is warmongering, nuke-crazy, homicidal maniac. Watch your back.
neato;-;Addicting
OG Gandhi;-;If you like strategy or board games, I would highly recommend this to anyone.
Telemar;-;Civ 5 is following the steady lineage of Civ games. Brave new world + Gods&Kings packs are quite worth it due to adding a ton of new capabilities. Specialy in The Brave New World the caravan tradings can make your day.
Pappybuck;-;I great strategy game that you chose the outcome of your Civilization and others. I would highly recommend this game to anybody who wants to play a strategy game.
Shrike;-;Play as your favourite civilization through this grand strategy game. Endless fun, it's in the top 10 games for a reason. 10/10, make sure you have the latest expansions they are WELL worth it.
actualwizard666;-;As a huge fan of games like Age of Empires, I figured that Civ V wouldn't be much different. I hadn't played any of the other Civ games when I jumped into Civ V, and boy did I love it. The game play is lots of fun and there is good level of strategy involved, though the difficulty is easy to control when starting the game. There are so many options and variety that it's almost impossibly for me to get bored. Most fun is the ability to play with friends. Nothing says friendship like attacking with the full force of your military! :D
Mattron1;-;I have spent way too much time in this game and have survived the trial and error that was multiplayer. It now works, but put in place a pact to finish games you start and be cut-throat.
Uncle BB;-;Amazing! Loads of fun!
MonolJibberish;-;I've only played about 70 hours but its enought to tell me that this was one of the best buys I have ever made. The Civ 5 strategy may not be the most advanced or detailed but it is definitely exciting and easy enough to adjust to. THe many different legends who command their civilizations to greatness is also a perk. Each civilization has their own distinct advantage that can be used to help in whichever type of win you want. The unitys are well balanced and the gameplay as said Buy this game and all the DLC its a definite buy and if more DLC comes out I will be extremely interested in it. 9/10
mastermind;-;the best game of all time
car.maloney;-;I love all the civilization games. I just....I don't get why turns have to take FOREVER the later into the game you go. WHYYYYY
Captain Crunch;-;this game is the
CombatCorgi;-;This game overall is very addicting and a fun game and i 100% recommend it. The only thing I find dumb about it is the fact that if your civilization's borders are too close to another civilization they will eventually attack you no matter what. Other than that the game is pretty amazing.
palladiate;-;The God King of 4x games. This takes everything great from Civ 2, 3, and 4 and puts them together fix nearly every complaint I've had about the series. It has the elegance of 2, with improved graphics, streamlined strategies, more intelligent AI and maps, and a multiplayer that's engrossed me for hundreds of hours so far. If strategy is your thing, this game is required.
karl.yngstrom;-;I have 800+ hours played on this version of Civilization, and I have 50% of the achievements for it. I love this game.
Eos;-;Great strategy game, especialy if you have a friend to play co-op with.
Corvo Attano;-;Ever wanted to change the corse of history? Now's your chance!
TC (Champion_M);-;As you can see, I haven't played much of the game yet (As of june '14). However, that gametime is for a 2-day period. This game gives interesting and complex gameplay to every player. The AI is acutally able to be bargained with, and is great at the game's diplomacy (for a change). This game revolutionized the strategy genre at its release, and the expansion does even better. My verdict: 10/10
great name;-;okay my first half of the review will be good stuff and other half bad stuff i love how many different leaders you can play as and there historicl units building and powers. i also love the dlcs it adds yet more leaders although i think they spent slightly less time with the historicle info as there a few wrong dates and i do belive i misspelled word or 2 but stiil great. the mechanics are slightly tricky at first but seem pretty simply after the tutorial. i also love the difficulty you can set it so they wait to be killed or set it to MURDER YOU INSTANTLY . well on to the bad stuff the price is a bit high. the workshop support could be better. uhhh lets see ummm i got nuthin.
Tempto;-;A turn-based addictive, fun, and very strategical game. An infinte learning cap and replayability. A must have for anyone who loves RTS games, but without the stress of having to be very quick.
bandwagonlt;-;Very very fun, but as a warning, a small game took 10 hours to complete!! Fun, complex yet simple enough for those used to RTS or TBS can catch on relatively quickly!
T.A.W. Preuen;-;IT IS EPIC
theloots850;-;You can kill 'em with kindness, culture or just kill 'em. It's all good.
DemonJester5;-;Best by far strategy game ever created, and Best Civilization game. Civilization IV is nothing compared to Civilization V On average a game takes about 24 hours to complete on average time setting. There are 8 difficulty levels, 1: settler - 8: Diety WARNING: Diety is only for the most harcore gamers. Tons of achievments, around 280 in total. Steam trading cards are avaliable for this game. Got nuked by ghandi Even though it was made in 2010 dont let that discourage you from buying it. Quality game. Create friendships with other Civiliztions or go to war with them. Remember there are several ways to win. Domination Victory, Cultural Victory, Science Victory (Space Race) Domination Victory is the easiest way. Can you build a civilization that can stand the test of time? 10/10
50 Niggaz;-;"Yeah Ill play one game"......2Hours later 11/10 Great game
Hordagoth;-;This is a very good game as it is a time consuming one but well worth the money has an amazing amount of replay value.
Cyrostormz;-;Probably one of the best games i've played, the only bad things i can think of is the repetetiveness of a domination victory where most of the time your army is far superior to all others and you spend alot of the game shifting dozens of units around one by one. 4.5/5
fullmetal darkcow;-;Best strategy turn based game till this point of 2014.
Toothpick;-;Don't worry about it.
PorkchopSammich;-;After hundreds of hours of gameplay this is still my go-to game when I'm looking for something to do. Can't recommend this game enough!
Lt.Cloud;-;Great game in a great series.
Ethan_;-;The game where you; get the man into the space age: Wage war, conduct diplomacy, discover new technologies, go head-to-head with some of historys greatest leaders and build the most powerful empire the world has ever known. Great game:)
Lone Cypress;-;It is Civ, the ultimate turn based game... Get it
Ego_Bizarrro;-;Great game! Especially after some time and many game updates it feels very well rounded and cleverly designed. Of course, the gameplay is mostly not new but there are a lot of new aspects and improvements to justify buying this one even if you already own the already brilliant Civ IV; especially the new strategic aspects from the non-ability to stack units and hexagonal fields was a welcome change. The only thing I don't like is a late period in every game session when everything seems to kind of drag along, but I guess that's only because of the way I play (slowly expand and tend to my cities and later build an army and conquer everything ^^ That's the part that's fun but drags along and gets old fast...) I have to admit, I haven't even ever played Civ in multiplayer, so I can't say anything about that... 8,5/10 PS: I find the two addons pretty expensive but to be honest, they don't add anything I find essential to enjoy the game. Nice stuff, but not necessary at all (for those who are thinking about buying the game but fear they won't have much fun without also buying all the expensive extra stuff).
SK.Deku;-;Civilization 5 is a fantastic turn-based strategy game that keeps you playing for hours. Its addictive and a must have game.
ThyScroticus;-;Can't go through a whole game being 'friends' with a single civilization
avery113;-;GREAT strategy game. In fact the best stragety game I have ever played, which says a lot. It's not just strategy, either. It's also fun to play online with your friends. But I suggest that you might want to learn the ropes before you face a Deity-level CPU :) (BTW, this is my second favorite video game of all time)
Awsomehippy;-;Best strategy game I've played. Really fun with friends and still nice solo. Any civilization? Nukes? Let's play some Civ!
syphenstone;-;Such a fun game. Brave new world and Gods and Kings definately made this game better than Civ 4.
DingDong;-;Gondi was being a total  so I stole that hoes nukes and nuked rome as china. 100% acurate story 10/10
AdamofBeard;-;The beginning and end of TBS. Amazing.
The Government;-;I really like this game! Civilization V is a very great game: tactics, politics, economy... You will spend a lots of hours of your life with it!
Gimanua;-;This game is for those who like staretegy games but want to have some more time to think what to do.
Fnarkoman;-;Great game, but the games take ages so prepare for that.
garciiia;-;Civ V is Civ V. Buy it, play it, enjoy it.
Slynessity;-;I never expected to be drawn to a Civ game. They never really appealed to me before. However, this game remains my most played on Steam and I constantly keep telling myself "Just one more turn!" I recommend this to everyone!
Duhj;-;Killed a hell of a lot of time, had a great few laughs. Learned that Ghandi is a prick. 10/10 Would recommend
brain/b-rye;-;for those who love strategy games this game is for you. I have played countless hours of this game. Theres alot you can play around with. Especially get the game with brave new world because it adds a lot more to the game.
Infinity_Dragon;-;Fantastic game there!
onsalefor10cents;-;I feel naught but gluttony when I descend into the depths of this game. Before me stands a vast planet, ripe for the fruits of conquest. My conquest. Thousands of years pass and my empire is never satiated. Despite the marvels of the world laying to waste in the empire's glorious capital, the citizens of this utopia cry and beg for more. The great Pyramids and ancient wonders go unattended as people demand for new marvels. Food is never of want, yet they demand for more. Rivers run with gold yet they demand it to be filled with the blood of my enemies. I plead for my empire to embrace the peace which I've fought milennia for. Watching a small band of settlers build a vast nation expanding multiple continents only to succumb to their bloodlust sickens me. I digress. Every click of the mouse casts years ahead in this virtual heroin pit, yet hours fly by as I slowly watch myself lose interest in the plights of real life. Yes I should relieve myself in a bathroom, or shower, or attend to the various pleas of my family to pick up the phone and let them know I still draw breath. I cannot abandon my love though. I press forward and embrace my citizens as they were my own kin. I watch in horror as opposing civilizations, who have lived side by side, as allys, trade partners, research collaborators, and friends turn to their own demands and launch vast assaults on my beloved people. The only affirmation this game offers is the demonic plague which will steal your humanity, and cast your selfish demons upon you.
O0mix0O;-;This is virtual heroin.
Sam is Going HAM;-;I love this game best Civ game out there updates just keep getting better (somehow).
Shankz;-;This game will swallow hours of your time
megalarry48;-;Excellent, addictive game...so many scenarios, and situations to build or conquer, may pull some all nighters for some games.. My only complaints are the multiplayer(it's like running the game on the lowest settings) and sometimes the AI is just plain stupid. I highly reccomend this to anyone who likes strategy games!
tyrus.dixon;-;This game... just look at the hours I have put into it and I still havn't touched all the civilizations, playsyles, or even the map settings. single player, multiplayer, mods, dlc, this game does everything everyone says it does. One small flaw I will note is the AI is very hipocrytically unforgiving. Attack a warmongering race and eliminate their capitol and it triggers a domino effect that gets the whole world declairing war on you. Attacked a city state at the start of the game and conqured it, reached turn 300 still basically begging for forgivness from other civs. Reguardless of that the game plays flawwlessly *for me* is absolutlely beautiful and will keep you comming back for years to come. Even when you put it down, you'll want to pick it up again in a month or two "just to see what this scenerio would imply to the world" another 50 hrs and 7 games later.
:3;-;I'm going to start this review by saying note this is a great game. It's mechanics are great you overall should probably buy it but i also have to write this about a warning. This game is very fun and when you play you feel as if you should continue playing and not stop playing. So what i'm trying to say is this game is extremely addictive, you will spend hours on end wasting your time on this video game, no breaks you dont stop until you finished playing that civilization, luckily i was able to get out eventually but if you can get addicted and dangerously addicted to games easily i don't recommend this game to you. But if we delve into the game mechanics it's pretty good, the game is a bit to laggy but very great idea once you go through the tutorial thats easy to follow you will get the hang of everything and can easily lead your civilization to becoming the greatest kindom ever. The price for what it offers is definitley good but not amazing. Overall i'm going to give this game an 8/10 so you should buy this game, but beware my friends, beware.
norwoodcm91;-;Great game. I have never played an RTS before, but couldn't resist civ 5. There are so many countries, ways to win, etc. I enjoy the fact that I can play against 24 countries in a world sized maps. I can play the political game or I can become a warmonger and take the world by force. Easy for people who have never played RTS and yet still has enough content to please long time RTSers as well.
eXistenZ;-;A thousand times better than civ IV
Cheeky Nandos;-;good but better with the DLC
Vagonbrei;-;All that you need to know about this game is... that it is Sid Meier's Civilization!! Come on! You don't need more incentive!
Frank;-;It's consistently one of the most played games on steam. I like it. Everybody likes it.
JellyMaster;-;Don't bum rush culture when you are about to get ed by the Portugese inquisition!!
Stargazing Bretetetetetetet;-;Play it all the time, great game for people looking for a strategy turn based game. I strongly recommend it to people looking for a game that you can just start and play over a few days. Great re-play value and overall, I feel it was a great purchase.
coolieo;-;Just give up on trying to go outside because this is the end....
Imaginary Number;-;"One more turn, just one more turn..." 6 hours later and I've got an hour 'till I have to go to work. Time enough for one more turn...
Przemes;-;This is definitely one of the greatest games I've ever played. I wouldn't reccomend getting the vanilla version though. With GnK expansion it's very good but really starts to shine when you add Brave New World. Watch out though it's really addicting and a single game can take up to like 10h but if you can spare this game some time you definitely won't be dissapointed.
Octavius;-;Civilization V, the fifth installment in the amazing Civilization series, is undoubtably one of the most user-friendly, easy-to-play strategy games on the market. Players that are new to Civilization will find this game enjoyable the second they start to play, as the game has a very small learning curve and is easy to grasp. If you're an older player, you'll find the game harder to get into than previous installments, and the base game is lacking many of the things that made previous Civilization games enjoyable (religion, behind-the-scenes politics, advanced diplomacy (vassal states, etc.), Leonard Nemoy, and a large number of civilizations). However, with "Gods & Kings" and (especially) "Brave New World", the game becomes what it should have been: advanced, full of new ideas, and addicting as hell. "G&K" re-adds religion and "BNW" adds in some nice diplomatic options and advanced trading abilities. All in all, Civilization V is great for new Civilization players, and perfectly fine for old players (and great for old players if they have the two main add-ons). Either way, you'll find hours of daytime vanish into thin air.
Space Sloth;-;You can do, like, so many thingss!
jellysquid36;-;You will be addicted to this game forever.
Myed, now in 6 designer colors!;-;Always fear the silent ones.
TheOverallBest;-;Love the game!!!!! It never really gets boring because you can switch civis every game. I like how the AI's are really smart. You DO NOT have to buy the DLC for it to be fun.
AsLan;-;Awesome, Just one more turn + the expansions are very good and make the game even more exciting!
Binky Barnes;-;I love this series, played Civ III
Chooddy;-;Beware of Gandi
CreAm Cheese;-;Ok, listen, this game is so great. I don't care if you like strategy games or not. This game is 100% worth it. The only problem I have notived is that it's little bit on the high end pc side of things, but that doesn't mean it's not playable with a bad computer because there is a thing called strategic mode which turns the game into a board game. If love creating an empire and watching it rule the world or fall to it's doom, this game is for you.
KiaraCake;-;Beautiful example of what the gaming medium is capable of. The vanilla version is remarkably well-designed and compelling, the two expansions add depth and strategy so seamlessly that I often can't remember which features were added in expansions - they all seem like indispensible parts of the game.
Scandic;-;A Game to soak in yours hours into with a good singelplayer and a good way to pass time ^^ To many of my hours have been sucked into this game but i do recomend you to get brave new world first u dont need the once before those but BNW is a game changer :D
Ferris;-;Scouts walk by my boarder? I'm taking that as a direct act of war. 10/10. Would recommend.
Onion Bubs;-;If your looking to find your first strategy game, you can do no better than Civ V. I grew up playing the third game in the franchise, and despite the game having many flaws and being incredibly hard, I enjoyed the game immensely. Civ V changed and perfected things beyond what fans of the series thought possible. From getting rid of the unit stacking, minimizing city micro-management, to changing the movement from squares to hexagons, so much could have gone wrong and instead created a modern masterpiece. Any and all bugs or imbalance issues were fixed in the updates or DLC's. I've played 200+ hours and still going. Wait for a steam sale and nab a genuine copy of the bestselling build your your own empire simulator! (Oh, and it has multi-player and community mods.) 5/5 stars.
Where_Wolf1001;-;This game is seriously awesome. That being said, I wouldn't recommend playing it if you ever plan on doing anything ever again in your life because it is super addictive.
chaosadnd;-;Fantastic RTS. Just buy it on a sale.
50cal Barrett;-;This game is fun but its more addicting then fun. It makes you keep playing even when you just want to put a fist through the monitor.
OMG.Natt;-;Gimme back my life !!
fatblackcat;-;Yes. Game addicting and fun. Frusterating sometimes but good. I like being Washington.
Mike Tyson-Real American Hero;-;Amazing, If you love Strategy Games. Its fun to play with Friends, because Singleplayer can get boring after a while.
Deathray44;-;Great for people who arent big in stratagy, not hard to learn and go crazy for power as you conqure the land and destroy all thats in your way. Or just be cultral and win that way or even yet be into Technology and be the first to the moon to win the game. The best thing is it takes time to beat it so you dont have to replay every hr it take HOURS just to beat the game HALF WAY. ITS GREAT!!!!!
T3hRogue;-;totally not another "Ghandi nuked my " review. ...Ghandi TOTALLY nuked my . (It's OK, I brought him the FREEDOM he wanted as ol' Georgie boy)
Pounding Gaze;-;I love this game. If you have a life, you might want to discard it now
Towndrunk26er;-;Highly addictive. The just one more turn and I'll go to bed mentality has kept me up late to many times playing this game.
Toothpick;-;Don't worry about it.
raspberryzinger;-;I love this game! I grew up playing Age of Empires and Age of Mythology, so this was great to find.
'RETNUS' (Pindah ID);-;Sid Meier's Civilization V: the only game that i can play for straight 12 hours. just, one more turn....
testdummy653;-;Great Game, really buliding on Civ IV
Zgames The Dragon;-;This game....this game. It's like nutella. Seems kiddy on the outside, but the goodness damn epic. I've never actually attracted to strategy games frankly. I was the kind of guy that was all about pew pew...pew pew games. But damn this game is easy, and enjoyable. I've heard that the older Civilization games are harder than this. But this games is like an opening to anyone who wanted to try or know what a strategy game is like. Now excuse me, nuking Gandhi back.
Chris;-;Lots of land to explore, lots of different civilizations to play and ways to improve your growing kingdom. This game does take a bit of time to play, but it is rewarding for all the hours you put into it. This was the first Civilization game I played and it taught me some things in history that I didn't know. With all the content put into this game (Now including DLC Brave New World and Mods) this game should keep you busy for quite a while.
raW;-;I have played lots of games but this is my love :)
Lanadre;-;Awesome game but can take a while with a lot of enemies ;p
dogphan;-;Great strategy game. It may take a while to get into the multiplayer but if you have a group of friends it is excellent. Singleplayer is also entertaining.
SPUD;-;It is good
The Orange;-;me gusta mucho
Freshly Squeezed Man Juice;-;The biggest problem with Civ. 5, is that the game is borderline bland and boring without any of the incredible DLC. Though with all of those(which if you buy on a Steam sale wont be to pricy)put together, you get a beautifully crafted turn-based trategy game that demands hundreds of hours to be put into and always lets the player find something new when they play it. It also very easily teaches the player to play, with difficulty levels going from very beginner to experienced master Civilization 5 is a wonder of a game that demands attention.
AtomicTurtle42;-;Absolutly amazing strategy/simulation game. Superb graphics, great gameplay, everything about this is phonominal, that is, if you like strategy games.
Flow;-;This game ruins more friendships than monopoly, which is by far its greatest feature. 10/10
Grandsaber3;-;This game is great for the first three hours, shortly it nose dives into 'next turn next turn next turn next turn ' with minimal production. Near the end you get that start of the game freedom but its crashed by how soon you'll win the game. This game goes from amazing to boring in turns, just try different game modes and until you find the settings you want. 8.5/10 +fast +fun +Easily understood but hard +insane replayablity -goes from slow to fast quickly -certain countries will hate you for no reason -gandhi
Monty Python;-;I turned Gandhi into a militaristic s that hoarded oranges, and then I slaughtered everyone that was alive. Then my people started to rebel, I left to take a , and I lost after I won. Best game ever 10/10
Meepo!;-;One of the best TBS ever! :3
Thorny;-;Great game, With mods it makes it move fun to play with. Should get it
GBuddai;-;very challenging and a great play with a group of friends
Eagles;-;great game, recomend it to anyone of any age
dustteas;-;my favorite game of all time!!
PredatorDrone18;-;Okay, so, I would call the people reading this review just another group of filthy ing ers, which you ing are, but Valve doesn't like that anymore. Now, let's get one thing straight, right gere, right now: Valve consists of nothing but cool guys. Gabe is our lord and savior, and his disciples follow his teachings by the ing book. However, they have decided to censor swearing in the reviews. So, I guess either I have to cool it a little, or you guys have to start figuring out what I mean by ""; so y'all as better get real good at seeing the difference between hearts. Let's get started. Imagine that you're a citizen of the United States of America, or the United Kingdom, or maybe even Russia, and you want to control your country as they kick  in World War II (ADDITIONAL FEATURE: If you're from Russia, you can also fabricate a false history in which Russia doesn't ing suck from it's creation until present day.). You get to control a country from start to finish, doing as you please. You can focus on science, religion, warfare, or anything else. You can take over other empires,  churches and burning women. You have a huge--er--ing--load-bag-of-s-and--festivities-and-giant- amount of control in this game, and can rule how you please. Although Civilization V sacrifices historical accuracy for the sake of a good gaming experience, it does include some nods to the real empires of history, such as civilization-exclusive units. You can change the settings for a game or choose pre-made scenarios if you want more historically accurate gameplay, and you can play through real events, such as the fall of Rome. In conclusion, although I'm not a fan of the strategy genre, this game's addictive gameplay, endless replayability, and vast array of features earn it a 9/10 in my book.
Valueless;-;Too addictive, you may lose your friends and family cuz of this masterpiece .
Walter White;-;Very good game, a lot of fun, takes a long time but still great would give this a 9/10
hampoooz;-;One of the best strategy games to play with you friends!! Try to win trough military, science or diplomatic viktory and some outhers as well.
Kiyorezo;-;Civilization V may not be the best game in the series, but to say it isn't a truly great game would be a clear falsehood. Although lacking some of complexity and difficulty of its predecessors, Civilization V is a triumph for modern strategy games and city builders alike. Starting from the most ancient eras of human time, on a randomly generated map with few user inputs, you, portrayed as one of the greatest leaders of history, and your people, will traverse through time, technological innovation and cultural expansion. Working with or competing with you are your neighboring Civilizations and, newly added to the series, 'City-States' these mini-states can be made to serve you, or your competitors in a variety of ways. The combat system of Civ games has been entirely revamped in this edition, no more stacks of doom, and much less of the, how did that medieval archer shoot down my jet fighter? Instead each unit occupies its own hex, and the battle outcomes are not only more predictable, but much more realistic. This is made even better in the Gods and Kings expansion, which revamps and balances the combat system even more so. The single player game is one of absolute self-indulgence and glee, you will trollop your foes on the lesser difficulties and construct massive and intimidatingly successful cities to crush your AI foes in whatever manner you see fit, be it through diplomacy, culture, technology or perhaps just flat out war. The game does indeed grow in challenge as you increase your difficulty, but unfortunately due to the complexity of the game, the developers were forced to sort of 'Band-Aid' the higher difficulty settings, in that rather than facing more devious opponents with advanced strategies, you have simply been handicapped, while your AI rivals have been given gifts of free technology and increased resources. There are also a variety of special scenarios (some downloadable) which place you in a specific time period or conflict; these can be quite a puzzle on the higher difficulties. The real challenge in the game for those who dare to venture is in the online and LAN multiplayer. Playing against real people adds a whole new level of difficulty, but also opportunity, competition can be fierce in some games. Luckily because of the nature of the game and the desire to play with real people instead of computers, it shouldn't be difficult to find a group of non-war like players for those still wanting to build their skills before truly experiencing PvP style play. Players drop frequently because of time constraints and games are rarely finished, which is why it is lucky that there are special modes such as 'quick speed' to allow more rapid progress. With so much variety in selection of leaders, maps, strategies, settings and more, it is easy to see how players like me could clock hundreds of hours. Expansions: Downloadable Civilizations: Almost always worth it, if only so that you may battle against them or be better able to join more games. It just adds more to the amazing international melting pot of war and conflict. Personally I find many of the DLC Civ's the most fun to play as. Extra Scenarios: These I maybe could do without, but if you love history, or are just starting out in Civ, they could be a great way to explore the game, in addition they offer special civs with unique abilities and powers not possible in regular play. Gods and Kings: Although I won't get into it too much, you're crazy if you don't get this expansion; it fixes so many issues, and adds so much to the game, namely religion. Real Civ 5 starts with this expansion. Brave new World: Firaxis has done it again, even more civilizations, more bug fixes and more customization and realism. I absolutely love this new expansion! It is the reason I am playing again, trade routes, advanced diplomacy, the world congress and more. This polishes off the game and gives it the 5 stars it deserves. Ratings: My rating for the game is at its current state, not taking into account previous issues or ones that may occur in the future, I figure my review has been written for people who are considering purchasing the game, and so I have let go of any ill will caused by issues that are now resolved. Singleplayer: 5 Multiplayer: 5 Gameplay: 5 Replayability: 5 100% Reccomend to anyone who enjoys strategy games, city builders, history buffs or political science buffs.
Solidsem;-;One of the best "time machine" games, first impressions may seem a bit complex, but once you learn how to play it you won't regret.
Magaroth;-;One of the most addictive games i've ever played... my first match, i spended like 8 hours without even realising!!! 9/10
Desolate_Archer;-;I have a lot of fun playing this one, the possibilities are endless! I enjoy randomizing all settings so I can always have a new setup!
Christmas is for Jew;-;A+ material. I love this game, the soundtrack, and how relaxed it makes me. I can't wait for Civ 6 if it comes. Everybody should get this game. Bless Sid Meier's heart.
Naked German;-;(Reviewed with Gods+Kings expansion) This game has sucked over 40 hours of my life in the last 2 weeks. It brings the "just one more turn" addiction that I felt with Civ 2 and Alpha Centauri, as well as updated gameplay and strategy. At first I didn't like the dumbed down tech tree, but it's grown on me. I have few complaints about the game--The automated city manager is adequate, alliances with the AI seem hardly useful (you hit endgame and they will backstab you. Or maybe that's just Korea's MO. in. EVERY. GAME), and it appears you can game the new combat system something fierce (I field at most 3-7 units to defend my empire, regardless of empire size). I have to admit I really enjoy the fact that CiV has finally gone hexagonal.
BoomyHolster;-;Love the graphics compared to Civ IV! And as always, an awesome soundtrack xx
Trelares;-;Awesome Game, but far to many Achievements this will take forever to collect most of them ;-).
DRAGON BOT;-;Really good turn based strategy game
ljiljan89;-;Want to finish college and find a job? Do not buy this game!
American Goose;-;"Do you recommend this game?" Yes
Neovulcan;-;TL:DR Amazing strategy game 10/10 buy it
Poisoned Salami;-;This game is awesome. You can build your civilization from the ground up, going from flint axes, to chariot archers, all the way to nukes. But it's not all fun-and-nukes. Rival civilizations can attempt to steal your tech, declare war, or, even worse; build a city RIGHT THERE. I'm looking at you, AUSTRIA!
Colonel Kristov;-;Really fun and time comsuming
Jazz [VGA];-;This game has destroyed my life. Buy it and all the DLC. It's freaking awesome.
Akim;-;Civilization V is a fantastic example of a turn-based strategy game, In this game you get to play as one of a large selection of Civilizations and take them to greatness or death, they are in your command. This game has streamlined UI, great AI and amazing replayability. If you like turn-based strategy games or games that you run countries then buy this game!
Realazul;-;Easy to play, difficult to master, the game I just cant stop going back to for...just....one...more...turn! Having played all of the Civilization games since my best mate introduced me to the orginal when we started high school through to being married with 2 kids I have definitely grown up with Civ and it has grown up with me over the past 20 odd years. I have spent 1000s of hours in the Civ games over the years and have found each to be different to the game before it and all enjoyable (although I much preferred Alpha Centauri to Civ 2). All of the Civ games are pretty easy to get in and play with a simple interface and varying difficulty options allowing anyone to play, develop strategies and build their empire, but underneath this is a game that is extremely challenging to master. With the Steam Achievements helping to give differing objectives to work toward while playing the game I have found my gameplay more focused in this than previous Civ games, yet I still start random games just to play and keep enjoying the differing maps and starting locations. Generally I have been against DLC for games as it often feels that the vanilla releases are getting less content than in previous years but with Civ I had already spent 200 hours in game before the outlay on the first expansion and have since bought the DLCs and expansions "Gods & Kings" and "Brave New World" and have passed 500 very enjoyable hours. The feature that has impressed me most with this Civ release has been the scenarios which have been both challenging and enjoyable to complete. Most PC gamers would know the names Sid Meier and Civilization and many would already have these names on their "must buy" lists but Civ 5 is more than just a game of the year, it is a game to go back to time and time again...just...one...more...turn
Kuma;-;This game is amazing! It's kind of like Total Rome and has a feel of Settler's Catan! Such a fun game; everytime I play I always lose track of time hahaha!
psychedelic goose;-;its so good u need to play it omfg i can horse
The Grey Don;-;This game provide an excellent strategy platform which is both tense and relaxing due to its turn based mechanic.
koopatroopa12;-;Woohoo! Civ V!
Trethan;-;Great strategy love it, I played Civ 4 love the improvments!
crnisokol;-;One of the essential TBS series. Civ V is great sequel, although little simplified, but still got the ''just one more turn'' addiction. Highly recommend the game.
Pocatello;-;Wasted my life.
epsilon064;-;Montezuma stole my kill when I attacked Greece 0/10 would not recommend for ally 10/10 would recommend game
DrFunkDAT;-;This game is like a time machine, you sit down and play for 20 minutes and find yourself 5 hours into the future.
Mr. Polite;-;Sid Meier`s Civilization V is an exceptional game. Changes from the past games include, the new social policy trees. They are much like the Civics in Civ 4, but in a more enhanced way that goes more deeper. They now have ranged units in the game. That can fire up to three tiles away. The square grid has also been replaced with an hexagon Grid. Military units can not be stacked anymore, but becasue of this you can do some really cool blockaed things. Now I won`t spoil anything more for you guys, so I hope this review was helpful, please check out my Civ 5 guide on screenshots. I recommend this game, it`s by far my favorite turn-based strategy game. Thre is also toutorial on the basics of the game. Oh and Cities can now attack themselves, you do not need units in the city to protect it. Also there is no Anarchy or revolts. You also can not trade technologies anymore, but they have added city states which are like small Civs, but they won`t try to win the game. If you gain a good reputation with them they will gift you stuff or help you out. To gain a good reputation with them, you can either give them gifts of Gold or units. I hope this review was helpful, and I hope you like the game to someday.
Sparkly Something;-;DO you have lots of friends that love eachother! well this game is perfect for you! it has a few side effects though... 1. watch your friendships crumble to pieces in a matter of minutes! 2.Discover that paranoid side of you that you never thought you had. 3. Greed (that is all) SO ENJOY HATING YOUR FRIENDS! If you dont have friends well...try single player and GET NUKED BY GHANDI! HAVE FUN!
NovaAsylum;-;Civilization V is really addicting! When you buy the Complete Edition, you save a ton of money if you want the DLC... I logged 32 hours and I just bought it this week... In my opinion, it is great, no second thoughts on this game...
Dr. Baggins M.D.();-;Sleep? oh i rember that.
psychedelic goose;-;its so good u need to play it omfg i can horse
The Grey Don;-;This game provide an excellent strategy platform which is both tense and relaxing due to its turn based mechanic.
koopatroopa12;-;Woohoo! Civ V!
Trethan;-;Great strategy love it, I played Civ 4 love the improvments!
crnisokol;-;One of the essential TBS series. Civ V is great sequel, although little simplified, but still got the ''just one more turn'' addiction. Highly recommend the game.
Pocatello;-;Wasted my life.
epsilon064;-;Montezuma stole my kill when I attacked Greece 0/10 would not recommend for ally 10/10 would recommend game
DrFunkDAT;-;This game is like a time machine, you sit down and play for 20 minutes and find yourself 5 hours into the future.
Imaginary Number;-;"One more turn, just one more turn..." 6 hours later and I've got an hour 'till I have to go to work. Time enough for one more turn...
Przemes;-;This is definitely one of the greatest games I've ever played. I wouldn't reccomend getting the vanilla version though. With GnK expansion it's very good but really starts to shine when you add Brave New World. Watch out though it's really addicting and a single game can take up to like 10h but if you can spare this game some time you definitely won't be dissapointed.
Octavius;-;Civilization V, the fifth installment in the amazing Civilization series, is undoubtably one of the most user-friendly, easy-to-play strategy games on the market. Players that are new to Civilization will find this game enjoyable the second they start to play, as the game has a very small learning curve and is easy to grasp. If you're an older player, you'll find the game harder to get into than previous installments, and the base game is lacking many of the things that made previous Civilization games enjoyable (religion, behind-the-scenes politics, advanced diplomacy (vassal states, etc.), Leonard Nemoy, and a large number of civilizations). However, with "Gods & Kings" and (especially) "Brave New World", the game becomes what it should have been: advanced, full of new ideas, and addicting as hell. "G&K" re-adds religion and "BNW" adds in some nice diplomatic options and advanced trading abilities. All in all, Civilization V is great for new Civilization players, and perfectly fine for old players (and great for old players if they have the two main add-ons). Either way, you'll find hours of daytime vanish into thin air.
Space Sloth;-;You can do, like, so many thingss!
jellysquid36;-;You will be addicted to this game forever.
Myed, now in 6 designer colors!;-;Always fear the silent ones.
TheOverallBest;-;Love the game!!!!! It never really gets boring because you can switch civis every game. I like how the AI's are really smart. You DO NOT have to buy the DLC for it to be fun.
AsLan;-;Awesome, Just one more turn + the expansions are very good and make the game even more exciting!
Binky Barnes;-;I love this series, played Civ III
Chooddy;-;Beware of Gandi
[TAL] Chronometry;-;This is a fantastic RTS game. I would highly reccomend if you like elements like catan settle and expand + Risk world domination. If you have ever heard of Twilight Imperium and like it this game is fairly similar except old age.
matthias;-;Almost as good as Civilization IV...
zejrix13;-;The grand daddy of strategy games, which will leave you with an itching civ addiction.
Piratees;-;Awesome Game!!! just do not trust mongolia.........and hm.......... FRANCE!!!!
K A P P A;-;Once you play this game, you are hooked on to it.
Scrawny Peasant;-;Try it, its good for ya!
Lodar;-;Awesome game, better than 4
Hank Scorpio;-;Nothing like turning Babylon into a Pious Jewish Republic.
guardian2112;-;Fun strategy game. Would defininitly recommed it.
skividishglagarfkanogin;-;Since everyone else is placing their reviews, and having around 30-50 hours of gametime, I figured I'd put my word in and close the time gap. This game is AMAZING, you will NOT regret getting it. It's not a waste of time, nor is it a waste of money. This game will have you playing it over and over repeatedly. Replay value? Definately a lot. In fact, if you were to buy this game right now, and you've liked the gameplay videos and screenshots, I'm positive you'd like to play the game for yourself. Go ahead and buy it if it's your cup of tea! It's very fun, and you'll enjoy yourself. :)
fatblackcat;-;Yes. Game addicting and fun. Frusterating sometimes but good. I like being Washington.
Mike Tyson-Real American Hero;-;Amazing, If you love Strategy Games. Its fun to play with Friends, because Singleplayer can get boring after a while.
Deathray44;-;Great for people who arent big in stratagy, not hard to learn and go crazy for power as you conqure the land and destroy all thats in your way. Or just be cultral and win that way or even yet be into Technology and be the first to the moon to win the game. The best thing is it takes time to beat it so you dont have to replay every hr it take HOURS just to beat the game HALF WAY. ITS GREAT!!!!!
T3hRogue;-;totally not another "Ghandi nuked my " review. ...Ghandi TOTALLY nuked my . (It's OK, I brought him the FREEDOM he wanted as ol' Georgie boy)
PfcGusto;-;Dropped 32 nukes on the Iroquois, didnt even take there cities. Won a diplomatic victory. 10/10 would irrationaly nuke again.
Lowflyer45;-;Big fan, one of the best in the series.
everquest;-;Great game you can come back to time and time and time again
acm1979;-;This is my go to game for burning a morning away. With so many variables in how you play and how AI/other players can play, the game has so much replayability. The graphics are well done and the music is beautiful. Gameplay is easy to pick up. There really is no "right" or "wrong" way to play, only ways that work for you or don't. So many different ways you could take this. Warfare, diplomacy, keep to yourself and pray, etc. A great game in a long line of amazing games in the series.
CrackHeadMcGee;-;The DLC is as much as the game. It makes no sense!!!
aducheee;-;excellent game, highly recommened
RawrNessa;-;Only play if you have 6 hours at a time to lose.
Get Popped;-;Very fun strategy game. It is both appealing to the casual and strategic gamer It also ruined all of my friendships because my friends are stupid back-stabbing jerks 9/10
Rama;-;best civilization game yet
patter1999;-;It is a very detailed game and even if you think you are a pro player you will still learn tons of new things that will improve your skils. Btw never play it before going to sleep or you will end playing it by the time when you should wake up (when your lucky)!!
Chrisfred10;-;An easy way to spend hours alone or with friends! This is an overall awesome multiplayer strategy game.
pea;-;harald bluetooth walks off the set when caught spying splash
Niko Jims;-;Average time spent per login: 500 minutes straight Buy this .
rmtyler14;-;Awesome game if you don't have midterms to study for (time consuming and drags you in).
[TF]Korvath;-;Love this game and the xpacs. I'm pushing 1000 played hours and still find ways to have fun with this game!
nebbii;-;I hope you have a lot of hours of sleep to spare. Civilization V is a very complex turn-based strategy game. For newcomers, it's easy to understand and grasp the basics, but under the surface there is a lot of room for planning, decisions to make and strategies to use. After you've learned the basics you'll learn the other aspects of the game mostly by trial and error. You'll find out that making a lot of cities needs to be balanced with happiness, and that it isn't a very good idea to settle on nothing but tundra. This game isn't so much about being able to do a lot of actions in as little time as possible, or very quick reflexes. Planning and strategic measures are much more effective than producing buildings on impulse. Diplomacy is a big factor, when you start a match you don't necessarily think of ways to destroy your enemy. There are multiple ways to victory, sometimes it's better to befriend your opponent to make deals that make your civilization stronger, or assist eachother in times of need. Not to say warfare isn't an option. Taking down a city (or a civilization) requires a lot of strategy and planning, you'll have to keep in mind cities can be tough to take down if they have a lot of defensive structures or defensive units within borders, and you can't simply walk over most cities with just a few cheap units. It's easier to be defensive than to be the attacker. These and many more mechanics make Civ 5 as interesting and entertaining as it is. You'll find yourself keep wanting to press next turn, seeing what effect your moves made, if your scout will get away or get trampled by those units on the other side of the forest, et cetera. The diplomacy gives a lot of options for mindgames, betrayal and friendship. Surprising your ally who is about to take a cultural victory by launching an invasion assisted by a nuclear missile can be completely game-changing if executed well. I highly recommend this game to anyone remotely interested in this game, it's timeless.
C00lNati0n;-;THe game is really good. I have spent about a good bit of time playing. Its not a total waste of money. The game feels more like a simulator than strategy. All the CPUS can have different personalitys and actually have a think more. Even on Easy the CPUS are making good descisions. The game also lets you choose a historical figure such as Alexander the Great, Washington, Ramses, Elizabeth, and Augustus Caesar. Multiplaye is pretty good to. With a special chat syste, you not really need any voice speaking. All the mechanics make the game intresting and fun. I would say Sid did a good job on this game. My Rating is 9/10 (THis game is one of the best I have seen)
Kitsune Shukko;-;I originally got this for me and a friend to play together a few years back and to be totally honest the game is amazing. I would of course at least reccomend playing the demo to see if you're into this kind of thing but Civilization V is a very fun game and its great to play with your friends!
Glutarded Whale;-;THis is a good game, but it is a HOLE NEW GAME when you get Brave New World Gods & Kings and other DLC
Drkovic;-;Say goodbye to any of your social ambitions and prepare to abandon your family because you will be sitting on your  for 7 hours straight playing this game. Germany, Poland, and Ottomans FTW.
(BMK) Brusli;-;Great fun but can take ages to finish a game. However you can save multiplayer games to continue when you want or you can just play singleplayer. So overall it's a great game.
Awesome Cookie;-;10/10 Would play a second game
Awesome Yoshi Man!;-;Why would anyone not buy this game?
Ye Ole Peasant;-;I enjoy playing Civ. That is all!
Gandalf;-;This is a good game but not my fav but still ok :)
Lee;-;One of my favorite games in my library, hours of gameplay with random results every time.
Collo;-;The best turn based strategy game out there!
Arashi;-;An excellent strategy and conquest game, completely worth the 20$.
Chansey Is Angry;-;Awesome Game... But not enough hats.
Striker;-;1 more turned' my spring break away 10/10
Mr Forest;-;Awesome game which requires much intelligence
Agiri (Plant Ninja) #SoTired :^);-;Sometimes I play this game and my dog starts floating.
Y U N G  G L A C E;-;Aight, listen up. At first, it may seem like a boring  game. But that's because you haven't played it yet my a! Listen, As soon as you have a few warriors and builders up, the game gets incredibly fun. Like, you can  people and be like "Yo, what it is, ?" and divebomb entire ing cities, bruh. If you do have any power in real life,  get Civ 5 and rule entire NATIONS. Bruh, this game is better than watching Shrek  on an onion and eating it as part of the Shrekian Ritual to worship our lord and savior, Shrek. NOw, that's saying something. And even if you geet bored aand you're like "I beat the game on every single difficulty with every leader. Now what?" There's a bunch of stuff you can download n stuff. NOw go buy this game, or if you already own it, play it. 'Nuff said. TL;DR:  you, read the whole thinng you lazy piece of .
college man;-;With a load of carefully placed content, the game delivers a fulfilling experience of what it's like to  and pillage every other culture on the entire earth as Gandhi. Regardless of its wonkiness at times and high spec requirement for hosting late games with a lot of AI, the multiplayer experience is enjoyable, especially with a lot of friends.
foundthefloor;-;ever want to forget to eat and have the clock mysteriously turn from am to pm and back again....play this game. the ultimate in convincing yourself "just one more turn." seriously, it's that good.
Kevin;-;This is a great introduction to strategy games, really loved it when it first came out as it was really the first somewhat difficult strategy game I played. However if you happen to be an amazing strategy game player, I don't think this is the game for you, get one of Paradox's grand strategies. However for new players this is an amazing experience that really introduces you to the strategy game genre, it gives you advice on how to play and is easy to get the hang of. Now it's supposedly addicting, but for me I kind of lost interest after a bit over 200 hours, but that's all personal preference. This is an amazing, even classic that everyone should play.
Haku;-;Great game. It's fun to play by yourself or with a group of friends. It takes a bit to get the hang of everything, but once you get it, it becomes even more fun.
The Terstotzkan;-;This game is too addicting... I'm sitting at my computer at 10:00 and I'm all like "ust one more turn... Just one more turn..." (Pretty sure that's copyrighted :P)
GayRambo;-;This game is fantastic its so in depth and worth the time and money spent on it. The only thing that you have to be careful of is playing too much of it as one game could last 30 hours (my longest game so far).
SquangleMonkey;-;I felt that civlization V is simple yet complicated it is easy to get the hang of but complicated in the way that you need to deal with everything and pay attention to every little aspect in the game
Rock Knight;-;THIS GAME MADE ME RACIST, 10/10.
Schrodinger's Cat;-;One of the best turn by turn strategy games I have ever played, and I am definetly not saying that just to finish the pillar of the community badge.
raspberryzinger;-;I love this game! I grew up playing Age of Empires and Age of Mythology, so this was great to find.
'RETNUS' (Pindah ID);-;Sid Meier's Civilization V: the only game that i can play for straight 12 hours. just, one more turn....
testdummy653;-;Great Game, really buliding on Civ IV
Zgames The Dragon;-;This game....this game. It's like nutella. Seems kiddy on the outside, but the goodness damn epic. I've never actually attracted to strategy games frankly. I was the kind of guy that was all about pew pew...pew pew games. But damn this game is easy, and enjoyable. I've heard that the older Civilization games are harder than this. But this games is like an opening to anyone who wanted to try or know what a strategy game is like. Now excuse me, nuking Gandhi back.
Chris;-;Lots of land to explore, lots of different civilizations to play and ways to improve your growing kingdom. This game does take a bit of time to play, but it is rewarding for all the hours you put into it. This was the first Civilization game I played and it taught me some things in history that I didn't know. With all the content put into this game (Now including DLC Brave New World and Mods) this game should keep you busy for quite a while.
raW;-;I have played lots of games but this is my love :)
Lanadre;-;Awesome game but can take a while with a lot of enemies ;p
dogphan;-;Great strategy game. It may take a while to get into the multiplayer but if you have a group of friends it is excellent. Singleplayer is also entertaining.
SPUD;-;It is good
The Orange;-;me gusta mucho
Freshly Squeezed Man Juice;-;The biggest problem with Civ. 5, is that the game is borderline bland and boring without any of the incredible DLC. Though with all of those(which if you buy on a Steam sale wont be to pricy)put together, you get a beautifully crafted turn-based trategy game that demands hundreds of hours to be put into and always lets the player find something new when they play it. It also very easily teaches the player to play, with difficulty levels going from very beginner to experienced master Civilization 5 is a wonder of a game that demands attention.
AtomicTurtle42;-;Absolutly amazing strategy/simulation game. Superb graphics, great gameplay, everything about this is phonominal, that is, if you like strategy games.
Dragonflame;-;I enjoy playing this game because I like the idea of being able to develop technologies and advance through the eras. I also enjoy attacking enemy units but find it annoying when I usually lose the battles even with the advantage. Overall, I think that it is a pretty good turn based strategy game.
Toaster Oven;-;Do you enjoy not bathing, having cancer, or fighting over the city of "Buttfart" for hours with your friends? If you answered yes to any of these questions or if you really enjoy crying yourself to sleep in a hot sweat of frustration and disapointment, then this game is for you! This game is great, it has caused me to permanently damage my mouse AND my self esteem during the countless temper tantrums that this game promoted! I was meant to be the supreme leader of a great nation but instead I sat and watched the glorious cities of Buttfart, Fatnut, and Dickblood get defiled by the Japanese. Sid Meier is a sick man and so was Ghandi.
Sharkeisha;-;This game is ridiculously addiciting. Start a casual game at 3 in the afternoon and end up playing til 4 in the morning. I love this game.
Void;-;Civ V is an incredibly addicting game, with solid diplomatic and military fighting dynamics, along with excellent visuals and simple menus. Be warned, though, that the AIs seem to be the largest s when it comes to asking for gold and when making dead. I'M LOOKING AT YOU, CHINA! Anyways, it's a great game if you enjoy strategy.
Thomas;-;Addictive. Watch your afternoon turn into the evening while trying to survive the world stage! The DLC is a must as it completely revolutionizes the game. Sad about the Mac version not having mod support unless you get tricky with the files, but even then it causes instability. Still glad to have it on both devices.
Sullyvaan;-;Cool
Kurtc1989;-;This game is a sleep destroyer, be prepared to lose your life if you start a game. It starts as one more turn, then ends tomorrow . If this game teaches you anything its dont trust the french or gandhi!
Honsolo;-;Turn based strategy all time top 3
Shahkulu;-;Litteraly the best turn based game in my opinion. Highly reccomend you buy this if you havent already.
Matt Spaul;-;Definitely one of the best games I've ever played
jordanbeals;-;Great game very easy to sink several hours into it without even realizing it
SideGFX;-;Civilization V is a solid game. Not too much more to say. It's fun to play Vanilla, with many different ways of achieving victory (Culture, Science, and Domination, for example) and no two games turn out quite the same. Then when you include mods into the equation, and you get even more playtime and fun. I recently played a match as the kingdom of Rohan on an 80x80 hex map of MIddle Earth, and man was that fun. There are also mods that add enhanced functionality, unique units, GUI tweaks, and a whole slew of other changes that serve to spice up the experience. Definitely a solid pick up. However, I'd definitely advise getting Gods and Kings with it at the very least. The Gods and Kings expansion adds a lot of content to the game that was sorely needed, and they have added even more content to it with the newest expansion Brave New World.
Greenlawn2 [_];-;Amazingly fun! Highly reccomended!
skuzbunny;-;This game will eat your life....
RolandasD;-;Great game
PRoToGeiST120;-;550+ hours in and I will say this: You will experience alternate worlds' histories unfold before you. Like who could forget The Polish invasion of Ur that caused intervention of the Protestant Egypt and Saim in the year of 1964? Perhaps you remember the 1678 discovery of a second continent that greeted Brazil, Maya, Rome and China to the world stage? Or the Atom Bomb dropped on the Aztec capital after its embargo on Persia escalated to war in 2002? Maybe some ancient events like the first trade route between the US and Babylon in 2580BC? You can't forsee all the events you'll make and see in your Civilization's trek for glory and that is why I keep coming back, win or lose!
MR;-;Great game, I highly recommend this game!
Jragghen;-;Absolutely wonderful game. Easily the most accessible Civ game for those new to the series, and fun to fans of the series as well. Every expansion pack/DLC is worth it (with the possible exception of the two newest map packs). There is endless replayability options between the various ways to win/factions to play/maps which can be generated, and that's not even scratching on the scenarios and other options. In-game multiplayer is limited to eveyrone being on the server together and playing at the same time, which can be a little difficult to do - a proper included "play-by-email" or something would be very appreciated, but http://multiplayerrobot.com/ works in a pinch. Anyway, if you like strategy at all, GET THIS GAME.
Simon;-;This is a brilliant game. As I had never played a Civ game before this one, I had no idea what it would be like and I expected it to be too hard for me to play, but the help and advice that this game gives you at all times is amazing and has really helped me to get into the swing of things. Don't trust the other civilizations though. Use them to your benefit but don't let them lull you into a false sense of security. Even if things are going well, there's a large chance that they'll randomly just turn and denounce you, or worse. 9/10, would recommend this game to anyone who has to time to put into it.
JaegerBombBastic;-;Just don't think about it, it is a steam must have!!!!
Godrin;-;Great Game would recommend. I have yet to try the expansions though.
WaZz93;-;Great for passing the hours without realising
chris76mills;-;One of the best strategy games I've ever had the pleasure of playing, or simply losing a entire night of sleep to the replayable single player. This is one game that any strategy enthusiast, or casual player can enjoy!
Darkfox;-;a great game and fun to play in single and multiplayer
Stormy Night;-;This game is amazing in my opinion 10/10
Salamy_Doggy;-;I would highly recommend this game, it's very addictive and with all the dlc's the game is just perfect, and the multiplayer is very fun but watch out for the trade bug!
andy72774;-;This is an amazing game and it is definitely still my GOTY, We've played hotseat mode for hours at my friends house. But sadly, after getting my own computer (Windows 8) and attempting to start the game, it just closes before i can even get to the gameplay. It is still a very good game though, so rock on Firaxis, keep making great games!
OMFGaPOTATO;-;Great strategy game.
King Carr;-;Great
Manderson317;-;Gandhi nuked me, is was great
BRB Queen;-;10/10 Civ V is, hands down, one of the best PC games I've ever played. I've never experienced vanilla Civ V, but I've put in a lot of time into Gods and Kings, which was pretty fun (a little slow at times with not as much micromanaging), and Brave New World, which gave the game, to me, a lot more playability (added quite a few new features which I enjoy thoroughly), especially due to the amount of gold it allows to be accumulated. I definitely recommend getting both of the DLC for this game, as each adds a little more that brings it closer to perfection. My only complaint is that it can still get pretty slow, but it's hardly a deterrent from loving this game. Add a bit more micromanaging, and it's golden.
Kyle;-;Well made game with a mostly intuitive interface and great game mechanics. Some minor glitches that can be resolved with mods and it just feels so satisfying taking over another civilization and claiming the continent to yourself! Also the interaction between leaders adds an interesting perspective and convinces you that these are real civilizations you are blowing up with your giant death robots.
megahugestrike;-;EXTREMELY good game. Random maps provide large replayability, and hours and hours of gameplay each game. Lots of strategy and balance is neeeded by the player to make a proporus civilization. You can even play with friends! Also, Brave New World makes it a 1000 times better.
Garyan;-;You guy should get this its so much fun with multiple people.
Angus Patty;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is the game that you play in the morning, laying in bed, sipping a cup of tea, and laying in bed. However, you will look up after a couple hundred turns and realize that you have been playing for 3 days. As I always say, if it's on sale buy it. If it isn't - wait. Cuz it will be.
silverwings24;-;Best game ever, I wasn't sure if I would like it as I had not played the earlier versions, but as I had experience with age of mythology and other similar games, this was only 10x better. (though age of myth will always have a place in my heart)
HighCommanderXen;-;A very fun game,and very entertaining.
Shadowofanova;-;This game will take all your free time away, and no matter how long you try and resist and walk away from you computer, you will always return.
AirWhale1;-;I'm nowhere near a big fan of strategy games, real time or turn-based, and can't really say I'm a big fan of any...except this series, which I adore, and this game is no exception. Difficulty levels go from 1(tutorial level difficulty here) to 9(I barely won a single game at 5), so anyone can find their sweet spot. If you do not have any interest in history I can almsot guarentee that this game will change that. So many quotes by famous people in history, many leaders and civs to choose from, units go from men with stones tied to stick to the kind of warfare we have now (with a single unit that goes beyond), multiple ways to win...there is a ludicrious amount of content in this game. If you are ANY sort of fan of history or strategy games or simply just good games, you will get a lot of enjoyment out of this.
Stefan Lenn [ODDJBBS];-;Colonize Europe as the Aztecs. Prevent your citizens from reproducing in the course of 180 years in order to build the Eiffel tower before Mongolia. Build a submerged Kremlin cause you didn't have enough space on land. Get nuked twenty-eleven times by Gandhi. Invent the internet before anyone has ever heard about the computer. Rain death upon Japanese Crossbowmen with your F-22s in the 17th century. Rename the World Congress to "A Bunch of s." Get somebody to wage war on you cause on of your cities happens to be next to Mt. Fuji. 1/10 for historical inaccuracy.
Dr. McCoy;-;Get this game, IT'S AWESOME!!!!!
Two Clicks;-;A modern-day masterpiece. Beautiful graphics, elegant gameplay, sleek interface, all wrapped in the glorious civilization building model that goes back to version 1 through 4. If there is a downside its that combat units cant stacked.
Gruzzli;-;Got fed rottie food
ZUES6DESTROYER [NL];-;it is a fun and great game if you like stratigic games i would recommend it for all strategy players
Nano_Ranger;-;best turn based strategy ever play as any civ old or new
Albatraoz;-;it cool
SterreRem;-;Nice addictable game, Just sit back and play how YOU like it.
General Catlysses S. Grant;-;THIS GAME IS FABTASTIC
Husky;-;Just.One.More.Turn.
Mack;-;I dont have enough hours i this game. its amazingly talented, unlike my skills in it
DemonicOwl;-;This game is a wonderful addition to the Civilization frenchise. It has everything you would need. Owning the Brave New World DLC also makes the game play a lot more fun and better. The controls and the gameflow are rather simple and intuitive; I even got by 7 year old brother to play with me and he could play it. Great game.
Farmboy102;-;53 Hours in to the game and I am still loving it... Civilization V is my first game in the Civilization series and now that I got it I don't Understand why I never played the others. You start the game off with one group of settlers and a warrior to protect them, from there you start building your civilization. It's not like other strategy games where you literally build every single building, the map is devided into Hexagonal tiles with different resources, all you have to do is build your settlement and from there on expand to the surrounding tiles, as you play you unlock new buildings to upgrade your settlements, you can found new settlements as freely as you like but you always run risk of attack so make sure you have the proper amount of troops to protect those new found bottom feeding settlements of yours. There are 5 ways to win the game: Domination victory, Science victory, Cultural victory, Diplomatic victory or a Score Victory. But this means there are 5 ways for you to get beaten as well so you will need to not only keep an eye on your own civilization but your enemy's aswell, and know exactly when it's time to attack or ally up. If you get tired of the standard game check out the scenarios, that is where the real fun begins, with scenario's that actually happened like the Boers vs the Zulu's in Africa, the Mayan's who feared the end of the world and all the troubles they faced like the french invading them with weapons they have never even seen before in their lives, the scenario's have it all. And if that's not enough, Civilization V supports the steam workshop so there are endless mods for you to choose from to spice your game up even more. The game is very easy to learn with the help of your advisers who even though they can be pretty annoying sometimes, make sure you know what you are doing and what the Consequences will be if you take a certain action. They will take good care of you. My Rating 9/10 - (-1 the game sometimes feels like it's taking forever to finish, but there are settings to change the game speed which will sort this out for you, but I found that on Standard settings the game takes forever and on quick settings you can't help but feel extremely rushed. It would have been nice to have something in between. ) BUY THIS GAME!!! IT'S AMAZING
[CNDR]GreenMyshelf;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is the best Strategy game currently on the market. Civ V is a game of economy, science, culture, diplomacy and warfare. This turn-based strategy game was originally a board game and is worth buying and getting DLC for.
Mattomatic;-;Can keep me happy for hours. Amazing Strategy. 10/10
AweDude;-;You thought you were going to do something today? Nope.
The Most Zealous Sea Cucumber;-;I love it. It's an easy-to-use turn-based strategy game that changes each time you play. Each update is an attempt to balance civilizations, which is good. It also has a lot of distance between each new iteration; Civilization IV was years and years ago, so it's not like they're pumping out low-quality products for a quick buck. My complaints are that this new game put features of the old game into DLC, like religion. It's also completely eliminated corporations (though a new take on it comes along in Brave New World). Overall, it's a good game, but get the bundle at a discount.
Mitchfynde;-;You will accidentally play this for 5 hours in a row if you arent careful!
An Innocent Duck;-;If you like nukes, you'll like this game. If you had a depressing child hood being a russian orphan who ended up dreaming about world domination in the form of shoving your  into all kinds of things that may or may not involve pointy objects and diplomacy. You will love this game. If you hate turn based combat or Montezuma ramming his jaguars into your capital because he is that angry. well you may just tolerate the game. 100 score, wins gold medal, and yes I will undress for you George Washington, *Blushes*
ARC0;-;Good game to kill some time
Chucky;-;Great game, spent many hours on it. It's most fun when doing multiplayer,
Adam;-;The best game i have ever played on steam
Tam slent;-;Buyitlol. #1moreturn
Blacker Spork;-;You can nuke George Washington as Augustus Caesar. :)
[TGoEG]Cthulhu;-;Great for Anyone Even If You Havent Played The Other 4
Yagamire;-;Must play! Just never trust Gandhi...
Ponyboy Curtis;-;Great game for history  like me who just want to soak in all the indulgences of helotic civ
dg16dg;-;beware playing with war mongers fun multiplayer singleplayer boringish 7.9/10 (tip for pros only : rush nuke tech for e z win)
WhiteBread;-;Amazing game. Very in-depth and great game style. 10/10
grandrusenko;-;I love it, very addictive. Very good with all DLC's. All of them.
vemanik;-;Dont trust Gandhi's innocent face, he will shove a nuke down your throat.
Ghost;-;One of the best turn based strategy games ever created!
[354NC] MithrilMike;-;Just one more turn. That's the phrase the has been uttered by almost everyone who has ever played a Civ game. This game is no exception. The music is tailored to the civilization you play, the graphics are beautiful, the strategy is intense. You will find yourself plotting your next victory, whether it is through military force, economic maneuvering, or scientific research. Different ways to win or lose, so position your forces and click next turn.
Boo Boo;-;This game is fantastic! Wether you are playing with or against friends or just playing by yourself, it makes you have a sense of accomplishment through completing the smallest of tasks. This game also does not have a campaign, wich reallly makes the player concintrate on having fun instead of "beating" the game. Also when playing with friends, it does not create teams. You decide if you want to win the control of civilizations through war or diplomacy. The player decides who he wants to befriend or declare war with. I have a fealing that this will eventually ruin a few friendships.
Walder Frey;-;More addictive than the addiction a 55 year old baby boomer has with his cigarettes.
Your Dad Comma Shrek;-;amazing game. It can get very addictive because there are endless amount of things to do(Sort of)
KidFromIndianaJones;-;Very Fun Game. Youll find yourself playing for long periods at a time for what will seem like 30 minutes for you. You will get addicted to it and want to finish the game before you do anything else. Even when you finish your first match you might want to play again. Theres no problem with that either as there different ai difficulties , randomly genrated maps and varing civs with there own special perks.Once youve mastered all of that you can try to mod the game , this game has many creative and smart players that made there own custom maps , civs or scenarios. If you have a friend thats plays the game you could play with them. If you are a stratagy game fan or just like the feeling of creating YOUR own empire and nation then this is a can not miss.
White Tatsu;-;Seriously, if you played Age of Empires, and you loved it, but wanted more, this is THE game for you. It's so freaking good, I can't stop playing it >~<
Ice-Melter;-;This is a very enjoyable game if you have the patience to play it to its full potential
Reformed Ex-Gamer;-;Sonic Adventure is the final digital installment of the Sonic The Hedghog series for the Sega Dreamcast. Despite foiling Robotnick countless times, Sonic is in way over his head this time as a mysterious demon beast threatens humanity. He must team up with some old favorites and some new unlikely heroes to save his wild world from total devastation. Before you getting excited you might wanna pump the brakes. This game is kind of a dud sad to say. The best part is when you fish with one of the Cadillac Cats. Otherwise you got a janky platformer due to Sonic Team's inability to translate Sonic buttery smooth style to the 3rd dimension. Worst of all, the whole game takes place in some outdoor mall with real humans. If you stay next to one long enough they will give you a piece of kibble and a pat on the head. There weren't many worse ways to end the 90s than to play this game while listening to Jimmie's Chicken Shack. I didn't know no better. Me know better now. Not the adventure I was looking for. Thanks Sonic, you nitwit.
Slushee99;-;You can be George Washington 11/3 PS: F*** you Ghandi, f*** you!
mr. i don't know;-;This is an awesome game. Me and my friends play all the time thgether, and has really inproved my gaming experience.
FranDog;-;What can I say, Civilization is a briliant game. This title combines the strategy of a turn based game, while still allowing you to save and continue later.
Mr G 1999;-;Amazig game, I didn't think that I would like it but its amazing, I love it!
Nathwes;-;Yes but got lots of bugs what need fixing
SCORPEANrtd;-;A really fun turn based strategy game, some issues with multiplayer, and optimization, but it's well worth it!
ChaozCloud;-;very good game runs well and would highly recommend DLC's as well
xGhacer;-;Mowing down Roman archers with tanks. 11/10
Melichor;-;Excellent strategy for long nights with extremely well made multiplayer
Strong M;-;Amazing game that I can't stop playing. 9.5/10
leodavin843;-;You start a game. "I'll play for about an hour, then go do something else." Then you start you empire, you research mining, horseback riding, all that good stuff. You found another city or two, and make allies with Russia and Germany. You notice an hour has passed, but you're just about to finish building the Pyramids. "I'll just play another turn or two." The moment you finish the Pyramids, Russia denounces you for finishing them right before she did. "Maybe I'll play for a few more turns, just to see how this plays out." And before you know it, it's 3 AM, you haven't eaten in 12 hours, and nothing you wanted to do today gets done. TY SID MEIER. BUMP.
Insanity;-;Easily one of the most entertaining games to play with friends. Win or lose, each game creates new laughs. Great factors were put into the game, and it feels as real as ever. I already recomended it to 10 friends. Great work Sid Meier!
WhyamIhereWHY;-;When was the last time you saw Ghandi Nuke an entire civilzation? Exactly, you haven't. Buy Civ V
Zealot;-;Solid and in depth turn based strategy. Games take just about forever to complete, especially when you've got a large bunch of players. Regardless, it's a lot of fun and very interesting to those who appreciate 'management' type things in their games.
Stormy Night;-;This game is amazing in my opinion 10/10
Salamy_Doggy;-;I would highly recommend this game, it's very addictive and with all the dlc's the game is just perfect, and the multiplayer is very fun but watch out for the trade bug!
andy72774;-;This is an amazing game and it is definitely still my GOTY, We've played hotseat mode for hours at my friends house. But sadly, after getting my own computer (Windows 8) and attempting to start the game, it just closes before i can even get to the gameplay. It is still a very good game though, so rock on Firaxis, keep making great games!
OMFGaPOTATO;-;Great strategy game.
Manderson317;-;Gandhi nuked me, is was great
BRB Queen;-;10/10 Civ V is, hands down, one of the best PC games I've ever played. I've never experienced vanilla Civ V, but I've put in a lot of time into Gods and Kings, which was pretty fun (a little slow at times with not as much micromanaging), and Brave New World, which gave the game, to me, a lot more playability (added quite a few new features which I enjoy thoroughly), especially due to the amount of gold it allows to be accumulated. I definitely recommend getting both of the DLC for this game, as each adds a little more that brings it closer to perfection. My only complaint is that it can still get pretty slow, but it's hardly a deterrent from loving this game. Add a bit more micromanaging, and it's golden.
Kyle;-;Well made game with a mostly intuitive interface and great game mechanics. Some minor glitches that can be resolved with mods and it just feels so satisfying taking over another civilization and claiming the continent to yourself! Also the interaction between leaders adds an interesting perspective and convinces you that these are real civilizations you are blowing up with your giant death robots.
megahugestrike;-;EXTREMELY good game. Random maps provide large replayability, and hours and hours of gameplay each game. Lots of strategy and balance is neeeded by the player to make a proporus civilization. You can even play with friends! Also, Brave New World makes it a 1000 times better.
Garyan;-;You guy should get this its so much fun with multiple people.
User has not setup their Obama;-;Amazing... civlizing game? anyway it is really fun, espicaly scince u can launcher nuclear weapons 4 no reson at other ppl. Amazing game. buy it now.
Matt;-;I have been playing Civilization since day 1 (1991) and now in the year 2014 i cant wait for "Byond Earth" add on
ThomasOverMany;-;This game is worth the money. I bought it the first year it came out, but I constantly come back to play it after a while especially since I'm a history buff. Every playthrough is different, even if you still use the same strategy everytime. I would definitely reccomend this game to anyone who loves strategy games, but I also think this game is a great starter for those who don't usually play strategy games and want to jump into them. 9/10
Wicked Little Critta;-;At first I was not wholly impressed with this installment in the famed Civilization V franchise. I thought the new hexagonal tiles and inability to stack units really restricted the game dynamic... but as it turns out, these changes, as well as graphical updates, are what makes Civilization V even better than its predecessors. In Civilization IV, you could stack units on top of units on top of units. Often combat strength was dictated by the amount of time and resources you put into building so many units. Now you can only have one unit per tile, and you can't even have units walk over each other. This makes the game much more strategy based, and this works especially well in multiplayer. The hexagonal tiles also make for much less blocky world generation and more countour. Overall, I love with this installment of Civilization. I would much rather play Civ V than Civ IV, which is good because Civ IV doesn't work on my computer anymore.
Ascadian;-;This is probably the most influential game of my generation.
Sebbish;-;Was Julius Ceaser, made archers, Ghandi declared war on me and I was killed by Queen Elizabeth. 10/10.
Machu;-;Love it goes threw history great sound affects, music, and art
AlphaGamer;-;A great game that combines strategy, warmongering and building! The AI needs a HUGE improvement though... I got Washington down to his last city and he demanded that I give him all my money and luxury resources for peace!?
Piledriver;-;Fun and addicting
Fl1pz;-;Probably the greatest turn based strategy game I've played to date. With all the different victory conditions, map layouts, and leaders, its like playing a different game each time. The games do take a long time though, especially playing with others, be prepared to sit down for 6 hours and play. Or you can do pitboss games and the game also alows you to safe it and pick it up later.
chosen01uk2002;-;Another great game. Though I stopped bying the Addons. samey samey..
Solid Squid;-;addiction
Beard Wonder;-;Needless to say if you want a turn based strategy game believe me when I tell you, THIS IS IT! However it's hard for me to recommend this to someone who is planning to buying just the vanilla (no DLC included) edition. Of the 255 hours on this game I've spent at least 50 of those on the vanilla and back then I felt as though the game had less game play than the previous game in the franchise, CIV 4. So if you're getting this game I highly recommend you get the gold edition, you get the core game, the Gods and Kings DLC and a bunch of scenario packs (never used) and civilizations which I have found to be very viable in game, such as Korea. My other biggest complaint is that the AI do sometimes cheat. Now based on your definition of what "Difficult" AI means, you might be fine with this. My personal definition of a difficult AI is one who is given the same basic resources as an AI on an easier difficulty, but is much better at deciding on what to do and how to use those resources. Civ 5 believes that a more difficult AI has more resources than the easier AI and the player. Despite this I still believe Civ 5 is the based turn based strategy due to the sheer amount of strategies you can use to explore, expand, and conquer.
The Bible Guy;-;Just one...more...turn... One of the best strategy games I have ever played!
PlaineWayne;-;This game will make you hate foreigners.
Sailor Twift;-;its great!
metangchase;-;This game is very time consuming but you meet tons of new people, and develop skills like strategies, and diplomatic abilities, this game is like life, risk, chess, and facebook all thrown in a blender to get this game.
The Coo Coo Nut Guy;-;I spent like 40 hours playing this game in the first 3 days. The variety of civilizations and their characteristcs fused with the game concepts itself will make you spend hours instead of minutes you intended to. I strongly not recommend for those who has limited time to play or has some work to do.
Peef Beef Rimgar;-;Good to play with friends, even better to play by yourself, 10/10 recommended!
Gizmo;-;Have nothing to do for 9 hours?
DaFragger;-;Probably the best turn-based god game ever.After the first four games Civ V has lots of improvements there is no more religion which is probably a better idea and has city-states which are a quite good idea also the interface is much more streamlined.There are a lot of options for your civilization from America to France.Also now the game is on a hex-based grid its a lot better than the old square-based grid.You need to take your civilization from cavemen to the future.Watching as you advance in technogly run low on money and try to regain it,you are invaded and denouced as you need to built farms,new cities,mines,quarrys. An excellent game! 10/10
Duke_Vandera;-;i love playing stratgy games and Civ 5 is by far the most in depth. best graphics on a stratgy game other than rome total war 2. every game can be played differntly and stratigies vary so its all up to you.
leolandfunk;-;This is a very fun game to play for people who like a challenge. Although I do recommend watching someone play the game because there are hints the game is still hard for beginners. I bought the Civ Gold Edition & I want to buy Brave New World so yes PLAY THE GAME and friend me on steam so we can play on Civ together.
BloodEagle616;-;Great game has given me hours of fun and I can see many more hours ahead, I defiently recommend this game to anyone who like strategy and to who like destroying their friends in all out war
Papa Nooch;-;I like the part when Gahnid dies from Obamas bomb
spockjsimp;-;This Is A amazing game. so much effort and time put into the game. dont expect to just start and be good at it as it takes many games to know what your doing and sometimes you still find something knew. amazing replay value. i could play this all day.
Entborn;-;As much as I enjoy strategy games, I had never played any of the Civilizations before. One of my friends gifted this game to me a while ago, and I had to try it out. I ended up getting hooked to it. I enjoyed it so much, my older brother had decided to get me some of the expansions. It's amazingly simple to figure out, and you can get the hang of it fast. I had no idea how to play the game when I first started, but with time I was able to figure it out. Pros: ~Has a really great tutorial for new players to help learn the mechanics of the game. ~Huge range of civilizations and unique stats for each. ~Tons of different maps and game styles. ~Able to played with friends or AI. ~Wonderful mods on the Workshop. Cons: ~Some of the mods don't always install properly(Not really their fault). ~Easy to get addicted to and lose track of time. ~If you're on a team with other AI when you're at war and about to take a city, they will steal it from you.
Looking to Play;-;good strategy game, worth the money
Rezu;-;Just one more turn... Aww  what day is it?
Firethorn;-;Civilization 5 is an outstanding strategy game, making you think for every move. Get It
idontknow950;-;lots of fun
Zack;-;This game can suck many hours away from you without you noticing. I'm honestly surprised I don't have much more time in this. Obviously one of the best civilization building games you can buy. If that's what you're looking for, you can't go wrong.
Gramps;-;One of the best and most engrossing strategy games I have ever played. Just prepared to have your time get  like a blind-mute in prison.
Planemgnt;-;It is very fun but there needs to be more balance within the races. For instance venice needs some hard nerfs whilist civs like Sweeden need to be greatly increased. It is fun because the bots are super easy to beat even on deity because of have finished it on deity. there is nothing else wrong but please venice needs to be fixed!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
supersling;-;It's a fun game where you controle your empire through history and can go for different types of victories! It's really fun alone, and even more with friends! try for yourself :D
goose_803;-;If you want a game that never ends this one is for you.
Nigel Farage;-;This game has stolen my life...
SwiftKillerWolf;-;The best game if you want to sit down for countless hours of joy and fun at least till your favorite city is seiged but up till then you are always having fun in this amazing game.
Professor of Aperture Science;-;It is really fun, although it may look pretty boring, it is actually much more fun than you think. Don't judge a book by its cover c:
meldridge;-;The classic turn-based strategy game, but with HEXAGONS!
Azazel;-;AMAZING! You should get this if you don't already have it. ( Always kill every other civilization o.o or they keel you!)
Foxtrot;-;Without a doubt one of the most dangerous addictive gaves I have played.
1Ra;-;The beans have never been cooler
Kim Jong-Un;-;Definitly one of the greatest games of all time. Playing as some of the greatest civilizations ever to walk the Earth you must race for victory. Unlike some games, in this there is multiple paths to take on your way to victory, including scientific advancement, taking over the world, and discovering the United Nation. This game never gets old and is always fun to play.
Bobotron00;-;This game is Amazing, Get it
ChalupaInducedStroke;-;Sid Meier's latest entry in the award winning Civilization series is fantastic. It allows you to rule a country however you would like, be it peacefully allying yourself with others or steamrolling them with the feet of your armies. The two expansions, although steeply priced, is a must for the full experience and i reccomend the dlc strongly. If you love 4X games and have a lot of money in gifted steam cards, than i highly reccomend considering Civilization V. However, if you couldnt put a lot of time into one saved game (a standard game could be awhile,) then you might want to look at less time intensive titles. 10/10
Patchy;-;Buy this game and it will eat your brains. 0/10 needs Shrek civ
Gangbangbaby;-;It's a great game full of adventures and upgrades. You can research really excisting projects and monuments. It looks a bit like Age of Empires II, but I think this game is more fun (and more expensive).
tom_hughes;-;Game constantly crashes, I rarely go 10 turns without having to restart the whole game; this is with running off 8 GB of ram with an intel core I5 processor. Very frustrating! On the rate occasion the game works it is a great game and highly addictive!
Mr. T. W. Walrus;-;A game that makes me feel great. Creating the single most authoritarian superior Atheist society on the planet, while I send my Crusade of Euphoric Intelligence across the planet in a stream of blood, tears, and nukes. All in the name of Chairman Walrus. ALL HAIL THE HAIL THE MASTER OF EUPHORIA 7/10 It was okay
Tadpole;-;So many varied ways to play. Accurate to historical content. Is a lot of fun to play with friends online with only a little occasional lag. 550 played hours and still not bored with the game. Great strategy based game. Don't buy if you like games that don't involve lucky chance.
Pocato;-;This game is like when you pee in a coconut and than later look at it under a microscope just to realize that your new pee humanoids are getting nuked by ghandi.... 10/10 HOE
Proactive;-;Where should I start? This game is absolutely amazing! It has so many things you can do. Such as re-enact historical events, see what it would be like if different civilizations began in a different part of the world, or play against your friends in an intense race to see how can dominate the world. Not only can you achieve domination victories, but your nation can also excel and thrive with science, cultural, and faith victories. No matter what civilization you are, you can build any world wonder you desire! As long as you're in the correct time period and meet the requirements of course. All in all this game is great fun, providing hours and hours of fun (and that will only be one game). TL:DR You can build giant death robots towards the end. 10/10.
Jagger;-;Amazing game, I would say one of the easiest to control, and fun strategy game ever.
Cameron;-;Only 268 moves in and already have thought about fighting :)
Eddy;-;Dont play this with the lights off. It's scarier than Amnesia
Matte d[-_-]b;-;Every time I recommend somebody this game, I just tell them the story of the guy that played a single Civ II match for over 10 years! In the far future, the game has been able to reproduce all of the details of a distopic sci-fi future world. All but 3 cultures have survived, and these 3 has become super-nations in a constant war against each other lasted more than a 1000 years. Most of the lands were devastated by the post-nuclear war fallout, and the people of these superpowers were starving, because their leaders were spending all the resources available in war efforts. Even when the player was willing to withdraw from the war, it was simply not possible because of the greed and the need for resources of the other two nations. So, when I fire up my Civ game... I always deactivate each type of victory... I wanna go see the future!!
ironblademetal(bored);-;Nothing like it, best strategy game on the market right now! 100/10 would get nuked by a  off Ghandi again
Star Commander Billy Mays;-;This game is absolouteley recommended and super fun. There are still a few bugs but i will talk about that later. If you turn the graphics on high it all looks so good it's amazing. The animations , fighting, running, moving, are some of the best ever. The only bugs i have found are the workers sometimes will build things and they never show up and i have to restart the game.
dan;-;define fun and boring at the same time.
Brassm0nkey;-;Great strategy game for wasting hours on end. 10/10
Hjc135;-;it's a good game but if u get it make sure to get the dlc otherwise its not worth it
Ryskatt;-;Buy this game, and give it a chance. A couple of hours in, and you will be addicted. When you've reached the 'addicted'-stage, it can last for hundreds and hundreds of hours. When the addiction slowly disappears, the game will still continue to give you a fair amount of entartainment for the years to come.
proletr;-;This is the best game I have ever played, it has consumed me and remade me into a human being with dreams
Vedvart1;-;This is by far the best game that I have ever played. Entirely worth getting it, however Civ Beyond Earth sounds like its going to be even better than Civ 5, which is a difficult criterium to fill.
Kappo;-;I've never played civilization before, but after playing for (almost constantly) my first 18 hours all what I must say is just: wow. I get it on sale and its really worth it. Need to go to work, but just one more turn.. lose your job but its gonna be alright, just one more turn.. your house is burning, but... one more turn?
Pretty Boy Ginklo;-;very awesome game , the gameplay is fantastic , must buy this! its very fun
Aeilko;-;Great game! Played it many hours before buying it on steam and played many hours since. One of the best strategy games there is, endless posibilities and many ways to win. Always makes you want to play one more turn before you quit. 10/10
Monttupomo;-;Great game, but really addicting
InfamousKerai;-;Just buy the damn game.
Jihadi Jamal;-;Do you want to never go outside again? Yes? Then this is the game for you!
Kyubey;-;Built Nuclear Submarines in 1790. 10/10 Best game
spunkylass;-;I tend to set alarms on my phone so I won't forget important things while playing this game... like eating. ...one more turn.
shane;-;I played this game, 10 minutes later approx. 27 hours had passed 10/10
Hacho;-;Just one more tur-WHEN DID THE SUN COME UP?
Jordendarc;-;It's so awesome. Buy it especially if you enjoy strategy games like age of empires or stuff like that. I've played all the civilization games and this one really is amazing.
Panzerjger Tiger Ausf. B;-;Laugh at your enemies while they taste your nuclear might!
HellfireEire;-;Amazing addition to an amazing series. But seriously, Ghandi, stop being such a warmongering -hat.
Mr. Foster;-;Who the  is Sid? 10/10
Shibe;-;Most historically correct  I've ever played. 10/10 Would get nuked by Ghandi again.
dagaminglyfe;-;I can never get sick of this game, it's just one of those games that you come back to.
Classy Villain;-;>Start to play >Try to befriend everybody >Make everybody hate you instead >Start bribing people with crabs >Kill your old "friends" with robots and bombs >Be brtrayed by your last friend >Look at the time >Don't care and play more 10/10 Best strategy game ever,
HP;-;years ago (~1991-->) c:\_ cd games\civ c:\games\civ civ hours, days, ... years of good time. Now back in business and the game feels actually fresh and good-ol-civ Recommended, for just one more turn
PerrinAybara<Meta 6>(VINI);-;great game all the options for making games and when playing are just great
MistaRushYoTeam;-;Probably the best strategy game I've ever played and I am now going to be a long time fan of the series
Dro205;-;...Just one more turn...
Unzen;-;Do not play if you've promised yourself "...just 20 minutes" for that will pass in a blink of an eye. Civ 5 maybe the most recent, the most expansive and potentially most daunting of the classic Civilization series - reinforced with a 234-page manual that comes with it. With those factors in mind, it's easy to imagine strategy new-comers, running away from Civ 5 in droves. But give it another look. Please! Civ 5 is the culmination of over 20 years of series development. Each game has been better than the last (which is a feat in itself) - and welcomes both seasoned veterans and newbies alike. The devs have beavered away on features that worked and ditched those that players felt weak. However, the single, most impressive attribute about Civ 5 is the ability to play the game how YOU want to play it. Want to be a peace-loving, pacifist society? You can be. Want to be a total powermongering and ruthless despot? Again, your choice. I wish I had more space to promote this! Buy it! :) 9/10
Nicdemus;-;It's boring, historically an inaccurate mess, not immersive and slow paced as all hell. Also one of the greatest damn strategy games I've played and know it to be the best I'll play for long. Until Civ VI that is. Supports a ton of playstyles and even losing a game would not bother, as it's incredibly fun to just... build and develop your empire. Also watch out, starting it once means all of your games will dust in your steam library for the next one to four weeks.
Mr. Person;-;A game for people like me, who have a craps load of time to create a civilization. Anyway, it's a lot of fun. Try it out!
Razpado;-;Civilization V An indepth stategy game with historical figures and events. Sid Meier knows stategy and when there are (at times) over 90,000 people STILL playing Civ V to this day, you see the proof how well this stategy game is made. Stategy games have always been my "take a break" from the shooter games. Civ V is the best of that break. If there is one strategy game to buy, Civ V is it! Is it your time to jump in to history and have the control?
AdolfEichman;-;Great game.This game will have you say "yeah ill play for a little bit" and there you are 5 hours later and you keep saying one more turn.one more turn..............
Dux Terrae;-;This may be too adictive for some people. But it is so worth it.
pumpkinman77;-;This game is absoulotly amazing it is one of the best strategy games ive played and i recommend it to anyone
Colby Bryant;-;its great
Jupiter;-;Ever wanted to completely pillage Sweden or make every tile in Tellus full of giant robots? This is your change to do so.
Gemgeffery;-;Because China's icon is a mothering dragon.
Keegan;-;i ing love this game ive had it for 2 months, it runs on any computer
circularmirror7;-;BUY NOW! hours of gameplay and time to waste
TheTHCChip;-;Best game ever can i always have a fun time playing this game
chezlem21;-;Amazing game, would recommend to everybody who likes longer games or has the time to play them , good subsitute for shooters and adventure games. 9.9999999/10
Knob Jocky;-;good game but long loading between turns
<o> Aaron 42 <o>;-;Great game for history nerds and future tyrants. I personally had no experiance on how to download or use mods, however Civ 5 made it easy and fun. Hundereds of hours my life were spent on this game, and it was all worth it. 10/10
BRAINfreeze;-;I get god complexes playing this.
GlosterKnight;-;Love playing this game
Eidorian;-;Basically, cause there are nukes n stuff. Plus it's extremely moddable
Shroomie;-;The Celts started a nuclear war with Germany and Russia. 10/10
Archangel;-;There is no instance of a nation benefitting from prolonged warfare, except India -Civ V
scarlettcrush;-;"everybody wants to rule the world" I consider this the new age gamer version of chess. Totally addicting, I've been up for hours and hours for that one more turn. I do wish for more victory types, only because after playing every version of this for way over 500 hours there comes to you a formula for winning certain types- that said...I still play the hell out of it.
Captain Doraemon;-;Great work that worth your money and time.
ZephyrAM;-;Best Civ yet! Only being allowed one unit of each type (combat/non-combat) per tile really changes the game from previous entries, and while the multiplayer mode right now may feel a bit slimmed down, it's still fun with friends! Definitely suggest it if you're a fan of turn based strategy games.
Max Ulmeera;-;Getting serious while playing a tutorial (not even the "Learn as You Play" one) So, why not? This "Nuke Simulator" would be great if you can make it to Nuclear-ish situation. 10/10 Alexander would be my "Gandhi" again. Oh, and...6.8/6.8 Nukes my wallet and worth it (On sale if you want that nuke misses the target...at least, misses your wallet)
ghostman587;-;This game keeps on crashing saying there is an error with running it help?
ass salt;-;10/10 This startagy makes me boner
timbhb74;-;Awesome game and content and mods
Esiotrot;-;Until you have conquered the world as Banana King of Ethiopia, one with an insatiable lust for bananas, going as far as to commit genocide through nuclear weaponry just for their tasty goodness, you have not lived.
ThaLaurens;-;Great game, really enjoying it!
tokaiser;-;Great for people who don't mind slow paced games.
Seor Chimp;-;If I had to pick one game to play for the rest of my life, it would be this one. Every game I start feels fresh; I never feel like there is nothing new to experience. Plus it's really fun to play with friends!
Badassmedic;-;if you like RTS's then this game is for you its one of my fav's
RedEyeHawk;-;This game is awesome, get hundreds of hours of gameplay out of it!
Ajplaysgames;-;WARNING. DO NOT PURCHASE. Ive lost my job, my friends, and my family to this. This is a game you would give to your worst enemy so they would just live out their life locked in a room. This is essentially the best review you could give a game.
Hajtla;-;Burn them all.
John XXVI;-;10/10 would play again
didyouexpectthat;-;Highly addicting. I downloading on a whim and was actually stuck playing the game. I rarely get stuck playing games but was glued from the beginning.
VanRipernator;-;Sure, it's good
TheSpecialTed;-;A bit doubtful as to whether I would like this game before I first played it, and in the first two days after buying it I played about 19 hours of it. This is a fantastic game.
Joseph Stalin;-;great game. love it
rasm835g;-;this is a really good game if you enjoy being tactical with things, its really nice for planning out strategies or just ing around making war with everyone, i really do recommend it, its awesome
Ozymandias;-;As a Civilization veteran (having played through III and IV extensively), I thought that Civilization V stayed true to the rest of the series while making excellent improvements and additions. The game is a polished, tested, and free of any discernible bugs. The UI is more intuitive than that of Civilization III and the overlay options allow you to view the map area in terms of whichever factors you see fit. The concept of non-stacking units is also surprisingly good. Gone are the painful late-game turns of managing a bloated military, Civilization V encourages a more diverse style of play, wherein pursuing cultural, diplomatic, militaristic, scientific, or time victory is a choice that does markedly affect your style of play more so than in prequels. This is largely due to the city-state mechanic as well as the social policy mechanic. A complaint I had with the previous titles in the series was the tendency for domination victory to be the most effective strategy by far. In this game however, I feel the developers have done an excellent job in making every victory type to be worthwhile, unique, and effective in their own rights. Thanks to the many improvements made to the series in this game, and the adherance of the developers to the root mechanics of Civ, I think this is a great game for Civ fans and probably the best ever for new players.
Jake On A Plane;-;Umm okay this was a pretty fun game but there was no Sid Meier Civilization included in the game and it has yet to be patched in so either change the title and quit misleading your customers or I will write about this in my blog. You've been warned. 10/1000 A+
___________;-;Hours and hours of slaughtering any empire that dared to denounce you during your early stages, and eventually conquering the entire world is probably the most fun i've had with a game that involves slaughtering entire countries.
Big ol Dragon;-;I... Can't... Stop... pleae help me. Just one more turn.
Johnny;-;heroin
Limskaya;-;Warning: the one-more-turn-syndrome is real!
ibrahimodad;-;Got it about 5 days ago, already put in 15 houirs. Waste of my life but soo worth the money.
Lee;-;One of my favorite games in my library, hours of gameplay with random results every time.
de green blob;-;best turn based game by far
Kaalo;-;If you like strategy games, history, crafting your own stories within a game and you are prepared to spend hours upon hours playing, this is a game for you. And yes. This is one of the addicting ones.
Nobody Special;-;This game is recommended by me.
Bassmastah;-;Pretty good game! just the right balance of war and diplomacy with science, religion, and culture tossing things up!
MistaRushYoTeam;-;Probably the best strategy game I've ever played and I am now going to be a long time fan of the series
Dro205;-;...Just one more turn...
foksieloy;-;Base game is solid. The expansion turns it into a brilliant and balanced game. Only issue I have with it, is that it is so good that it makes you want to play it with friends. And the multiplayer is the most unstable thing I ever experienced in a game. And you play it anyway, cursing Sid Meier every step of the way. Because it is good enough to make you wade through the suffering of constant disconnects.
Alcromas;-;Excellent game for those who want a game with good strategies and many options available. Great soundtrack and user interface is very clean.
F3CAL_COMMAND3R;-;my wife hates this game, five stars.
Barbisaur;-;This is a great game you can spend hours playing either casually or competitively. This is the best turn based strategy game I have ever played and would recommend it to everyone even if the genre is not one you would normally play.
OHeyImBalls;-;If you are prone to addictions, do not buy this game. 10/10 would get addicted again.
Mevolent;-;When I lost contact with my friends the AI in this game did suffice. Overall a really fun game, can be a bit enraging if you're not prepared for a situation. 10/10
Lt_Maverick;-;This game has taken a lot of my time; probably not even close to as much as other people who play this. It is a very accessable game but also can be complexed. I recommend getting the expansions as the final expansion adds more importance to faith and culture. This game can be addictive though. I played 3 playthroughs; by the end of the 3rd night, I had 20+ hours into it.
Erik;-;Best turned based strategy I own.
DaPayn;-;its really good. both single player and multiplayer have mods which make the game wayy more fun and the features are all polished and cool. however there are still a couple bugs which have been in here for soo long and havent been fixed, but all in all its pretty good
Ranflax;-;Simply Awesome
Rajah Bimmy;-;Gameplay (5/5): Builds stress at all the right times, and certain AI add extra flavor Graphics (4/5): Takes a bit of time and tinkering to run smoothly, and your computer definitely will get a little toasty, but this is made up for by the stunning amount of resources the game can handle at once. Design (5/5): The devil is in the details, and Civ is packed with bells and whistles on every tile. The UI can appear daunting at first but in the long run becomes incredibly simplistic. Sound (4/5): The score and narration really enhance the immersion and make your civilization's story all the more epic. Multiplayer (3/5): The only aspect of the game that is just average. The graphics and amount of AI the game can handle take a significant blow in multiplayer, and the way the game freezes entirely if you're at war with another player and it's their turn can be frustrating. The lack of achievement support in multiplayer is also a bit disappointing. PC Factor (5/5): The mod support is absolutely fantastic and propels this game to be a staple of PC gaming. Replay Factor/Achievements (5/5): By the end of one really long game, you will have a full understanding of how to play and be ready to rack up another hundred hours over the course of two days (this game will make you think that's possible) Civilization V is the kind of game that may lead you to rehab, but that'll only hurt your loved ones and you're two turns away from learning how to build a giant atomic robot so who cares? Overall: 8.9
Vinman;-;Great game if you like Turn Based Strategy. Especially fun when playing with friends. 5/5
TenSnake;-;Gud Game >_> unless you play with my friends
Wingzaber;-;Civilization 5 is highly addicting and is a very good choice if you want to make a lot of time disappear before you even realize it was gone. If you've tried the previous Civilization titles and didn't find them fun give Civlization 5 a try, it plays more like a strategy board game then previous titles.
Hooting Up Into The Sky;-;All is fair in love and.. not now you barbarian keds.
EternizMortz;-;One of the best strategy games ever, i never get bored playing this game i always come back and play more of it! I highly recommend this game :)
bungis;-;literally cant stop playing ever
daireon97;-;Brilliant game, wish I had Brave New World though, my only complaint is that the palace view that was in Civ 3 is gone:(, but I gtg and play more Civ 5
flatfoot8355;-;The Best of the Civ series... and with each new expansion it gets better and better! 10/10!
capn_yellowshirt;-;For the person that wants to rewrite history from the comfort of their own home this is the game for you.
Bran;-;what time is it again?
IcyNova;-;Awesome game, the effort put into quitting for long enough to type this comment was overwhelming
Plutia;-;For strategy games, this one takes the cake, and eats it too. The modding community is strong with this one, every game is different, no two are alike. Multiplayer is nice, and with final update smooth, enjoyable experience all around. If you're into building up a civilization from the ground up over the course of 6500 years, making diplomatic decisions with other empires, whilst protecting yourself from barbarians and finding ancient ruins all in the process, this game is for ye.
CS:GO Shitter;-;Cannot play as Sid Meier himself and the civilization is not his, don't be fooled.
Mr.Morningmad;-;Once you get into this game, a whole new world opens up, where you first only saw some numbers, fresh strategies appear. It's also relatively easy to learn, so don't be intimidated.
SSGSSL Goku;-;Play as a civilization and bring forth your country from the dawn of time to the end of it (or untill everybodys dead by nukes) create vast tech and armys and a stunning culture to shun the world in your mightyness or share it all and be a  but that will never happen
bananagramz;-;Awesome game to lose track of time and play for hours on end
Kits;-;good game, lots of replay value, and lots of mods in the workshop.
XINGJUAN;-;great game!
JimmyG107 | trade.tf;-;I would greatly reccomend this game for anyone who likes strategy games. This has already given me hours of fun, with many more to come, I'm certain. The multiplayer featre is epic, allowing you to save and resume a game at any time later, which is very useful for me. The AI is very good, it is reasonable as far as I can see. I have not played the other Civilization games, so I am not comparing this game to others like it, but I would definitely reccomend this game for you to purchase. It is well worth your money.
TheLameGatsby;-;Civ 5 is a great game if you have tons of time to pour in or very little, one of the few games I love recomending.
F3CAL_COMMAND3R;-;my wife hates this game, five stars.
Barbisaur;-;This is a great game you can spend hours playing either casually or competitively. This is the best turn based strategy game I have ever played and would recommend it to everyone even if the genre is not one you would normally play.
OHeyImBalls;-;If you are prone to addictions, do not buy this game. 10/10 would get addicted again.
Mevolent;-;When I lost contact with my friends the AI in this game did suffice. Overall a really fun game, can be a bit enraging if you're not prepared for a situation. 10/10
Lt_Maverick;-;This game has taken a lot of my time; probably not even close to as much as other people who play this. It is a very accessable game but also can be complexed. I recommend getting the expansions as the final expansion adds more importance to faith and culture. This game can be addictive though. I played 3 playthroughs; by the end of the 3rd night, I had 20+ hours into it.
Space Geebus;-;This game is the shizznits.
musicfan013;-;This game is fantastic...there is so much depth and content.
grandknight95;-;It's a great time killer and is even better to play with friends. I recommend checking out the workshop for mods with this game as they can add countries or leaders that aren't recognized in the game or in the dlc's.
Tinker_H3ll;-;Great game, I can and do get lost in it for hours.
Hash Slinging;-;This game, along with every civilization game is both the greatest and worst thing that has ever happened to me. I love to play but the horrible addiction that is "just one more turn" has kept me up or away from work so many countless times I'm almost not a functioning human anymore. Want to sink days of your life into something, but Civ V
Dankey Kang;-;Good game. Lots of fun. Easy to learn. Hard to get good at.
mokitaco;-;Favorite game of all time, hands down. Hundreds of hours of gameplay later and I still don't have it mastered. Highly recommended.
DNalfein;-;The great life destroyer that keeps improving with every xpac. The game is a true successor to a legacy that started over 20 years ago. Dont be fooled by the date this came out, its still a game with next to no equals in terms of the turn based strategy genre. The learning curve might look steep at first glance but I assure you that mastering the basics game will come faster than you think. For the over 1500 hours of gaming I have recorded in the game I am still someone who barely did any scenarios. To keep the game fun, dont forget to crank up the difficulty as the challenge that is brought by the highest difficulty levels will bring out the true test of your abilities.
Le_Cheese;-;A great turnbased strategy game, really fun when you get the hang off it.
Aflin;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is one of the best games I have ever played, but I would recommend getting the Brave New World expansion as it enhances the gameplay greatly. I have literally spent hours playing with my friends, losing every time, but the experience of the game in itself is what makes this game truly remarkable. A Masterpiece.
A Spastic Squirrel;-;quite possibly the best turn based strategy game on the market
vorpalblade;-;A turn based strategy game, Civilization V continues the classic Civilization series.
BASOLUTE KOMODO;-;Became friends with Gandhi, we made many trades and research agreements. Then he just ran over me with elephants and nuked my capital 10/11
BiscuitSawce;-;Awesome game! Very addicting! One of my favorite games!
Charlie Bucket;-;Nuked Gandhi and the whole world hated me. 11/10
dolsson;-;A wonderful TBS for a group of players
bateofsix;-;great game for playing during Bill Reid's Computer Organizations class.
tortellinyo;-;Absolutely epic game. A vortex of time consumption.
BlakSlabeth;-;Don't start this game. Your life will be gone. Have buried man years playing various version of Civilization over the years.
Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs;-;i can prevent forest fires. 10/10
Moecliny;-;I once played a hot seat game with a friend starting at 10pm. 1 turn later it was 8am in the morning. Does not dissapoint
DANjustYEAH;-;Say goodbye to your life
Macabre Octopus;-;I'm pretty sure this is my most played game on Steam, with, as of right now, roughly 177 hours or so of gametime. That tells you something right there, as that's a lot of time to put into playing a game. In truth, this is one of my favorite strategy games, and one I have played for years now, since I first bought it on my birthday a few years ago. The fun of building a civilization and dominating all of my opponents keeps me coming back again and again. With the addition of the Steam Workshop a while back, the game got even better, and now I only play with mods. 9/10
Civ Forever;-;It's kinda like Civilization Revolutions for xbox 360 and ps3, only much better.
SiNbAd [Robot House];-;Just 1 more turn is what you will say after every turn of any game of civ v. This game is very fun for you turn based strategy fans.
SleepyZealott;-;Mechanicly solid - Simplified/Streamlined gameplay - One More Turn Every playthough is its own adventure - granted your willing to set your own goals. Civ has always been about more than just a videogame recreation of history; its always left the player with a sense of achievement; more-so then just the players own, but rather, the grandeur of what our race has managed in such a short time. Its the sense of optimism and hope that stems from those achievements that is so special and makes any version of Civ worth at least a try.
Nanniro;-;Very solid experience for a wide audience! Mold your own story, play your own way, and make your own rules. On top of the already solid vanilla experience, the steam workshop truly makes this game shine brighter than it's predecessors. Don't buy this if you have no time on your hands, because you'll be itching to spend a whole weekend on it!
Sonrisa;-;One of my favorite games of all time. Few games have provided the amount of single and multi player hours Civ and its expansions have.
JinnY;-;10/10 epic warmonger
Wardolf;-;A fun game that you will lose yourself hours if your not paying atttention.
Archipelago;-;Amazing game endless possiblities and if you get bored theres always fun mods
Siratiel Heichou;-;Amazing strategy game and even better for people who like to play with turns
Vince;-;But it (free xp)
Hero;-;Well to start, Civ is an amazing game even if you don't have friends to play with! The AI isn't a pushover and can be quite challenging based on your difficulty level. But playing with friends is where all the fun is at! You can build up your own empires and then take down your own friends in so many different, and strategic ways! I should warn you, the game requires a LOT of time, as each game runs for a few hours or more. Also, it is very complicated at first so don't get overwhelmed! And finally, this is a very strategic game! IT requires a lot of straetgies to take down opponents and win. But other than that, HAVE FUN!
ItsMeTonyG;-;Always addicting, I love how much more in depth this one is than Revolution. Definitely suggest buying it!
XxiMonsterxX;-;Say you'll play it for an hour 8 hours later Well, I think thats enough for one night 10/10
Dshenatzz;-;Love this game would recommend it, missed the first time expansions went on sale but got it the 2nd time arround
The Black Swordsman;-;This game is great to play with friends and is very addictive.
Rexura;-;One of the best games I've played
[Ti] Alpha Omega;-;If you love Total War games this is a great change for you. It also provides MP which is great if you are into rulling the world with your BFF. It has a large variety and gives the player so much to do and choose from. You will never get bored from the wide range of civilization's to choose from.
arch0nmyc0n;-;Excellent game. Just enough of everything. I played original, G&K and BNW. While there are some thing I'd like to see improved, amazing game overall.
theshinymew64;-;This game is one of the best I've ever played. It's a deep simulation game that is good to play in both single player and multiplayer. I'd definately recommend this to any strategy fan that has somehow missed this. (I think that this with BNW is better than Civ IV, but Civ IV is good too.)
Ark;-;You may have heard jokes regarding this game and its ilk that go something along the lines of "Just one more turn oh hey it's 6AM". You are mistaken. Those are not jokes.
Jenna;-;Who knew a strategy game could be so dang fun!
Monty Python;-;I turned Gandhi into a militaristic s that hoarded oranges, and then I slaughtered everyone that was alive. Then my people started to rebel, I left to take a , and I lost after I won. Best game ever 10/10
Meepo!;-;One of the best TBS ever! :3
Thorny;-;Great game, With mods it makes it move fun to play with. Should get it
GBuddai;-;very challenging and a great play with a group of friends
Eagles;-;great game, recomend it to anyone of any age
Maximum Overdong;-;I created masochism Best game 2050 1.5/10 wood bang
RANT;-;A great way to lose seven hours without realising it. If you're going to play this game, be prepared to lose track of time very easily.
Rorik_The_Red;-;Before I continue, The Vanillia game is little more then a demo for the real game. This game is only worth playing with all the major expansion packs, "Gods and Kings" + "Brave New World". Unless you can get all 3, dont bother. This is because religion, espionage, trade routes, a world congress, tourism, great works, and 18 new Civs are added with theses expansions. Without these two expansions there is no economy, religion, nothing to do but grind tech and build military units, which is boring. The Vanillia game is little more then a demo for the real game. Having beaten this game on all it's difficulties I can for sure say, Civ 5 has put me through my paces. WIth the full game there are limitless hours of civ/world/difficulty combos that can be further tweaked with advanced setup. The game doesnt really cheat hard until the last difficulty, which is better than most games because there are a total of 8 difficulties with 5, 6, and 7 being hard but not impossible. If you play this game on windows then the game is worth double its money because civ5 has one of the best modding communities on the steam workshop. Thousands of mods to change the mechanics of the game along with thousands of new civs with just as good if not better quality of the vanilla ones. This game is a staple in the strategy community and is the best civ yet: you manage economy as well as city building and commanding armies. Pretty much the same as civ4 with better graphics and a revamped community through steam workshop. If you like strategy then give this game a try.
Tastycakes;-;Phenomenal, honestly. If you're a fan of 4x, poltics, management or strategy games this is truly a staple. Customization, replayability and incredibly addicting gameplay keep people playing this for hundreds and thousands of hours. The game has one major flaw, and that's if you get the base game with no expansions, packs or DLC then it can feel empy, which is a flaw. Though, at this point with all the bundle sales if you can get anything along with it it feels fleshed out and is probably one of the best games on the market for your money considering how many hours of gameplay it gives.
bretleyrene;-;This game is off the hizzy.
desmondxo;-;I can spend years playing this game! Fun solo player, and fun with friends :D A great way to DESTrOY YOuR FrIENDS EGOS!!!!!
Epic Ruiner;-;Provides hours of entertainment. Some games can last days, but it's always fun playing as a civilization you like, versus those you don't. Almost like making up your own history.
BloodyKlaw;-;This was the first Civ I've ever play. It is a lot better than I thought it would be. I give it my stamp of approval.
LittleWally;-;Play Gandhi + build lots of cities = Easy game
Elizabeth I of England;-;45 hours into this game and watched a 117 part playlist of it... this game is a must buy.
Yancy Fry, Sr;-;Civilization V. This game is truly amazing and deserving of the title PC Game of the year. The base game in itself is a massive title with loads of replay value. The additions to the series are truly noticable and they all play out perfect. The policy trees are something can be very helpful if taken advantage of properly. The use and importance of city-states is something that wasn't seen before and they only get better in the Brave New World expansion. The introduction of Relgion is Gods and Kings is also a great mechanic for working with City-States and other Civs. Combat is something that was really impressed me. Its in depth with many factors practically in every single tile and with the abilities that you gain leveling up your units or the unqiue ablites/units that come with a certain Civ. Speaking of the Civilizations.....the choices of the Leaders you have is plentiful to say the least. It has something for everybody. A must purchase title for any gamer who enjoys RTS, Strategy, and Turn-Based. Really just if you like video games buy this one. If you want a rating....5/5, 9.8/10, two Thumbs up, 99/100, and just damn amazing guys.
Wojtek;-;Got it yesterday, already have 20 hours in it. On the path to ruining my life
H.o.W-Umbrella;-;Civy 5 is great like the classic and best thing about civ5 is the workshop they had added. Civy 4 and 3 were great games and I still play them over civy5 but don't get this wrong, civy5 is still a great game and does change the gameplay a-bit. Civy 5 puts you in a world of conflict and desire, building & war. The gameplay factor for this is pretty good and always has been. Feeling like a game should with a boardgame element that fits perfectly together. Some turns and games are very long but many options, mods and settings can change that. Fun Factor: 6.7 Graphics: 6.5 SFX: 7.0 Gameplay: 5.0 Total Rating: 6.2
disstress;-;This game will ruin your life. I bought this game looking for a simple way to kill a few hours. I started playing it two years ago and looked up this morning at it turns out it is 2014 now.
Knaramadil;-;Absolutely love everything about the game
Millicent Bystander;-;Excellent game... It's so addictive you'll look up one day and realise it's the year 2050!
Redisia;-;Civilization V This is franchise is so addicting it should be said as a warning. This turn based stratagy game lets you take on the role of a leader of a nation and let you manage all aspects of the nation, from diplomacy to economics. The game leads you through the technological advancements of mankind and will let the wars waged go from man wearing clubs to aircraft carriers with fighter planes. The management is very in depth and there are many ways you can manage your civilisation and lead your people to victory. A small example is that you can let your city construct wonders of the world that take up a lot of production time or can say "I do not want to waste time on that" and focus on developing the infrastructures and or armies of your nation. There are to many aspects to praise in this game. And I have played civ 1 back in the day... this game has come allong way and I will gladly see this game be rememberd as a great game. Story/plot: 8/10 This is a hard one, since the story/plot is history replayed by you. Therefor I will rate this based on accuracy on history. The game follows the history books and is therefor spot on. But since it does not really have its own story to tell I cannot give it a 9,5/10 but I will go with a 8/10 Diversity in ai: 8/10 The AI reacts on dilpomatic discisions of the player, knows how to do an attack and has moods programmed into it. Solid and since the update quiet a while ago ... I have no bad things to say about it. Mechanics: 9/10 [/b] Solic mechanics, very in depth managing so thats the best part of this game. And its what makes the game so addictive. Environment: 7/10 The variaty of tiles is great, but the different arts for the same tile seems limited. Voice Acting: 8,5/10 The voice acting for the english version is great, calming voice for narratives and the authenthic languages for the leaders really is a plus in my book. Flexible story: N/A [/u] Overal: 8,5 [/u] On the side note I have played more then my currently displayed time, but this was all BEFORE steam. Do not worry I have quiet the exsperience with this game. :)
crad;-;Civ 5 is great. Enough Said
Haapy;-;This game isn't bad. It also isn't good. Buy it if you've played the other Civs and need a fix. If you're just getting into the franchise, wait for the next one.
Da Toasta;-;The best waste of time ever devised 10/10. probably one of the few must have games on steam it runs on practicaly any machine and has some of the most addictive stratagy that never gets old. Even if you are not usualy a stratagy fan this game is for everyone becuase of its simple nature and easy to get to grips with systems. This game is best enjoyed with a low paced netflix series for maximum enjoyment and time wasting.
'Stache;-;A truly excellent turn-based strategy game. Just be careful not to get sucked in- it's addictive, and games tend to last several hours each.
John Dorian;-;Fun game to play alone or with friends. Few improvements needed for the AI when playing against computers but still, I played many exciting hours. Multiplayer is a bit tricky as one game can last many/many/many hours. All players have to be available at the same time. I recommand this game. You can start playing alone but then play with friends and your alliance will give the game a new dimension.
gunboats soft and wet;-;This game is tight as hell.
Spook Warning;-;Great game, I have played over 110 hours and it never gets old!
Parawhore182;-;I forgot I had a girlfriend after the first turn.
murderer900;-;Really fun,enjoyable,relativley cheap for what it is,strategy game.
Tiger Squirrel;-;This game made me miss a date once. 9/10.
DJ Skeletor;-;I never knew war could be so fun
Lyte;-;Ghandi nuked me and killed all the people in my town.... 10/10
blacklabelbluelabel;-;As you can see by how many hours i've played this game, I definitely recommend it to anyone who likes this type of game.
JHK;-;Civilization continues to deliver one of the primier strategy game experiences. There is little negative to say about the fifth installment of the civilization series, which prides itself on its immense amount of features and challenging gameplay. It's game mechanics are incredibly in depth, balanced, and well researched. The game is only made better by its fantastic, and well worth the cost, dlc which adds new scenarios, world leaders, and features such as religion. The experience is even better when playing with friends and foes in a multiplayer match. The only cons to this game may be the learning curve, as there is definitely a lot to take in. Another gripe with the game is the amount of time it consumes. An average game may last more than 10 hours, and with the amount of different civilizations, scenarios, and features to play and master this may seem a bit daunting. Friends that are familiar and play this game call it a "One way time machine." This meaning you sit down and start, and then snap back to reality 8 hours later without much sense of the amount of time that flew by. Would I recommend it? Yes. A thousand times yes. It my personal favorite strategy game of all time, and is well worth the cost. 10 / 10. Note: If you aren't enthused with it as a single player match I would highly recommend getting some friends together and trying it as fast paced as possible playing against eachother.
Paxer Neo;-;Ah Sid Meier's! We've had so much together, in peace, in 'understanding' from Alpha Centruri/Alien Crossfire and more apon hours and hours of gameplay I can't possibily know how many but this review is for the 5th installtion of Sid Meier's Civilization, as you should know. Personally I have problems with this game from multiplayer and single player campaign. I have many things I enjoy in this game but at the same time it gives me emotions that I can't describe, its not a good feeling or a bad one. Its the small things that naw at me. Like the choice of 'Civilizations' which aren't really interesting, others may argue that this game is perfect. It is in somethings because they have had time to tweek it from SM's Civ 1 (and all other SM's games between back then and now), but this is not diffinate world-embodyment of human culture. I mean sure, if you are looking at this review and your thinking, "Should I buy this game and will I have fun with it as a gamer?" You might or might not be disappointed depending on what you think a fun game is. Is it nuking a civilization that will randomly make war with you because your close to their border by their country? Or will they spy on you because your a ally to them and have been friends with them from the beginning of the game? I think not. I will say this though, if you are one that likes to use your mind in games you will love this game. Not for civilizations mostly but for the way how it all plays out. If you lose or win but if you have poured a good 20+ hours in one game that isn't that awesome, if you lose. But my final scores are: Gameplay: 4/5 From Civilizations to choose from: 2/5 AI's  meter/AI's BSM: 5/5 (Based on highest diffcultly) Playabillity: Average Steam Community active? Yes, very. Altogether I give this game a 7/10 because I do enjoy this game just please to god make this game more realitic among cultures of the world. {Recommended}
Musicmaniac563;-;Sooooo gooood. You can honestly spend an obscene amount of time playing this without even realizing it.
Manolin;-;Civilization 5 is a really addicting turn based strategy game. It has been more streamlined than Civilization 4, but the elements of managing an empire are still there. If you love sinking in hours upon hours into your games, Civilization 5 will be worth your money. The online aspect of this game is also good, but I woulnd't recommend it for its online features since you can go at your own pace when you are playing by yourself without worrying about finishing the game. It is fun to try out the various leaders and it is challenging enough to keep you entertained.
Admard;-;Civilization has always been the penulitimate "Just One More Turn" game. Its latest continues that tradition with gusto. There is something deeply satisfying about guiding your growing civilization through the course of history. The varied victory conditions allows for a multitude of strategies to be effective and fun to pursue; And with the latest expansion, Brave New World, these victory conditions are better balanced than ever. I can not recomend this game enough, but be warned: it is all too easy to play "Just One More Turn" for hours on end.
Todza;-;One..More..Turn...
280 Pound Lips;-;I have always loved these Civ games. I am a bit dissappointed that I just spent 20 bucks on brave new world because of the good "late game reviews". I'm now in the late portion of the first game I've played since I bought this expansion and the game keeps crashing. The content looks appealing, but the crashing makes it unusable.
magnvs1101;-;researching mathematics and engineering without writing 10/10
Mr Brick Panda;-;you get to be Ghandi with the great wall of China and Angkor Wat with enough troops to invade/ take over the world. Realism at it's finest 11/10
digydegu;-;Really addictive game that will keep you up until the very early hours of the morning. At which point, you will promise yourself that this will be the last turn before bed, but you contiune until the Sun pops up from over the horizon and there isn't any point in going to sleep anymore.
iisjah;-;I was weary of it in the beginning comming from the 3rd one (not counting the 4th) but thet definitelly delivered! The gameplay is spectacular! You just need to know you will sink a lot of hours in this - many many hours xD
Sappy Shadows;-;Good game 10/10 can screw over friends by taking their workers.
ForrestWolf;-;This game will take over your life
McLovin;-;Five seconds in, already climaxed.
Yam;-;Pretty much the best game ever.
ropie;-;Once again Civilization will eat up your waking hours.1
NICK;-;I have over 24 hours clocked on this and haven't even finished a game yet
Benito;-;This game is the reason why none of my friends trust me anymore. 10/10 would buy again
senpai peon;-;when i typed pepperoni pizza, nothing happened and gandhi invaded me 0/10
bolognasuntan45;-;Awesome game that can be played over and over again.
2rockon;-;Countless hours have been lost to this game. Watch out for Gandhi...
ShaquitaChicken;-;This game is my favorite game in my library out of 30-40 games. It will bring endless hours of gameplay and non stop strategical situations that you will have to surpass to be a great leader. Keeps your brain circulating options/ideas and this game will bring stress due to all the situations that come into play. Love this game. classic
[Starbucks]-{Man};-;Over the river, and through the woods, there all my movement points go...
jrk409;-;Very good strategy game and hours of fun with friends and/or family!
Lone;-;Lots of fun, can be replayed infinitely with many different settings and lots of interesting strategies
Redcat;-;Well worth the purchace, loads of replayability. multi player is especially fun
spiffzombie;-;This game is so worth the money. in the past year i have put 250 hrs into the game. 10/10 would do again.
andrewcul;-;I am completely addicted to this game! Would recommend to anyone that enjoys strategy games.
Sidez123;-;So addicting!
PieCakesCookies;-;Long Gameplay but never bores
the_kevinchi;-;Easily one of the best TBS games available
Lomariza;-;Can and will get very addicting if your into Turn-based Strategy as much as I am. Been a fan of the Civilzation series since the first one and cannot ever play this game and not be bored. Very fun especially if you play with friends. Highly recommended.
rage;-;I like this game. It is very fun and time consuming.
Tha Dogg Doctor;-;This game sucks your life away but it is so addicting!
Gatorbear;-;10/10 Would Recomend!
YouEvenLiftBro;-;One of the best game I have ever played. Every match has it own feel to it and you are always longing for one more turn. Progessing through the difficulties is challenging, but rewarding. The DLC is worth every penny, especially BNW. It makes the game nearly perfect. I would recommend this to anyone.
Mystery Mask;-;10/10. Would get nuked by Ghandi again.
mramsey1101;-;One of the most dynamic experiences you can experience. Every time you set up a new game slight differences will change everything. Only one thing remains constant throughout... Ghandi is always a .
The Last Unicorn;-;Dis game is super duper gud play it now
Imabanana;-;Wasted my life 10/10
Emma Genation;-;Make sure to get the DLC, still a bit partial to the older version but this one is winning me over. Slowly. The LAN options need a fix but otherwise a solid sequel to this timeless classic.
BlackRice91;-;I have been playing Civ for many years and I love Civ 5. The whole series is one of my favorites and they just keep getting better and better!
Kosherstars;-;An amazing strategy game that gets you addicted every time!!
toe;-;ultra epic but boring play wit homies or don't play $WAG
Definitely Not A Heretic;-;AM SUPREME LEADER WHAT WRITES THE HISTORY AM BEST SUPREME LEADER IN HISTORY WHY OTHER NATIONS NOT SEE THIS AM CONFUSE OTHER NATION AM PETTY TELL EVERYONE NOT TO TRADE ME SHINY THING BUT SHINY THING VERY IMPORTANT FOR PEOPLE TO HAPPY I BURN OTHER NATION TO GROUND AND TAKE ALL STUFF FOR DARING TO OPPOSE ME THINK WORLD HAS LEARNED LESSON THAT ME AM SUPREME LEADER THAT IS BEST EVER NO. NOW NEW NATION TELL EVERYONE NOT TO TRADE ME SHINY THING WHAT AM IMPORTANT FOR PEOPLE TO HAPPY AM FORCED TO BURN ANOTHER NATION TO GROUND WHY NATION WHY DO THIS WHY
Soaringquail;-;<333 way too addictive
Aerodynamic Panda;-;It's like Civilization IV, only with less I's before their V's.
Alta;-;Would be 10/10 but PolarEclipse won't play with me so 8/10
D O N G E R Z;-;This game is perfect, now go buy it and join me goddammit!
sippin lean;-;You can be north korea... 7/2
Sneaky Columbus;-;So far, so good! Loving this game, it has brought me as much satisfaction as previous titles without a doubt. It's graphicaly pleasing, and has some neat new mechanics. Get the Civilization V Complete Bundle, go ahead and get all of those goodies included! I can't wait to plunge hours upon hours into this myself, you should do the same!
Petersky;-;BEST. GAME. EVER. Enough said.
MUD_TURTLES_88;-;The best.
SexyBalwantSingh;-;The greatest game ever!
Timbobjoefiz;-;this game is amazing!
Lord Denvoros;-;I have played this way way way way way way way way too much. But I don't regret a minute of it.
Brown Booty Ranger;-;this game is great. Love it!!!
RedEagle;-;Do not get this game if you have a short attention span, this is a strategy game that requires a lot of thinking, planning and time.
Edwin;-;The game feels finished, and plays well. It's an improvement over civ 4 in every way, save mutliplayer, which is awful, lacking mod support, animated leader heads, etc. Fleshed out multiplayer would be much appreciated.
Don Don Donuts;-;this is one of the better simulator games out there, accurately representing the hundreds of years it takes to build a dirt road ten kilometres long
Argentum;-;Civ V is the best in the series so far. Definitely one of my favorite games of all time!
Muffin_Annihilator;-;"It's worse than a plane flight"
moosewrath;-;I was deep in prayer when an angel entered my mind space. She was mixed-ethnicity and looked a little bit like a woman that worked at the local Panda Express (lol @ all of you who think that angels are white. God doesn't descriminate against any groups. Read the bible.) "You shall be the pillar of a new civilization.", the angel said. Then she told me her name was Lucy. Lucy Furr. I didn't know what that meant at the time, but COINCIDENTALLY, 6 YEARS LATER, I see that this game is on sale for 75% off. So, I bought it. Now I'm just waiting for a heavenly message to come through this blessed WIndows 8 :)
shak_T <|;-;This is an exceptionally great turn based strategy game. I haven't played many other games like this but it has encouraged me to. I actually hadn't played the other 4 games in the Civilization series and I found getting into the game a bit tricky but with the help of some mates and the wiki I managed to love the game. I ended up creating a relatively awesome empire only to be crushed by a backstabbing 'friend'. So if you're wondering wether to buy this game or not I would recommend you do and buy the DLC Brave New World, it adds so much and makes it so much better. Buy it, get into the game and start up with your friends.
caseybius;-;This is an epic game
LusciousOldMan;-;It's fun.
Alternatehero_;-;Bought this on impulse, having never played game in this genre before. So far I have spent nearly 300 hours plying this awesome game.
Legatus;-;Just... one... more... turn. I'm with the Civ franchiese since Civ I back in the '90. This is simply the most beautiful and easy game of the series. It's like never-ending fun, with so many different strategies and possibilities, you can be sure you won't play the same way twice. Also, many mods. Cool mods. Lots of cool mods like new civs or policies or maps or like everything. And lots of achievements. Also, POLAND CAN INTO SPACE!
ProfileName;-;It has consumed my life... 10/10!
Theaubreau;-;First off, this game is very fun when played with friends. It's still very good with AI though. This game is like a time travel machine. Time goes so fast while playing this game. Just get this.
A_6foot_Bambi;-;possible one of my top games ive ever played
nykid10;-;First things first, my experience with Sid Meier games was virtually nonexistent about a year ago. I downloaded XCOM: Enemy Unkown for my ps3 and loved it! So, it made sense to try out Civilization V. It was highly recommended by some very close friends, and I was not disappointed. Civ V give you the opportunity to lead any of a number of nations throughout history, ranging from the ancient era to the information age. You are expected to create and maintain cities, build your armies, crush your enemies, spy on your opponents and ensure they do not steal your technology, engage in diplomatic relations with other countries and so much more. As the game progresses, your nation is given access to more advanced technology and your world becomes larger as you explore more of it. You can easily lose yourself for hours at a time in this game, and that is a great thing. This game is among the top in my personal gaming collection. It should be in yours too.
JHein23;-;This game is great. I can sit down and spend hours upon hours on each game. Highly recommended!
Jippo;-;One of my All-time favourite games growing up, always seem to come back to it. Here for the Long Run... 10/10
runvus4;-;I first played Civ V back in 2010 on Windows. Then I switched over to Mac and couldn't bring myself to buy it again, especially as the original Mac version was just the Windows version in a WINE type emulator and sucked. After they released the OSX optimized version in March 2014, I couldn't resist getting it again. Much better performance now and not as laggy and graphics. On an iMac 27" at full resolution with high details is not choppy at all, but when scrolling fast it does pause to load the tiles one-by-one. Probably because the iMac I have only has 1gb of memory, not due any limitation of the OSX port. It does run the GPU hot hot hot and kicks the fans up to max still. Running it on a late 2012 Macbook Pro 13" retina got too hot to leave on the lap after half an hour and I could also get the tiles to load one-by-one due to the shared memory archetecture. An old octa-core 2009 Mac Pro with a Radeon 7970 had the PCI fans kick in a little higher but not in max airplane turbine mode. The tiles don't have to load one-by-one as much as the others, but it has 3gb of video memory. Gameplay is still the same addictive turn by turn, but the new-to-me Gods and Kings / Brave New World expansion packs and re-balancing forced a little adjustment my old tactics!
Ma3dia;-;This is an amazing game for anyone looking for a strategically sound empire-builder! Great community, playability, and oodles of fun again and again!
Timmeh__;-;Good turn based strategy game. It passes time very well.
His Highness;-;Pretty standard entry into the Civilization franchise. Lots of cool stuff. DLC is a bit pricey, but its fun to play multiplayer against others. Religion plays an interesting role in this game. The varied methods of winning are also an exciting challenge each in their own way. Gone is the path of pure domination for the most part. This opens up a lot more strategy for the slower paced players. Unfortunately the standard cap on turns till auto-end limits most of the victory conditions from being met by all but the best players.
Herman Mcpootis;-;if you're a fan of strategy games, this is the game you should get. if you have the money, i recommend you buy it.(more fun with mods)
gromszgrad;-;you wont go outside 11/10
thel vadam;-;this is a great game I recommend it for anyone who likes TBS.
Entrenin;-;I've wasted hours on this game, definetly reccomend it!
Nexusaur;-;Ive wasted so much time on this game, sometimes a whole night devoted and just ended up losing...and i loved every minute of it!
MrGreen;-;Although not without its flaws, the game that comes closer to perfection than any other...
TheMaseDog;-;One of the best games I have ever played, you can play it for hours and hours on end.
gorzek;-;Tremendous game, especially with the expansions. I've been a Civ fan since the original. I was initially a Civ V skeptic due to what I'd heard about the new combat model. After spending several games with it, I have to admit it's a real improvement. Armies matter more because they are relatively rare compared to past Civ games--they're resources you need to steward carefully, as they are expensive to build and you can't stack them. The core Civ mechanics are intact. Graphics and sound are superb. Absolutely a worthy iteration to the series that should make long-time fans happy. If you're new to the series, this is a great jumping-on point. The controls are explained as you go and not hard to learn. Each turn, you're told what's available for you to do or worry about, so you don't miss any critical cues. Even so, the game provides a substantial challenge with different difficulty levels and a good online experience.
x294500;-;It's going to sap your time like no other. <3
keLLen;-;This game is the ultimate time vacuum, you will get stuck in the endless "just one more turn".
Owen;-;There is no reason not to get this game.
Swiggityswooty;-;This game has made me hate life, HOW ON EARTH CAN THE FRENCH EMPIRE SURVIVE 5 NUKES AND NOT RAISE THE WHITE FLAG? 10/10 REALISM
Carlos [Red Toast];-;Definitely will spend your life on this.
yomads;-;3 words - BEST GAME EVER
Thomas;-;10/10 would play again
Jarrold;-;Friend gained one useless piece of land in the middle of my territory, Nuked his country 700 years later. 10/10
The Bear;-;This has better battle parameters, diplomacy and character personalities.
Lukeulele;-;Really cool strategic game!
A Classy Oil Rig.;-;Addicting, you'll keep saying one more turn then next thing you know the games over and your starting another one.
Sauron;-;Ever get tired of being an average Joe? When you're playing this game you're a god-king-general, you have the option of creating ever lasting world peace...or a scorched earth.
db_kck;-;From the beginning, there were several things missing to make Civilization 4 the more superior game, with all of the added expansions and DLC, coming from someone who has wasted thousands of hours on the Civilization series...I much prefer Civilization 5 to the others now. This is the closest it's going to get to managing an empire, forging a large group of people the way you want and almost everything about them. There is a large learning curve but I assure you, if you get past the initial bump you will amass countless and countless amount of hours as I have in to this beautiful game. I reccomend this to any one even remotely interested in strategy games, or games of the slower nature. I do not recomend this to anyone who is impatient by nature.
Jimmorrello;-;I dub thee "Time Eater"
LukeVC;-;I have only had this game for a few weeks and cant get enough of it. ONE MORE TURN
Shlorpus Dinglethorpe;-;This game is the best time sink I've ever stumbled upon
DapperDespot;-;I didn't think I had time for another Civ game, but then I just stopped sleeping. Or socializing. Problem solved.
Keakealani;-;Civ V was my first turn-based strategy game, and my first Civilization series game, and on both counts, I couldn't be happier. The strategy is compelling and detailed, with many options and playstyles available. The variety of bonuses and unique units available to each civilization allows for a great deal of replay value, and randomized elements in the maps and AIs contribute to a fresh start with every game. There are some downsides, however. Although one of the biggest draws to Civ V is the complex and highly variable strategy options, the AI programming leaves much to be desired, as an AI simply cannot account for the many different levels of strategy needed to achieve victory. As such, the difficulty settings feel somewhat lackluster, as they simply give the AI greater and greater early advantages, leading to a very different gameplay at high levels compared to a truly "even playing field". Combat, like with many games, is clunky and time-consuming, and although there are elements of strategy and maneuvering, it can be boiled down into essentially a numbers game of tech and manpower, rather than true strategic prowess. Multiplayer is also less than ideal, particularly in a mixed human/AI environment, as AI features are severely nerfed or nonexistent. In terms of fluff, I find the pseudo-historical theme to be a huge benefit, as I'm just enough of a history/linguistics/geography nerd to find it interesting, but not condescending or painfully inaccurate. (The "alternate history" line allows for a lot of freedom, when of course the game will not reflect a real-life history.) Ultimately, though, I've sunk many, many hours into this game and I can see myself continuing to play well into the future. Especially considering the price is quite reasonable for comparable game quality and style, I would recommend this game to anyone who likes strategy, history, or just having a good time. I particularly recommend it as a solo game - for those of us who don't care for online multiplayer, Civ V is by far the most rewarding single-player Steam title I've come across.
chandlerpl;-;Civilizations 5 is an amazing game! I would reccomend this game to everyone, it might be hard to start of with but once you know what your doing you will have a lot of fun. Its also got multiplayer so you can play with friends. I've got 67 hours on record of this game and still haven't got bored of playing it.
Mats;-;Each game can take upwards of 6 to 8 hours but you WILL remember your empire days, weeks, even months after you finished the match.
Mark is Ehrett;-;I bought this game recently and already sunk nearly 200 hours into it.. Amazingly well structured sim.
Suren Cao;-;Love playing the ruler over people, then grab Civilization V. Continues to be a great series of games!
Propellergator;-;I was gonna go to work, but then I played Civ 5 10/10
xomm;-;solid game with approachable curve, but needs DLC to achieve same levels of depth as previous games
Flamestryker;-;Excellent game! kept me and my friends going for hours!
Big Boss;-;If you like your Social Life, don't get it. 100000000000000000000000000/10 would lose all my friends again
HeroicWinston;-;y yu no make hotseat multiplayer, still a great game tho.....
Dude with the face;-;Civ V is like most other Civ games but with better graphics and more streamlined features. If you like any of the Civ games you will most certainly enjoy this one.
TheMadMentalist;-;this is possibly one of the best turn based strategy games ive played. and its reallyt easy to get into so you do not have to play the previous civlization games to play civ 5. its 10/10 from me
FFF Inquisition;-;Spent and hour and thirty minutes trying to set up a game with 8 other friends, finally clearing the pregame lobby the game crashed for everyone -Awards Awarded- Best time i've spent in a lobby Recognized the true meaning of friendship as we didn't need a game to have fun Single Player is great tho 10/10
[TTRO] MooChaqaman;-;New to Civ? Play Civ 5!
Sactic;-;Civ 5 is the best 4X game ever made, better then even the great civ 5. Not only does it look great it feels and plays great. Get the BNW and GK to make it even better! Who doesen't want to be gandhi and take over the world? I would also suggest you play it with friends since back stabbing your "friends" never felt so good. I give it a 8.5/10 and a 9.5/10 if you got some of the dlc like BNW and GK.
dutchboy_ingwi;-;this game could be one of the the reasons crime rates have gone down while obesity rates go up.
Serodopa;-;This is addictive fun, get it. Especially during exams.
Heavily Weeded;-;It is ever so addictive.
ThatGuyInYourHouseSoTurnAround!;-;Great
Balanse;-;As a mind games lover i highly reccomend this game even if you one of the people who dont love looking up for many tutorials and guides to play a game. this game briliant once you play it you cant get enought as some one who made more then 10 saves atleast and still every new game is more crazy then the other just the felling from making your first city with one population all the way to a huge empire with an advanced army. i highly reccomend this game to everyone no metter what types of game you love action,adventure or any other type this game is fun for everyone.
Celsius [Meninist];-;This game never ends and is very addicting first game set it to random lasted 15hrs totaly worth the buy but i'd say till it goes on sale so you can buy all the dlc and the game cheaply
magweed;-;good game would play 10/10
Corkaz;-;When I first played Civ V vanilla, I counldn't get into but once I decided to invest into the two expansions (G+K & BNW) im really enjoying it and having an awesome time with it. I would definetly recommened getting this along with its expansion to make the experience of playing this more enjoyable and exciting. This will go down as one of my fav civ and strategy games of all time.
Trogg;-;Don't play with friends, they'll stab you in the back as soon as you start winning.
Sliefox;-;Anyone who is any kind of strategy player this is a must have. WIth the seemingly limitless mods and ways to play you can't go wrong. Very easy to sink hundereds of hours into this game without even realizing it. This game is a must have for everyone.
gtapete;-;With Brave New World this game is very good!
Cyanide_Impact;-;Great strategy game and worth playing
TK SWAGGER;-;Fun and addicting
Jewggernaut;-;It's like middle school all over again; the bullies take your lunch money and your only nerdy friend wins all the chicks in the end.
SePPiE;-;Just.... One.... More... Turn.....
mishagator57;-;great game, also it is a great time waster. in a good way :)
Jacklaster;-;it is amazing
Dazuam;-;Totally worth the price tag, one of the best strategy games I've played.
<corrupt_%data>;-;Civilization V is a great turn based strategy game. The music is phenomenal, no matter how long I listen to it (and Ive listened to it for hundreds of hours, literally), and the atmosphere is amazing. 2K games has supported this game for years now, releasing content and expansion packs ontop of an already amazing game. (I especially love 2K games for adding another unit in one of the expansion packs called the XCOM squad, directly from their other game XCOM: Enemy Unknown (also a great game!) As further incentive the steam workshop allows you to conveniently download custom mods to further your enjoyability of this great game. If you think turn based games arent for you, and that you prefer RTS's or dont even enjoy strategy games at all, I beg you to pick this up! I didnt even find strategy games all that great until I picked this up, and now they are a reoccurring theme in my steam library. Play this game and you might be hooked for life, like me:)
Serge;-;When I was young I couldn't really get into turn based strategy because it felt like it took forever to do anything fun. As the Civ series has progressed, they've made it not only easier for newbies to get into, they've also made the pacing very flexible, allowing you to play at whatever speed you prefer (still turn-based, of course). This game is a brilliant way to spend a few hours/days/weeks. Be warned, when you start a game, you will experience the time travel effect!
TheOptionalOath;-;I'll just play for an hour... look at the clock twelve hours have passed you've missed work and for the last thirty turns you've been telling yourself one more turn and THEN I'll go to the bathroom.
Setzera;-;10 / 10 I have to say, watching reviews, gameplay videos and trailers, heck even watching a friend of mine play it.. I didn't think it was that good. Especially being a veteran of Total War: Shogun 2, I figured the battles were way too basic and would drag the whole game down. Well.. I was wrong.. This is one of those games that has a ton of customization options to fit any type of play, short, long, easy, hard. It's a game that you literally will keep saying "one more turn". So very addicting, and even more so if you play with friends. For a game with 6 or 12 players online, and 6 player offline hotseat (co-op fully supported) on a single machine.. this game is one of the best games I've ever played, and I've played games since Atari 2600. I highly recommend this to any strategy or micromanage gamer. The feature set is so strong, and this game just completely sucks you in. My only regret was not getting it a year sooner when it was on sale for the same price.
Rage Bear;-;WOW! What can I say about this game? First its so addictive you lose track of time, I would advise getting the DLC Gods & Kings and Brave New World because this is what makes the game and It has great replay value. 9/10
ScottDark00;-;This game is great. This is for anyone looking for that good turn based stratagy game. I am a huge fan of the series, and the AI on this game are intelligent. They will attack if they see weakness, so you are constantly on your toes.
One-Fifty-One;-;one of the best Strategy games on the market, if you have alll day to kill or just a few hours it can be a lot of fun.
Fre2Doom;-;Good old civ.
Qilv;-;The fluidity and addictive nature of this game really made me feel comfortable as a first time strategy game player. A must buy. Unless you value your social life.
JunnuW;-;One of the best turn based strategy games. (remember not only war strategy). Fun to play, expecially with friends. But a word of warning. really heavy on the processor in the late game. atleast on MP hybrid mode. (my advice use standard turns in MP too). Helps a bit... So if you like turn based strategy were you dont have to kill everybody play this. Brave new world makes it lot better !
Pudding Face;-;This is simply a master piece, with unlimited replay value and outstanding complexity, this game could just be the end of all other games.
demnotch2;-;I enjoy this game very much, sadly it makes the hours fly by without notice. Multiple ways to win with diversification on the races. Plenty to try with great replayability.
Apex;-;Great game with unlimited potential, easy installation on mods, and i got the gold edition GNK for only 15 Dollars!
FabulousHippo7;-;An amazing game. The expansions make this game greater but the base game works just fine. When getting this game realise games take a long time to complete. Overall great way to waste time, 10/10
DogBoyGenius;-;A lot like Cory in the House.
10lb. Tuna;-;The Best Game, The Olny Game
menaxa;-;great game!
Hayate;-;Great strategy game if you like turn based games that allows you the choice between different victory types. More fun when played against human players as opposed to the AI in my opinion as the predictability is much lower but there are a large number of options and player mods to help change the game up if it starts to feel a bit stale. A really good pick up if you can catch it in a sale for around 5 - 10.
Aventual Disaster;-;Its fun. What more do you want.
JETST0RM97;-;Amazing game. Never ceases to show me new ways to play. Just watch who you play with. If one of your friends seem like a power hungry, violent , don't play with them.
Robb Stark;-;This game is beast.
A Slightly Mouldy Sandwich;-;This game is amazing. Complex at first, the game has a good tutorial that explains the main concepts. The game has lots of layers and multiple ways to win, either through, science, culture, and diplomacy, or war and domination. This enables you to not always crush everyone, but to be diplomatic or be more cultural/scientific. Your social policies can give you edges in certain areas of your Civilization, and often one thing is connected to another. More science research means better army which leads to more diplomatic power and so on. Only negatives are that sometimes the worker automation does not work and that one game can take days to finish. Multiple characters and DLC enable endless replayability without the game becoming boring. Overall, a great game.
ZedZ;-;Yes much fun wow would play much cheap
BM3West;-;I suppose I should write a review for the game I've put the most hours into. I am writing this after the release of both expansions. For the people with Civ IV vs V debates, I can understand why people disliked Civ V over IV at first. The Civ series has gradually improved itself to Civ IV, and then Civ V is a total overhaul of the game. A hex grid board instead of squares, one military unit per tile (no more stacks of doom), and a simplification of the UI. All of these things are a blessing, with the exception of the AI doesn't really know how to control it's military properly (it has been noticablely improved though). Also, Civ V (vanilla) didn't have religion or espionage, so why move on to Civ V? (imo) Civ V is better than IV after Gods & Kings, and definitely better after Brave New World. Thanks to the one unit per hex system, Civ V feels more like a wargame than the ones before it. And I like the change for how religion is used in V better than IV, which was really just a research rush for the tech that unlocked that religion. The best part about the BNW expansion is that the peaceful victories have become just as fun throughout the legnth of the game as conquest. The cultural victory used to just be to get your culture buildings up quick, beeline radio and sit there and hit end turn until you win. Now, you can go to war and steal great works of art from a rival civ, send in archaeologists to take artifacts out of their lands, and send in great musicians to tourism bomb them in the hopes of influencing their citizens to your culture. This game is endlessly replayable. Even if you play on a preset map, like Earth, the actions taken by other civs is always unpredicable. Basically what it comes down to is, I love this game. I would recommend it to anybody, but I guess if you're the impatient type, then you might not like it. My arguement to that would be, every turn in this game has something important happen (except maybe the first few), and that is why my hours are over 500 (at the time of this writing). It is addicting to watch your mud hut village with spearmen grow into an empire of gleaming metropolises that is capable of launching nukes. Even when you finish the game it gives you the option for "one.. more.. turn.."
Unspecial K;-;Washington should have conquered the world IRL.
hK;-;It is possible that you disliked Vainilla Civ5. But trust me on this, after 2 expansions the game has become a truly masterpiece.
Ransomvik;-;holy crap this is awesome
N7_Sire;-;This game is great and is fun to play with friends.
MilkAndLettuce;-;Expertly balances the grand majesty of human accomplishment with the cartoonish evil of nuking Mahatma Ghandi into the stone age.
JoeJoeMoJoe361;-;Great game
nikita698;-;i like the game very much, is realistic and enjoyable. 9.5/10
Dimpivle Snorts;-;Dude I give this game a 10/10. Amazing strategy game and lots of fun in single player, coop multiplayer, and vs. multiplayer.
Noxah13;-;Fantasmic Game, So many hours logged
FTM.Hatsune Miku;-;games last for hours one of my games has lasted 17 hours and still is going
WILL THROW FOR SKINS;-;Apparently unicorns aren't a resource for happiness... 1/10.
MuhuhS;-;Pick Babylon go pottery -> writing -> Great library. GEEE GEEE
squablyScientist;-;This is an amazing, immersive game
TheReverseBrother;-;I enjoy endless hours of fun on it and would recommend people to buy it. Definatly worth the price i paid for it. The expansion packs add a lot to the game as well.
dUKE;-;Civ 5 is the last in the series of the civ 5 games, a turn-based empire building game. A lot of fun as long as you have the patience and get the statisfation of building a nation and dominate the world. >:D
MagicBinaryCode;-;This game is very addicting. I have played many times and I still feel that I have not done everything there is to do on this game. If you like to think and plan, this is the game for you.
RezLar;-;Great Turn Based Strategy Game
Zink [PC is rip];-;This game is a bit hard to master, but once you get into it you can spend hours having fun pillaging, trading, exploring, or doing whatever. I strongly reccomend this game, and i'll give it a solid 9.5/10 Also also also, buy Gods and Kings, and the other DLC's, adds alot of fun content
Scientific Pretzel;-;I love this game. It has an awesome soundtrack, great mod support, and really addicting gameplay
wetterfree;-;It is a great way to spend your hours of uselessness
log1 (Rodolfo);-;A fresh next gen take on the classic that shaped PC gaming on earth, this is a beast of a game, no single human born after the 90's can say it never heard of sid mier's CIV game... To review this i would need some 2 history books and a couple of pages....
Grolsh Premium Lager;-;Its an awsome strategy game if you ask me
Sir Tadmos;-;This game is rather exquisite. It inspires me to raise an army and conquer the world with brute force. Thank you for your time.
jmart0325;-;Full of Entertainment, best thing is that every game is different.
what is love;-;bichass game 10/10
Strayed;-;This is a absoloutsly fantastic strategy game, the best of its kind. Extremely, Highly Reccomended.
T-Beaun;-;This game didn't cure my virginity :(
H34DL3ZZ;-;Goog game, but soooo confusing for new players
Cpt.Carruthers;-;A really craking game that doesn't stop entertaining. Truly remarkable.
Theeb;-;One more turn...
Theoden;-;Not as good as CIV IV. But CIV IV is one of the world's best tactic games and not many games are better than it. Civilization V is something new and special. There are new buildings, soldiers and diplomatic possibilities. When you've played it for some hours you know how it works and you can use the many different tools to become the biggest civilization ever.
Raigenkajun;-;A great statergy game, and througly addictive.
Zlegoguy;-;Great game for the RTS user.
Turned-Bull;-;Civ V is a good game if your into strategy and all that
Wolfy;-;It's good, but this game will just eat up all of your time.
humananchor;-;Combat is better than IV but everything else is a little less fun. From what I understand BNW really makes this the game it is supposed to be. It is still a great game though.
chiefs3;-;How many hours have I lost? What year is it? Why is my underwear solid? These are all questions I ask myself when I finish playing a game of Civ 5 and all of it is worth the pain of 100 asleep buttocks. Seriously though this game is great and worth every penny you could pick up and through at it.
Si;-;I've logged almost 500 hours in this game. Best Civ so far.
Bolamuch;-;One of the most addicting games ever.
DoubleYoricks;-;I'm not a huge strategy player, but this one hooked me. I cannot reccommend this game if you plan on doing anything with your life other than playing it. The hours vanish when you start it up.
-(|RG-A|)- Comrade Marine Sanic;-;Basicly it's like Paper please, but it's not 10/10 Paper please is good game
GreenPlasticSpoon;-;Sid Meier's Civilzation V is one of the best stratagy games I have ever seen. And I am not the only one who thinks that. Mulitple players and IGN said the same thing. Civ V is a turned based game where you try to conquer your entire map. But if that seems too hard you can either; be the first to space, have 5 diplomacies, research everything or have the most points when 2050 comes around. You play one of many famous conquers in history and try to build a civilization that will stand the test of time. If you don't want to do this alone, you dont have to! You can make helpful city-state (random civilization) become your ally and they will reward you by sending you gifts of gold, resources or even army units. If that is not what you thought I meant by "not alone" don't worry, you can play with other people and take down or befriend their civilzation. -fiddlesticks 9/10 review
[MNI] RB | Rasputin;-;Do I recommend this game. Hell yes. This is one of the greatest games I have played and playing it with friends is even more fun. You can choose from many civilizations from the Aztecs to Russia and almost anyone else you can think of. So in total. Yes I would reccoment this game to anyone and everyone.
nopr;-;Civilization has ruined, and continues to ruin, my life. Would recommend.
Rich;-;One more turn? Am I right? Lol
Warlord Gandhi;-;Ciiv 5 is a great game for those who wish to become a warmongering menace to the rest of the world. Fight your enemies, sack their cities and enslave their population... *ahem* I mean ask them nicely to join you....in the name of peace of course! ....NAH! Just kidding! Rampage through their territory and when they ask for peace, extend to them the warm glow brought only by a nuclear missile! Remember kids, my words are backed by nuclear weapons! I'm Warlord Gandhi and I approve this message!
ThreeDoge;-;Certainly a fun game. It is fabulous to declare war with everyone on the first turn and win the game. Add some friends into the mix for more awesome. I would NOT recommend this game to someone who is not patient. Games take upwards of 3+ hours to complete on average.
ryel97;-;I purchased this game for me and a friend, we went on multiplayer and it was feckin' awesome. This game will never get old and can be played over and over again for endless hours of fun.
stool;-;DON'T TRUST GHANDI
Moon Moon (Winter);-;I highly recommend this game. The graphics are awesome and the gameplay is so open that you can run any civ how you want (although some strategies are more effective than others with certain factions). The game allows for so much variation between individual games and you will never play the same match twice because of random starting points and different civs that you face.
Srrin;-;What can I say, Pew Pew! Let's go to war, or not. Your choice.
Gabriel;-;ing Caesar...ALWAYS there to  thing up...for  sake, i just trespass your land once...!!!!!
Nuns Of Anarchy;-;its good
Dax Strife;-;Only get if you like turn-based strategy games that can make hours disappear from your day.
L.;-;I have not played many hours of Civ 5. But I would like to give my intial thoughts and views on this game. I would like to start by comparing this game to a Board game. Think Catan with a little bit of risk moved in. Now that you can view it as this, now add in a little of Age Of Empires. This is a turned based version of these games.(Board games are usually turned based) The atmosphere is great and the initail game I played had me stuck for 6 hours straight. This game is very good as it keeps you stuck in for the long haul. The Objectives in the game are great as there is more than one way to win: -You can build a giant army and march across the battlefeild crushing your enemys. -Going the cultural root and increasing your artistic side of the city. This gives the game varity and replayability. The diffrent races/world leaders you can choose from also gives the game a great uniqueness that allows for hours of gameplay. There is no story there is just advance you civilisation (5) to the best point by researching diffrent things and building unique buildings from throughout History. There is a multiplayer that I have not yet delved into. I believe the multiplayer would increase the game time by at least another 2-3 hours. I have an estimation that each game on normal of about 6-8 hours. This game takes some thinking and a few of the actions take a while to figure out. This game is very good at explaining what you have to do to learn how to play. From what I have played so far, I would say this is a very great game and has given me the longest single sitting in anygame I have played in for a very very long time. Well worth a look. (At the time of this review, The game and the dlc is avalible on humblebundle.com for $15 as well as some other games.)
Levityan the First Blood;-;THE BEST STRATEGY GAME I HAVE EVER ENCOUNTERED
TheWeeabooWarrior;-;Awesome game, Can turn some the coolest civilizations upside down. Like Native americans building the pyrimids
Pen Tool;-;Ok, I must say I am hooked! This game has interesting gameplay and every single round you play is different. I did not take the tutorial *facepalm* BUT because of the advisors I really didn't have to! I learned how to play the game by, playing it! The only downside I have with this game is the length of time it takes to play a full game. My first victory took me 700+ moves and over 8 hours of play to win. Also it is the game of publicly denouncing, no matter what you do, you will get denounced. Become friends with a city state someone else is friends with, denounced. Take over 1 city state, denounced. Look at someone the wrong way, denounced. Overall a fun game! Overall this game gets an 11/10 from me! Oh and 1 more thing, Julius Caesar is one greedy dude, watch out.
El Jambie;-;Fantastic game, gave me a very bad case of one-more-turn-itis.
Juicetinian;-;Literally the best gaming experience for those with any appreciation for history. This game gives you the ability to rewrite the history of a new world, possesing an industrious nation state/classical empire of your choice. You have the ability to persue a victory in cultural supremacy, scientific achievement, diplomatic popularity, raw conquest, or a tally of points at the end of the year 2050 AD. Every civilizations' unique abilities, units, buildings, or tile improvements correlate accurately to history, and the way that civilization gained power in our world usually ends up it's strong suit in the alternate multiverse created with each game of civilization 5. 10/10 by far worth anyone's time.
Spudgetical;-;Great turned based strategy. Good fun with multiplayer - but expect a chess like game, rather than full on action. Very addictive and replayable.
Gordon Freechdogg;-;Speaking from the perspective of someone who's never played the earlier Civilization games here. The stories about Civ 5 being a great time sink are incredibly true, but I find myself somewhat hard pressed to start up a new game after sinking a lot of time into my first game. Just don't expect to be able to please everybody, and don't expect to be able to do all there is to do in a single campaign, and you should do just fine.
Shark;-;>implying that grinding every other civilization off the face of the earth then salting their lands as you suppress riots and famines in your homeland with armor rolling off the lines and pollution choking the skies isn't the best way to win every game.
DelilahFive;-;This is possibly one the best games I've ever played in my life, the modding community is brillaint and i've spent more than 339 hours playing it... Do I recommend it? Hell yeah!
Shrimpy;-;i love this game, so addictive, so real
Izak;-;Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn... Just One More Turn...
stilgar;-;Civilization has been one of my favourite games since 1994. I've spent hundreds of hours with Civilization 1, which for me was much better than sequels, I never quite liked the way 2, 3 or 4 were made. But 5 is different, and for me it's a worthy successor of Civ1. With God&Kings and A Brave New World expansions, it's tons of fun to play.
Unofficial;-;Its fun but has a ton of achievements and long games. I suggest a guick game which can be chosen in set up game. The first difficulty is really easy and I suggest starting on a higher difficulty like 3.
Roasty McToasty;-;Civ has got to be one of the best strategy games I've ever tried. Turn-based and played on a hexagonal field, a bit like a board game, but the special rules in Civ make you think twice before doing anything. One part of the game that I love is how you get to control every little aspect of your Civ; from research and military, to social policies (Communism!) and construction. Another great thing is that there is a BIG selection of different Civs, each with their own unique units and/or buildings and traits, from across time to choose from; such as 18th century America, 1st century Rome, 9th century Denmark, and many more, with another chunk being added with the Gods and Kings expac, such as 17th century Sweden. Also has a f*cking great soundtrack. My conclusion: if you are into other turn-based strategy games, such as Total War, but want en exciting twist, try Civilization 5.
supreme chinese worker;-;great game full of fun 9/10
The Magnificent Bastard;-;great strategy game
Zulthar;-;Great game, one that can always be replayed and doesn't get repetetive, some aspects of the game are infuriating at points but once you get past them the game reaches a point of unparalleled enjoyment
Monopolization;-;this is the best game the only game
TrapLord;-;Very fun game if you like strategy games. DON'T TRUST ANYONE! haha
foolbaar;-;A game that lasts long
Nobaddy;-;It's pretty fantastic
Maw2812;-;a very good game with the dlc's
PIGGEH;-;Very amazing game, though falls a bit short against Civ 4
pineapplefun101;-;"I'll just play a quick game" - Said no one ever
Gloindir;-;I have been playing this series since Civ 1 back in on my Amiga 5oo days in the early 90s and if you are into world/civ building strategy titles in any way, shape or form, games just won't come better than this masterpiece, It is immensely fun, totally addictive and returns great value for your money. Worth noting is that I have exclusively played vanilla (with the exceptance of purchased official DLC) single player vs AI for Civ 5 (i.e. no MP at all) , but judging by previous experiences from earlier titles in the series, I dare guess that MP is even more fun and challenging. Add to this the plethora of user created mods via steamworks and you have an almost endless source of digitalized entertainment!! :-) This comes highly recommended as a game with the almost perfect mix of theme, ambience, game mechanics and outright addictive fun.
Andy Chen;-;This game is completely addicting - I would recommend it to ANYONE who enjoys RTS games of any kind. It just reels you in, keeps you going, and makes you NOT want to stop for ANYTHING!
Skilax11;-;Very fun and addicting to play with friends
Fazzie;-;This game is a game. A good game.
Corthlan;-;It's really quite a fun game. You can choose whether to make it fast games or epic long games. plus the modding community seems pretty large.
lewie;-;If you've ever wanted to be Ghandi, build the Great Wall of China in the middle of Africa, or blow the  out of George Washington with a Nuclear bomb, you should play this game.
Dad;-;The amount of content available in this game is ing insane, the addiction factor is up there with the best games out there and it never feels like a chore, best casual strategy game out there up to this date. 10/10
The Leftovers;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V never ceases to amaze me with its content. With the sheer variety of customization options, every single game is different. There are so many ways to play as essentially any past civilization you could imagine, that it is surely my favorite game of all time.
kosherhouse;-;The latest Instalment in the Civilization series number Five sees the biggest changes in the established format. The game is based on an entirely new game engine with hexagonal tiles instead of the square tiles of earlier games. The combat system has been overhauled, removing stacking of military units and enabling cities to defend themselves by firing directly on nearby enemies. Computer controlled City-States are a new feature which allows you to befriend and trade with, if the neighbouring A.I. is not offering trade due to them panicking over your troop build up on yours and their border. The DLC - God's and Kings adds Religion and Espionage features that were already in Civilization IV, but strangely left out of the base Civ V game. Coming from previous Civilizations takes a little getting used to but overall this is a solid outing. 8 and half out of 10 kiwifruit.
Bongo^ `;-;awesome but takes a long time to load!
GeneralApathy;-;Just like in real life, people in this game hate me for no disernable reason! 9th grade all over again! Except throwing spears instead acusations and supicions about my sexual oriantation. 10/10 great low self esteem simulator
DubVenom;-;Great game 10/10
snowingheart;-;OMG YES Strategy fan? You will LOVE this game. OK, it's a different take than the fast paced Age of Empires or the bazing fast Starcraft, but even though the combat is not challenging, you do need to think your movements through before executing, or you'll find yourself in a pesky situation. It's fun that it's history-oriented, but it's kinda irrelevant in my opinion. You just have to know what kind of buffs you get from each civ and pick your victory route. The AI tends to not be quite friendly but that keeps things interesting if you can't find people to play with (and let's face it, the games are loooong, so it's rather hard to coordinate with other humans :P). Great game!
Flotilla;-;You'll easily get a few dozen hours of playtime out of this, if you like strategy games. Definitely recommend it.
Spells;-;Great game worth money
Shadedthoughts;-;I believe with enough friends, an online match would be amazing
tasty serving of;-;Who needs drugs when civ V will make you feel like an addict for alot cheaper
mrbopnpop;-;Really cool game, worth the money. Get it if you like intense strategy.
xanmander7;-;i love this game i just wish its gold edition came with all the dlcs
nothing;-;cool game
sahara1512;-;This is one of the best games ever!!!
RedRipz - Bingo;-;Mint.
Silver Samurai;-;Free from GMG / Golden Joysticks, but this little gem has seen more playtime than anything else the last few weeks...
XCOM Agent: K;-;I gave horses to Rome and died
YungBlubber;-;this stuff is good. i like this stuff
[niridio];-;Cool game but enemy calculations take a little long thus it gets lenghy if u play with lot of ai ... the difficulty settings seem a bit easy
denuoweb;-;Online games get kicked and don't last but otherwise it is good game for sure!
Cs;-;A very addicting strategy game. Very fun in singleplayer as well as multiplayer. Definitely a great game for anybody who has a bit of time on their hands. :)
BobbyBlackBelt;-;Great game, lots of fun and very addictive. Expect a massive drop in your productivity from the moment you've first booted the game.
Hero;-;this is game for people which loved ruled the world!
RavenStag;-;Perfect for the war mongering menace within us
Stevelisk;-;This game is awesome , cause its the only game that i can torture and enslave people in order toi make ING ARMIES AND FACTORIES AND  EVERYONE CAUSE MY TOWN IS MILITARY BASED . ING EPIC with tankes and  and VIKING BERSERKERS . IM STEVE THE DEAMON AND I APPROVE THIS MESSAGE !
That Nigga Meech;-;Who needs to waste their time on real life things when you can become the king of the ing planet?
Freddy;-;This game is a time machine. Be careful. On multiple occasions while playing I was flung several hours forward in time but perceived none of it. It's like those stories people tell you about having missing hours in their life. Driving home from work and all of a sudden you're home and can't remember anyhitng at all about the trip back. They could have sworn the just turned the key, and now they're in their driveway. Yeah same thing here. I start the game at 9PM. I make like 4 moves and it's 4AM all of sudden. 's crazy, man.
ChickenNoodleTime;-;a suprisingly good game one of the best i have played in a very long time
meridian;-;click cities n
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
Sorry;-;Fantastic game, I strongly reccomend you purchase the expansion packs however. The game feels incomplete without them.
aerolen;-;This game makes me lose track of time
Trouble;-;Addictive and fun especially if you have someone to play with! I recommend this for anyone over 12, it is educational and teaches strategy. My whole family enjoys playing together.
anthracite coal;-;This game is super complicated and hard to learn but it's fun so there's that.
nydac98;-;Love this game to pieces. Only reason I haven't played it more is because I got a new computer and I can't be bothered to install it. :/
mirrorgleam;-;This is one of my all time favorite games. However, (please observe this warning) this game is like crack. if you have something you have to do in the next couple hours like sleep, work, take care of a child, really anything that requires you to have some track of what time it is DO NOT START A GAME! Personal example and reason I'm in the dog house: Came home after work around 10pm kissed the wife ate dinner decide to play a little civ v around 1030pm. Wife went to bed I started playing. Lost track of time and became extremely engrossed in the game, the progression of my civilization, which technology I should research next, Ghandi just nuked me so now I must exact revenge, Ghandi is gone now who is next on my list. Next thing I know my wife comes in the room and says "ARE YOU REALLY STILL PLAYING! THE KID WILL BE AWAKE IN 2 HOURS AND YOU HAVE TO GO TO WORK IN 6 HOURS! WHAT THE HELL IS WRONG WITH YOU!" My first reaction was there is no way I've been playing for 7 hours! I checked the time and sure enough it had gotten way out of hand. Just remember to keep a clock somewhere nearby and within view if you are planning on playing this game!
Avery;-;it's like Skyrim but with civilizations
Your Pal Stalin;-;Awesome Game! Very Addictive.
Draigh Rehadyn;-;Too many hours in this game. Just one more turn ;)
nfries71;-;Pretty good game.
mconnor3;-;It's addicting. Delete it from your computer before you flunk college.
TOMP!;-;The true benchmark for Turn-Based Strategy.
Imperiledthree;-;Civilization V is a very slow paced game that can take days to complete. Singleplayer is one of the most boring experiences I have had in a game. Grab a few friends to play with and this is a solid 8/10. Very few glitches I found and tons of replayability. For those Casual gamers out there, this is the way to go. Building your Empire or knocking others down, this is the best Empire building game out there. Solo Rating: 4/10 Multiplayer Rating: 8/10
despotak;-;The most accessible grand strategy out right now.
Dr. Crab;-;I found Civ5 much like I did the others in the series: once I got the expansion packs, the experience became so much better. This game is nothing short of addictive.
[D.I.C.K.S.] Your Senpai;-;Best game ever. Until you cry when the AIs or your mates started to war on you, for resources or land.
TechDevil;-;Warning, this game can seriously damage your avalible free time.
Bradicus;-;This is an absolutely magnaflorious game, nuff said, BUY IT
papapyro;-;Great game, very replayable. Definitely worth it, and it's on sale, so if you're thinking of buying it, don't think twice and get it!
Mara de Jess;-;Fun game. Spent many hours playing.
Spracky;-;Its an amazing game with a large modding community. If you haven't got this game, you should get it when onsale.
CaptainZachSparrow;-;Fantastic, strategic gameplay. An immersive learning curve gets you into the game early, and you can't help but play until you're the last nation standing.
Zaun Darksword;-;Great game, fun to paly with a group of friends.
High Lord Akkarin;-;I love playing this game, i would highly recomend it to anyone who has alot of time, its very addaicting!
coolj006;-;Game is a lot better now bugs are sorted and dlc released
PouffySubset;-;This game is amazing!
Dr.Rockzo;-;Honestly, if you are fan of Stategy games, CIV 5 is for you. Bots can actually be a challenge sometimes, but by far the most enjoyable way to play CIV is with friends. A huge selection of Civilizations to choose from, all with their own perks and specials. Game mechanics make sense to the idea of the game - To lead a Civilization throughout history. Better yet, like many steam games, the workshop for this game is great. Makes it just that much more replayable.
Why u heff to be mad??;-;Best Gandhi nuking simulator out at the moment. ++ Can nuke the Gandhi ++ Addicting -- Gandhi can nuke you
Vandrash;-;Excellent strategy game for beginners and veterans alike. Eight difficulty levels allow players to fine-tune their difficulty levels, and user created maps/civ packages allow for ridiculous replayability. Excellent community on the web for single player and multiplayer. DLC is reasonably priced and goes on sale often. Firaxis could patch balance issues a little more frequently, but it's still pretty balanced for the most part.
Wally Beetles;-;The game itself is amazing. You add the expansions, which add even MORE content, it just makes a great time killer while having fun at the same time.
Bree Valentine;-;Ghandi is a mass murderer in Civ 5, a game in which you sit around for 30 turns to make a single building. It's a fun game but even on the fastest setting makes "casual" a thing of the past, watch your armies crumble to shreds, your villages pillaged and destroyed, and learn to hate everyone around you today, In civilization 5.
Zeonic Muppet;-;Nothing beats taking over the world
SaneSational;-;Hey you! Yeah you! Don't sit there all like "I don't really like strategy games" because you haven't played this beast of a ing game! You could literally forget about your real boring life and become muthaing Queen Elizabeth and go  up Greece if you want to! (We all know Caesar was secrectly gay right?) Or what about that Ghengis Khan ?! Who the  does he think he is right? Right! Go  him up then and stop wasting time! GO, GO FORTH!
ayy lmao;-;So much customisation and units to choose from, different era's and leaders , different game lengths and different maps! Epic game overall!
Dr. Pikkuk;-;Brave New World is a very good expansion, higly recomended
ScotchCat;-;Possibly my favorite game of all time. Xpacs highly recommended.
Strawberry Avalanche;-;Naming my city banana is really potato.
Jordan_X;-;This is a very fun and intuitive piece of software 100/101 must buy.
Sgt Porcupine;-;If you like deep strategy games, where a military conquest isn't always the right move, then try out Civilization V. This game has kept me up late at night with it's engrossing gameplay, brilliant interface and wonderful design. ...just...one...more...turn...
Alex;-;You see, tanks have a preset kill limit. Knowing their weakness, I sent wave after wave of my own men at them until they reached their limit and shut down
SilverApollo;-;This game is awesome. Time and space with vanish.
BIG D;-;Perhaps the best RTS I've ever played and I've played a heck of a lot of 'em. There is no end to the playability that is presented in Civ V. The game is beautiful, as well as challenging and will provide many, many, many hours of gameplay. There are an almost absurd number of factions to choose from, all of them with their own specialties that utilize different playstyles as well as multiple ways to win games, granting almost endless replayability. Perhaps one game, you'd play as Japan and establish an autocratic government, who will win by global domination. Perhaps another time you'll take a shot as America and create democracy, winning the game by becoming the democratic world leader. But if you're feeling really kooky; why not play as the Spartans, establish a scientific society and master space flight? Regardless of how crazy you want it, you can probably do it. It's all up to you. Ever since Alpha Centauri for the ye olde PC, I have always enjoyed a good Sid Meier's game, because there are no other games like these that are as intriquate, difficult, interesting or fun. This game just WORKS, where so many others end up being clunky and poorly designed. If you're into RTS games, want to experience something incredible and you have the patience to endure games that can last multiple hours, pick this up, you won't regret it at all. I won't, however, suggest this to people with a short attention span and/or a lack of patience. You won't enjoy it.
C-12;-;Best strategy game, very intense, and can get addicting
Low_K;-;A very addictive game. Countless hours of (re)playability. The Gods & Kings, as well as Brave New World, expansion packs add so much good stuff, it is strange that some people don't have this game yet. As you can see from the amount of hours played, you will not be disappointed when you buy it. Only gripe is that if you play with friends against the CPU in multiplayer, the AI is very stale. Furthermore Mods are not enabled for multiplayer, although they are for single player though (and Irecommend the European and World maps made by the community with true placement). Buy it and prepare for hours and hours of fun gameplay!
UncleMontezuma;-;Manages to be be both easy to pick up and incredibly tough to fully master, which is quite an achievement. It walks the newcomer through the basics of the game before leaving them to work out how to improve and build from there.
Brad;-;it isssss ammmmmmaaaazzzzzziiiinnngggg game could play for hours
~AttackonRaian~;-;One of the best game in the Strategy genre and anyone can just pickup and play but only true masters will be good at it you will not be able to do anything else after starting a game so Make lots of time :D
Praetorian;-;incredibly addictive game that i never thought i would get into. definately worth trying ;)
BOT Preston;-;this game is amazing
The Poop Scoop;-;50 Hours into your latest save, all is going well. Only 3 leaders left Gandhi, Caesar and Washington. you draft an 'end game' plan in your mind, you will make friends with Gandhi (for obvious reasons he's chill) then procede to befriend Caesar. Then you will take out Washington because he is a  and did not accept an open border agreement 3000 years prior HE MUST PAY. 20 turns later all is going to plan, we are now on Washingtons doorstep, Gandhi and Caesar appear to love and probably fear your superpower nation. All we need to do is eliminate the pesky Americans and ith all our military now on American soil this should not take long. Then after the swift invasion of America we will make a vote for world peace at the U.N (in rome of course) with our new found Indian and Roman brethren it is a sure win! But all of a sudden the distant droning of nuclear sirens start, quickly they become louder and louder, "what is this!?" you think to yourself, a false alarm? You shrug it off maybe Caesae bombing a city state. The game pauses... Gandhi appears on the screen, with a sinister grin he shouts "WAR" in your face. Only seconds after you see a gut wrenching sight. The camera focuses on a nuclear submarine stationed just off the coast of your pride and joy, the capital of your glorious nation. You then hear a rumble, just seconds after a nuclear warhead emerges from the previously hidden submarine, you realise it is too late... you can only watch as the missle closes in. As your city goes up in a giant cloud there are short lived screams from your beloved people, then silence. Before what had just occurred had sunk in, before you could make rescue efforts to save your much loved citizens the humming of quiet engines fall upon your ears. Suddenly countless 'stealth bombers' appear seemingly out of no where, soon the sky is blackened by planes, the game falls almost silent only the whistle of falling bombs remains. You faint from the shock of what is unfolding. You awake shortly after, Gandhi is still flattening what remains of your once prosperous empire, now with 'giant death robots' making the most of his seemingly never ending turn. As Gandhi clinically and relentlessly razes what's left of your broken nation all you can do is weep, your people hacked down in their prime and your glorious nation so mighty just minutes before has just been been all but eliminated in 1 turn. Why oh why did you turn of autosave? did it really speed your game up? was it worth it? Ghandi is a complete , he acts like your friend but WILL nuke the  out of you if even the slightest oppurtunity presents itself. 10/10
BenjiOfTheZulu;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
T'Challa;-;It's like crack. You keep telling yourself 'just one more turn'. but then you realize you've been sitting in your underwear for for 36 hours and you've forgotten to check on your wife who gave birth to your baby last night.
Admiral Johan;-;-playing as the US -explores and finds siam -befriends siam -finds greece -greece is a  and invades -gets in a war with greece -takes 2 greek cities and returnes the rest -greece is happy -sails to new lands and finds all other nations -befirends russia and china -gets in a foolish war with siam not knowing that every nation exept china and russia is friends with siam -feels sad because everyone hates me -makes peace with siam because im feeling guilty for being a warmonger -people start being nice to me -feels happy, only germany and arabia are guarded, everyone else is friendly -china asked me to declaire war on arabia even though he has done nothing to me -I decline because Ive decided to be an example to the civilized world -china declares war on and denounces me -germany declares war on me -every nation on earth exept for russia declaires war on me -me and russia vs. the world -I have 3 nukes and no one else has any -cant make myself use them -steamroll enemy city states south of me -steamroll greece to the north -steamroll native american settlements on some islands near me -siam discovers urainum -siam is confirmed to have nuclear power plant -must stop siam from getting nukes -US gunships race to punch a hole in siams defences -all reserve units are embarked for the invasion with destroyer escorts -gunships meet uber heavy resistance -invasion due in 2 turns -russia is being cut off from US aid -sends paratroopers to break the siege of moscow -fails due to being outnumbered 20:1 -D-Day in siam -steamrolls siam until only capital left -no sign of atomic weapons -100,000 troops surrounding the capital -air raid sirens -siam nukes himself four times along with most of my troops -paras mop up and capture the capital -sad music -all other nations in shock -we mourn our fallen troops -all nations make peace in the next 4 turns -we all are sad -decides war must end for good -changes course for diplomatic victory -starts work on UN -becomes allies with 19 city states -all nations live in realitive peace -finishes UN -wins vote -wins game 10/10 no feels like this in a game before.
Icewraith;-;- played as Arabia on a large earth map - started in Europe with Brasil below me - captured Brasil's capital city because it look nice - turtled half the game before finding out I was coming second - RUSSIA WAS FIRST - the only one between me and victory - Russia wiped out Egypt and Japan (which were around Kazakhstan) - Russia has a army 3 TIMES the size of mine - Russia has like 30 citys with -2000 gold per turn - Russia's capital is in the middle of those 30 citys - Russia was sill ahead in tech - operation cold war was now in effect - allied with Korea (who was above turkey) and city states near russia to use as a shields - sent 2 nukes along with a fleet of 15 ships across the world to get as close to the capital as possible - still wasn't close enough - Russia's finish half the space ship - sent xcom squads to the city states closest to the capital - ATTACK - que skyrim music - sent ships into the sea of Okhotsk - oh crap Russia was prepared - was met with a blockade of nuclear submarines - but the nukes must go through - punched a hole in the blockade with my ships - my ships sinking left and right - sent the cruiser with the nukes as far in as possible - Russia's got 3 turn left on her last spaceship part - the range on the bombs is just close enough - FIRE THE NUKES - SEND IN THE XCOM SQUADS - captured Russia's capital! - no ships made it out though, their sacrifices will be honored - most intense battle I ever fought - one turn later and France wins a cultural victory - WHAT THE HELL FRANCE great game 8.5/10
Derpnshire;-;Alexander the great insulted my army saying they were **** I declared war on him he was right
Leon Declis;-;I am the peaceful nation of the Celts. We shall be the nation of religion, and of diplomacy. This went well; we ended up next to the Babylonians, and we expanded nicely in peace. However, I have always believed in "dibs", so I placed down Glasgow onto the land between us, to provide a little buffer. They seemed annoyed by this. A few warriors glared at each other across our borders for a few hundred years, but otherwise, nothing too bad happened. In order to spread our religion further (because we were known for our Confucian beliefs which helped us grow our borders and spread our religion faster), we begin to invest in boats. Soon we covered the oceans in missionaries, Inquisitor and warriors to help defend our religious allies. Babylon was making friends with a local city state, Genoa. However, they were trying to spread Zoroastrianism; those heathens! Despite both our religions being known for their peace, we passive-aggressively sent missionary and Inquisitor to Genoa. Over the course of about 700 years, we had probably burned a few thousand people for swapping religions; those same Warriors had been given spears now, but they continue to glare at each other from across the borders. I offer Babylon some sugar for their spice; they wanted my sugar, iron, coal and all of my money. I then asked Germany if they wanted sugar for spice; they accepted. North of me, Rome had begun a war with France. Due to my time of peace and massive amounts of trade, I found myself with a huge amount of money. Everytime France and Rome made peace, I knew that Rome was beginning to look on my relatively peaceful country with greedy eyes. So I bought... I gifted many city states my religion and gold, and then I bought... gifted France and Germany enough money to declare with with Rome. While they fought, my Spearmen (now Musketmen) continued to glare with Babylon's, and we continued our 1500 year religious passive-aggression over Genoa. They said I was spying on them; I said I wouldn't. When my spies returned, I sent them back to Babylon. A squad of 5 Great Prophets charged into Babylon, converting left, right and centre. Babylon complained I was being a bit aggressive. I apologised. I then sent more missionaries to Babylon. I had now found every single Civilization; we decided to have a United Nations meeting in 1600A.D. I, as the host, gave everyone a single vote. Except myself. I gave myself 16, due to my popularity. I declared my religion to be the world religion. Every one opposed. I listened to their opinions, and then passed it anyway. When Rome got angry about this, I then paid France to declare war again. When Babylon got angry, I then paid Rome to declare war on them. My civilians were amazingly happy; hugely more than any other place. But because I was an Emperor, they declared me Declis the Terrible; despite my universal healthcare, happy citizens, peaceful religion, not a single war in my entire history and massive popularity in the word. My army consisted of mostly my friends, my city states, and my Musketmen (now Great War Infantry) continued to glare at the Babylonian Great War Infantry, after 2000+ years. A great duty to my nation, their descendants shall continue to frown at the Babylonians until the civilizations of the world fall. Eventually we reached a grand United Nations meeting; I sat on one side of the chamber with my 12 City State friends, and the other 7 nations glared at me from the other side. I said that the People's Confucian Republican Empire of Scotland was the best nation in the world. They all voted against me. I smiled, and then declared I won anyway. Democracy is overrated. Freedom of religion only applies to my religion. I don't need to be stronger when I'm more popular (and my people are probably more beautiful). And if you don't like me, I'll pay your best friend to backstab you. Through this, I came to understand American foreign policy. So Civilization is if nothing else, an educational tool.
Pygomi;-;Made me obsessed, destroyed my social life, gave me and irrational fear of Gandhi. and made me invest countless hours into destroying civilizations. 12/10 potatoes
Mr. Flying Turtles;-;When Gandhi or Ethiopia comes to your doorstep with gifts of gold, dyes, and ivory, take my advice. Ready all your tanks and nukes, arm them, AND SHOOT THEM LIKE YOUR LIFE DEPENDS ON IT. They are evil, traitorous demons. NEVER TRUST THEM. However, Genghis Khan is my best friend. He came up to me and was all like, "De full do bu la chi mendo." And I said, "Okay! Let's be friends!" I can never understand that guy, but something about our relationship just works. Ghandi Hating Simulator 2014 11/10
Doc;-;You'll decide to play for an hour and you'll realize four days later that your wife left you, but you're so close to killing that scumbag Gandhi that it doesn't even matter. 20/10
Tin;-;Awsome
Predator.;-;Considering this is a turn based game rather than a shooter it is ridiculously addictive. I've owned each release from Civ. 1 onward and have enjoyed them all. If you don't like the relatively slow start then use a small map and begin in the modern or future eras. This is a really good alternative to shooters if youre willing to think and plan, connive and weasel.
scouts pauling pin up;-;WoW is what i said after i finally beat this game this game makes you start off with nothing aand lets you create step by step and at the start peaceful times none around at the end your warriors have to fight off 2 or 3 civs just to survive and you can make freindships but in this you can't trust your allies they turn on you any chance they get annd number one rule DO'NT TRUST WASHINGTON THE OTTOMANS OR SPAIN
hman141;-;Great game. logged 30+ hours on one game. plan to go back for more
vzmig;-;Great game for anyone who likes strategy games. Varying difficulty choices allows for beginners and the challenge seeker. Hundred of combinations between rulers and land masses make it almost impossible to play the same game twice. Multiplayer just adds to the fun. Playing with friends (or backstabbing friends) never gets old as you play your new favroite strategy game!
Bop;-;Sick game. Buy it.
Bunzoclown;-;Highly recommended. It takes a LONG time to play through, but is great to have a fun time with some friends.
Smire;-;Simply a perfect game. Buy the game, play it and be happy!
RAM;-;Very addictive and a different game everytime you restart.
Fat Ninja;-;My nuclear powered robot was killed by rifleman. Apparently it was Chuck Norris.
Broseph Kony;-;Truely amazing game, at its base it can be a little dule but with all of the expansions its a lovely game.
xconway7;-;Awesome splooged in my pants
etitterud;-;This game is pretty fun. The interface takes a bit to get used to. The game is incredibly addictive though. The perpetual cycles make it hard to walk away from and therefore I ended up playing through an entire civ often, much to the detriment of my work :)
Geomire;-;Civivilization 5 continues to improve upon this amazing franchise in small and wonderful ways. The addition of the policy trees is one of my favorite because it allows more control over the way your empire grows and gives your civ more personality than it could have in previous games. Diplomacy, combat and the tech trees have all seen improvements as well as a significant upgrade in graphics quality. The two large expansions for this game, Gods & Kings and Brave New World also add a huge amounts of complexity and depth to the game that was lacking in the former titles.
[ICON_RES_BANANA];-;Awesome game! I play it way to much!
chiliman11;-;It's awesome if you get it message me and I will play with you!!!
Johnnypopper;-;Started from the bottom now i'm here.. get the  away from me you mothering queer. Actually the game is quite fun and it's a lot of fun to start from nothing and then take over other civilizations only to be denounced and called a liar and a betrayer, but all is worth when you win the game.
MangoTangoFox;-;Incredibly Addicting. I was never really into strategy games, but this one completely changed my mind.
Brontosaurus;-;Great game, has loads of different strategies and personalities to make for a different game each play time
m00sestache;-;8/10, wish there were more units to annihilate Napolean's punk
miloxbrennan;-;its great
Jarude Sandstorm;-;If you like being a maniacal dictator, hell bent on the total distruction of all the world, this game is definently for you. P.S. NEVER TRUST THE RAGE FILLED BLOODLUST OF GHANDI
ElizaJane;-;Super fun, simple with pretty good graphics, costumizale world and difficulty on single player. Good game for gamers whoare just starting out or are ready for a tougher game. I really like it :p
atomicPACMAN007;-;Probably one of my favorite games of all time. For those who like strategy games, this game is a must-have. You divulge yourself hours upon hours building your empire the way you want. This game took so much of my life and I definitely recommend it to anyone who is a civilization fan or just appreciates a good strategy game.
What is Aim???;-;Great game can play it for hours
fghtoffyerdmns;-;this game is really, really fun especially if you have friends to play with you. its the penultimate strategy game at the moment pretty much, and you will waste alot of time on it itll be awessssssomeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee.
Dat snygga 90-tals jacka;-;You assume the role of one of many great european/asian leaders to your ultimate goal. There is one goal only and that is to eradicate minorities with different means of said 'eradicating'. You may pursue four different paths. You can dominate the sandpeople with your highly advanced weapons. You mayshow them that european/asian culture is supreme. You can trick these fellows into letting you lead the world, trough diplomacy. Or the most logical, trough science. They only live in huts, right? Buy this game if you enjoy bashing minorites, making fun of religion (create your own by using existing religious symbols and then rename it, hilarity ensures) and use nukes. 11/10 like Age of Empires with guns
Tin;-;Awsome
Turtle Astronaut;-;Super addictive. I've played around 25 hours, and it hasn't lost its touch. Every game I start is as fun as it was the first time. 9/10. Would be 10/10 if you didn't need to buy all of the unnecessary DLC. But it was still fun without it. :D
Olek;-;I love this game!
Fonganator14;-;A Must Have for any history loving, civilizationbuilding, strategy loving Gamer!
randomguy;-;This is a great game, so much content and replayability, and with mods it trully becomes an infinite game. I have barely grazed the surface of this game and have already poured over 200 hours into it. So much fun, so much value for money
QuirkyMariner;-;Super addicting Gameplay that will keep you up all freaking night if you aren't careful. I nuked Ghandi, and I feel no remorse for it.
Soup;-;This game is simply amazing. I love the gameplay and the style and the way you play. It is all up to the way you want to do things, and no two games will be the same.
ilBat;-;Recommended only if you have a lot of time to spend, it's like a drug once started you _have_ to finish...
Misuki;-;fun game, I'm not good at keeping peace politically. but if you look at me wrong I'll cry and start war with you. 9.5/10 fun games each country needs unique looking units (not the special units you get though but all of them)
Jihadi John;-;Highly addicting, with smooth, streamlined and quick gameplay. Graphics are a visual treat in this game. AI is decent, and multiplayer can be a fun, albeit occassionally sluggish, experience. If you're a fan of any type of strategy game, then Civilization V is one you ought to at least experience.
Sephiroth;-;This fifth installment really brings my previous Civ gaming experiences to the next level. :) As a history and a book lover, Civilization 5 brings me to the days of old when nations are still small, wars are constant, where seeds technological development are still being planted and watered for growth, wonders are being constructed, etc. This game gives users the best perspective of seeing how the nations of the world evolve and continues to evolve until now. Nice gameplay, superb detail and graphics, plus the accuracy of AI leader personalities (based on history) really gives you that great feeling leading your chosen civilization to glory. The different systems in the game, the religion and espionage (in Gods and Kings) adds depth to gameplay. It gives the player multiple ways to achieve victory for a civ. I just love this game so much.
joe-omega;-;Awesome game, lots of fun with friends. Be prepared to lose all track of time. Just one more turn turns into hours...LOL
TheAndrew1987;-;Outstanding game, i recommend it to everyone who is looking for a fun turn-based strategy game.
The Lord Almighty;-;a truly beautiful game that one can play for many hours on end
M-rag;-;One Word High price But Addicting Game Wait Thats More Than One Word My Bad
Wulf zFast.co.uk;-;IT IS SOOOOOOOOOOOO AWESOME!!! No, but seriously, you got to play this. psssst. PLAY IT!!!
TheHerbivore;-;Civ is brilliant, definately worth the money, especially for the multiplayer.
1x3000;-;Great game. However, don't play without a clock because you will lose track of time.
Big O **IN THE U.S TILL AUGUST**;-;This game!!!!! I'm not usually the type to enjoy a game like this, I'm more into Arma and the such, but picking this up in the sale was a genious idea! Everything looks so crisp and clean, a little hard to get used to at first, but thanks to the tutorial after a game or two you'll pick up everything you need to know. This game is made even better if you have friends to play it with too as thanks to the steam cloud saving you can load up your saved game with your friend anytime, and stop playing whenever you like.
DANCER;-;This game is pure crack. There is nothing more addictive than this game. I want to gift this game only to my worst enemies and all the evil mad humans out there. Get somebody in touch with Kim Jong-Un, set him up a steam-account and get him this game: it kills lifetime without being able to be productive in any form(except playing this game). The world will be a better and peacefull place if we can get those kind of people playing CIV V!
Owen_raisch;-;This game will make you play for hours and hours and hours it's nonstop fun!
The Spider_Bro;-;Civ 5 is one of my favorite games I've every played although I've only played BNW and gold edition I've enjoyed every moment. Civ 5 is the best strategy game I have played with it's depth and fun gameplay every game is different. with multiple victory choices your not limited to one way of playing. Each civilization has differnt perks making it interesting to play new civs every game.The expansion of Brave New World focuses on improving the way to win culturisticly and diplomaticly from fully adopting 5 policy trees to out culturing everyone else with tourism and from building a wonder voting on who should be world leader. another big thing Brave New world adds in is world congress where you vote on matters every so often. The addition of the great writer and great musician makes culture count even more. BNW also adds in new civs like Venice, Poland and Morocco. Civ 5 is a great game and recommend it everyone.
Teddy;-;So  addictive, just....one......more.....turn
Bick Dutt;-;One more turn. One more turn. One more turn. Its been 6 hours.
Frax;-;after completing 2, four hour games today alone, im ready to admit my addiction to it, even got it to run on my work netbook, sweet
Swash1998;-;Awesome game, one of the best I have ever played.
Mr Clarko;-;Fantastic game, buy and enjoy.
Damn Good Coffee!;-;The best Strategy game ever.
SirTurdFurgison;-;this is one of my favorite games of all time, if your looking for a game with great gameplay, awsome multiplayer, and hours upon hours of fun... BUY THIS GAME!
Jeffie from the Interwebz;-;This game is a turn based strategy title based on actual history. It makes learning history fun as you take control of countries as far back as the ancient era and rule them in your own way.
|CEG| Renz;-;Its a really cool game if you like strategy games. This is a really fun strategy game, that has action but also takes a ton of thought. One downside is it takes probably 12 hours minimum for each game.
nickperrino;-;Ive had the base game a long while now. and the expansions just make it better. this game will never grow old for me
Metal-Sonic;-;Create History with Greatest CIV game ever made!
Commandant;-;one of the best stategy games ive played some things could be better for exaple the soundtrack or diplomatcy but all in all good game
PlattypusJoe;-;Great game that will offer hours of enjoyment for completionist
danceonthorns;-;I highly recommend getting this game if you enjoy strategy games. Its very addicting. Just one more turn before bed Oh ! Is it 7am already? Haha.
<M4XY>;-;One of the most addictive games I ever played. Recommended.
Danzig;-;one more turn...
Princess Pooterin;-;If your thinking about getting it, get it. I don't even like stratagey games and i love this...
vantrim;-;Great game. Repeat play is excellent.
The Endless End;-;tis a damn good game that consume your whole life buy with caution, get your mates to play it
Baromega;-;I hope you don't like sleeping or being productive
Dylan;-;Absolutley Awesome game, I'm most likely addicted!
Bryce;-;If your into strategy games and you haven't played civ yet your missing out. It is a fun game to play solo but even funner with friends. I strongly recommend this game and suggest you to get the gold pack so you get most of the dlc.
OneSecond;-;Very addicting game, albeit historically inaccurate. The engaging gameplay makes up for Ghandi's rampant expansionalism
Holmaan;-;Firaxis Latest installment to Civilization series (although I recommend quite late..) Civilization take the already glorifying series to upper heigh !, with some gameplay rehaul and enhancement, and introduction of some new nation even siam!!! (xD **) engage in all new diplomacy and technology rehaul. improved AI, Graphic, Newly introduced victory type (Diplomatic Victory) along with the older type such as good ol' Cultural, Technological, and Domination victory. the Game also see a Great modding community that allow you to load and enhance the game without a single dime ! Also new DLC pack "God and King", seen some new nation such as Netherland and Celtic, Religion now also play role in your national strife to glory !!!
Orange Soda!;-;THIS GAME WILL RUIN YOUR LIFE. BUT BUY IT. BUT IT WILL SERIOUSLY RUIN YOUR LIFE.
Soapy Dishes 144hz?;-;Best turn based stratergy out there. If you have friends with skype tell them to get this game and play it with them, you will have countless hours of fun and then just be dominated by that guy!
Paul Chuckle;-;If you are planning on having an early night. Don't play this game. "I'll go to my bed at 11" "Ahh it's 12:30 ill go at 1am" "Hmm it's 1;05am may aswell stay until 2am" *Girlfriend comes in* "It's 7AM where you and your friend up all night?"
Galactic;-;One of the best strategy games of all time. Would recommend to everyone.
Versace;-;Civilization V is one of those few games that is enjoyable whether you're playing alone, with friends, with people you don't know or even passing it around with people at your house, it's just a fun game. The amount of different scenarios that can happen is infinite, and as you progress you have this feeling of being a world leader, which is very satisfying and is something I have never seen delivered successfully in a game. You can be what you want, whether it be a nuclear war-lord, or a peace-seeking nation the game is always fun. You can choose to start at the beginning of Civilization, and a huge selection of different iconic eras such as the Medieval, Renessance, Ancient, etc. or you can even start in modern times, or in the future to come. Every game you play lays down new options of how you want to go about doing things, keeping it fresh and fun. A great investment.
Chat Repellant;-;Like a Persian, touched for the Darius time!
DataEntity;-;The fifth iteration of the original Time-Vampire...
Jimbo;-;The kind of game you can play all day. I can't wait until 6 comes out in the next few years. One of the best games I have ever played.
Gankom;-;Big fan of the game. Very addictive, you spend most of your time going "just one turn more".
anime dating simulator;-;I've put 300 hours into this game and that's more than I put into relationships haha i'll be here all week people
StoneMonkWisdom;-;Civilization V is a wonderful game and experience to be had. Not only do you learn a little bit about real world information about various civilization leaders but the game itself is also quite enjoyable. The game is also highly addictive and can become a major timesink. This expansion ("DLC") adds quite a lot of new touches enhancing the game so much more than the original standalone game. If you can afford it or have the patience to wait for the next steam sale or holiday sale, I would strongly recommend Civilization Gold which gets you the game, and the two expansion downloadable content for God's and Kings, and Brave New World. Sometimes the game can feel a bit slow, so those that have more patience would likely enjoy this game. As with anything, I would recommend checking trailers, some gameplay on youtube and so on to potentially entice you, giving you a better informed decision to pick it up for yourself or not. I hereby give my recommendation to this game.
Kawaiichi;-;Very interesting and informative game. Your brains will level up with this game. I recommend it :3
JR "Rob" Dobbs;-;Civ V is the closest thing we currently have to stasis sleep. I started this game up and suddenly two days were gone. Over 29 hours gone from my life. This game could really take out all the tedium of intergalactic space travel. A more appropriate analogy may compare Civ V to a highly addictive drug, but I'd like to make it perfectly clear that I love this game. Even if it tears my family apart. I seriously wish I didn't come into work this morning. I'm Jonesing so hard!
Rambo;-;One of the best strategy games I've played. Immensely time consuming but great fun. 10/10
PizzaMindControl;-;A very fun game.
element 62;-;Years will go by before you realize you're still playing.
ShintoSkookum;-;Great strategic game. Good-Fun, full of adventure and exploration. Strategic. Bad-Ehh, nothing much. 10/10
The Spider_Bro;-;Civ 5 is one of my favorite games I've every played although I've only played BNW and gold edition I've enjoyed every moment. Civ 5 is the best strategy game I have played with it's depth and fun gameplay every game is different. with multiple victory choices your not limited to one way of playing. Each civilization has differnt perks making it interesting to play new civs every game.The expansion of Brave New World focuses on improving the way to win culturisticly and diplomaticly from fully adopting 5 policy trees to out culturing everyone else with tourism and from building a wonder voting on who should be world leader. another big thing Brave New world adds in is world congress where you vote on matters every so often. The addition of the great writer and great musician makes culture count even more. BNW also adds in new civs like Venice, Poland and Morocco. Civ 5 is a great game and recommend it everyone.
Teddy;-;So  addictive, just....one......more.....turn
Bick Dutt;-;One more turn. One more turn. One more turn. Its been 6 hours.
Frax;-;after completing 2, four hour games today alone, im ready to admit my addiction to it, even got it to run on my work netbook, sweet
Swash1998;-;Awesome game, one of the best I have ever played.
Mr Clarko;-;Fantastic game, buy and enjoy.
Damn Good Coffee!;-;The best Strategy game ever.
SirTurdFurgison;-;this is one of my favorite games of all time, if your looking for a game with great gameplay, awsome multiplayer, and hours upon hours of fun... BUY THIS GAME!
Jeffie from the Interwebz;-;This game is a turn based strategy title based on actual history. It makes learning history fun as you take control of countries as far back as the ancient era and rule them in your own way.
|CEG| Renz;-;Its a really cool game if you like strategy games. This is a really fun strategy game, that has action but also takes a ton of thought. One downside is it takes probably 12 hours minimum for each game.
Angry Wizard Prince;-;only if you have a crapload of time
jewberrykush;-;sick game buy it now or die
[DnO]FiendFellow;-;Civ V is probably the best looking and most enjoyable game in the Civilization series, plus major updates to gameplay every few months. Very worth it, buy it!
Kippeves;-;Civilization 5 is a great entry in the series, and a good one for beginners to start with, since it has the design(-flaws) of Civilization: Revolution. Not as good as Civilization 3 or 4, but it's prettier and works better online than both of them, so it gets the job done. The expansionpacks cure what the vanilla-version lacked, so make sure to get those right away, otherwise you won't enjoy the game, and even if you DO, you miss out on a lot of content. TLDR; The game is bland if played vanilla, with Expansion + DLC the game is great.
declangrey;-;so addictive. sooooo addictive.
Nuggetahkiin;-;Spectacularly good game. Definately one to pick up with friends and play when you get bored of repetetive FPS'. I would recomend also getting the Brave New World DLC aswell.
_byte;-;Though I've never really enjoyed strategy games, Sid Meier's Civilization V has definately been an enjoyable game to play. Though things aren't always historically correct *cough cough* (America in the ancient era), it's still fun trying to outlast the AI or the barbarians. Overall, this is one of the best games I've played so far. If you have the money, get it.
Artemis Entreri;-;really this is a yes and no recomendation i like the new map setup and no unit stacking but its too simplified and sure dlcs fix that but that is $60 usd for both
StealthyPanther;-;A tremendous strategy game that evolves and changes as time progresses, and features many ways to expand your empire. It's even more fun with the expansions.
Rocax;-;This game has, on several occasions, left me playing until the break of dawn unintentionally. That is a rare feat. Make sure you get Gods & Kings as well as Brave New World for the complete Civ V experience!
RavenStag;-;Perfect for the war mongering menace within us
Stevelisk;-;This game is awesome , cause its the only game that i can torture and enslave people in order toi make ING ARMIES AND FACTORIES AND  EVERYONE CAUSE MY TOWN IS MILITARY BASED . ING EPIC with tankes and  and VIKING BERSERKERS . IM STEVE THE DEAMON AND I APPROVE THIS MESSAGE !
That Nigga Meech;-;Who needs to waste their time on real life things when you can become the king of the ing planet?
Freddy;-;This game is a time machine. Be careful. On multiple occasions while playing I was flung several hours forward in time but perceived none of it. It's like those stories people tell you about having missing hours in their life. Driving home from work and all of a sudden you're home and can't remember anyhitng at all about the trip back. They could have sworn the just turned the key, and now they're in their driveway. Yeah same thing here. I start the game at 9PM. I make like 4 moves and it's 4AM all of sudden. 's crazy, man.
ChickenNoodleTime;-;a suprisingly good game one of the best i have played in a very long time
meridian;-;click cities n
Eriff17;-;Siv V.. a very good game indeed but needing some improvents including some new characters like stalin and hitler.. because when i get home after a hard day of work I like to recreate the genocides that happened in the 1930-40's.. it brings a tear to my heart of happiness when I see it being done. This game is great for almost everyone that likes to think (1% of the U.S population). 1 Final problem with the game is that when you are allys with a city-state or ruler, not once can you ask friendly troops if they want to have sex with other troops, very prejudice against homosexuals I see. Anyway, would recommend to most folks. 69/69
Fireflint;-;I've played this series from Civ2 onwards and I continue to be amazed with the depth of gameplay. Be warned that this is is one of those, "... just one more turn." games and will keep you up late at night.
RealDirtyDan;-;10/10 would buy again
Mortagraw;-;This is most likely a game.
Raysie;-;get it its the daddy of strategy games.
StealthyPanther;-;A tremendous strategy game that evolves and changes as time progresses, and features many ways to expand your empire. It's even more fun with the expansions.
Rocax;-;This game has, on several occasions, left me playing until the break of dawn unintentionally. That is a rare feat. Make sure you get Gods & Kings as well as Brave New World for the complete Civ V experience!
Hamster;-;i give this game a 5 star rating
GanglyTrex;-;Hexagons errday 9/10
Coming In Hot;-;It is a great game with hours and hours of replayablility
Mr. Deer;-;[Quick Infomation]: I'm completely new to the Civilization V series, but this title is one you should consider picking up! The game is about you taking control of a civilization. For example China. You can choose to start in the ancient age all up til the information age. You can also choose to spawn in the real world or a random map, or just build a map! [Gameplay]: The gameplay is turnbased. You do what ever you want to do in a turn. Press "Next Turn" and the AI (or if Multiplayer a human) does what ever they want. You can choose different kinds of game speeds. Quick, Standard, Epic & Marathon. The difference between the game speeds is how long Research, Production & Grow takes. But movement of units ISN'T slowed. The maps is made of Hexs. It opens up for lots of tactical opportunities. [Gameplay Time]: If you start from the ancient era, and with quick speed. You can easily expect a few hours. Unless you rush your enemies. A marathon can take multiple days. But over the course of multiple days you can get tired with your Civilization. So I do not recommend playing at this speed. I normally take Epic to have a acceptable science speed. and so I have time to explore in a good time. But Marathon is just to boring since there isn't much to do while you wait for the cities to finish production. In the course of 2 weeks I've already played around 100 hours. Only a few games can keep my attention so strong and I'm still playing! [Community]: The game features mod support. The mods are in the Main Menu. Just click on the and connect to steam workshop and there are already many mods for you to use even more time on the game! [Multiplayer]: The multiplayer is not tagged on. It has a great multiplayer. It is pretty much just like Singleplayer but just with humans! But the turns takes some time late game. You can actually turn something called "Pitboss" on. This will do so that every time it's your turn in Multiplayer it can either e-mail you or send you a steam invite. While you do other stuff! But I like the Single player more since there isn't that waiting time. But one quite annoying thing that can't really be fixed is that there will allways be a good one in a game. If you are the good one, it will really decrease the other players morale... If they have a bad time they will proberly quit or just be kind of sad/mad at you (friends) So this game is best at it's Single player. [Final Score]: 9/10
littleso;-;This game is great!!!
LiNcE-PT;-;Time FLIES in this game, i need to buy diapers to conquer the world
GokuTheDragonBornPrincess;-;URMURGURD!!!! This game is the tankiest tank of all tankdom, if you have friends get them to get it if they dont THEY ARE NOT YOUR FRIENDS!! If they get it THE FUN WILL NEVER END!!!
Zlegoguy;-;Great game for the RTS user.
Turned-Bull;-;Civ V is a good game if your into strategy and all that
Wolfy;-;It's good, but this game will just eat up all of your time.
humananchor;-;Combat is better than IV but everything else is a little less fun. From what I understand BNW really makes this the game it is supposed to be. It is still a great game though.
chiefs3;-;How many hours have I lost? What year is it? Why is my underwear solid? These are all questions I ask myself when I finish playing a game of Civ 5 and all of it is worth the pain of 100 asleep buttocks. Seriously though this game is great and worth every penny you could pick up and through at it.
Si;-;I've logged almost 500 hours in this game. Best Civ so far.
Bolamuch;-;One of the most addicting games ever.
DoubleYoricks;-;I'm not a huge strategy player, but this one hooked me. I cannot reccommend this game if you plan on doing anything with your life other than playing it. The hours vanish when you start it up.
-(|RG-A|)- Comrade Marine Sanic;-;Basicly it's like Paper please, but it's not 10/10 Paper please is good game
Bran // Tame;-;Immersive, fun, easy to pick up but hard to master. Really should not miss out on any Sid Meier games, especially not Civ.
BenAorDur;-;Just .. another ... turn ! ^^
JerC;-;Ressearched Internet before Computers. 9000/1337
JR;-;Get this game don't be a chump.
ThatGuyInYourHouseSoTurnAround!;-;Great
Balanse;-;As a mind games lover i highly reccomend this game even if you one of the people who dont love looking up for many tutorials and guides to play a game. this game briliant once you play it you cant get enought as some one who made more then 10 saves atleast and still every new game is more crazy then the other just the felling from making your first city with one population all the way to a huge empire with an advanced army. i highly reccomend this game to everyone no metter what types of game you love action,adventure or any other type this game is fun for everyone.
Celsius [Meninist];-;This game never ends and is very addicting first game set it to random lasted 15hrs totaly worth the buy but i'd say till it goes on sale so you can buy all the dlc and the game cheaply
magweed;-;good game would play 10/10
Thirty850;-;It was once said that man can be entertained for hours on end with the simple image of boobs. While this is true, man gains nothing from this other than an erection, dirty tissues and a hard to explain smell on his . Purchasing this game is not only a visual pleasure for your brain. It helps you understand that 10 hours in a chair can really mean something. Your wife or significant other may leave you due to the new smell that has appeared. But at least you can cleanse the land of all that oppose you without being called a racist or going to jail.
FrenchyPoP;-;Controlling your own civilization? Who wouldn't love that? and with the expansion packs you can just keep going forever. You can also get the satisfaction of beating your militaristic friends with science. There is only one thing I don't like about this game...Those damned Barbarians
SuparJoka;-;Best strategy game I've ever played, it's silly how addicting this game is. Once you start a game and you get into it - you instantly forget about time.
Squadward;-;The game is easy to learn, and once you learn it you can't stop, there is so much variety with each game that you have, each one lasting about 6 hours, you can never stop playing! You have been warned, I also reccomend getting the expansions, they make it much more intresting with more stuff to do and balanced.
Rich;-;One more turn? Am I right? Lol
Warlord Gandhi;-;Ciiv 5 is a great game for those who wish to become a warmongering menace to the rest of the world. Fight your enemies, sack their cities and enslave their population... *ahem* I mean ask them nicely to join you....in the name of peace of course! ....NAH! Just kidding! Rampage through their territory and when they ask for peace, extend to them the warm glow brought only by a nuclear missile! Remember kids, my words are backed by nuclear weapons! I'm Warlord Gandhi and I approve this message!
ThreeDoge;-;Certainly a fun game. It is fabulous to declare war with everyone on the first turn and win the game. Add some friends into the mix for more awesome. I would NOT recommend this game to someone who is not patient. Games take upwards of 3+ hours to complete on average.
ArbyBicepZ;-;This has to be the greatest investment I've made on Steam in the two years i've been using it. Civilization V is an amazing turn-based strategy game and although I'm not a seasoned fan of the franchise as I've only been playing this for a year, it deserves the hundreds of reccomendations it has and I'm sure that even with Beyond Earth being released Civ V will continue to be competitive throughout Steam. I have to say this is... there is no word good enough to describe this game.
Zero;-;Definatly one of my favorites
Cobbo || Busy with study;-;>Long time player >Played a game with Ethipoia and India >Turns out ethipoia doesnt care about food when both Ethipoia and Gundi both nuke you on the same turn >Good Game would get nuked by Peace leader and a starving country again 420/10
Where'sWaldo;-;"Too hard to understand, I hate it....! How can I get my money back!" -That is what I used to say to this game. I completely change my mind this game is endless fun!
[E.Z.A.] WTFNOOBFTW?!;-;Sid Meier is apparantely Da creator of da world, since he has many Civilizations. 10/10, would Civil again
DesperadO;-;This game is worth every cent I paid for it.
jehhi;-;Great game! A must for every strategy lover!
Fre2Doom;-;Good old civ.
Qilv;-;The fluidity and addictive nature of this game really made me feel comfortable as a first time strategy game player. A must buy. Unless you value your social life.
JunnuW;-;One of the best turn based strategy games. (remember not only war strategy). Fun to play, expecially with friends. But a word of warning. really heavy on the processor in the late game. atleast on MP hybrid mode. (my advice use standard turns in MP too). Helps a bit... So if you like turn based strategy were you dont have to kill everybody play this. Brave new world makes it lot better !
Pudding Face;-;This is simply a master piece, with unlimited replay value and outstanding complexity, this game could just be the end of all other games.
demnotch2;-;I enjoy this game very much, sadly it makes the hours fly by without notice. Multiple ways to win with diversification on the races. Plenty to try with great replayability.
Apex;-;Great game with unlimited potential, easy installation on mods, and i got the gold edition GNK for only 15 Dollars!
FabulousHippo7;-;An amazing game. The expansions make this game greater but the base game works just fine. When getting this game realise games take a long time to complete. Overall great way to waste time, 10/10
Nuclear Kangaroo;-;I AM YOUR KING NOW, GIVE ME YOUR VIRGINS!... *ahem*, very nice game, makes you feel powerful, really deep, very thought provoking, excellent
preventerwind10;-;girlfriend is jealous of the game
LoneSpecter;-;Fun game with seriously flawed AI.
Tidyjoker;-;Ive played the very first, and am debating getting the new one. This one is miles better then the first, but just as enjoyable. If not more so. The different scenarios and ways to win mean you can always pick up the game and do something different. I play on the easy setting most of the time, just for the enjoyment of an easy world domination. I think it's easy to play, but that may be as i've just had to learn improvements on each edition? Great 'waste' of a day :)
Xantos;-;I recently tried the expansion to this game (Brave New World) and I must say that I am very impressed. The new voting system in the united nations absolutely gives new play options for experenced players. It keeps you thinking about more than just conquest and finally gives you a reason to be diplomatic.
thejamesbunting;-;It's alright
Le Patriote;-;One of the most enjoyable games I have ever played,
Aayla Secura;-;Civ V is a good game, and I have played Civ since Civ 3. I would however, recommend getting BNW ( Brave New World ) for a vastly more enjoyable game experience.
[TNC] Lupus;-;Stunningly good turn-based strategy, no wonder - giggity - it's one of the most played games on Steam. Getting it for the singeplayer is a no-brainer, but beware, the multipayer is very unstable.
Lirli, never gets better;-;#WontStopUntillIHaveDestroyedEVERYTHING!
TheWarGamer11;-;I do injoy the game style of the game, as being both challenging and fun is aways a plus in a turn based game.
zeus;-;This game is great for people who are first-time strategy gamers. The idea of the time line (from begining of civilization, to the future) is very rare. For all I know this is the only game that has this time line.
lord bonez;-;Great game.
thisiseric;-;You will forget to eat because of this game.
SilphCoLapras;-;User friendly for those who are fairly unfamiliar with the RTS genre and gameplay. It's addicting, enough to the point where I'd be up till 3am and not realize it; just blankly looking at my screen and yelling "ING GOD DAMN ALEXANDER STOP TRYING TO START A WAR WITH ME." It is amazingly fun and the games can go on for a very long time, I think my first game lasted about 9~10 hours. It's an RTS fan's staple and for good reason.
JTLrules;-;WARNING, EXERCISE CAUTION. If you are considering picking up Civ 5 then you MUST beaware of it's incredibly addictive nature. This is the game series that spawned the phrase "Just one more turn. *8 hours later* Just. One. More. Turn"
McDonagh;-;iron ore > friendship
Riot;-;This is quite possibly the best game I own, I have had hours and hours of fun on this not only on my own but also with my girlfriend in the hotseat mode and also online with my friends. 10/10
Standa L;-;Don't even think you can just go ahead and play a few rounds of this for an hour or so. You would end up spending your whole day playing it, dehydrated and hungry just to plan your revenge on the damn Greece. It's freaking awesome.
Poseidank;-;Amazing strategic gameplay, especially in late game. This is one of those games which you need friends to play with or you wont get too much enjoyment out of the game. I would choose this game any day of the week over any of the other strategic (turn based and not turn based) games available on steam. It is a pricey game, but it is well worth it, I got it for 20 USD on sale. I would recommend also getting all DLC's, if not all DLC's then at least get Brave New World and/or Gods and Kings. It really ups the gameplay and the amount of things you can do in the game. 10/10 would nuke and giant death robot again
piet;-;best game ever so much fun played it for more the 100 i suggest this to all strategy loving people
Jordan;-;New to the Civilization series. Played it for 8 hours on the first day.
Voltboyy;-;This is one of the best games ever made of its kind, you can it play for hours without getting bored. I recommend this game to everyone who is interested in a well made strategic game. It offers enough to keep you interested wether you play it alone or with friends.
knight;-;This is one of the best strategy game ever. You can keep playing for hours, even days. *Don't mind my hrs record, I've played this game long before I bought its steam version.
VectorAdw;-;In my opinion it's one o the best in the series (Ex aequo with Civ 3). Performace isn't too bad even on old (~4 years old PC) or my 'not so powerful' school laptop. Definitely it's worth full price (now even better with 50% off). Grab it and grab a friend or few to play and have fun!
MrBladeey;-;In love with this game.
A Wolf Actually;-;Apart from a few crashes here and there (partially my own error) It is an amazing game! For best experience you need the DLC.
Godis;-;This is the game I play the most, nuff said.
Steele Zedslayer;-;You start out trying to be nice to everyone, as they all offer you  deals and denounce you for no reason. As you get further and further ahead, eventually someone declares war and you, having had quite enough of their , bomb them back into the stone age. Then they offer you horses if you'll stop murdering them, while in the midst of the Modern Age. You seize one little capital, and suddenly everyone in the world hates you for 'warmongering'. So you decide to live up to their expectations and conquer the world. Such is life in Civ V. - Anonymous, of FJ
[TAW] Nonmatter;-;Iz teh shiz. Das it. Also. To quote the great Arin "Egoraptor" : TEN ATTA TEN
[SkrubL0rd] Useless Land Fish;-;Japan is of win
acealeam;-;If you're going to buy this, be ready to buy expansion packs. If not, don't.
Red Wing (Enanthomas);-;I am an avid player of strategy games like Age of Mythology and Age of Empires, but when I saw this game I thought I wouldn't like it, but I changed my mind quickly after I got it. The gameplay is great, the endless playability is amazing, the online support is fantastic and the fact that you don't have to have a 10 ping internet connection to be able to play well since it is a slow turn based game. The game comes with multiple expansion packs that add countless more hours of playtime to your account and mods are completely optional. I rarely find myself playing with mods due to the endless replayability of the game. 10/10
Martster;-;Its been a while since I lost myself in a game, but I found myself enjoying this so much I ended up loosing half a day without realising it. Its a super enjoyable game that I'd recommend to all, but do try the demo first if your unsure
ChaosEncourager;-;This game is amazing, I highly recommend it. Play the tutorial first, though! You will need it if you aren't used to turn-based strategy games.
Yumesuki;-;EDIT: All of this is written assuming you'll buy the two expansions aswell, don't get it without them. I have not written a review for this yet somehow. Good game, fun with people. Not the best Civ to date, but still good. If you don't mind dealing with an old game, get IV instead, but this is alright substitute, and most of the  can be added in by mods. No modded multiplayer though, and a ed up trading bug which hasn't been fixed after years...
Ravioli-sama;-;This is a great game, untill you have ing Siam, the Dutch and Japan taking their Bombers and ing you straight in the , but other then the japanese samurai's slowly taking my  in, if you feel the need to be ed so hard this is the game for you, TenouttaTen would play again.
Lewis;-;Welcome to Civilization 5; a turn-based strategy game where you are tasked with building the biggest empire and winning the game either by means of science, military, diplomacy or cultural influence. Choose the civilization you wish; whether that's sending Russia to space, or having Genghis Khan become world leader! What is good about this is that it is so immersive. You can really get stuck into a game and before you know it you're late for work. Yet while that is fairly undesirable, you can't help yourself from advancing into the next era, or hold off a few more turns until the Wonder you've been working on is completed, or even telling yourself you'll just keep playing till you win. Days may fly by, but the sense of achievement when you complete a game of Civ 5 is overwhelming, and makes you just feel pretty good! To play the game you will require a quick-thinking brain, as sometimes the slightest of decisions can result in finding an army on your front door, or could leave you at the bottom of the research table. To stay afloat, you must act fast and establish the means to produce a military quickly should you be attacked, but also to keep your research going. But don't have too many citizens, or your people will become unhappy! Great strategy game that will be played for years to come. Definately recommended!
Tiodichia;-;I think that the game has an interesting array of oppertunities to make each game different from the last. i rate this a "yes" game for someone who gets bored easily and wants a challenge to ceep him/her occupied.
dragonking_9;-;Well this game is very enjoyable for it's strategy based control system. I also love the fact that it contains historical information which makes it a bit educational as well but what makes this game very enjoyable is the game play itself, since you can raise a great empire in any direction you want to go from a peacemaker to a powerful overlord who crushes their enemies. It's a refreshing break from your typical hack and slasher games or FPS based games. Not to mention the graphics are nice as well. If you like starcraft then you'll like this game as well.
AlphaMandje;-;Civilization 5 is all about building up your own civilization, with your own religion and rules. You can do anything you like, which allows you to customize your game even further.
Cracktus Jack;-;Sid Meiers Civilization V Complete is a turned-based 4x strategy game. From the stone age to the space age, lead your civilization to span the globe, competing against your rivals as you establish cities, research technologies and build your units to stand the test of time. This review is based on the base game, the Gods & Kings and Brave New World expansions, and 13 DLCs that add additional Civilizations, map generators and game scenarios. Pros : Bringing the game to hexagons and limiting it to 1 unit per tile, are two bold steps away from past versions that completely revolutionized the strategy section of the game, as you must now plan, prepare and place your units. You have a huge selection of distinct civilizations to chose from, each of their leaders being memorable opponents, may they be friend or foe depending of which religion they adopt in the early game, or which social ideology they identify to in the late game. Will you use brute force to have your armies march through your enemies, overrun other cultures with yours with the tourism generated by your arists, writers, musicians or artifacts from archeological digs, use trade routes and influence to have other nations and city states to elect you World Leader of the united nations, or surpass humanitys science as you send the first interstallar ship to Alpha Centauri? Cons : There is little in form of story, quests or accomplishments to be had in a game. The AI negociation, although better than past Civilizations, is still broken when it comes to negociating or reasonning with it. The game itself is a resource hog, and the game will slow down in late game no manner how powerful your PC or Mac is. Verdict : I strongly recommand this game! The replayability is incredible, you can play a thousand game and never play the same one twice. The variety of civilizations allow you to try different approach, different styles and different strengths with each play through.
F8 #GOINGTOTI5;-;Tons of fun, both on singleplayer or multiplayer, highly suggest getting this. Definatly worth your money.
HenTheBen;-;I gave Gandhi 1 Uranium for 5 turns. 20 turns later, he nuked me. #NeverTrustGandhi 10/10
smokesV;-;Great game. But, why in the world would you not play multiplayer?
Funkapuss;-;Ghandi's a . 10/10 GoT
Spiderfork;-;WATCH AS I TAKE OVER THE WORLD AND NUKE JAPAN REALISITIC LIFE ABILITIES
Pancakesls;-;This game is really fun and really historical. It was voted both the Game of the Year and Strategy Game of the Year by gamespy in 2010. In a nutshell, this is the best strategy and historical game ever. I would recommend that you play this game.
Clayman897;-;Really good game! Keep up the good work
L'Kapetron Dookmarriot;-;Best turn by turn based game ever.
Coach Chance The Rapper;-;I spent many weekends playing this by myself...would reccomend
FarmerMitch;-;Great game, with incredible detail into the smallest things.
VonWolf from School;-;I don't know how to play this game. I'm not very good. I have no Idea what I'm doing. Why Am I on steam right now? Well good night everyone. time to die.
Geminiunleashed;-;More ways to win!
Kaigon, from AutoGlass;-;Great game
Gromph Teh Demon [Stand by Me];-;Seriously, hi is one of the best games I've ever played. There's amassive world, aninfinite amount of possibilities for playhrough, and a great community in the Steam Workshop. Especially great with the Gods and Kings + Brave New World DLC. Also, really appreciated the Mta Nui map mo. Brought back some memories.
CookieKing;-;With hindsight I can tell you that even at full price, the full Civ V package (including DLC's) is well worth the price. This is one of the most complex, interesting and engaging games that I've ever played. You have a massive list of Civ's to play from, which all have unique playstyles suited to them so you can play an infinite amount of games (each of which can easily last 10 hours) with AI controlled opponents, or your friends online. Not only do the variety of Civ's make the game so deep but also the map choices that you're given. You can choose your favourite map type (of which there are Continents, Islands and Pangea to name a few) which are all randomly generated, or pick the random map type for a surprise. If you somehow get bored of that there are also a number of scenarios that you can play in, as well as the ability to crank up the difficulty to insane levels, or  easy ones if you just enjoy stomping on everyone. I can guarantee that if you think that you'll enjoy this game that you will, I thought about it for a year and finally got it in the winter sale and can only sing it praises. But if you're REALLY unsure about whether you want it and you don't want to drop the money on it, then there is a demo available to get you hooked so I recommend trying that out before buying the game. I highly recommend this game at a 9/10, it will absolutely ruin your life. I should currently be doing work but Just... One... More... Turn...
Moose Protector of Vietnam;-;Great game, its worth your monies if your willing to sell your soul to the game for about 30+ hours strait for an amazing time :D
Scharnhorst (Akeno);-;France killed me... with a nuke 12/10
Luko;-;Took over whole world, only had india left until domination victory completion, the only victory type enabled. It was turn 430. I lost five turns later. The nukes man. The nukes. 1000/100 would get nuked again
Tredoubur;-;This game is amazing! You may have seen Sid meier's Civization beyond earth. I still recommend this game rather than that because there as been more work on it than the new one. If you buy this game you will want to buy all of the exspansions for it. The exspansions exspand the game so much, the base game is not near as fun as all of the exspansions combined. I really would reccomend this game. I play with my uncle all of the time and we kill each otheror work together, and not even talking about all of the fun of smack talk! This game is amazing to play and even better playing with freinds and family. If you buy this game make sure to get someone you know to play with you. Also make sure to practice so much that you crush whoever you play with in an istant, this game lets you achive complete and utter power. Buy this game.
koushirou;-;this game would probably be a lot better if my friends weren't so  and played with me. but other than that great game, make sure you get both expansions!
FillyPhlyerz;-;The newest iteration of one of the greatest series in gaming. 250+ hours on my steam version, which is one of three versions that I've sunk a lot of time into.
everywhere he is in chains;-;Fantastic strategy game (with the expansions-- it's still pretty good without them). Challenging, satisfying, and replayable.
rook295;-;One of the best strategy games I've played - an improvement in many aspects over Civ IV. As of the last expansion the game feels fully realised, balancing combat, economics, diplomacy, religion and culture superbly. AI, graphics, and UI are all up to scratch, while the mechanics are accessible but with time-consuming depth. Equally fun alone or with friends - no other game has the same 'one more turn' addiction - 10/10
Kastor;-;Easily my favorite strategy game and one of my top games overall. It requires smarts, cunning diplomicy skills, and lots of multitasking. With the Complete Edition now out, you can buy the game and all the DLC (which makes the game even better) for a very fair price. I can only say good things about this game except for one thing: the combat is fairly lacking. They had a good idea with all of the terrain bonuses and debuffs, but when it comes to PvP, it's just hard to be able to attack and move your troops around, because a lot of the time, it's whoever clicks first wins. Obviously that's not the case all the time and the combat is still pretty ok, but if I had to make any complaint, it would be that. However, all around, this is a fastastic game and easily worth buying the Complete Edition.
ARK_Apollo;-;Germany and Russia went on a quest to rule the world. 10/5 would conquer again -IGN
Perry;-;it's pretty cool...
edward starch;-;The next installation in Sid Meier's Civilization series of games, Civilization V is a wonderful turn-based strategy game in which players can forge the history of an earth-like world as they rule it. Augustus Caesar may declare war on George Washington, Catherine the Great may find that her cities are being bombed by Mahatma Gandhi. Initially met with some criticism over how it plays in comparison to its numerical predecessor, Civilization IV, Civ V is still an excellent game that is improved immensely by its DLC. Please note that anyone buying DLC may be better off buying ONLY Brave New World rather than Brave New World AND Gods and Kings, as Brave New World adds everything added in Gods and Kings save for a few Civilizations. If you enjoy Turn Based Strategy games with a focus on decisive victories through conquest, culture, diplomacy, or science, you certainly can not go wrong with Civilization V.
Kenny-X;-;Awesome game, im actually adicted.
[HUD]cab;-;This is really an upgrade from the old versions. The complexity and multitudes in achieving victory combined with the different civilizational aspects provides an extreme diversity in each game. The multiplayer experience is really the pinnacle of what started as CIVnet. This game is truly enjoyable in the company of friends in multiplayer mode.
Esiotrot;-;Until you have conquered the world as Banana King of Ethiopia, one with an insatiable lust for bananas, going as far as to commit genocide through nuclear weaponry just for their tasty goodness, you have not lived.
ThaLaurens;-;Great game, really enjoying it!
tokaiser;-;Great for people who don't mind slow paced games.
Seor Chimp;-;If I had to pick one game to play for the rest of my life, it would be this one. Every game I start feels fresh; I never feel like there is nothing new to experience. Plus it's really fun to play with friends!
Badassmedic;-;if you like RTS's then this game is for you its one of my fav's
RedEyeHawk;-;This game is awesome, get hundreds of hours of gameplay out of it!
ZippityBoppityGiveMetheFloppity;-;It's like crack but you can quit crack
CasualTyeDie;-;While I've never played a Civilization game before this, I absolutely fell in love with this game. Utterly fantastic, 10/10 would recommend!!!
The Banana King;-;Gotta love a game where if you're too nice to ghandi, he nukes you 10/10
DreamSockz;-;Very addicting, especially with mods.
Hnir;-;Deeply strategic, great fun with freinds, you will play entire days on it, even better with all the DLC but try to buy it during a sale (it's really expensive).
Holydevlin;-;Great game, tons of things to do, tons of fun. If you're into RTS's you'll love these games.
Rada;-;Kiss goodbye to the sun, because this is the biggest time sink ever!!
Kippeves;-;Civilization 5 is a great entry in the series, and a good one for beginners to start with, since it has the design(-flaws) of Civilization: Revolution. Not as good as Civilization 3 or 4, but it's prettier and works better online than both of them, so it gets the job done. The expansionpacks cure what the vanilla-version lacked, so make sure to get those right away, otherwise you won't enjoy the game, and even if you DO, you miss out on a lot of content. TLDR; The game is bland if played vanilla, with Expansion + DLC the game is great.
declangrey;-;so addictive. sooooo addictive.
Nuggetahkiin;-;Spectacularly good game. Definately one to pick up with friends and play when you get bored of repetetive FPS'. I would recomend also getting the Brave New World DLC aswell.
_byte;-;Though I've never really enjoyed strategy games, Sid Meier's Civilization V has definately been an enjoyable game to play. Though things aren't always historically correct *cough cough* (America in the ancient era), it's still fun trying to outlast the AI or the barbarians. Overall, this is one of the best games I've played so far. If you have the money, get it.
Artemis Entreri;-;really this is a yes and no recomendation i like the new map setup and no unit stacking but its too simplified and sure dlcs fix that but that is $60 usd for both
Inharmonia;-;Takes about 48 hours to understand about an eigth of it, but wow, rewarding as ever. Extremely good game.
Reindeer AWAY UNTIL THE 25TH;-;The first time I tried Civ 5, I wasn't much of a fan of the Strategy Genre of games. That was until I play Civ 5. It just simply has profoundly amazing gameplay, stunning graphics, and the replayability is great for trying out different styles of playing the game. It has exceeded my expectations, and I highly reccomend it.
{PV}Lexthatguy;-;Very good game, a shame there are almost no nordic/germanic civs in standard. got gold now!
Slime;-;A great game. I played it for a lot of hours. The DLC of BNW brought a lot of new options to play the game. Sometimes the difficulty of the AIs doesn't really resemble the difficulty you choose. And of course the multiplayer is awesome :D
xXMatthewMaMathaway420BlazeitXx;-;I would recomend this game, but only for those who have friends, it is quite long, and boring if you have no one to play with, but thats just me.
Kaldain;-;Civilization V (w/Gods & Kings Expansion) is the best "just one more turn" game ever!!! There are many mods for the game, as well as a brand new expansion pack coming this summer!
Itsamekoko;-;You know when you say to yourself, in the morning: I'll do a few turns before going to work... 10/10, would never stop again
PhilipTerryGraham;-;While more simpler and straightforward than other entries in the Civilization series, Civilization V , despite possessing an overwhelming sense of something missing, is a fun and enjoyable game nonetheless. A game that seems more tailored to newcomers to the franchise, Civilization V pays great respect to presentation, with a more alive and animated gameplay that Civilization IV had left mostly to the imagination, bringing new life into the world that players have been running around in for the past two decades. While experienced Civilization players may find emptiness in the many removed and replaced features and aspects compared to Civilization IV and previous entries in the franchise, others can find elation and waste countless hours with a game that, on it's own, proves to be one hell of an experience. What contributes mostly to the game's attractive atmosphere are the opponents you play against. In Civilization V , all leaders that you compete alongside have been given such rich personalities through vivid animation and luscious voice acting, giving new strategy to gameplay that isn't necesarily a physical aspect of the game, but rather an emotional one. For example, Caesar's passive-agressive attitude and Wu Zetian's consistently defiant personality gives weight to the player's actions against these particular people, deepening the fog of war and giving a new dimension to the gameplay. While Civilization V is undoubtedly better with the Gods and Kings and Brave New World expansion packs which have been released in the years following the game's original release, the original "vanilla" release is still a great game on it's own. Having played it bare for five years, I still think Civilization V is one of the best PC games on the market. Bold and beautiful, it's definitely a game you must play at least once before you die. Or twice. Or a hundred times.
game caesar;-;an awesome game i highly recommend it for a histo freak like me or just to relax the gameplay is relaxing and smooth depends on what difficulty it is it is great the mods in the workshop are mostly for the DLC's and the DLC's are also 30 bucks each so i would take the complete edition for that matter but if you are not in for the DLC's buy THIS GAME
per;-;Playing CIV 5 is like playing CIV 5. You forget there are other games...
JackThePegasus;-;I reccomend this game if you like turn based, stratergy games. I dont reccomend this game if you want to spend hours upon hours doing something useful.
lord_striker;-;Fun, need to get the full version soon!
Rtanix;-;Really Good Game. Perfect for a group of Friends to play with each other.
Motol;-;Murdered Nobunaga as Senator Armstrong from Metal Gear Rising. Then got nuked by Ghandi. 10/10
3p0;-;Probably the fifth game in the "Civilization" series to date. As such, it fits its description well, and -as has been pointed out by shady figures of the various adulatorious delinquents that lurk in the shady fora surrounding the subject- is playable enough to be truly identified as a "game".
Bill Door;-;The change to hexagonal shapes and removal of unit stacking has made combat more strategic (and harder!). Not sure if this game is better than Civ 4, but it's as good.
TriFish24_7;-;Awesome game. Wish there was more countries to play as though.
Freedom Time;-;11/10 Would lose most of my firends and social life again.
Giant Octopus;-;Yeah you should probably buy this game. Seriously. Do it.
TownyBoy;-;10/10 Would get nuked by Ghandi again
AwesomeTom;-;A really fantastic game
DrinkyCrow;-;One of the funnest games I have ever Played, easy, relaxing, and I get so caught up in it I loose myself.
LollyGames;-;Very Good Game
wilmerding;-;For years I ran a hobby club in my son's School focusing on Civ III. Civ V is the extension of that franchise, and they have wisely adopted the hex format for their maps. A livelong strategic game enthusiast who has designed my own games based upon the US Civil War, I find that the Civ V developers are making the effort -- and succeeding -- at delivering a peerless strategic gaming experience. Onward! Vinceremos!
Danny54d2;-;A fantastic strategy game which is extremely addicting. Where you lead a civilization from prehistoric times into the future! You can play on your own or with friends. If you get bored of the game you can purchase some dlcs to make your experience even better. A must buy for anyone who loves strategy games.
Dapper Commander;-;I've never played any other strategy games likes this before, but that didn't stop me from getting addicted to this. My first night, I played something like seven hours.
Multani;-;Civilization, you are my doom, my bane, my everything, my love. You keep me so busy I forget the world. You are great in so many ways, and hurt me in so many others. Great game though, seriously, I've always loved the series, and this one has a special place in my gaming library now after so much time in it. I always enjoy what comes with my Civ games.
Akimoto;-;More addictive than cocaine. 10/10 Would press next turn button again!
YungBlubber;-;this stuff is good. i like this stuff
[niridio];-;Cool game but enemy calculations take a little long thus it gets lenghy if u play with lot of ai ... the difficulty settings seem a bit easy
EC! N0x;-;this game is really bad for my character. every time i play it i become insane and just kill everyone in the game.
Kvasir;-;and you thought skyrim was life consuming
Minsterman89;-;I dont think there has ever been a game that makes me lose track of time as much as this.
Czarica;-;Fun game. Wish it was less time-consuming.
Roosh;-;One of my favorite games on steam. Much improved from Civ 4 and easier for the regular player to pick up if you like any kind of rts or city building game then this is for you. It's basically a much simpler version of the Total War games.
Rezxure;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING!
ErnestHemingbae;-;My most played Steam game, at least when I had a job where I could get away with it. I've spent many enjoyable hours trying in vain to prevet world wars and build an arts culutre based civ. would definitely play again for just one more turn.
Kerbox;-;Worth the money.
Damoun;-;Lots of fun, I recommend mods also
barkind;-;gosh i cant get enough of this game
Gimboid;-;Very addictive and fun.
FappyGilmore;-;my civ was full of illiterate  so i left them for dead to go live the pirate life on the sea. 10/10 would let egypt starve to death again
Nekryz;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is definately worth a play. Alot of people say it's pretty much Civ 2 with updated graphics, which I donot think is a bad thing.
james_binkie;-;this is a game i have wanted for a ong time and now i have played it i think it is even better than i could imagin!
Ratka;-;brother bought the game... steam-shared it to me... two weeks later... i got the game bought by myself
Rexer73;-;One of the best
Saint Pepsi;-;The only game in which you will be nuked by Ghandi and wage war on Saudi Arabia for taking ALL YOUR  LAND YOU KNEW YOU WERE GONNA SETTLE THERE! Sorry, I got a little carried away there. It's just that i'm a little bit ABSOLUTELY LIVID. Anyways, here are some pros and cons of Civ V. Pros; -No longer will you sit down and wait for minutes to go by because GMod has nothing for you to play! -Enjoy being a  to everybody around you with almost no consequence because why would you not play on the easiest difficulty? -Nuclear warfare isn't as bad as it should be! -One of your cities just exploded? Make another seven! -Extreme online capabilities -MODS MODS MODS Cons; -Ghandi -Saudi Arabia -Ghandi -GHANDI -ING GHANDI -WHY GHANDI WHY -There's more difficulties than Chieftain?
Sasha Erin Alexain;-;Brilliant gameplay, challenging when you could face off huge armies against many countires countless armies. Strategic tree-advancement depending on how you like winning the game. Love the aspects like creating a religion that would ensure a diplomatic win and such.
IronCross;-;Probably the best game in the world !
CptAssCheeks;-;Diplomacy, culture and science victories can be summarized in clicking on the right buildings until you win Only fun if you win via domination
Darth Marek;-;One of the best games I have played. I highly recommend checking this out, and on sale, woah, you'll regret not.
Fxekyo | Crucial;-;Very original game which has brought lots of fun memories for me and my buddies :) If you want a strategic game based on real time events, buy this!
GloboboLord;-;I played 5:00 Pm I looked at the clock. The Slavs had guns already. 6:00 Pm I looked at the clock. Everyone hates me for destroying Carthage. 7:00 Pm I killed everybody who opposed me. 8:00 Pm I looked at the clock. 6:00 Am -10/10- Still have the Last Turn Syndrome I guess...
Superuser;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a very fun and strategic game. The mechanics in the game are amazing, and I would recommend this game to anyone - those who want to go to war, those who want to build a civilization, those who want to dominate the economy, or those who want to do scientific advancements.
kenaniah.drs;-;Love this game!
Simply Genesis;-;Great fun with friends!
Notorious B.I.G;-;If you wanna be trapped in your room by the chrystal meth of turn based strategy for days.This is an absolute recommendation.If you still have a job and family this'll strain your relationships for a few weeks.
NanoPiska;-;Love this game... I myself am a huge fan of the Civ series
TheSoccer;-;Really fun once you learn how to play!!
Diztrack;-;Either die as a legend, or live long enough to see Mongolia betray you.
Generalisimo;-;The game with the two expansions (G&K + BNW) changes completely from the vanilla game originally released... it is a completely new experience. You have new units plus a lot of new features to try. The new ideologies, plus tourism and the related cultural victory is a great new addition really. I havent got any problems finishing the game first on Marathon length on Prince (no special AI bonuses). The only drawback I find is that without many bonuses, the AI has a hard time to keep up with the player after the Industrial Era (especially if you run for the Artillery unit and start decimating the rest of the factions). Higher difficulty levels give many different AI bonuses to balance the game (some people may not really like this because it is very easy to notice the AI bonuses, especially early in the game).
itwins;-;The last time I played Civilization was Civ2. Although I bought both Civ3 and Civ4, I played for less than an hour each because they really sucked. As for Civ5, I had little faith in it but bought it anyway because I collect the series and I waited until it released the complete scenario packages at discount prices before buying it. Happily, Civ5 was nowhere near the suckiness of its predecessors. It's really very good and addictive, much like Civ2. However, after all this time presumably dozens of patches and updates, there are still a lot of bugs, some annoying and some even showstoppers. Good thing the showstoppers can be corrected by a simple savegame reload. But the worst is probably it's very slow even on my Intel i7 RAID SSD system. It could even take for the game to think a couple of minutes each turn when you have conquered much of the world map. Last but not least, AI seems weak. A hundred hours gameplay later, the computer players have never declared war on me. It's always me declaring war on them. 4 out of 5 stars at the most...and I am being generous. Nonetheless, I still recommend it.
Tommerer;-;Civ 5 is a brilliant game. It has beautiful graphics, perfect performance (on proper machines that can take it) with detailed and handy systems for creating your own civ. I suggest the DLC due to its offering of a new religion you can personalise which is always fun. Gets boring pretty quickly, I've found it best to play in multiplayer with friends as it gets very boring very quickly as theres not much action at the start, even if you set the speed to fast. BEAUTIFUL WILL RUN ON MOST COMPUTERS BORING AT POINTS
Thunder Legion;-;Awesome game, I had a 1000 year long war with Japan... then I got nukes.....
Toby Maguire Spider Man;-;Other than slow load times, especially when you are running Mods and playing on a large scale with lots of civilizations this game is too fun. Adding wonder and building mods also adds so much more depth to the game, yet can slightly imbalance some strategies.
gonewrong;-;Best turn by turn strategy game ever. but remember to tink!
OmAGiC;-;Awesome game ! Maybe a little easier than CIV 4 but still needs some thinking. Nice graphics and sounds. It is most fun with the Brave new Worlds DLC... 9/10
Willie Jk;-;9/10 - This is a GREAT game. +tive Points - Contender for most addicting game I have ever played. Literally, you'll say 'I'll just start playin...holy  its been seven hours'. Civ 5 perfectly encapsulates an all-round fun experience, there is so much to do in a single playthrough, but all of it comes together in a brilliant package. Every civilization is different and requires different tactics, but all are fun to play as (personally, my favourite is Greece). Becasue of this you'll have so many campagins you just lose your life. Multiplayer is UNBELIEVEABLEY FUN. A whole day can just be spent with your friends just having a brilliant time. Combat is fun, wonder races are challenging, every civ has personality, the map is beautiful, it is just fun. -tive Points - There are negatives however, mainly being in DLC. DO NOT BUY THE BASE GAME. BNW is required to play the game to its full capabilities. Without it the game is probably a 7/10. The only beef I have with this game is that it is made to produce DLC. You could see it from a mile off, just like with Beyond Earth. I'm also not a fan of the difficulty settings; I'd prefer it if the AI were smarter, and not just given buffs to improve their play. This means it is no where near the most challenging stratergy game, when competing against the likes of its Paradox brethren for instance. Overall this is a very fun and addictive stratergy game, but BNW is REQUIRED!
Captain Huntsman;-;Every hour spent on this game has been a good investment. I was skeptical at first, seeing as how I had never seen myself as a strategy game fan but Civ 5 changed my perspective on that within the first few minutes. The diversity and depth of the game is astonishing and is worth everything and more.
Dickbutts;-;This is probably my favorite turn-based strategy/board game that I've played. You should play it.
Shonuff;-;One of my favorite 4x games provided that you get the Brave New World DLC,also has a great mod community a must own for 4x lovers
THEsmallPRO;-;Civ 5 is one of those "different" games, you know your just bored of playing a fps and you're like "oh!" i feel like i want to play a game that is ACTUALLY not a fps!, and thats were Civ 5 comes in through the door and punches you in the face and is like "what the  man, why does no one like me and everyone only plays fps games" and i'm like "because no one has no ing clue on what the history was for the japanese." THE END
BIZARE;-;To be honest i cant believe i got this amazing game for free! the developers deserve recognision for making such a fun stratergestic game like no other. This provides hours and hours of fun on multiplayer and yes even singleplayer! Before you know it, its bed time and youve got to part with this smooth running, great looking, fantastic game! Its defintley something your guna play often with a group of friends. Great. 7/10
fEDex;-;Its like meth, but you'll lose more friends by using this.
Ackerman;-;civ 5 is a horrible game
Burlap Jesus;-;montezuma scares the  out of me
Hayther;-;Samurai, Nukes, and Giant Death Robots. 10/10
BOT Clippy;-;Much joy. very excite. many long.
Huffle Puffle McGee;-;Yes, this game is absolutly brilliant, it has beautifull graphics and the gameplay is smooth. The loading screen takes an age but it is so worth it. Very few/no bugs that ive seen are in the game. 10/10 GET THE GAME
Gay Bacon;-;This game is the sh*t 10/10 Worth every penny. And also ruined my life
_loco_;-;An amazing, well-thought out game that is extremely fun and replayable. Although it has its flaws, the game is still great.
Shoot Your Eye Out;-;Perfect
Ahmuhphagit;-;Masturbatory power trips at their finest.
Charles' Pants;-;10/10 Nuked by Gandhi
TheRamblingMarks;-;Spent my entire weekend trying to keep America from curbstomping me, whilst simultaneously telling Caesar to f*ck off while making pottery. 10/10, gold stars all around.
Silentwill;-;Great strategy game! The endless ways you could build your city keeps the game interesting upon playing over and over.
MannedBitcoins;-;This game is simply amazing.
John Smith;-;It's like CIV II with goods
[Volk]Gunslinger1127;-;Fun, If you like a game in which is very time consumeing and alot of stragity involved. Also when playing mutyplayer you can have great team work , Or just try and kill as much as you can
KurlyWurly;-;Buy it and become addicted!
TaliTek;-;THIS GAME IS FREAKING AWESOME.
n0cturN ~ KnifeTrading;-;I nuked everyone as Gandhi 10/10
[Sengoku Jidai] hylianlink5000;-;Wanted to see how France would do... In the middle of Africa?! Want to reach space? Want to create a cultural influence which makes other civilizations culture look insignificant? Or maybe your faith in the powers that be will lead you to glory? Want to do all of this and more? Go ahead, these things aren't only the greatest parts of Civilization 5, as you lead your small minute civilization to greatness. Or failure, if you are destroyed by the strongest who can stand the test of time. But never mind that, can you? The main strength of this game is the wide amount of flexibility allowed for every leader, but still keeping their image and real life legacies intact. So what if the Russia didn't actually go down the "Freedom" path, or America didn't choose "Piety" over "Rationalism?" It all adds to the way the game is smooth and easy going, whilst making sure none of the leaders are changed in any way to their real life counterparts. Overall, this game is a strong interpretation of the real world. Many games, such as the Democracy franchise, simulate the political aspects of *Modern Life*, but no game can better Civilzation V on its simulation of the development of mankind.
Akashi-;-;Great game
Pejout;-;I played all the Civilization games and enjoy wasting my time on it.
[SHNK] Splendifirous;-;Great strategic game. Strongly advise trying the demo.
Dr_Hax242;-;An Amazing Game, people who want a challenge have to buy this.
SpaceCatMeow;-;countries and stuff
Nouvelliste;-;This game is ing fabulous. Highly recommended. The Gods & Kings and Brave New World expansion packs are a must have.
Scotts a Faag;-;SOOOOOO addicting
Mr.Mongoose;-;Oh dear god, where did all my time go? Where am I?
redrum91825;-;WARNING: Highly Addictive. Sid Meir's Civilization V is a turn-based strategy game designed to take you through the eras of mankind while you expand your civilisation. There truly isn't another game on the market which delivers an experience quite like this. The game features no story driven campaign mode, the closest being scenario games through DLC, Instead you set-up your game preferences and launch. The game typically begins with one combat unit and one settler unit who will form your first city. This is where your story begins, the game will always offer a completely different experience from the last match played due to its random seed generator, different civilisations personalities and resource placement. Personally I feel what can limit a good experience of this game is a lack of imagination. One match I formed an alliance with my neighbour Rome early in the game because of Mongolias warmongering and mass expansion of its territories. So together I the Ottomans and Rome formed a coalition military and advanced on Mongolia to knock them down a peg or two. Soon after we declared war on Mongolia and we sustained a few loses Romes forces pulled back. I could only assume this was due to their economy being in recession and couldn't afford to train new troops and risk Rome being defenceless. My economy however was booming due to my northern trade routes with the English, so my forces pressed on, determined to liberate the captured city-state of Monaco from the blood thirsty Mongolians. My troops succeeded at a high cost, losing many regiments and more men being crushed by the Mongolian might on their journey home back to the capital. It was at this moment Rome stabbed me in the back and invaded my lands with a huge force, destroying my trade routes with the English and bringing my income to its knees. The rest of the game and my relationship with Rome turned into a back and forth battle of gaining and loosing territory from each other, while my relationship with Mongolia grew stronger. Why did Rome do this I hear you ask? Because they were simple being racists. Or at least thats how I interoperated it through a politicians indirect use of language. Unlike many strategy games, turn-based and real-time Civ V can be picked up pretty quickly. If this is your first Civ title you'll be familiar with the formula in not long at all, its a very easy game to learn but can be a hard game to win. Sometimes it can feel like the AI isn't even trying, other times you can come under constant invasions. If I had to pick the worse point about this game, itd be the AI in diplomacy isnt perfect with a few of the dialogue options making no difference to what the outcome will be.
KingColeman23;-;Great addition to the Civilization series, with all the DLC the game evolves and becomes an even more intriguing and challenging experience.
Dumpster Diving Diva;-;Egypt is overpowered.
TheCommander608;-;This a highly fun and addicting game. It is a little different from Civ 4 like getting rid of health of cities ( sadly ) and the stacks of units ( thankfully ). I also recommend getting the expansion packs as they add much more bulk to the game ( more diplomacy , international trade , religion , etc. ) 10/10
Strayed;-;This is a absoloutsly fantastic strategy game, the best of its kind. Extremely, Highly Reccomended.
T-Beaun;-;This game didn't cure my virginity :(
parkerdrummer;-;LOts of fun you should also get civ 5 sdk
DynamicXL;-;A very casual turn-based strategy game. Great game, do not hesitate just buy it!
Ethon;-;This game was good on the free weekend, can't wait to eventually get it with the Bundle! :D
Tyrion Lannister;-;This game can get very addicting and is very fun in multiplayer. Other strategy games multiplayers should mimic this one as well as have there one kind. How you play the game is very addictive and its like you never want to stop and always say "Just one mroe turn" turns out to be 24 turns. Def a must buy for anybody even if your not a big fan of strategy games, as this one doesn't require as much thought process as many other strategy games.
Lesio;-;Simply one of the best strategy games I've ever played. The best thing about Civilization is that it's so different every time you play it, it never get's boring. 12/10. Would bang.
The Janitor;-;Holy crap this is fun Archers op 10/10 would nuke everyone again
Pahdul Ko Nebeniit Kelm;-;Great game but you need lots of time and all the expansions. I'm a big fan of the Civ series and have spent countless hours on the past games.
DrFahrenheit;-;Awesome game. Recommend it to anyone who likes RTS games or TBS games.
Table;-;in dis gaem, u pway ash a tiem travling prestitent, tryin 2 be a hela dope country u strt out as da leadur of ur countre, but ur contres hella dumb and pore, so u gota make it hela smart by growin it akkordinly as u gr0w it up, ull start 2 meet other sivs liek ching chon cheena or mummy get da camra egypat, who r also time travling like u sometiems, thye'll buly u and try to get rid of u, so u gota use ur cuning diplomacy to get rid of em. or ur cumming miltary to rekt dem there are alota ways 2 win. u can be da worl leady by bein social with sity states and gibeing them mone. u can take ova da worl by captuing a contres capital with ur militarie. u can be hela smart and land a prob on a comet and get yeld at by feminsts. u can be make hela pantings and get tourism in ur contrie, causin every1 2 move there. or just build alot of worl wonders and wait intill the year 2050. dis gaem is kinda like a faecb00k game, except u caint pay monie 2, and it ends eventualy Found myself playing for awhile, I enjoyed it. Get the DLC.
KYLLE;-;Civilization 5 (Civ V) i s one of the greatest Strategy games ever Just like all the predecessors. Lots of difrent way to play and never ending game time
Moon Moon (Winter);-;I highly recommend this game. The graphics are awesome and the gameplay is so open that you can run any civ how you want (although some strategies are more effective than others with certain factions). The game allows for so much variation between individual games and you will never play the same match twice because of random starting points and different civs that you face.
Srrin;-;What can I say, Pew Pew! Let's go to war, or not. Your choice.
Gabriel;-;ing Caesar...ALWAYS there to  thing up...for  sake, i just trespass your land once...!!!!!
Nuns Of Anarchy;-;its good
Dax Strife;-;Only get if you like turn-based strategy games that can make hours disappear from your day.
L.;-;I have not played many hours of Civ 5. But I would like to give my intial thoughts and views on this game. I would like to start by comparing this game to a Board game. Think Catan with a little bit of risk moved in. Now that you can view it as this, now add in a little of Age Of Empires. This is a turned based version of these games.(Board games are usually turned based) The atmosphere is great and the initail game I played had me stuck for 6 hours straight. This game is very good as it keeps you stuck in for the long haul. The Objectives in the game are great as there is more than one way to win: -You can build a giant army and march across the battlefeild crushing your enemys. -Going the cultural root and increasing your artistic side of the city. This gives the game varity and replayability. The diffrent races/world leaders you can choose from also gives the game a great uniqueness that allows for hours of gameplay. There is no story there is just advance you civilisation (5) to the best point by researching diffrent things and building unique buildings from throughout History. There is a multiplayer that I have not yet delved into. I believe the multiplayer would increase the game time by at least another 2-3 hours. I have an estimation that each game on normal of about 6-8 hours. This game takes some thinking and a few of the actions take a while to figure out. This game is very good at explaining what you have to do to learn how to play. From what I have played so far, I would say this is a very great game and has given me the longest single sitting in anygame I have played in for a very very long time. Well worth a look. (At the time of this review, The game and the dlc is avalible on humblebundle.com for $15 as well as some other games.)
[TTRO] MooChaqaman;-;New to Civ? Play Civ 5!
Sactic;-;Civ 5 is the best 4X game ever made, better then even the great civ 5. Not only does it look great it feels and plays great. Get the BNW and GK to make it even better! Who doesen't want to be gandhi and take over the world? I would also suggest you play it with friends since back stabbing your "friends" never felt so good. I give it a 8.5/10 and a 9.5/10 if you got some of the dlc like BNW and GK.
Inepi;-;worst game i've ever played 999/1000
GreyGhost;-;This game taught me more about foreign politics than the education system has.
Miles-dEN-kungeN;-;I have played the Civilization IV as well, and I got to say that this truly beats the IV. I will absolutely recommend this game!
GreenDragonSlayer;-;I love civ 5 but the only problem i have with it is not the game its the mods. They are all for Civ 5 brave new world. I saw a cool mod that brought the lord of the rings to Civ 5 but it was for brave new world! I recomend people who played other Civ games but for those who like mods to spice their game up I do not recomend.
Penmin;-;Very good. I think the decision to tone it down from IV was well-minded, but I think they over-simplified it. It felt kind of scummy to have to get GK and BNW to get features that would be a one stop shop in IV. Graphics are good. I like the Civilopedia and the historical accuracy. I reccomend getting BNW instead of GK, because BNW adds the equivalent of 2 expansion packs for the price of one. Unless you really want the Maya or the Celts. Still good game. Like the scenarios and pitboss. Don't think that games with expansion packs you don't have should be shown. It saves a lot of time. BUT IF YOU LIKE CHANGING HISTORY AND DOING TROLLS TO AI THAT DON'T KNOW THAT YOU'RE TROLLING THEM, GET THIS GAME.
Capt.Sweglord;-;One.. more.. turn..
Irishalian Stallion;-;The best game
DragonFire;-;Its like risk, only you can save and come back to with withouyr your cheating little brother moving all your crap around.
Wingman#24;-;Look at my play time and you figure out wether I think this is a good game or not. You can't go wrong with it.
Roast Beef;-;Great stuff if you like spending a LOT of time on turn based strategy. A lot of good things can be said about the game and im sure everyone said it already. As a bad thing ill say: if you like loading and saving a lot, you might get bored easily as loading screens take ages to go by.
Squish;-;Civ V is my favorite Civ so far (maybe not counting Civ II, but at this point, my recollections are mostly nostalgia). I may have put more hours into Civ IV, but that was because of Fall From Heaven, an excellent mod. Civ V introduced so many wondeful changes including hex based maps, 1 unit per hex to stop idiotic unit stacking (though I think they should have let civilian units stack on each other), and a revamped system for defining your civilization through policies. The Gods and Kings added more of everything, which is what I wanted it to do.
Handsome Ralph;-;"Sell the house. Sell the car. Sell the kids. Find someone else. Forget it. I'm never coming back. Forget it."- Typical Civ player an hour after they've started playing. This game will devour your time, and you will love every minute of it. Buy it now.
BOT Vadik;-;Classic game, the fifth iteration is by far the best! After a bit shaky 4, the fifth take on the immortal classic by Sid Meier hits the sweet spot. Not only is it gorgeous, smooth, and well-designed graphically, but it offers a great variety of features and complexity which does not feel forced. Recommend to play with both addons available to date. "Gods and kings" was not particularly good when it came out, felt a bit early and not ready. The second addon though fixed all of the problems, while expanding those that felt a bit lacking. If you got that turn-based-itch, look no further than this game =)
Azazel;-;AMAZING! You should get this if you don't already have it. ( Always kill every other civilization o.o or they keel you!)
Foxtrot;-;Without a doubt one of the most dangerous addictive gaves I have played.
1Ra;-;The beans have never been cooler
Kim Jong-Un;-;Definitly one of the greatest games of all time. Playing as some of the greatest civilizations ever to walk the Earth you must race for victory. Unlike some games, in this there is multiple paths to take on your way to victory, including scientific advancement, taking over the world, and discovering the United Nation. This game never gets old and is always fun to play.
Bobotron00;-;This game is Amazing, Get it
ChalupaInducedStroke;-;Sid Meier's latest entry in the award winning Civilization series is fantastic. It allows you to rule a country however you would like, be it peacefully allying yourself with others or steamrolling them with the feet of your armies. The two expansions, although steeply priced, is a must for the full experience and i reccomend the dlc strongly. If you love 4X games and have a lot of money in gifted steam cards, than i highly reccomend considering Civilization V. However, if you couldnt put a lot of time into one saved game (a standard game could be awhile,) then you might want to look at less time intensive titles. 10/10
Patchy;-;Buy this game and it will eat your brains. 0/10 needs Shrek civ
Gangbangbaby;-;It's a great game full of adventures and upgrades. You can research really excisting projects and monuments. It looks a bit like Age of Empires II, but I think this game is more fun (and more expensive).
tom_hughes;-;Game constantly crashes, I rarely go 10 turns without having to restart the whole game; this is with running off 8 GB of ram with an intel core I5 processor. Very frustrating! On the rate occasion the game works it is a great game and highly addictive!
DudeMansBurgers;-;This is a good game but SOOO much DLC.... They want all our money
Caiden;-;"Our words are backed with nuclear weapons" - Mahatma Gandhi the Terrible of India Nothing more to say. 10/10
Wilhelmus van Potato;-;AMAZING strategy game. It is very fun, although, it is far better if you can get a group of friends together. Highly Recommend.
TheAssassinStig;-;I'm going to get right to the point right now. Civilization V, with Gods and Kings and Brave New World, might just be one of the best PC games I've ever played. The potential for in-game experiences are limitless, and the amount of customization is greatly welcomed, which goes from individual unit names to complete civilization mods. In addition to that are the scenarios, which also have multiple ways to win, as you rewrite history, or complete it again. Gameplay wise, the AI has gotten much better with the DLC. On the vanilla verson of this game, there is room for improvement in quite a few aspects (which, for the most part as far as I know, have been fixed with the DLCs). While this may not be a big problem for players new to the Civ series, for those who have been into Civilization for a while may be disapointed with the basic version of this game. However, if you are willing to get the DLC, the game is absolutely spectacular. In other words: New players should have no issues with the game, but some more experienced players might be upset with the vanilla version. With the DLC, this game is one of the best out there, but the vanilla Civ V, along with Gods & Kings and Brave New World is $90 in all, so if you want the best experience (IMO), I would slowly get the DLCs until you are all caught up, or you are satisfied. As for fun value, I would say this is the best purchase on Steam that I have made. 500 hours well spent, and hopefully many more. The game is as challenging as you want it to be, but regardless, you WILL find yourself going for just....one....more....turn. You might lose a bit of your social life, and find that you just used up 8 hours when you thought it was only 2-3 hours. But damn it, at least it was fun. Overall, with out a doubt, I would recommend it.
TripTheFox;-;One of the all time best turn-based strategy games, everything that made IV great plus much needed improvements to graphics and game mechanics. Don't expect to just play a short game, be ready to sink a few hours into trying to dominate the world. "Brave New World" and "Gods and Kings" DLC really are necessary to get the full experience, however.
xSteelCandyx;-;A game that requires commitment but once you get on the right track it is very enjoyable!
Swirly27;-;This game is amazing, I recommend the Brave New World pack
Miyamoto Musashi;-;I say, playing as Oda Nobunaga and getting George Cromwell born in the land of the rising sun really made me smile. And Gandhi nuked Osaka twice.
El Guapo Numero Uno;-;I bought this game about a year and a half ago. I had read many reviews saying that this was a terrible game and that buying this would be a mistake. I originally heeded these and bought Civ 4 instead. One day I was at Target and saw it on the shelf and decided to try it out and see how it was. I am so glad I decided to buy it. I have 90+ hours and it is still fun. The one unit per tile is nice because it eliminates the person who would group 50 units on one tile and totally demolish you. The original damage system was good, and with the 2 expansion packs it is even better. I remember that in Civ 4 I frequently saw archers take down helicopters and it angered me. It now has a damage system of 1-100 so with each archer giving 1 damage it would now take 100 archers to take down one helicopter. The original game is very good, and the 2 currently available expansion packs make it even better. Gods and Kings adds religion, more Countries, more units, etc. Brave New World improves religion adds tade routes, adds civs, units, etc. The game is worth $30, but commonly goes on sale for $7.50 so you should just wait for a sale. I would give this a 9/10.
Rampage;-;This is worse than crack , 11/10 , would buy again !
Prismaticboy;-;If you buy a game purely from how much hours you get from it, this game should be worth 100+. It's  how much time I spent the first week I got this game. I spent the whole first week playing this game. Wake up, play, eat, sleep. Wake up, play, eat, sleep. For a week. FOR ONE GAME OF CIV. Just buy it if you want to lose the rest of your days. It is now belong to Sid Meier.
Honest Abe;-;this game is amazing!
Cupcake;-;A must have for anyone who likes turn based strategy games. The game itself is fun and simple. It's a bit overwhelming at first, but when you get down to it and play a couple of turns, do a bit of reading on the units and structures, it'll all make sense. It is, however, a lengthy game. It could take hours or days to finish a single game. This is practically this game's only major flaw.
MALFURION;-;Addicting. ... like its predecessors... a game to spend the whole day saying , just one more turn ...how i missed my Civ Marathons ^^ !
Gruppenfhrer Jordan The Teddy;-;It's ok
[] RogueCupcake;-;I think this is a wonderful game and I have played manyu hours of multiplayer. That gameplay is really fun and I reccommend this game!!!
Ryanasaurus;-;A great play for those who are willing to stay on the same game for hours and hours. The game itself has tons of replayability, and has some great, well priced expansion packs that add even more stuff to the game.
ST34LTH;-;I can deffinitly recommend this game to all strategy game lovers, If anyone ever played any of the earlier civilization games, you should not expect it to be too much like the older ones. Yet even though stuff has been changed or even taken away, that is more than outweighed by new additions, extremely well done graphics, the new soundtracks, and the new combat system.
BigBaum;-;Seriously? It's Civ 5. If you don't own this game already,you have something wrong with your head brain. If you ever wanted to Nuke Ghandi, backstab Boudicca, and setup trade agreements with Geroge Washington all in the same turn, this is your game. If you ever wanted to invade Rome with a mix of spearman and tanks, well you're stupid, but buy this game. If you haven't bought this game, buy this game.
LazyLizard;-;Best stratergy game of the decade.
Luke Alderslayer;-;One of the best games I have ever played. Incredibely fun when playing with friends.
arch0nmyc0n;-;Excellent game. Just enough of everything. I played original, G&K and BNW. While there are some thing I'd like to see improved, amazing game overall.
theshinymew64;-;This game is one of the best I've ever played. It's a deep simulation game that is good to play in both single player and multiplayer. I'd definately recommend this to any strategy fan that has somehow missed this. (I think that this with BNW is better than Civ IV, but Civ IV is good too.)
Ark;-;You may have heard jokes regarding this game and its ilk that go something along the lines of "Just one more turn oh hey it's 6AM". You are mistaken. Those are not jokes.
Jenna;-;Who knew a strategy game could be so dang fun!
StealthGod;-;Absoloutlet love this game, really good game to pass the time especially when bored.
chibeamken288;-;Greatest game ever
Flamingwhisper;-;A brilliant game. On the higher levels, it is challenging, yet just as addictive. Multiplayer gameplay is amazing, especially with expansion packs enabled, however, make sure you (and your partner/s) have a stable internet connection, as the game may have a tendancy to drop mid-way through. There are many Mods available for this game and I adivse you all to check them out. I am an avid fan of Sid Meier and cannot wat to see what they come out with next. Definately recommended.
a gas can;-;With way more than 200 hours of gameplay (Steam is always about 40% of what I actually played), this is my most played game in my library. This is not the greatest game of all time, but it is probably in my top three, with Portal 2 as the greatest game of all time. While this game does take long, it is worth it and very consuming! I love this game and I would most definitely recommend it! I love this game!
Drehman - The Ant;-;So, my friend said this was a good game. I bought it. OMG!!! This game is easy to get the hang of but extremely difficult to master! So many different civilizations and so many different factors! A turn based game where you control all of your units and build buildings and wonders. Construct the statue of liberty and the pyramids in 1 city and build other cities to grow your civilization. There is so much to do on this game and so much replayability! There are so many variants! You could play as one leader one time and play that leader again the next game and the outcome could be completely different! You could win a culture victory one time and a domination victory another time! And, the expansion packs add a bazzilion more things to do, like there wasn't enough already! Simply, GET THIS GAME!!!!!!!
Speedychive;-;Brilliant! The best turn based game by far. Hours can be spent playing this game with the possibility of victory being just one more click away. With the current expansion there are plently of scerniros to play in along with a large community of Mods. Just watch out for Gandhi!
GuardianSweetdream;-;One of the best investments I ever made and once you start playing you really don't want to stop until you win! Also makes any day gone in a flash! ;)
MegaBearsFan;-;'Brave New World' expands economic and cultural development, but pacifies 'Civilization V'. Peaceful management of your empire's culture and economy is now more active and challenging irrespective of empire size. War has been strongly discouraged via excessive economic and diplomatic penalties. Overall, there's a huge amount of base game content, and completely new features (in the series) keep the game engaging throughout. Full review(s) on my blog: http://www.megabearsfan.net/post/2013/10/19/Civilization-V-Brave-New-World-expansion-review.aspx Review of the major "Fall Patch" for 'Brave new World' (2013): http://www.megabearsfan.net/post/2013/11/25/Civ-V-BNW-fall-patch-review.aspx
Muffin_Man_The_Deity;-;This is a amazing game that i recommend anyone to buy but WARNING you may spend a lot of time playing this game
[MiT] iwy (NI8);-;So I bought it Friday night. By the end of Sunday, I had played 16 hours. Highly addicting. The games are upwards of 8 hours each and require a great amount of strategy-military, technology, diplomacy, resource management, etc. If you love RTS games, or even if you don't, get this. Civ is probably the the best turn-based strategy series. 11/10 would play forever.
Mountain Jew;-;10/10 would nuke Gandhi again
Apollo (   );-;This is a game for people with big  7 inch plus only
ConorWB;-;Good game but terrible online connection issues which never get sorted.
NadsThaC1own;-;Great strategy game. Better with friends. I recommend this game for everyone.
The Warlord;-;I love this game of stratagy and thinking ahead. It's good for training yourself to think ahead and think what your opponets might do next.
Left 4 Doge;-;Single player is fun, I have been playing it a lot the past week and even though I feel like I still don't get everything I don't have to in order for it to be fun. After getting a really good deal for the game and all existing DLC, I feel like I haven't even scratched the surface in things I can do. Only major complaint I have is that players online suck. Not as players, though they will mostly pick "overpowered civs" to try to compensate for something... No... as people they do. They will quit the first time something doesn't go their way (lose units to barbarians cause they are being dumb, lose out on a world wonder they were building, etc) to the point where you are playing against all AI before you can even build up an army to face the other civs. That takes all the fun out of trying to play online.
Cuffelink;-;This game comes with an addiction problem.
Collo;-;The best turn based strategy game out there!
Arashi;-;An excellent strategy and conquest game, completely worth the 20$.
Striker;-;1 more turned' my spring break away 10/10
Mr Forest;-;Awesome game which requires much intelligence
Agiri (Plant Ninja) #SoTired :^);-;Sometimes I play this game and my dog starts floating.
Y U N G  G L A C E;-;Aight, listen up. At first, it may seem like a boring  game. But that's because you haven't played it yet my a! Listen, As soon as you have a few warriors and builders up, the game gets incredibly fun. Like, you can  people and be like "Yo, what it is, ?" and divebomb entire ing cities, bruh. If you do have any power in real life,  get Civ 5 and rule entire NATIONS. Bruh, this game is better than watching Shrek  on an onion and eating it as part of the Shrekian Ritual to worship our lord and savior, Shrek. NOw, that's saying something. And even if you geet bored aand you're like "I beat the game on every single difficulty with every leader. Now what?" There's a bunch of stuff you can download n stuff. NOw go buy this game, or if you already own it, play it. 'Nuff said. TL;DR:  you, read the whole thinng you lazy piece of .
Ararati$he;-;The greate and best strategy ever! There are a lot of kinds of development of ur state in this game. You can become a rich person and make "BOOM" to other countries. On the other hand u can fight for every piece of land and struggle seemingly insignificant from the poor state. So this game is rly enjoyable and diversful!!!!!! 9.5/10
Stradag;-;takes forever but is fun only get if you like strategy games
SexyBalwantSingh;-;The greatest game ever!
Timbobjoefiz;-;this game is amazing!
Lord Denvoros;-;I have played this way way way way way way way way too much. But I don't regret a minute of it.
Brown Booty Ranger;-;this game is great. Love it!!!
RedEagle;-;Do not get this game if you have a short attention span, this is a strategy game that requires a lot of thinking, planning and time.
Edwin;-;The game feels finished, and plays well. It's an improvement over civ 4 in every way, save mutliplayer, which is awful, lacking mod support, animated leader heads, etc. Fleshed out multiplayer would be much appreciated.
Don Don Donuts;-;this is one of the better simulator games out there, accurately representing the hundreds of years it takes to build a dirt road ten kilometres long
Argentum;-;Civ V is the best in the series so far. Definitely one of my favorite games of all time!
Muffin_Annihilator;-;"It's worse than a plane flight"
Makken;-;The best game ever! Well....... i have played this game for 60hrs now so i think it's time for me to do a rewiew. I only have one word for this game and that word is AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! The game is adictive and fun becaus you make your own story like dayz, you do not have a specific goal exceppt make your civilization soo good and big as possibal. For you that don't know a  about this game read this: You start the game in the ancient time with some few settlers and warriors, then you found your capital city on a good place and start build things and units in your town. When you research new technology you will be able to build new stuff and when all of the technology in that era is researcht you will enter a new era. On you way to a great empire you will meet other nations and city states that you may choose to be friend with or wage war agienst. This is where the hard part start and when you start to make choices that madder, and it's here the endless replayability is becaus you maybe whant to have world domination or be a friendly guy that help empires with food and other stuff. Well that's the basic and i cant wright everything but i promise you that this game is one of the best games ever made becaus off the free choices and the power you feal when you controll a great empire or win a big world war. And one more thing! If you think this game is nice i strongly recommend the total war series becaus it has some simular stuff to civ 5 but here you get a game that is focesed on war and it's a combination of turn based stratigy and rts where you will get a close view of the battlefield with your troops. (rts stands for real time stratigy if you dident know)
Mont Gank;-;A pretty good strategy game with historically relevant civilations. Only really lacking some versatility. 7/10
PublicEnemy;-;Such strategy Much countries Many faith Such resources
Rednalooz;-;One of the best strategy games out there!
Baconater_1000;-;AWESOME IF GOLD EDITION!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Pounding Gaze;-;I love this game. If you have a life, you might want to discard it now
Towndrunk26er;-;Highly addictive. The just one more turn and I'll go to bed mentality has kept me up late to many times playing this game.
My Nigga Totoro;-;This Game, was a fan since Civ 4, and this game is a GREAT sequel. So i do really reccomend this, if your a fan of strategy.
pnPh;-;This game lets you play through history your way playing as the Japanese, England, ect. This is one of the best games I own currently.
Serinity;-;Fun with friends
DlondSpiceShaker;-;This game is easily my favorite game in my library it provide all the things i love in a game. A social aspect, great quality, and overall stratagy. Go get it now!!!
Tall_Man_Dan;-;Its fun to play but hard to get the hang of at first
SenseiWu;-;awesome! people who like to take over the world!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
ZoraZ;-;The game itself is really good, but if you've never played any Civilization or something similiar before you should've try it out first. (maybe your friend has it?) because, well, personally I love turn-base strategy game, so I thought this game'd be fun. After playing a bit, I can see why people are so addicted to this game, but somehow I can't enjoy it. (probably because it's too slow for me) I regret buying this game but seriously, TRY IT, if you like it, this game is really worth the money
Ixion;-;Fun, but it would most definetly be better with Workshop support for the Mac.
TheChocolateAxe;-;civilization v is one of the best strategy games i have ever played i definitely recommend that you buy it
calendir;-;a great 4X game that just keeps on getting better with each DLC, can't wait for the latest one
Cat of Handegg;-;It's like a RTS. Just with more civilized people.
A cop that is also a Dog;-;This game is awesome... until you meet Ghandi... he is actually the worst person ever...
Mr.Bang;-;This game is great for people who are looking for a long strategy game to play. Very indept and very enjoyable.
Sadface;-;Surprisingly addictive game, extremely diluted grand strategy fit for newcomers to the genre/idiots. If you play games like Crusader Kings avoid, but if your coming from games like Call Of Duty or Starcraft this might be for you. wait nvm Ghandi just nuked my capital brb
YoniJ;-;an realy awsome game... i liked it... and it actually teach me some stuff... you can learn stuff from the game and i had a great time playing with it
Zero [killer];-;If you are going to play this be sure to have alot of hours , yes literally some days it takes forever but when you have world domination nothing beats that felling. Myself really enjoys spending countless hours on this game just because you get to conquer all in any way you want.
Wolfmother;-;Heaps of fun to play with your friends and the single player is fun if you feel like trashing some bots with large militaries
AssU;-;WARNING: may cause severe addiction, losing grip of reality and pain in your butt.
ProfessorDinosaur;-;Civ V is my deault game, pure and simple. Only got an hour? Play a few turns and save. Cleaning up the house? Turned based is excellent to be able to walk away from while the other players are simulated. THe additional senarios leave much content yet to be explored but what I have only adds to the greatness. Mods! Pirates and Hobbits on Tatooine. and DONE
The Perpetual Meh;-;It's Civ. And the best one yet. What more can I say?
Chrome713;-;The classic game is back and better than ever.Featuring fun startegy and resource manegment.This is the best in the classic strategy game series.The ideal game for thise who like strategy games
SteveGazworth;-;Incredible! Must buy!!!!!
Matt Tao;-;This game has wrecked my sleeping pattern on many occasions Historically accurate to build Stonehenge in Babylon and A Great Wall around Mongolia 10/10, would spend days dennouncing Ghandi again
That-One-British-Guy;-;long and confusing but fun when use to
labcitychamp;-;DO NOT BUY... unless you want to waste 300+ hours of your life playing an amazing game!
Edvin Lysgaard;-;Its k, not as good as Lira but yeah
vpol;-;Great game with unlimited replay value.
Snowglobe The 2nd;-;totaly AWESOME!the gameplay is great,the graphics are awesome, and its just all-around EPIC.
tooley;-;This was worth failing Spanish
Rainbow Socks;-;If you're reading this 20 years in the future for some odd reason, scroll up and buy the game. I don't even care if Civ VI or Civ VII has come out in that span of time, you should still buy this, and get addicted in the process.
agent.cyclone;-;It's reet gud!!!!
dewknight;-;I play this way too much. This is a great followup for the Civ franchise. The DLC is worth it at any price, but you still get a great game without the DLC. If you buy this, you'll get used to the hours flying by.
KingArthur1995;-;This game is highley recommend for any one to who wants to play it
Pseudo;-;Just as addictive as all the previous Civilizations. A wide variety of civilizations to pick from with different units and benefits that give you a slight edge in certain playstyles. A worthy successor.
dister1;-;Not a bad game it is a real time passer
lol;-;Great game. Really time-consuming though, 10/10
maireadre;-;I've always enjoyed the Civ franchise, but they are soooo expensive. I really reccomend waiting until the game and its expansions go on sale to purchase.
Irennae;-;Ruin your life with one simple game!
Admiral Hackbar;-;Fun game! As a person who is not that into strategy games, it's not too hard learn and is quite enjoyable!
CatShark;-;Basically the best turn based strategy game ever. If you like long extended games with multiple win conditions, most of which do not even involve conquering, this is the game for you.
PostmanPat;-;I love how immersive this game is. "Just one more turn" couldn't be more true. I have over 100 games in my library but I keep coming back to this one.
BEN;-;One more turn and ill write this comment
Pizkwat;-;This game is absolutely incredible. I have played over 233 hours of Civilization V, and I have enjoyed every second of it. It is a highly in-depth strategy game, and despite having countless features and nuances, they are all seamless; every part of this game is intuitive, and nothing seems even remotely out of place. This is probably as close to perfect as the strategy genre has ever come.
White Ranger (Mike);-;Pretty all around outstanding
justwait072;-;It's an awsome strategy game.
lolwtfidk;-;Spent over 100 hours on this game, easily one of the best strategy games ever.
www.twitch.tv/saskuevsnaruto;-;Impressive game Good graphics , much better than 4
mirrorgleam;-;This is one of my all time favorite games. However, (please observe this warning) this game is like crack. if you have something you have to do in the next couple hours like sleep, work, take care of a child, really anything that requires you to have some track of what time it is DO NOT START A GAME! Personal example and reason I'm in the dog house: Came home after work around 10pm kissed the wife ate dinner decide to play a little civ v around 1030pm. Wife went to bed I started playing. Lost track of time and became extremely engrossed in the game, the progression of my civilization, which technology I should research next, Ghandi just nuked me so now I must exact revenge, Ghandi is gone now who is next on my list. Next thing I know my wife comes in the room and says "ARE YOU REALLY STILL PLAYING! THE KID WILL BE AWAKE IN 2 HOURS AND YOU HAVE TO GO TO WORK IN 6 HOURS! WHAT THE HELL IS WRONG WITH YOU!" My first reaction was there is no way I've been playing for 7 hours! I checked the time and sure enough it had gotten way out of hand. Just remember to keep a clock somewhere nearby and within view if you are planning on playing this game!
Avery;-;it's like Skyrim but with civilizations
Your Pal Stalin;-;Awesome Game! Very Addictive.
Draigh Rehadyn;-;Too many hours in this game. Just one more turn ;)
nfries71;-;Pretty good game.
mconnor3;-;It's addicting. Delete it from your computer before you flunk college.
TOMP!;-;The true benchmark for Turn-Based Strategy.
Imperiledthree;-;Civilization V is a very slow paced game that can take days to complete. Singleplayer is one of the most boring experiences I have had in a game. Grab a few friends to play with and this is a solid 8/10. Very few glitches I found and tons of replayability. For those Casual gamers out there, this is the way to go. Building your Empire or knocking others down, this is the best Empire building game out there. Solo Rating: 4/10 Multiplayer Rating: 8/10
drakelovestrains;-;this game is amazing it could not get ant better i heard there going to make a civ 6 cant wait!!!!
Terra;-;great game to waste your youth
NeroMercury;-;8/10 Glorious, really. Although, the concept of time needs to be addressed, you need to have it in ample amounts to fully appreciate the creation.
Radical Jam;-;Any multiplayer game lets you stab your friends in the back, but only Civ lets you keep pushing the same knife in deeper for weeks at a time!
Hx_of_Falls;-;MAN, this game was one of the first games i got on steam, and i love it to bits. The best part about it is the historical inaccuracies of it, like discovering the nuke with the Maya and bringing about the actual "end of the world". When you get bored of playing the game conventionally, mods can completely change the feel of the game. For me however, i was playing the vanilla version of civ 5 for 100 hours+ (i have no life), so when i got gods and kings/brave new world, it was like a whole new game to explore! I am still enjoying the game to this day, and i most definately will buy the next Sid Meier's game on the line-up. 69/10 - Swaggy as  !! :P
Fallout 4 :D;-;This game is realy fun
Catfished;-;This game damn its good especially if you like strategy games WARNING HIGHLY ADDICTIVE. But if this going to be the first game you ever play you are gonna have a bad time
Vanilla Gorilla;-;Civ 5 is a game I recommend for many types of people. Strategy lovers, 'Risk'-type game lovers and history buffs alike should enjoy this game without even needing a review! If you're on the edge about getting this game, I encourage you to buy it. It's a very popular game for a very good reason. I do warn, however, that if you enjoy fast FPS-like action, this is not the game for you. The game is all about thinking, and requires remembering certain complicated procedures of the game. There are lots of menus, lots of buttons and options and numbers that measure seemingly nothing, which is a bit intimidating at first but I promise, it gets a hell of a lot easier when you get into the mindset of a leader. As a history buff, I love the game for it's accuracy. It's like a history teacher's dream on steroids. Don't let the potential education value discriminate from the fact that this game is mind-washingly, time-wastingly fun! Be ready to spend hours on this game, I lose many nights myself!
Aceris;-;I have put so much time into this game. The Civ series always delivers.
Licecolony;-;If you're looking for an amazing strategy game to play with friends, this is the way to go :) Takes a few games to get used to, but eventually it can be really fun, especially multiplayer.
bainardhume;-;Another excellent entry in the Civilization franchise. Switching to a no-stacking model is a big change, but one the game pulls off. Expansions only improve the game; buy all of them.
John Mazzetti;-;You can build your own country, Run cities and declare war on other people. Sounds fun, but you've got to manage your economy, culture and other stuff like that. But, You get to nuke people, So, Yes. Buy it.
highkingnm;-;I have forgotten the sounds of birds and children's laughter. Sunlight is a faint memory. My friends have reported me missing and the neighbours have complained of the smell. 10/10-rebuying for Complete Edition soon.
Megapower;-;It's a fun game I enjoy it when I have nothing to do. If you're interested in history, you'll probably like this. Even though it's fun, it has some technical problems. 1. The AI sucks, it does stupid moves and makes cities in 1-4 tiles islands with very limited resources. You can go to multiplayer to fix this, but multiplayer has its own share of problems 2. Multiplayer is buggy and needs work. Sometimes you loose connection and there is a noticable delay even with low ping. There's some other issues with it, but I'm going to try to keep this review short. 3. The game has long load times. It takes 2 minutes to load to the main menu screen on my laptop, 45-1 minute on my desktop. If you have a SSD, store this game on it. It'll help. UPDATE: Recently Aspyr ported this game to Linux. I have tried it and it suffers from some issues, some fixable and some ignorable. 4. If you're a Linux user, the game runs only in DirectX 9 mode. Other than that, the port is REALLY GOOD. Surprisingly, the game runs faster on Linux compared to Windows using the Intel Driver. On the requirements it says that the Intel HD 3xxx series wont work but I can confirm IT DOES with a workaround. There is artifacting text when the Steam Overlay is on, just turn it off or set the overlay settings to low, fixes the problem.
Nintorii;-;An overall fun game with tons of replay value that is detrimented by the sheer amount of DLC. If you didn't buy all the DLC from the get-go, enjoy forking out a bunch of cash to be able to enjoy the full game, or have fun in singleplayer since almost all multiplayer matches require DLC. edit: I managed to get two of the expansion packs and it makes the game more deep and enjoyable, but I still think those who are suckered into buying any other version that the complete edition are going to be disappointed at the money they have to spend to fully enjoy the game. Still a great game.
@Ava3a13;-;GO TO MARKET AND BUY THIS GAME!!! That's one of strategy games i like the most, you need to conquer Rome in 100 moves can you do it? can your brain and eyes do that for you?! if YES go and buy this game, i rate 10/10
Drunkengaming;-;Completly worth buying mass multiplayer with good instructions and a interactive singleplayer I recomend considering a dlc or two
Zalzalec;-;One. More. Turn. @#!*&
aqua.alex.hart;-;What can you say about one of the best series of true strategy games. As with every version of Civilization there are small changes which makes an old player a little annoyed. But once you get used to the changes and get into the enhancements you know why you purchase every one of Sid Meier's branded games since the first Civ :) Amazing game play, single player, multiplayer. Many different variations never the same game twice, several difficult levels to challenge players of all skills levels. Defnitely one for the more intellectual gamers out there.
Mao Zedong;-;Civ 5 is one of those games that people who like the idea of owning their own empire will enjoy. You can wage war with other nations and be happy with fruits of your conquests, even though many risks were taken. With DLC, you can watch as your religion spreads across the world. Also, for diplomats, you can negotiate land, resources, and forge alliances. I would recommend this game for people who have a lot of patience and time on their hands, because this game is addicting as hell.
Mike53;-;First Civilization game I have ever played. I regret purchasing it and wasting my time on it. My productivity has gone down and it takes many more turns in order for me to accomplish anything IRL. 10/10
damacyman;-;hexagons man... much better than squares
Blind Temple;-;I play a little...
sinder87 IN EUROPE;-;1-Gold Coin Simulator 1942
stw.picknell;-;building you civilization you will
IAiTY;-;2 words ing awesome .... just remember dont trust gandhi -awesome gameplay -god of RTS -speacial units makes it more awesome 9.5/10 from me
Tweak;-;A game where I can finally make China and Japan fight. A game where Gandhi can drop 10 nukes on America just for the laughs. 10/10
FNG_DatLil_Gun;-;This game is awesome. I love how it takes time to build up, and you can go from the primted, to the very advanced. The only thing i see weird in it, is when the ai leaders denouce you for no reason when your already friendly with them, besides that i think the game is perfect. Heres a tip, when playing on two player, make sure you have your food right next to you eatting it all day because thats how long the game takes to finsh. I love and you will to.
*[MDC]*Kakek MadDog;-;don't let your guard down.... especially raging barbarian they will always haunt you, steal your worker, raze your city, and don't be friend with askia.. damn I still grudging him until now
msocdoc;-;This is an addictive turn-based strategy game that will keep you at your computer for hours at at time! I always find myself saying "I'll play just one more turn, then I'll get off" then I find myself playing 15-20 more turns before I finally pull myself away. This is because there's always something interesting happening during every turn and you feel the need to take advantage of it. This game also has low specifications, so you don't need a super fast computer to play it. Fun, immersive, historical, and captivating - definitely worth the price!
You're A Fraud!;-;CRIKEY! THIS GAME! IS AMAZING! THE WILDLIFE IN THE OCEAN SHOWS EVERYTHING FOR MY LOVE!
clay_the_awsome;-;Very fun and addicting.
Le Count H;-;This is a history fanatics dream game and I love it
ELUC1DAT0R;-;I would say this is a great predessor of the good old civ 4, I have good memories of Civ 4 and this does not disappoint. There might be some historical unaccuracies, such as nuke happy Gahndi, but still I can not say that makes this game bad. If anything you should deffinetly buy this game to play. You do not have to depend on multiplayer to find something fun to do in this game because you can do so much in it without anybody else with you. There are so many diffrent ways to play to get victory other than war, you can be a cultural based civ, diplomatic, or even my personal favorite buy yourself victory. buy this game. 10/10
Vultus;-;It should be Slavery as a Social Policy, and i can't understand why some evil historical rulers like Hitler, Stalin, Vlad The Impaler aren't there. Genghis Khan was an absolutely bloodthirsty ruler and i can play him as a pacifist. It's just a game. Nevertheless, Civ5 is maybe the best strategy game ever produced. It's real fun to control all aspects of a civilization, such as economics, religion, military...
danielthegamer;-;This is the best 4X game ever
Jordan;-;Great entry in the franchise
Milind;-;I've only played a little bit, but 10/10 IGN. Seriously, gg.
Stunnederella;-;Great game, huge bush.
Joefish_69;-;amazing game you will have lots of fun even if you lose you will want to keep on playing
Vandrash;-;Excellent strategy game for beginners and veterans alike. Eight difficulty levels allow players to fine-tune their difficulty levels, and user created maps/civ packages allow for ridiculous replayability. Excellent community on the web for single player and multiplayer. DLC is reasonably priced and goes on sale often. Firaxis could patch balance issues a little more frequently, but it's still pretty balanced for the most part.
Maximax Rule;-;ever since alpha centuri ive been looking for a simalar game that is more updated and can actually play multiplayer. civ 5 comes close but alpha centuri still wins im afraid but dont think that this isnt an awesome game. it is still one of the best games in my inventory
Kingmoney;-;THE best strategy games/series... One of the best games. Will keep you entertained for hundreds of hours. Puts the best of military strategy together with things like cultural and technological strategy and adds diplomacy (a little lacking but game play makes up for it) to create one of, if not the, best games I have ever played. The internal improvements, such as wonders and buildings, and choosing how to shape your civilization towards a certain victory condition even adds to the strategy. Throw in the GOTY edition, along with G&K and BNW and you have a highly developed and emerged strategy game that will give you thousands of hours of entertainment. Each civilization gives you a completely different experience and there are hundreds upon hundreds of combinations you can try. The DLC may get a little pricey, and the AI has some issues, but it is still, by far, one of my favorite games.
lemywincks;-;this game lets you act out your anger on the chinese by building a mass army and taking over their cities and renaming them stuff like "land of the small weewees" 10/10 GOTY
ralphboy888;-;Great game played over 140 hours, and loving it :D
Hans;-;This is a great game kys if u think otherwise
Gremlin;-;My go to game. I love this game.
A Sentimental Oboe Solo;-;Want a strategy game that's not too compex? I'd say Civ V fits the mold. You essentially face off against AI or human players to become the best real world nation/empire in a made up, earthlike planet. Scenarios such as the Mongols developing cultural superiority, Swedes conquering the world, and the Mayans sending the first man to the moon can happen, all of which resulting in victory for that civilization. Compared to other strategy games, Civ V may not have as much depth as other strategy games (including Civ IV), and there are many features that could be added or improved upon, but that's not to say that it's a mindless game. You need to manage your cities and armies and your empire overall well if you wish to win. I've spent hours upon hours playing this game and it still sparks my interests. If you do buy Civ V, I'd suggest buying the gold edition on sale. The game itself plus all of the DLC that goes with it is expensive, but I've seen the gold edition, which has all but one piece of the game's DLC, go on sale for about $12. If you see that deal and you like strategy games that aren't too complex, then take it.
Aikuro Mikisugi;-;This game is great for buying wives losing them in the forest and finding them slayn by internet trolls that look like Vin Deisal.
A.Akis;-;Play dis  ma n1gg4, kick some , launch some nukes, take over some other civilizations, pillage & plunder, or have peaceful relationships with other civs and swipe them in a cultural or science win... 9.8/10 Multiplayer can be buggy...
Curious Donger;-;I recommend this game to everyone who likes strategy/board games. It feels like playing a board game but much more fun! Go buy now
the lord;-;addictive and well made. cant wait for the next civ
edward starch;-;The next installation in Sid Meier's Civilization series of games, Civilization V is a wonderful turn-based strategy game in which players can forge the history of an earth-like world as they rule it. Augustus Caesar may declare war on George Washington, Catherine the Great may find that her cities are being bombed by Mahatma Gandhi. Initially met with some criticism over how it plays in comparison to its numerical predecessor, Civilization IV, Civ V is still an excellent game that is improved immensely by its DLC. Please note that anyone buying DLC may be better off buying ONLY Brave New World rather than Brave New World AND Gods and Kings, as Brave New World adds everything added in Gods and Kings save for a few Civilizations. If you enjoy Turn Based Strategy games with a focus on decisive victories through conquest, culture, diplomacy, or science, you certainly can not go wrong with Civilization V.
Kenny-X;-;Awesome game, im actually adicted.
[HUD]cab;-;This is really an upgrade from the old versions. The complexity and multitudes in achieving victory combined with the different civilizational aspects provides an extreme diversity in each game. The multiplayer experience is really the pinnacle of what started as CIVnet. This game is truly enjoyable in the company of friends in multiplayer mode.
Rguekittens;-;i have loved the civilization series bbuuuttt spending most of my time on civ 4 logging thousands of hours then playing civ 5 there is a huge gap and its so different im not saying its bad change alot of the new stuff i was looking for in civ4 but i personally feel that if civ 4 and civ 5 had a baby it would be a perfect game :p i have a hard time transitioning between the 2 games now but i do love how the game can be different every time. and if your like me you like to have more fun then is ment to have with these games. to create a story out of this sooo addictive game. i do enjoy how you can make a defensive line and hold back the enemy instead of in civ 4 where making a line of troops are so easy to cut through due to stacking troops (which over all i love stacking troops). the nukes are sooooo over powering builds a couple and can decimate any army in your path. i really love how there is actually a set number of resources and many different ways to spend it so you have to think ahead instead of just spamming troops with no limit (besides gold) . also compared to civ 4 instead of the AI spamming catapults they need to build normal troops. it is definitly improved from civ 4 and would definitly recrommend and really meets needs of how some of the newish games are. but always remember clicking the button is half the FUN!!!
Australian Empress;-;Played with friends. Tried to be neutral. One friend starts giving me troops. Other friend nukes me as a safety precaution. 11/10
Oli;-;Only worth buying if you can get the entire thing + all dlcs massively discounted. It's good fun don't get me wrong, but they've basically made a decent game, then broken it into parts to milk all the money they can from the franchise. Civ5 base + G&K + BNW = A decent game and worth buying in a bundle at 11.
pumpkinpieguy;-;I think I have a problem just got the game today already played 11 hours. I have friend, wait correction I had friends 10/10
DJB445;-;I love this game, it has an amazing progression system and tech tree, a lof of units, and many unique to certain leaders giving you incentive to play all of the factions.
[OCS] Noodles3996;-;One does not simply play this game for less than half an hour in one sitting.
Chris Steyn;-;Civilization v is altogether a great game that I recommend everyone should play.
Blinken;-;Best game of all time
Morgon Gordon the Freeman;-;Got Denounced by America for promoting International games. 10/10 for realism.
Desuberniis;-;One of the best games ever if you have a nice group of friends to play with. Me and my pals play all the time. worth the buy. also note YOU DO NOT NEED GOLD TO GET BRAVE NEW WORLD
Sahara Smoke;-;Love it you all should play this great game.
TIStiles;-;Great game that you can play multiple times and each time is different.
Murder Claus;-;this game is good everyone should buy it
gerb;-;buy this so you can play with me pls
TheGreenBastard;-;The game is amazing, very difficult to tear yourself away once you get going. The expansion packs are highly recommended as well!
Dead Pixels;-;If you don't own this game, you should.
wearestarrdust;-;What can you say about Civ V? If you dont already have this....buy it. Addictive as anything and so much fun. Yes it's an RTS but the turns don't get in the way. You will want to win on each and every civilization available.
Rajnovich;-;This is a very entertaining game. I find it very challenging, though that may say more about me as a player than it does about the game. It's a very good game from a genre I don't typically enjoy.
Georgia_is_a_Country;-;Get it.End of story.
Imazoo;-;Great fun game. Lots of flexibility and never gets old
MotherGoose;-;Fairly Dank
infernowhite;-;IT IS A VERY VERY VERY GREAT TURN BASED SRATAGY GAMES AND THE CREATORS DID A FORMIDABLE JOB ON IT !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1
Bobo the Monkey King;-;this is one of my favorite games ever. if you dont have this game something is wrong with you
Armageddon Catfish;-;This is a pretty dense strategy game. So many things to customize, from rainfall to world age, and at least a dozen playable characters. Hours will be spent playing this game, if you like it (I'm sure you will).
Tyson216;-;Wasnt really into turn-based strategy games but this is really good.
VeggieFiend;-;Since playing 98 hours of Civ5, I have learnt two things: 1. Trust no-one. 2. Make sure you check the time at some point, because you've probably been playing this game for 12 hours straight. Buy it now.
Nope.avi [engi fam];-;Stock up on the Hot pockets and Mountain dew
Spicy Durian;-;A horribly addicting game. Hours upon hours lost to this game.
KakkaCarrotCake;-;"Just one more turn..." "Great it's been 4 hours"
SapphireRE;-;>Playing single player >Ghandi goes to war with me >Cries >2 or 3 Barbarian armys come out of nowhere and attack me. >Cries harder.
BigBoydy;-;From what I played of this game it is a very good 4X however I would recomend picking up Brave New World along with the game as it sorts out a few problems the game had on launch, however if you like playing with more sinarios and civs then you could pick up Gods and Kings for a few new bits of content. The changes that where made to cultural victorys make a lot more sense as in previous civ games it was a little too easy to mass produce culture in citys and slowly but surely take over the world, not to mention you can now pick which religion you adopt and can add perks to help you with the type of victory you would like to accoplish. And lastly the big change and the most welcome from my perspective. Battles. They had to be the most frustrating thing about the previous game as tons of eneimes could inhabit the same tile as each other making seeing what was coming at you a nightmare, not anymore though and thankfully with the addition of ranged units that can attack without being attacked themselfs it makes combat incredibley fun and strategic, and no need to worry about a stray bandit coming in and taking over a city as they now have health that needs to be taken down before they can be captured. So if you are looking for a knew game to waste some precious hours on I see no reason why this one can't be for you.
Prownag;-;omg so epic much stategy such wow
Faps With Fury;-;I love this game. Out of all 53 games in my library Civilization V is my favorite. It's so easy to learn and understand. It's also very addictive. There have been many mornings where I've needed to get up at 8 AM and still be up at 4 or 5 AM playing this game. The mod support is also incredible. A lot of extra civilizations have been added for extra gameplay. There's also a ton of extra maps to download and play too. I would also recommend getting the Brave New World expansion when it's on sale. It adds a lot to the game. One of the best things about it is the international trading that comes in the expansion. It gives you a lot of extra gold. Civ V is awesome. Buy it.
The123er;-;Its i very interesting strategy game. It is a lot of fun. But it takes a lot of time to finish one game.
SpeedyVelcro;-;10/10, will have to take history exam again.
cC Chen, Honkifex Maximus;-;I used logically irresistible methods and initiatives grounded in Co-operation, Friendship, and Paternalism in the name of the Righteously-Guided God-Emperor to reluctantly yet out of necessity annex, under ethically restrained duress, the entire continent which composed the Egyptian Empire into my Greater East Asian Co-Prosperity Sphere. Working together, we shall strive to protect the Far East, which includes northeast Africa, from the savage and insatiable barbarian greed and aggression which inevitably results from Western Imperialism, and all of its various excesses and immoralities. I also made anime into an entire religion by implying that it wasn't one already. "38/10 I guess it's okay" - Mr. Haha Funnymaymay, IGN
Sim00n * full focus;-;Scumbag Ghandi. Kill him yearly when you reach riflemen and he still has medieval units. Also watch for Napoleon - he likes to fight - bring units close to his borders to slow him down.
Wood Glue;-;Why should you buy this game? You can create a personality cult religion. You can nuke people you don't like. You can send rockets into SPEHSS. You can BURN cities and lands. You also build stuff.
tanketom;-;Enormous amounts of diversity, tactical strategies, and historical anachronisms. Delightful game.
Tryphos;-;Eh, Pretty Good.
Angus is a MASSIVE TWAT;-;A very weak recomadation as it has poor mulitplayer (I belive it has been patched, but not tested it) but when it works its great fun waring with friends and AI is pretty good, when you put the diffuctiy up. There is no cobbled story element which is great. For all of its flaws it has many great redeming features and truly a must have PC game.
PexE;-;It's a great game. The only problem is that you always want to play and sometimes a match takes several hours.
Jeff Mangum;-;Play, it's cheap and can last you a long time.
Aly Applejacks;-;I never thought that Civilization V would be something I enjoyed. It was a gift from my husband and I gave it a shot only to humor him. Yet, somehow, it entranced me for ten hours straight that first play. I love it! Great for people who are history fans (like me). The game play is smooth and easy to understand and is far more addicting than it may appear.
Magikitty;-;Out of all of the time wasters on earth, Sid Meier's Civilization V is probably the best. (and most effective)
Leevoh;-;I literally had to force myself to stop playing...
Epic Warlord;-;Civilization is a fantastic game and has a wide variety of choices and different paths to go. You are able to see the start of a civilization, and then you can see the end of your civilization in an armada of nukes. This game has everything!
Aurelian;-;I mistakenly bought this game before conversion to local value and without sale discounts. No regrets. 15/10
MungySpap;-;Great Game!
Ya boi Lestah;-;[Wonder you were building] has been built in a far off land *WRROOOWWN*
Salamantas;-;I'm pretty new to the PC genere as I got my laptop this Christmas, and I also have never reviewed a game before. That being said I have to say even though I haven't played the game as long as most usually play it it's easy to see why this game has so much critical acclaim! I'm only on turn 135 and I'm hooked the game makes me feel like I'm actually a conqueror or I can be a diplomat or I can partner up with another civilization and take down an opponent that's been giving both of us trouble! The choices on how you take over the world are endless! I love how your opponents are given real world historic leaders as their avatars and you get one too! Each avatar is random unless you set it otherwise and each has their own special ability and traits! This entire review has been about the single player version of the game! I haven't even tried multiplayer yet but I plan on it soon! I love this game and can't wait to delve into it soon! 10/10 with the non official badass seal of approval!
Nuns N' Moses;-;Warmongering Ghandi has ruined my life
[NjP] Nightwane;-;More addictive than heroin.
Boltrag;-;This is a game where you control your empire and nuke the bejesus out of whatever the heck you want. But watch out for nations like the peace loving India, they will tank the crap out of you and stick you on the end of their tank barrels for entertainment. 11/10 would get death roboted by Persia.
Multihog;-;Very much recommended. Can seem boring at first(especially if you aren't familiar with the series' earlier games), but once you get into it, there's no going back :D Deep and addictive gameplay.
Jon Pertwee;-;Smashingly Brilliant
ECD_420;-;I was first introduced to Civilization on PS3, After playing it and having a blast conquering the game. I started looking for ports of it on the PC. At this pivitol moment I had discovered Civiliazation 5 along with steam. Playing this game ( as a person who loves RTS games and grew up with commmand and conquer and other such games) I had a near instant Gamegazm and almost creamed myself. (metaphorically speaking) The Lush, Deep and imersive strategy along with slew of subjective style win-scenarios (technology, culture, domination etc.) was great. The Choices for Leaders and empires is also well diversed and colourful in its own right. This game is very addictive and with all the DLC thats available for it makes it truly one of greats. if I were to say anything bad about this game. it would have to be that my computer is not good enough to run it in its full glory. My rating for this is 10/10
{158} Mcnolty;-;Solo or with a group this is a fantasticly in depth game.
IKaosI;-;>Boot up Civ 5 at 7PM >Multiplayer >Host game >Invite Friends >Start game >???? >5AM
KingJackaL;-;As a loooong time Civ player I was a little underwhelmed by the inital Civ V offering, though it was a good base. But with the first expansion it achieves a lof the potential I had hoped for. Awesome game, there's a reason so many people are always playing it.
Changed Oak;-;Civ V keeps me from playing my other games. It is so good and soo fun. Endless replayability. It will turn you into a tactical city building fan.
SlutCakee;-;great game but if you play against me....ill probably nuke you.
Zodh;-;One of the most educational games ever.
Gorger;-;Just one more turn........
Fluffy;-;This is a great game.
Red;-;Great strategy game, looking forward to the next one in the series.
Phystherapist;-;Luv this game so much recomend to anyone if you love any type of stategy even if you arent into turn based it is soooooo adicting. definitly get the complete edition definitely worth it. you could hate video games and fall in love with Civ V
McGonigal;-;Easily one of the best games i've ever played. I Played this game on single player for days without getting bored and could play it almost endlessly with friends on multiplayer.
Turnip;-;Amazing game, gameplay time lasts for 100 of hours and the game improves greatly with the expansion packs G&K and BNW so you can replay again and again and again.....and again.
Zomgrofl;-;My friend took Newyork from me so I couldnt have the fountin of youth, decided he didn't want the fountin so he razed the city and demanded 2 gold and 1 horse for a peace between our nations. 10/10 would lose again.
InfiNit_;-;10/10 would nuke civs three eras behind in technology again!
Ladiyus;-;This game can become very addicting.
The Mighty Dildozer;-;This game makes my netherregions very confused. 10/10
adnan tvrtko;-;Good game, but FIX FU*KING MULTIPLAYER
glshardman87;-;Played a little bit.
GravyBacon1;-;This is an amazing series and this game is the epitome of it! You definately need to play! sorry for my poor spelling :)
wolfanonm;-;I love this game espically the mutiplayer. it is so fun to get a bunch of friends together and play this game with them. I recommed this 100% to anyone.
Giraffe_ :^);-;Civ V is the type of game you play with the intention of finishing in 20 minutes. Civ V then laughs at you and makes you kneel before it as you play until dawn. Civilization 5 is an amazing game, it reminds me of when I used to play Command and Conquer Zero Hour. Civ V is packed to the brim with content, every time you play you learn something new. If you have some money, you should definitely pick up Civ V next time it goes on sale.
Bolt Vanderhuge;-;I have been playing the Civilization series since the late 1980's when I had it for my Atari ST and MS-DOS. The series has remained true to it's roots all along. Civilization V has continued in that tradition. I can highly recommend this game. I have not yet spent any time in multiplayer and more than likely won't very often if at all, not because of the game but because I prefer to play solo. The UI and control is well done, graphics and sounds also very well done. The fact that it has user made content support via the Workshop is a huge boost to the game options. Makes it infinatly replayable with that new content. So far the 2 things that I do not like is the fact you can not stack units which makes it tough to overwealm an enemy city or fortification. The other thing I do not like is the fact that land units can move across the sea without having to board sips, to me it kind of dumbs down that part of the game and takes some of the challenge away. In previous versions of Civilization you had to have ships to transport units across the sea. Overall the game is a lot of fun and in the end that all that really matters. Would recommend this to anyone who has enjoyed the earlier versions or who enjoys strategic games.
Hestia is Bestia;-;meh, not that good but worth a shot
Elgalad;-;Not much else needs to be said after you see that I've played this game for almost 700 hours since it came out. I'm a huge fan of Civilization and have played every iteration since the first. Each has built upon the last and I can't wait to see if there will be a Civ VI sometime in the near future. A turn based strategy classic that will remain in my top 5 of all time.
Sakata;-;Let the Confederate take charge!
Missouri;-;Great global strategy of all time.
[GC]SpiritWolf;-;To start off, I feel I should issue a warning.. This game is incredibly addictive, if you have the patience for it. I personally think it's a game you either love or hate within the first few hours of play. For those of you like me who have given it a chance beyond those few hours of engaging enjoyment, you got hooked and most likely will end up investing an absolute tonne of hours into Civ 5, making it well worth the money. Civ is one of the best turn based strategy games I have played. On top of that, the extra DLC, specifically; 'Gods and Kings', and 'A Brave New World' add a fair bit to the game and I would suggest them as a good accompanying purchase. Basic breakdown of the game is; you choose your world leader/race each with unique skills that tend to fit them decently well compared to their historic counterparts. Next, you settle upon new land of your choosing, begin earning production points, science points, faith points, gold etc to make your city grow and branch out to make new cities in land further away as you discover more and more of the map you've been given. Seems simple? not quite. You have constant pokes from Barbarian's and barbarian camps, hostile countries and city states. You can try to win them over and steamroll other opponents, or try and squish each and every single city you happen to come across, the choice is really yours. A few things that really stand out for me is the fact that it allows a lot of leway for different playstyles. Something of which I utterly love. I enjoy when a game doesn't make these invisible little hallways to make sure you only walk in that and only that direction per say. It lets you freely make your own mistakes or victories. Another point I will happily give it, is that all maps are randomly generated adding even more content and depth for the game as you never know what you're going to be thrown. You could start on a map that will only give you a lot of production upfront or one that gives you a lot of gold, or maybe one that already has luxury resources, it's all up to chance. And another point it hands down warrants is for the incredible voice acting and languages, they are impeccable. Graphics for a lot of top down RTS games that I have played don't seem to leave much room for detail, Civ5 blows most if not all of the others out of the water with their attention to detail. Zooming in closer to your map and cities are a joy. And if that all weren't enough, the work put into making all the character details, histories, traits and historically accurate backgrounds for wonders and characters are remarkable. Now in saying that, this is *not* a History Simulator, do not come into this thinking it will all be 100% historically accurate. Doing so would be incredibly difficult and would in turn not make it Sid Meiers Civ due to how AI's would play. You have accurate backgrounds and info files for world wonders, natural wonders and all leaders, that's about it. AI will not react exactly like they would have back however many years. (Mind you, I only add this in here as I have actually heard a few complaints about it.) However, it's major failings lie within the AI, now if you're not constantly playing against someone in a PVP duel, you have nothing but the AI to deal with. This can be a bit of a headache as they end up with unfair advantages such as finding an abundance of luxury resources all the time no matter the difficulty. If you're just starting out on Civ, this can be a quite daunting put off, if you are a Civ veteran, you'll see even more flaws. Even within the trading system it will sometimes bug, never coming out to a fair trade or even worse not giving you anything for what you've offered. Wanting to sus out what you would get for a certain trade? Most of the time won't work, no matter how much or how little the bot can have in it's inventory. All in all though, it is an incredible game well worth it's weight in gold(See what I did there?), with how many hours you will end up investing into it.
Jake Moody;-;great game :)
Dr.Chocolate;-;12 hours a game gr8 with friends but will get mad if they take forever to end their turn 6/9
towleboy;-;I came, I saw, I got nuked by Ghandi then a massive war destroyed my save file 11/10
abraham.lincoln;-;Love Civ too much!!!
Rocket_Surgeon;-;Vanilla Civ V is good; Civ V with the expansions is great. Whenever I start to get bored with this game, I just install new mods, and it's fun again.
Kragar;-;Awesome game, great visuals, gameplay and wide veriaty of races, units and winconditions. 1 con: alot of DLC,,,
David- selling tf2 bp;-;Great game, very realistic.
Bravoman;-;Beware the God Damn Wu-Tang clan
50Shades;-;gg very nice yes in syria this is very good use of program when terrorist.
[Lone] Wolf;-;Civ game spend 9 hours in a game then die from a nuke yet you still go back for more.
valueasset21;-;one of My favorite RTS game
Foxnine [koiti];-;If you like strategy games, you already played it, right? I'm getting addicted to this even and even more.
Anaf7;-;With the recent updates to resources and stuff, this game is even better. I declared war for cocoa.
therepoocminer;-;10/10 if you love turn baced strage games youll loves civ 5 also i would recmend the DLC/Exsation Packs
Hollytime81;-;Played this rather than study for finals. Flunked them. 10/10 would do it again
SarbiReyiz;-;Great game.
"RED";-;very good strategy game dont have all the DLC yet , but im sure it willl be even more fun!
[DG] pickle330;-;This game is great with all of the dlc's. Very fun to play with friends and also very relaxing. Never seems to get boring. Easily 10/10
Lewi;-;noice, really noice :)
Magnanimo;-;This Game never gets old. Its very easy to log in 100 hrs. Can't wait to play beyond earth. 9/10
ROESCHK /w/;-;Great
Unzen;-;Do not play if you've promised yourself "...just 20 minutes" for that will pass in a blink of an eye. Civ 5 maybe the most recent, the most expansive and potentially most daunting of the classic Civilization series - reinforced with a 234-page manual that comes with it. With those factors in mind, it's easy to imagine strategy new-comers, running away from Civ 5 in droves. But give it another look. Please! Civ 5 is the culmination of over 20 years of series development. Each game has been better than the last (which is a feat in itself) - and welcomes both seasoned veterans and newbies alike. The devs have beavered away on features that worked and ditched those that players felt weak. However, the single, most impressive attribute about Civ 5 is the ability to play the game how YOU want to play it. Want to be a peace-loving, pacifist society? You can be. Want to be a total powermongering and ruthless despot? Again, your choice. I wish I had more space to promote this! Buy it! :) 9/10
Nicdemus;-;It's boring, historically an inaccurate mess, not immersive and slow paced as all hell. Also one of the greatest damn strategy games I've played and know it to be the best I'll play for long. Until Civ VI that is. Supports a ton of playstyles and even losing a game would not bother, as it's incredibly fun to just... build and develop your empire. Also watch out, starting it once means all of your games will dust in your steam library for the next one to four weeks.
Mr. Person;-;A game for people like me, who have a craps load of time to create a civilization. Anyway, it's a lot of fun. Try it out!
Razpado;-;Civilization V An indepth stategy game with historical figures and events. Sid Meier knows stategy and when there are (at times) over 90,000 people STILL playing Civ V to this day, you see the proof how well this stategy game is made. Stategy games have always been my "take a break" from the shooter games. Civ V is the best of that break. If there is one strategy game to buy, Civ V is it! Is it your time to jump in to history and have the control?
AdolfEichman;-;Great game.This game will have you say "yeah ill play for a little bit" and there you are 5 hours later and you keep saying one more turn.one more turn..............
Dux Terrae;-;This may be too adictive for some people. But it is so worth it.
Shorty;-;Never before have I played a game as majestic as this. The graphics are simply amazing, the soundtrack immerses you in the whole experience, and it's the kinda game where you sit down to play, and the next thing you know it's 4 AM.
Jinalpa;-;My dad and I used to play Chess. My son and I play Civilization. It's the new strategy game.
null;-;Awesome :D. Best Strat's game i have ever played :D 10 outta 10
Xaviien;-;Awesome game! Just be careful not to start playing if you need to do ANYTHING else that day, and absolutely DO NOT start playing if you would like to sleep anytime soon! Highly addictive, beautiful graphics and an awesome community. If you haven't already, check out the CivFanatics Forum [forum.civfanatics.com] for strategies, mods and more.
Mod0;-;Civilazations has always been one of my favorite games. Do what you want, command armies or grow a culture the world will never forget. Research technology and race to be the first to build monuments to your own greatness. Civilizations is a game where every move you make from the insignificant to the vital changes the game, and writes the story. There are no crappy one or the other ethical decisions in this game. You choose what is right. You write the ethics and judge only yourself. Five ramps all of that up a notch adding cultural bonuses and legitimate cultural gameplay (at least with Brave New World) If you're new to Civ, this is a great game to get started on. If you've played Civ before, this game is going to present new options, new challenges, and a whole new way to write your story. Truely a masterpiece of modern strategy.
Polocatfan;-;Civilization V is like if Risk and a Tycoon had a baby. No I have no idea what I'm talking about. Just play it
Azrael808;-;What can I say about this game? If you've ever played previous iterations of this game (I started with Civilization II), then you're probably already addicted and own it. For newcomers, I think Firaxis have done an amazing job simplifying the UI and providing useful prompts for new mechanics as they appear, so this is a great version to start with. Even with the simplifications, all the depth you'd expect from this game is still there and you can expose it easily (the city management screen for example). With the Gods & Kings and Brave New World DLC, Firaxis have made what I think is by far the most entertaining Civilization yet! So, to summarise: buy this game if you have any love for strategy and a w streak. Just be prepared to lose entire days to it.
Ryogeta;-;This is a game you can easily lose a day too. 4x games always look incredibly boring too watch but once you start playing one you just can't stop. Gods and Kings and Brave New World are pretty much required too get as the base game was a little too basic. The five different victroy types make finding new strategy's all the more fun.
XRAYSIR;-;its great
berto98;-;I whole heartedly love this game the first day i got it i spent the whole day with my friend playing it. Stayed up till 6 a.m. This game is one of my top 10 its easy to pick up and play .The games are long but you can change settings to make it shorter this games makes me feel like the creator had the consumer in mind while creating this game 9/10
Melkor;-;I really enjoy the coop of this game. My brother and I play as often as we can.
Coach;-;i dont understand how this game can be one of the most popular strategy games... its S-H-I-T... im not kidding, awful hexagone-style gameplay, didnt like it AT ALL, but i have to admit that in the beginning when i first tried it out, i liked the diplomacy aspect of the game... the rest.. no so much
KatanaWarrior007;-;One of the best 4X strategy games out there
Liev [Milla];-;One of the best turn-based strategy games I've ever had the pleasure of playing. Whether teaming up with my friends for some multiplayer, or simply losing a whole night of sleep to the game's endlessly replayable single player, this is one game that any strategy enthusiast, or, hell anyone strat-curious should check out.
Infinite;-;Very, Very fun game. Now, if you dont like AOE and Risk type games, you wont like this, if you do, you will love this. You just have to remember, its like Risk, with turns. Thats about all. Its like AOE because you have to get resources, ect,ect,ect. Its not like either of those in the ways of creating a city, attacking, trading and research. well, its kinda, a tiny tiny bit, like AOE with the research. Its like AOE with the "cant see anything" to start with...or at least, tell you get a satalite :) then its like you typed "marco" "polo" Its like Risk cuase you it takes turn, kinda like drafting, but not, its like AOE cuase you see your troops, but you have sections you can move, a amount you can move, and other things. All in all, I loved the game, Would buy it again if that meant playing it and winning...again :) Thanks!
PigFaced;-;None of my friends want to play this game with me anymore, which is a shame becauase this is a beast of a multiplayer, if your lucky enough to have cooperative friends, cherish every moment with them in this game...
ryanlaughlin17;-;Great turn based game. Always end up spending more time playing than I wanted to.
tzxcv;-;this game is very realistic. The japanese first started in north america where they were at constant odds with their neigbours russia and songhai. They managed to conquer them all and set across the seas where they setteled in modern day europe where they also met geroge washington and the arabs. The arabs were very strong and conquering everyone including america so then japan libertaed america from their arab opperssors but the americans decided to invade japan with it's longswords men but they were no match against the japanese giant death robots
TheTurboNerd524;-;The Zulu kept calling me puny,so I nuked them. 10/10,Would nuke again.
Redeptior;-;Don't buy this game unless you have the sparetime for it! You'll get hooked for hours - even considering staying home from work to play just... one... more... turn!
Meiji;-;Civilization V is by itself a good game, but not the best in the series. Civilization V with the two expansions Gods and Kings and Brave New World turns this game into by far the most addicting and streamlined entry yet. Engaging in border disputes, tech stealing, and global commerce are vary satifying (unless you are the one being exploited!).
max.hollmen;-;This game includes hours of fun and helps you learn about history.
=UwG= Buckonator79;-;"Just one more turn" is what you'll end up saying to your self. Can't wait to try playing this with the steam controller while sitting on the couch.
The _Fourth_Man;-;It may be simpler than earlier Civ games, but it makes up for that in refinement. Many mechanics are missing, but that ones that are here are very fun to use. Multiplayer is also fun in a LAN. You will not mind its flaws when you actually start playing it though, as you will be immersed in a heavily addictive game. JUST ONE MORE TURN!
Timuco;-;Be warned, this game is a drug.
Duke Mogs;-;This... is the best turn-based strategy game you will EVER play. And its not that expensive either. *Nudge nudge*
Tippymac;-;This is a very good game. I have nothing bad to say about it. It is one of the best turn based games I've played and have nothing bad to say about it in my experiences.
NewEnglandNole;-;This game is akin to heroin. Also, you can play with one hand. This is critical because I can still play while holding my infant son.
Adaptive Hop;-;Civilization V Is the most realistic strategy games I have ever played. With smart AI, Trading and politic aspect this game adds up to be the perfect strategy simulator. As you age from cavemen to towering robots every thing you do creates a story in it self.
Melissa uses her real name;-;Intelligent gaming at its finest.
KnightCyber;-;A quite addicting 4X that has a fair amount of factions to pick from, would recommend to but the complete edition because it feels somewhat incomplete without the DLC.
AwesomenessZack;-;You will invest many hours into this game.
~Dell1o0~;-;Excellent strategy! Definatly a good sit down game when you have lots of free time and willing friend to join you!
MaximumTrekkie;-;Top 10 things to know- 1) Ghandi= Happiness and peace (Thermonuclear warfare and death) for everyone! 2) War is best 3) Only make the game last for a long time if you want the AI to hate you 4) The AI declares war for no good reason 5) ONE...MORE...TURN... 6) Ceasar=Extreme backstabber...I think he want's what was don to him to happen to everyone 7) Dem stealth bombers tho 8) Dem nukes tho 9) Prepare to pledge your life to the all-powerful "Next-Turn Button" 10) Backstabbing simulator 20something Serious Review- This is a great 4x strategy game, and if that's what you're looking for, buy it. It has a fully functional Multiplayer as well as Singleplayer. You essentially play as different civilizations from history and try to win using various different methods, which are explained in the tutorial.
Destorious;-;the game is well designed but with some minor problems for some peoples connection while in multiplayer single player is good
[WLMM] Hoosegoose;-;Wow... this game, this entire franchise is simply genius! It seems like such a simple topic at first, and like so many other "dominate the world through first=person M-rated combat" games, but once you start playing, you realize that it's far more in-depth and dynamic and just plain addictive than those. Plus, it isn't rated M. That ability to bo one of the best games (in my opinion), like Minecraft, Terraria and the Zoo Tycoon franchise (All of which I love) is really a pretty herculean task in a world dominated by violence-addicted teens who would love nothing more than to lop a stranger's head off. Way to go, Sid!
Illimitus;-;I was a day 1 purcahser of vanilla Civ V. My initial imprassion was that it was a hollow game and it did not contrast well with Civ IV and Civ II. I recently picked up Civ V complete and have put quite a few hours into it, including a marathon pangea on prince with 22 civs on standard. It was a "one more turn" experience which prompted me to change my review to positive. The good: Hexes: they obsolete all previous games. Audio-visual; especialy the impressionistic art, the leaderheads, and the great works. The religion system is really good. The trade system is good. The bad: The culture system is not a dynamic as it was in Civ IV. Likewise, civics were more intuitive than policies. The Ugly: The AI cannot fight. One unit per tile. The two are linked, in my mind.
Eeuwit;-;Civilization 5 is a well made strategic game with very nice graphics. It is hard to understand in the beginning, but if you invest time into reading about the game then it won't take long to understand it. It is also fun, because a game is never the same and there are many ways to victory to discover. There are a lot of Characters with each their own bonuses and there are also a lot of ways to play the game. You can play it with agression and win by war or you can go the more peaceful way and try to get a science victory. The game gives great support while playing and also has it's own kind of guide book in it. The only thing people might find troubling is that this game takes a lot of your time. One small sized game can often take 6 hours, so the bigger games will definetly cost more time. One thing I personally like about this game is that it also has a lot of history in it. You get to see a lot of art works from great artists and you get to know how curtain object came in this world like the atom bomb. It also has some really nice quotes in it and even some music pieces from old musicians. I really recommend this game if you like a lot of strategy and thinking. It is not the normal 'Build your own city' kind of game, so don't go into this game with that thought. It is not like the Anno games from Ubisoft or the Setler games.
spire;-;Addicting!
The Warrior Pope;-;Very fun game. Many great features in the expansion pack, so make sure you get the whole thing if you are thinking of buying this game. The situations are fun, and multiplaayer works great. Citizen Managment can be confusing, and hard to master the best combination for specific situations and times, so dont mess with that unless you know what you are doing. Every thing else is great and easy to learn. All the leaders are great and fun to play as and against. Great game, and worth every penny.
Leymort;-;you have been warned, one more turn ends up becoming a few hundred more...
cott88;-;I think my play time speaks for itself....
Bibly;-;+Rewarding. +Infinite Replayability, +Best turn based strategy I've ever played. 10/10
RedOrion;-;Amazing game. Each new version of the game brings more and more stuff.
Bighiaboy;-;To build a civilization from scratch and pace out human history is completely worth the 1033 hours I've devoted to playing this game! I fully intend to play this game for at least a thousand more hours. 10/10
Moonsided;-;I love this game, plain and simple. I got the complete Edition for $25 dollars during a Steam Sale, and damn I don't regret it. With the DLC the game has a plethora of civs to play as, along with better mechanics, and features than Vanilla Civ 5. Each Civ in the game has their own Unique Abilty, Unique Unit//Unique Building/Unique Improvement. There are 5 Victory Types: Time Based (Whoever has the most points at Turn 500), Diplomatic (Winning the World Leader vote in the UN), Cultural (Having your culture being influencial on all others), Science (Build Spaceship Parts to go populate another planet), and Domination (Take all other capital cities). Civ 5 will suck you in, especially if you like Turned Based Strategy Games already, and History. There's a large amount of Map Types to build your Civilization in, from a Fractal Earth to the Actual Globe, there's a map type for everyone. Each AI also plays differently, based on their historic counterparts (Gandhi is peaceful, The Aztecs are warmongers, etc.) so a bit of knowledge of history can help you, or you cna learn more about history by playing, pretty cool. Total reccomendation, even to people on the fence about it. Try it! See if you like it! Love it! Lose your life to it! (Also Poland Can Into Space)
The Armored Owl;-;Buy it, play it. Done. Nothing else needs to be said.
AlphaCore;-;Got this game for free, cannot stop playing until it finishes. 10/10.
GunnyGunnyGumDrops;-;Great game worth your money but you need the dlc. I have spent almost 200 hours playing and it is still fun.
MasterPieater;-;Best game I have played in a long time! One play through and I have played for over 13 hours!
-H4T3 ! /6/;-;This is a must play game..it feels Quite a good..got it cheap after 4 years :P. Played it and had much fun..A 10/10 game..Even if i am not a big fan of strategy and simulation games
Yric;-;I've played CIv5 since i joined steam and played it for over 420+ hours. It was worth every second. Most DLC is worth purchasing when on sale. The actual gameplay is awesome! You can be a warmongerous, scientific, political, religous or culture based civilization, or mix of all! Plenty of civilizations and units to choose from especially in the dlc's and expansion packs. The workshop and mods for this game is one of the best in a game i have seen. A bit on the expensive side especially considering in Civ4 all of the features that were realesed as DLC for civ5 were already included in civ4. Graphics are beautiful, gameplay is fun and challenging, steam trading cards and achievments. As well as a brilliant modding community. 9.5/10
Cabbagera;-;Got pillaged by barbarian attack helicopters 10/10
J_x_I;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is possibly one of the best stratergy games that you will ever come across. It topped all Civs before it and is even better than Beyond Earth. You could be sat there saying to yourself "Just a quick game" The next thing you know you've spent over 5 hours of your life and jumped over 200 turns. This game is a must buy!
Lunargamer979;-;I do not know how to describe Civ V except for amazing. This RTS game may be slow moving but its stratagy is beyond compare. Civ V incorporates History and Gaming in a way that makes it one of the greatest games ive played.
DanishWolf (Mugge);-;One of my favorites. When you first start the game, you can hardly stop. You can choose a famous leader from throughout the time. And each have it speciality, and you choose how you will conquer the world; By by war, by politic or science and more. Its all up to you. This game is a must. Prepare to be consumed for hours. :D 10/10 <3
Cops Can't Read;-;this game is amazing to the point of rebuilding great empires or civilizations and breaking them down to control the world.
DanishBobainish;-;Civ 5 is one the best stradegy games I have played in a while. It will take you many hours to complete a game and there are hundreds of hours of replayablity. The multiplayer also works well. If you are trying to find a new stradegy game that you can spend a lot of time in, look no farther.
bagObricks;-;One of the most fun and all consuming games I've had the pleasure of playing. From holding a small mountain pass against multiple waves Napolean's cavelry all 300 style with a single group of spearmen to fostering new trade agreements with the Egyptions across the sea this game is fun. You sit down thinking oh, just a few turns then I'll save and make some dinner, but the next thing you know it's 4am and you need to be in to work for 6am. Simple mechanics that are easy and fun to learn. Multiple ways to win, from the classic RTS plan of kill everyone to the more complex cultural and tourrism victory. Tons of replay value as every game plays out diffrently.
ARCHMAESTER_GASH;-;If you have 1 day to live, don't play Civ V. It will take those 24 hours and crush them, there is no game more addicting than this
Kralle6000;-;Love this game, i deffintly recomend buying the complete pack, it is stupid to just buy Civilization V with no DLC.
TheChing;-;One of the best strategic games of this era. Best replacement for chess in decades :)
Pabloziac;-;This game was my very first turn-based game, and I have to say it's worth the money, even the DLC. Sadly, it removed some of the qualities from Civ 4 for all you oldies, but its still a new and awesome game that's worth playing. The DLC is what adds more to the game making it better strategy wise and especially fun with friends. The multiplayer is much better with the improvised patches that help make it better and smoother. The craziest part about this game is that they can last weeks if you play on marathon mode with friends or a bunch of AI. The AI decision making is not the best, but it's feasible and they can make some suprising actions no matter how long you play. I've been playing this game for nearly 2 years and it still never gets old, even with friends, and new content made by the fans at the workshop. I'll continue to play it every now and then and in my eyes is considered classic-worthy material; it's hell of a lot better than CiV:BE. The worst possible thing is playing a marathon match with 12 AI playing as Bismarck in the year 3422 with Ghandi, and all of a sudden you get nuked near the end and lose it all; All two weeks of progress to dominate the world cultrually, scientifically, forcefully, or diplomatically.
Simpleton;-;This game is fantastic! I play it with my friends and the internet and solo all of the time. I highly recomend it to anybody who ikes a good, turn based stratagy game!
Ultra-Rare Pepe;-;A good game indeed! I r8 th8 8/8 m8
CharlieJay;-;Building on the originals its a very time consuming game. But very enjoyable.
Damoun;-;Lots of fun, I recommend mods also
barkind;-;gosh i cant get enough of this game
Gimboid;-;Very addictive and fun.
Nuclear Entity;-;If you want to rule the world,and raise your empire this game is for you
Lucid;-;Super fun war game. Playing with friend is the best way to play this game. But is still reccomendable on single player. Build up cities upon cities of foundation on your civilisation and watch is thrive or be destroyed be superior forces. Great game. Only problem is tabbing out is super laggy and also the steam sever's are of poor qualty on this game, Would reccomend creating own server. 9/10
Guderian;-;An excellent addition to the Civ series, streamlines a lot of micromanaging, uses hexes instead of squares, and has a totally overhauled (for Civ) and awesome combat system. Not quite up to Alpha Centauri levels of greatness, but superb nevertheless. On balance, better than Civ IV (I say this as a former Civ IV addict).
Olecare;-;civilization is like the best. its so relaxing to just have it your own pace and i am only writing this because is have too
collinstumpf;-;Favorite game of all-time.
Dovahkiin Are People Too;-;This game has so many ways to play it's ridiculous. You can play as a Warmongering America, or you can play as a Cultural Germany, or a Scientific Iroquois. The game is easy to pick up if you put a little time into it. The game runs clean and smooth on nearly everythng and for a over the top strategy game it's awfully pretty too. Multiplayer games can get very intense if you've a friend who has this game. Great for LAN parties because anything can happen. 9.5/10, only problem is it can get a bit gltchy in multiplayer with loading, but only Vanilla Civ V has this problem. Definitely recommend getting the DLCs when they go on sale.
Tyrion Lannister;-;10/10 *thumbs up*
[RocK] The Other Guy;-;One of the best stratagie games ever made!
collshut_1021;-;Greatest game known to man. Period. I'll cut anyone who says different.
Nevsky;-;Nice game, it will let you to understand real historical actions (wars, coups etc.) and you will have a great time, especially playing with friends :)
microndou;-;great game
GuitarLegend3;-;It's fun.....BUT ONLY WITH BRAVE NEW WORLD!!!!!
Skinny;-;Different than civ 4, but not necessarily in bad ways. Great way to sink a couple hundred hours though >.>
TheDark, Lord Czar;-;Amazing Game! Very well directed, and the music is fabulous. I would give it a 9/10
Easy_SkaNkin;-;Delivers as expected, a must have for any Civ player.
graciegrappler;-;it's a awsome game. I like how there is no adds that pop up while you are playing. I like all the different civs.
.Watchman;-;Hours of fun and Fustration waiting for your turn lol, Great game
xelarock;-;Excellent game especially after the 2 expansions. Lots of great civs and they are really unique. Best played with friends but single player is just as good. If you don't have the game, make sure to get the complete edition when it goes on sale for like 7 dollars or so. Highly recommend!
trey_ok;-;Really, when it comes down to it... you probably already know this game is awesome and you either a) haven't tried it or b) know it's awesome from personal experience. Give it a go if you haven't, especially if turn-based strat/citybuilders seem kinda interesting to you. Tha major difference I've found between Civ 5 and it's predecessor, Civ 4, is that Civ 5 is really clunky and boring without all the DLC. I played standalone Civ 4 for countless hours; Civ 5 simply didn't click with me until I bought the DLC at the urging of a friend. Moral of the story is: buy the game and all the DLC during a sale. It's worth it.
Azmael;-;For a long time i used to hear stuff about this game. There is a big joke online about ll play 1 more turn and 10 hours pass" or i play until i realise its 7am and i have to go to work. And for a long time i thought it was funny but never really understood it until i bought the game. Its phenomenal and many times when i go to save i realise that i wasnt saving 15 minutes later but 3 hours later! My 1st session ended exactly as the jokes i have heard so many times on forums and in steam reviews. I do have to note that this is the kind of strategy that is tailored exactly for my tastes so i got hooked immediately. I highly recommend this. Im just having fun and learning the ropes with the base CIV V i dont even have the expansions yet and i hear they make the game 10x times better. You can always jump in for a world conquest and enjoy hours of fun. The amount of playtime you can get out of this is insane. Just pure value for money this game is a HUGE bargain <3 10/10
themanlydeadguy;-;585 hours played out of 5 stars
wolf;-;THIS GAME, OMG
DetectiveFox;-;This is a great historical city builder that you half to get your hands on. The DLCs improve the game by so much, and the depth to this game is so great. This game is a must have!
Digitlizeraton;-;I dont play this game often..but when I do I play 10 or more hours straight.
Zero Ezalor;-;Civilization V is a pinnacle for all strategy games out there. Great improvments in many areas compared to it's older cousins. The game itself is very addictive and like the previous versions, you tend to lose a lot of time out of your day to this game without realizing it. This just proves how mesmerizingly fun this game can be. At first, I thought this game would be difficult to grasp because of the idea of religion being abolished altogether, however, it was the exact opposite. If you have played the previous Civilization games, this one will be pretty easy to grasp and pick up on. For new gamers being introduced to strategy games, there is a very nice tutorial within the game itself that explains everything you need to know and to understand it easily. It's a great game to start with if your new to Civilization and/or strategy games in general. This is one of the best of best out there, there could be no better time to start Civilization than right now!
Palkyon;-;It's pretty fun with a lot of options for replayability. It's great with friends too.
Don't Panic!;-;Faith is an option
Govinator;-;This is the best Civ game I have ever played.
Superelderscrollsman;-;I was just strolling around during the Industrial Era as the Germans and I see some Indian Troops. I befriend them not knowing what horror I unleashed upon my 3 city empire. He comes two turns later and offers me open borders, and I accept, assuming he is really chill dude. I send out two of my heavily promoted riflemen that defend my main cities when all of a sudden Ghandi sends his troops straight at all of cities except Berlin. I thought that he just sent them to protect me assuming that he may have believe to be an attack from the Japanese that I was at war with, even though the fighting stopped for a while. Next turn I get a declaration of war from Ghandi. Feeling very betrayed, I sent my cannons towards his modern infantry with all of my might. After this, I see a horrible sight... from all of his cities (about 5 or 6) he sent nukes at all of my cities and right infront of my riflemen, cutting them off from saving us from what happened next. Seven Modern Infantry come rolling in at my final doorstep. In an attempt to stop them, I spend my whole treasurey on troops to defend, only to be attacked head on by Ghandi. My whole lifes work, down the drain. NEVER TRUST GHANDI! By the way, great game!
ripsnook;-;great game. totally worth the buy!
The Scientist;-;This game is a very fun turn based game that it is more entertaining when playing with friends. I reccomend buying the game when it is on sale because it can go as low as $12.50 and this game has great graphics and wonderful gameplay waiting to be played by you and your countless other friends!
danio43us67;-;Great addition to the Civilization series. I would totally recommend this game, it is enjoayble and although falls short compared to the previous offering in level of detail and polish, the new gameplay will definitely capture your attention for many hours.
Velvet;-;There is no need for a serious review of this game, Just Gandhi and more Gandhi and more Gandhi and some Nuclear Fallout ... 9/11- Would watch again
Scatterbrain;-;The best Grand-Strategy game of all time.
Qwerttdelta;-;If you buy this game, you will be addicted to it forever.
Arkanicus;-;Best Civ game so far. Mods are great. Definantly recommend this game.
sshann30;-;As someone that is still learning the game, I found that the as-you-play tutorials are not the most helpful and don't really help in shallowing the learning curve. However from what I have played, there is a lot to control. The game is deatail deep and offers a challenge when you need it.
jutrasimon;-;all right
Pork Lord Supreme;-;i only had this game for 2 days
OREO;-;BEST GAME I'VE PLAYED
Shere Khan;-;Can I has being civilized?
CarpeGuitarrem [Yomi];-;Oh gosh dangit. I made the mistake of installing this game, and sunk 12 hours into it over two successive days, playing a Quick game in two sessions. Best. Mistake. Ever. I've been a fan of the Civ series ever since I discovered Civ II (and have played every version since, except for Civ Rev, the Facebook game, and Civ I...and that includes the Test of Time games AND both versions of Colonization), and this is another worthy entry in the family! I'm a big fan of how it gives you the tools to analyze your strategies and change them on the fly.
Inugami;-;My first match: Start > Finish off neighbor civs (3) > Took lands > Took 2 city states allied to them > Allied with remaining city states with gold > Tricked remaining civs into war > Gifted tons of units to city states close to civs > Went at war with them > Terrorize with atomic bombs > What is this world leader thing? Me: 46 delegates, them 6 each > 'You have triumphed over your foes through the art of diplomacy. Your cunning and wisdom have earned you great friends, and have divided and sown confusion amoung your enemies. Forever will your be remembered as the leader who brought peace to a weary world.' - Diplomatic victory.
KRAKEN;-;Civ V is a superb game. If you bought all the DLC. If not, it is not really worth the money... But with both major DLC, it really shines. Especially in multiplayer.
Jozoz;-;This game will ruin your life. I fully recommend it.
matthewfarley2000;-;My absolute favorite game! It is amazing!!
kuyajamban;-;The notorious "Just one more turn..." games. Nuff said...
Provoe;-;Very addicting game, almost to the point where it is unhealthy. So many ways you can go about this game from the scenarios, Mods, DLC's, total domination, seems like I will be getting hundreds of hours of gameplay out of it and that isn't even including DLC's. 30 bucks is a little steep for this game and the expansions don't seem to get any cheaper, which by the looks of it, Gods and Kings seems to be the best one, that game of thrones mod tho.... If you stumble upon this game on sale, it is a must buy. 10/10
Scoots;-;I wasn't a fan of Civilization series but this is the only game I enjoyed and even managed to learn how to play. And do not trust Gandhi.
Pixlboy;-;Hours of fun gauranteed.
Chief Whip;-;Great game with solid rules and structure.
Hairy Cows;-;10/10 Love the Game it is good
Shrek;-;If you like turn-based games with a grid-like map then this is the game for you. You get to choose a civilzation which has its perks and then build it from the ground up by creating cities, researching tech, making units, etc. It has an exelent style of gameplay ranging from unit health, to resources around a city, and cililzation happiness. One thing I miss are goverments from early civilizations but overall its an exellent game!!!
Marshall Lame;-;11hours 1st day. Nothing more
zebaw5;-;really fun game in my opinion it's better with Brave New World but even the base game but for 30 extra dollars its tottaly WORTH your money
SuperFerry53;-;This game is damn good. 10/10
Cardinal_UK;-;Out of all my steam games, this is the one game I keep coming back to. When it was first released, I truly hated it. It was a rushed and broken game. Now, it has become one of my all-time favourite games. The turn based nature of this game means you get the time to plan your empire and diplomatic strategy. Battles can become large chess-like conflicts that require you to look at the bigger picture - simple numbers will not win you a fight (unless on the easiest difficulty of course). The game is engaging with a gigantic tech tree to keep you interested. There are also numerous scenarios to choose from, such as the fall of Rome and the American Civil War. You can also fully customise your game and create your own scenarios for you and your friends to play. The vanilla game is massive, and will keep you occupied for many an hour trying to crush, bribe, sleaze or geek your way to victory. Then there is the added bonus of the workshop turning this already huge game into an endless, life sucking monster from which there is no return. In all, I love this game and if you like Turn Based Strategy games this is definitely one you need in your collection.
Lord Kryos;-;JUST... ONE... MORE... TUUUUUUUUURN
Pookie;-;Ooh, are you thinking about buying this game? I love it, and the reason I love it? Because I can PLAY it. I'm not one for impossible games that you have to do again and again and again and you still die before the checkpoint - you can set the difficulty on this, and the difficulties seem to be pretty wide ranging. Very accessible to newer players, but with progression for those people out there who are just amazing at whatever game they touch! About playing it, though - you have to have the time to devote to it. Those with families or busy social lives will probably start resenting their families or friends because they want to be playing, and those without will never have a reason to stop! You just set yourself targets of, "once I've got to there, I'll stop", but by that time, you're working on something else! "Just. One. More. Turn." And that's just the first game - there's so many variations because there's so much choice of progression throughout the game, and then there's all those trophies (I do love a good trophy collection), that even when you finish the first game, you're already plotting which leader and which strategy you'll be next! I really enjoy the expansion Brave New World - I'm glad they brought religion back, culture victories are much more interesting, and trade routes are a good way to boost income (and partially equalise the science of nations). And if half the words I'm saying make no sense - don't worry; a lot of the game can be automated, the advisors don't steer you too far wrong, and if you've put it on easy enough, you're army will overpower the others soon enough to give you a satisfying first, albeit violent, victory.
Duck;-;If you buy it, get at least one of the expansion packs. Vinalla game is kinda meh.
IcySyrup;-;Just... one... more... turn...
Bender;-;It's good.
Jean Luc Shittard;-;I feel as though now is a good time to write a review of Civ V, given the relatively recent release of Civ: Byond Earth. If you are new to the civ franchise BUY THIS GAME. In comparison to Civ: BE, this game is so much more polished and generally better (but only with all the DLC. Without the DLC, Civ BE is better). Once Beyond Earth gets its own share of overpriced but high quality DLC, it will become the go-to Civ game, but right now Civ V is the number one title in the series.
MrMeatzombie;-;This game takes hours to complete a single match. Once played a 6 player multiplayer with my friends, 8 hours later we were not past turn 150, granted some of them were new, but we just couldn't move it along any faster. I love this game, I just wish the multiplayer was somehow more efficient.
War Hero, Capt. Gordo Sanders;-;it's really nice
HansCent;-;I recommend this game for anyone that enjoy slow turn based strategy games. If that does not apply to you, then this game is not for you.
MorningStar;-;Easily the best entry in the series I have played, if for no other reason than unit stacking is no more. One unit per tile and a hex based grid system make the game feel more dynamic and tense. One of the best strategy games I have ever played, and likely the best turn-based I have played. Well worth the money. The expansions are almost necessary however. The game works well without either one, but with both it unlocks the true potential of the game and truly makes you feel as if you are crafting the history of an empire.
trexslayer;-;Honestly one of my favorite games i have played in a long time. My friends and I often play on a team and put the AI on deity, the best way to play.
BortyTheBort;-;Gandhi is Kim-Jung-Un in this universe
Captun Mericuh;-;wow Contol states such graphic so BNW Such G&K wow
wuw pillowfight champion;-;I got nuked by Gandhi. 10/10
Spod, please;-;This game is great, I love it so much! Although I think the DLC's should've come with the game (The stuff in the DLC's I mean)
Kyemc2;-;Civilization V is the greatest world strategy game ever made!
Classy_Thatguyinthecorner;-;All I remember was sitting down and opening up Civ V. Then BOOM! It's 7 hours later and Gandhi's owned my .
Bubba_Rupert;-;This game is amazing. Best game of 21st century
PmanSweg;-;Much better than Beyond Earth.
Cuong;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is one of the best additions to my Steam Library ever. At the moment I'm roughly a bit more than 200 hours into the game, which is personally a lot of time for me, and I still play several turns each week. Pros: + [Laptops] Does not require a mouse; playable on the go. I frequently travel by train and whenever it takes a while I grab my laptop and fire up Civ. + A large variety of civilizations to toy with, even more when you purchase DLC and expansion packs, with each their Unique Buildings, Units and Traits. + Four speed options for the patient and less patient ones (Me. I tried marathon mode, big mistake, but my OCD kicked in and I just had to finish it.) + A large amount of mechanics, the game is complex, but it's a great once you get the hang of everything. + For those who crave knowledge; the game gives accurate information about the civilizations, units and buildings. + Playable on tablets. Cons - Might feel repetitive for some - Noob-unfriendly IMO, I wouldn't try playing on "Normal" mode (Prince) or Online if you're not familiar to Civ or the strategy genre. - Time consuming, be prepared to lose a lot of time playing this game (and maybe some sleep once you get hooked) - Waging war with an AI on lower difficulty levels may be very boring and feel ridiculously easy. It's common knowledge among players that the AI is terrible naval warfare Conclusion Civlization V is not a game for those who crave intense action and immediate results. Civ V is for those who like to put their brain to work and play that chesslike "One step ahead" way, where a grave error can actually screw up your whole game. To the strategists out there I'd highly recommend the game and it's certainly worth its price. I avoid rating simply because a rating mostly doesn't do anything justice. A tip: Don't buy games or watch films just based on a rating and actually read reviews if you wish to consider something, you might bump into lots of cool things that are supposedly considered bad. Though if I were to actually rate Civ I'd say a 9.5/10 N.B.: I mentioned as one of the pros that Civilization is playable on tablets. Normally this is not possible if you have an Android tablet or iPad, but there is a way to stream your PC to a tablet using Splashtop, which is available for both Anrdoid and Apple products. There are several guides available online on how to do this.
[BELG]konijnenpoes;-;In this game you play as a historical person trying to win a science victory,culture victory,domination victory or a diplomatic victory. This is an amazing where you begin with warriors and end with giant death robots this is the best game i ever played!
Cardboard Knight;-;High quality
Xonikz;-;If only this translated into my real bank account accrual.
ngt;-;This game is hard strategy turn-based game If you don't patient enough, you can't win it But if you are a freakin mind reader or a master of mind I suggest this game would be nice playing with your friends !
g;-;This game is amazing if your the kind of person who likes Stratergy and defence basiclly you can choose from a Leader of history and Change history! you can either go Single player where you compete againsed computers or multiplayer where you find a server or make your own one the only downside is that there are a few bugs that do not let you go on to next turn or attack enemy's when there near your city
Armand;-;Civ v is a great game with lots of adventure and strategy, It's fun to build your own settlement and to discover new techniques and develop your own civ. Civ v does take a lot of time, though. An average game on the "quick" setting takes 4 hours! If you have no patience, I don't think civ v is the game for you. This game will train your strategy skill and will help you with other strategy games.
EdMatta;-;fantastic game. hours of guaranteed fun.
N_gent;-;Great game
Gift from the Gods;-;cool cool, 32/34
Xephos Cat;-;I'm late to the party, yes. I know. If you've seen my review on the newest game, you'll know that I hate it forever and ever. This game is a beautiful piece of work. It's easy to understand Start with a warrior Get science upgrades Make new things! SIMPLE! The new game: Start with a thingie What is that? What is this science? What is reputation? This game is 9,726 times better than any other game in the franchise. If you're looking for a good civilization game, buy this one. (Or civ 3, that  was the BOMB) 9/10 Great with friends Great solo Easy to understand and play Amazing all around Only problem is that if you are playing with your friends (or strangers) the nations they choose can be way more powerful than the one you choose. For example Russia and France Russia gets 2x resources France gets 2x culture. Which do you think will do better? Nitpicking aside, great game.
The Man;-;Great game, love it!
josh93nath;-;could use more pony mods
Axios Vie;-;.... I'm addicted.
Hail Trackanon;-;Whenever I fail at anything in life, the trombones from The Price is Right play in my head. Now, I hear the sound of a Wonder being built in a far away land instead. 10/10 would scream profanities at Queen Elizabeth again
Cbone(80);-;The best game to play with your friends. It's like MONOPOLY! it ruins friendships.
aiglesias_24;-;This is one of THE best games. This is my most played game in my library Not only that, I have a sucky computer. Even then, I can fully enjoy the game. Honestly, I don't care what anyone else has said, GET THE GAME! You will love it. Well, if you like turnbased strategy games. Want me to tell you the best part of the game? Having a full blown nuclear WW3 at the end of the game. Seriously, get the freaking game!
Illuminati Agent;-;It's so easy to lose hours of time playing this game, and it's easy to have fun advancing your civ and plotting against other civs. Amazing game.
Kustomautos;-;hours of fun with friends
Joshmoe;-;Oh my god i spent 2.49 on this in the summer sale two years ago thinking it would run its course of being fun for a while and then give up on me after a few months yet it didnt, i love this game so much it is soooo addictive!
Corporal Soap;-;This taught me how to hate everyone.
Paarastraza;-;This is a review of the Complete Edition, experience may be vastly different for standalone. I have held off on the review until I finally broke the 100 hour mark, due to exploring everything the game has to offer.On that note let me tell you a hundred hours is not enough to explore everything, the game has a large selection of civilisations to play as and I in these hundred hours have only completed about 6 full matches.I have only played as six of the forty three civilisations and I can tell you from the Aztecs to the Polish there is something there for you.The game is really easy to get into, unlike some strategy games but the game takes time and will no doubt consume you. So lets get on with this: BUY IT NOW! But all joking aside if you are remotely interested try the demo, it gives you a sample bite that isn't even a percent of the full game's experience. So if you are new or a veteran of turn based strategy you should give this game a shot, as it is definitely worth the price.(Or you could wait for the sales that pop up every few weeks)
God_of_Donuts;-;amazing game to play with friends
satan;-;The first Civ game I've played and probably will stick as one of my favorites, though Civ V on it's own isn't that great. I'd recommend getting G&K and BNW with Civilization V.
astrospartan;-;Simply Astounding! One of the best strategic games ever! will keep you hooked until you realize its like 3:30 am, then your like " i better sleep so i can wake up and play more of this AMAZING game!" It is also a great way to take a bored day and turn it into a acomplished day full of choosing productions!
Metallic Buns;-;I can't believe I havn't reviewed this game. It's ing great. UNLESS you play... - With Ionic Bonds - Against Ghandi - As Ghandi - As a Scientific Civilization (Because then you will be referred to as an op scrub by your friends.) - As Japan (Because then you will be referred to as an op scrub by your friends.) - Without DLC - Without good connection - On Deity difficulty - As a Religious Civilization (You snooze, you lose) - With Raging Barbarians - On a GIANT Map (I find it annoying: takes too long) - On a small Map (Friends find it annoying: too clustered) - When homework is due - When your mother is calling your full name - When a new episode of Arrow is on - You have less than 12 years (Make no plans) - You forgot to save your last game (Raging is understandable) - I'm tired of making a list - Lists are  - Lists are boring - With Covalent Bonds
Monsieur Calvin J. Candie;-;My social life was razed to the ground, my girlfriend was destroyed by barbarians, its been three years of turns since my last shower... An echo keeps ringing in my now demented mind... "one more turn" Civ V is love, Civ V is life
Danielhrz;-;An excellent turn based game. It's hard to describe the game in full- with the DLC and without, there's just so much to it. Without DLC, In game, there's diplomacy, warfare, alliances, and social policies that will shape the world of your civs and others. With the Gold edition (Gods and kings) there is improved diplomacy, religon, and espionage. Is your religon the only acceptable one? Are you curious about your enemies motives? With Brave New World, you can vote on pressing matters, and it completely reworks the culturally victory. From Arts funding to policies that limit armies and nuclear weapons; these things great enhance the game once the world congress is founded. For the cultural victory, you now have to spread your culture via tourism- once everyone loves your culture, you win. (Believe me, it's quite difficult) Over all, it's a great game. I really appreciate the work put into it, and I hope to spend countless more hours playing it.
Doctor Lovebutter;-;A spectacular, amazingly-fun game. Perfect for the history buff/gamer. A wide selection of civilizations to pick from and immersive gameplay that will keep you playing for hours. Seriously, hours. I'm not even joking. I recall that there was one match that went on for almost four hours. Regardless, this game is fascinating and involving, and even has the history of units, buildings, wonders and leaders built into it. I highly reccomend this game. It's a must-have! Just... don't start playing it late in the day or at night.
steventhegooner;-;Great fun game both online and offline. Would highly recommend playing with lots of friends as it makes for much more interesting gameplay. Only situation I have with the game is that it ends at a too early date and could go on a little longer, apart from that I would say it is a great game to play. Very relaxing, very fun 9/10
Belial;-;This game. This ing game. This is easily one of the best games ever. But, then again, no game where you can play as a world-conquering Ghandi is a bad game.
Rogred (Fixing PC);-;I know this aint a review,but I just wanted to say...if you love strategy games,history games,etc. this game is the one you need. It's even better with the DLC. 8/10 Why 8? Well,the multiplayer isnt fully enjoyable... 10/10 would be threatened by Gandhi with nucklear warfare again
J_x_I;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is possibly one of the best stratergy games that you will ever come across. It topped all Civs before it and is even better than Beyond Earth. You could be sat there saying to yourself "Just a quick game" The next thing you know you've spent over 5 hours of your life and jumped over 200 turns. This game is a must buy!
Lunargamer979;-;I do not know how to describe Civ V except for amazing. This RTS game may be slow moving but its stratagy is beyond compare. Civ V incorporates History and Gaming in a way that makes it one of the greatest games ive played.
DanishWolf (Mugge);-;One of my favorites. When you first start the game, you can hardly stop. You can choose a famous leader from throughout the time. And each have it speciality, and you choose how you will conquer the world; By by war, by politic or science and more. Its all up to you. This game is a must. Prepare to be consumed for hours. :D 10/10 <3
Cops Can't Read;-;this game is amazing to the point of rebuilding great empires or civilizations and breaking them down to control the world.
DanishBobainish;-;Civ 5 is one the best stradegy games I have played in a while. It will take you many hours to complete a game and there are hundreds of hours of replayablity. The multiplayer also works well. If you are trying to find a new stradegy game that you can spend a lot of time in, look no farther.
T.B.;-;1st game on civ 5: -made settler -moved a bit -settler got captured by settlers -city got attacked -lost the game 10/10 would recomend
Exhera;-;Dear Potential Purchaser, Do not buy unless you have a lot of free time and do not have: a: a job b: a relationship c: friends In all seriousness, this game is quite superb. It's like Settlers of Catan but more complex. Way more complex. Just a tip, take advantage of Gandhi's lack of nukes pre-Atomic age and just kill him.
AceFace;-;This game is a game
BananaPepper15;-;Shoshone Native American Civ is so fun to play against bots, people, and your grandmother.. would 1 v 1 grammy again..
MrHockeyPants;-;Awesomly Fun and Addicting Strategy game that any type of gamer would love. There is so much to this game it will have you hooked as you build your empire from the early days of Mankind to the far future. Great game overall :)
Boys Dont Cry;-;The No 1 turn-based strategy game. I have been playing Civ since mid 90s. Civ V is less micro management compare to Civ IV.So if you are new Civ player Civ V will be a great start. After you have achieved all achievements when it's time to compete with other players. Civ have a large community, try http://forums.civfanatics.com/forumdisplay.php?f=412
Aiven;-;As an international relation student, I bought the complete pack when its on sale, just before the final exam. 10/10 would pass the exam.
xboxparadox;-;it is a great game with a better system than any civ game to date. settling citys is a bit more difficut but that aside you can make hugre armys easily and crush your enimeys or take the peace and be friendly to everyone make your citizens happy and make trades often once again you should buy this game and play every nation and find the one that fits u great game buy it
Lazdude;-;One More turn Syndrome OP
Jak3Dark-PistolwhipOfIreland;-;a Lovely Game About Growing Your Own Civilisation Then Reking Everything In Site
Big HD;-;It's da bes.
Momo Velia Deviluke;-;its a very fun game i am a big fan of the series but better than beyond earth
Magic Potato;-;This is a well made Pokemon game, reccommend it to anyone. pokeball/10
Leonardo Doujinshi;-;If your a fan of Strategy games give this game a spin. Civ 5 offers a ton of fun content available to each player with multiple ways to pave the path to victory. The core game itself is a good game. Add Gods and Kings or Brave New World and your playtime basically doubles and triples. Even with all my hours in civ I still don't tire of playing it. 9/10 Would play again.
Sir-Tristan;-;France was winning a war and it surrendered half its resources. 10/10
Light;-;Just One More Turn....
Mafdt;-;An amazing game, if you are a turn-base fan than this certainly a game to buy. I do recommed buying the gold version, as the dlcs greatly improve the gameplay. 10/10
Lumberzach;-;Where do I begin? The countless nights I've stayed up playing this game? The fact that I'm thinking about my current game at work and devising a counter attack? This game is ADDICTING. Do not get it if you don't have time to play. As a turn-based strategy game it gives you enough time to think about what the best course to take would be and then act on it. This doesn't mean it's slow or boring though. I've sunk a couple hundred hours into it and there's still things I'm learning about. I highly, highly recommend this game to anyone and everyone (except maybe COD players).
Duncan;-;Sid Meiers Civilization V is a turn based strategy based around the world that gets you so addicted to it you can literally scream just one more turn and have ten or twenty more because its that fun however this game does have its drawbacks. Looking at the game basically there are a few goals that get more and more complicated as you progress throughout the game. These goals may include settling citys with a settler as after you have gone through five hundred to one thousand turns there is hardly any land left to settle on because the AI (the computer) is also taking land. Another one of these goals is science points (how fast you research something in the game) if you get lots of these with buildings or social policys (earned by settling citys and happiness level) you can get better and better at the game for example when you research nuclear fission you get nukes!!! This can cause extreme damages to cities and units around them. Starting you game aiming for science is not a bad idea but if you dont earn enough gold per turn (earned by having buildings or trade routes to other cities) you may fall into debt and if you run out of gold it starts taking your science instead of gold because you have no gold left. And the final goal that gets harder and harder is your happiness level this is how happy your civilians are within the game this falls when your people are unhappy with certain buildings or if falls if you have taken an enemy country however if your happiness falls below zero your cities wont grow and if it falls below ten armies of revolting civilians appear near you capital ad start burning your stuff this may decrease your science or even gold so keep your citys happy. There are many goals of this game that are all very different and special in their own ways. Science - a science victory is where you have to get your capital to produce parts of a rocket and launch them into space however you have to do this before any of the other players. Culture - for a culture victory you have to complete five culture trees which are all roughly made up of five social polices (to get culture you need to be happy and you need to have built buildings that improve your culture per turn) Domination  After a while in your game you can choose to declare war on people and once you completely taken another persons cities they exit the game leaving one less player in the game. Domination victory works by only having you as the last player in the game. In my opinion this is the most fun victory as it happens very late on in the game and is the last victory that can be won. So there are many things in this game I really like the first thing is its simplicity any new player can hop on this game and get the basics in no time at all and it has things for people that are more experienced for example different tactics you can follow to make late or early game more enjoyable. Another thing I really like about Civilization V is the adventure and freedom to explore for example at the beginning of the game you decide what you want to do not someone else as you have the freedom to build scouts and roam the land or just keep to your city. However there are things in this game I really dont like for example the need for DLCs this game is really brought alive with DLCs as they add so much that should have been in the game anyway as well as balancing things that are way to overpowered in the first place like auto heal. (Heals your unit to full health) Another thing I dont like so much about the game is to achieve a domination victory you basically have to disable all of the other victories as domination happens at the last stage of the game whilst all the others finish before it. In this game there is an option to buy DLCs as I slightly spoke about above in what in what I dont like about the game. The first DLC you will hear about is called brave new world and I personally love this DLC it adds so much to your game for example it adds religion which helps your economy and allows you to purchase units cheaper however this comes at a price as other people try to convert your cities and get rid of your perks. Another thing that Brave new world adds is new people and technologies this is a major part of the game and it just makes it more fun for example one of the technologys it adds brings X-com squads to your game and they can parachute 40 tiles away from your territory allow for more dynamic wars. Overall this game is all I ever wanted it literally got me screaming just one more turn and this is why I think this game deserves a 4/5 rating. Its not perfect but if the game included brave new world with it instead of having to buy them separately it would be a 5/5 and a must have to any gamer. Review by James Duncan
kehsct;-;Awesome game. Some of the best strategy i've ever seen coupled with diplomacy. I recommend it for any strategy player.
.Watchman;-;Hours of fun and Fustration waiting for your turn lol, Great game
xelarock;-;Excellent game especially after the 2 expansions. Lots of great civs and they are really unique. Best played with friends but single player is just as good. If you don't have the game, make sure to get the complete edition when it goes on sale for like 7 dollars or so. Highly recommend!
trey_ok;-;Really, when it comes down to it... you probably already know this game is awesome and you either a) haven't tried it or b) know it's awesome from personal experience. Give it a go if you haven't, especially if turn-based strat/citybuilders seem kinda interesting to you. Tha major difference I've found between Civ 5 and it's predecessor, Civ 4, is that Civ 5 is really clunky and boring without all the DLC. I played standalone Civ 4 for countless hours; Civ 5 simply didn't click with me until I bought the DLC at the urging of a friend. Moral of the story is: buy the game and all the DLC during a sale. It's worth it.
Azmael;-;For a long time i used to hear stuff about this game. There is a big joke online about ll play 1 more turn and 10 hours pass" or i play until i realise its 7am and i have to go to work. And for a long time i thought it was funny but never really understood it until i bought the game. Its phenomenal and many times when i go to save i realise that i wasnt saving 15 minutes later but 3 hours later! My 1st session ended exactly as the jokes i have heard so many times on forums and in steam reviews. I do have to note that this is the kind of strategy that is tailored exactly for my tastes so i got hooked immediately. I highly recommend this. Im just having fun and learning the ropes with the base CIV V i dont even have the expansions yet and i hear they make the game 10x times better. You can always jump in for a world conquest and enjoy hours of fun. The amount of playtime you can get out of this is insane. Just pure value for money this game is a HUGE bargain <3 10/10
themanlydeadguy;-;585 hours played out of 5 stars
wolf;-;THIS GAME, OMG
DetectiveFox;-;This is a great historical city builder that you half to get your hands on. The DLCs improve the game by so much, and the depth to this game is so great. This game is a must have!
Oliver Clothesoff;-;Just buy it already.
AssociateTerror;-;This game is like that moment when you're geting a BJ and about to finish and she just lets you go all over her face and chest. And I mean EVERYWHERE. But overall, worth my dollar.
Luigi;-;If a console gamer asked me to give them a list of the top 5 pc games they needed to play, one of the games I'd tell them to play would be Civilization 5. It is absolutely one of the greatest games I have had the joy of playing. The game just throws you in without a strict tutorial you might find in most RTS games. But honestly it doesn't take that much skill or overall knowledge of the game's systems to start playing. Simply plop your settlers unto a hex (the recommended placements are great) and start playing. It's a turn based game so you have plenty of time to think through your moves and choices. There are so many things to look out for (happiness, city-states, economy, trade, researching the tech-tree, culture, city growth) and each of those things may drastically effect gameplay. Enemy Ai is fantastic, but side-note, I recommend players with experience in RTS to play at least on the Prince level, otherwise you won't get that much of a challange. Combat system works great, with many details factoring into a building/unit's ability to attack and defend. Diplomacy (improved with Brave New World DLC) is one thing I've wished was better but then again I've never played it with BNW dlc so perhaps its completely different. But all you can really do besides trade is declare war/peace and denounce people. The Ai will come to you with wierd proposals, like "hey give me your awesome oil research and I'll give you... uh how about dat pottery?". That scenario might not be real but still, I've definitely denied my share of strange trades, which may lead to worse relations. GET IT. If turn based strategy floats your boat, then by all means buy it, especially when its on sale.
LazyViolet;-;Absolute must-have! civbattleroyale.reddit.com civ.reddit.com ArrrLmao.reddit.com Inuittowinuit.reddit.com mossadspies.reddit.com
Steak House;-;A great addition to the empire-building strategy game. You have the ability to raise an empire from nothing and set about on your quest to rule the planet. Through means of diplomacy, technological advancements, culture or war you can make the Earth move under your command. Choose one of 43 empires from throughout history to aid you in victory, with several other mechanics such as religion, happiness, espionage and Great People this game is first choice if you need an in-depth strategy.
RoguishChuvak;-;Great game. Very addictive. Very huge. Very, very fun. Too many achievements. Must declare more wars.
shonebee;-;Destroying the culture and history of another civilisation with an army worthy of Mordor can be all the more fun with Civilisation V.
Superman;-;So addictive
IHG Juan Deago;-;Of the strategy games that I have played, it is amazing. It has an amazing mix of war and military, economy, science, culture, and religion (with G&K Worth the money, buy the expansions if on sale.
Nix - away for a week;-;This game sucks you in. Try for yourself, it's worth it.
[CARCOSA] Consultor da Indonesia;-;The best shortcut to death.
Razgar;-;Civ is Civ and will always hold a special place in my heart, I played Civ 2 the year it came out while in the 8th grade. A few years later I got a free copy of Civ 1 on a PC Gamer CD and played them both for many years. I love this game as I am not very good at RTS games these days because I can not keep up with all the clicking and multi-tasking. Civ 5 is a lot of fun if you like to stratergise as there are always plenty of factors to consider with every move in the later game. The average time I spend on a skirmish is about 6 hours so don't plan to have a quick 30 minute game before bed as you will be chanting... one... more... turn... as the sun comes up. I used to play this game with my house mate when he had trouble sleeping... 30 turns in and he's out like a light. I hope you all enjoy this game as much as I do!
Cerberean;-;I definetely recommend this game to anyone who enjoys RTS games. One of my previous RTS favorites was Age of Empires II & III, and I wondered if it was anything like it. The answer is not really. This game has more depth into advancement for your empire, and it is a TURN BASED game. Also be warned that this game will suck up HOURS of your time, as it can be very addicting and games do indeed last a long time typically. You can however, speed things up by changing your settings to create and research things quicker (taking less turns to do stuff). The game might be a little complicated at first and a bit discouraging when you see so many different stats to keep track for, but it's not as bad as it looks and it won't take long before you start getting the hang of how everything works. Also, if you are Hosting Multiplayer, be sure to uncheck Quick Combat in your host settings if you want attack animations enabled for online play. I mention this because I thought it was bugged or thought thats just how the game was, got me quite frustrated for a bit there before I found out how to enable it. I personally would not pay full price for this game however, I bought the Complete Edition when it was on sale for $16.49. (67% off) SCORE: 9.5/10
Cully919;-;i recommend buying this game
M3GA V3NOMS;-;Was Only Going To Play It For An Hour Or So But Spent Hours On Ends Playing It So Good!!
RileyF1311;-;Sooooooooooooo Good yooooo, if you don't have this game yet than your missing out! 10/10 Sick Brah!
Cazawhore;-;Thought I'd choose Ghandi as an ally because, well you know, he's a nice guy. Was later invaded by this 'nice guy' while I was entirely preoccupied by my conquering of Russia. 10/10 Right in the .
Zeniansorcerer;-;Best strategy game ever! Perfect for Multiplayer and extremely real when compared to real wars and world history.
thatyayo;-;When I first started playing I foolishly thought "I'll play for a couple of hours". Little did I know those hours turned into a whole night session playing Civ 5. As 4am approaches I realize how addicting this game is. You have been warned. You can't plan how long you will play, the game will release you when it is done with you. :)
Legacy;-;very good game if you like risk then you WILL like this game
VeronicaSlayer;-;A long playing stratergy game in which you can lead your civilization to victory or be crushed by more powerful and vicious leaders along the way. Learn how best to use your civ and keep your people from revolt. This is not a game to knock over in a lunch break, but one to languish on over a couple of days. Great fun to play with some friends.
Entreri;-;Well what can I say? I've got 491 hours put into this game and I'm still learning things. Even after all this I can still look at this game and wonder "What if I tried this strategy? Would things happen differently?" I can't imagine any other game could possibly offer as much content as Civilization 5's complete edition. The only flaw happens to be with the ai at higher difficulties. When you play for the first time they are more than a match for you at the regular difficulty because you simply don't have the knowledge to compete with them. However as you play and learn more about the game you begin to understand how to optimize things, and quickly learn ways to beat those pesky ai. At higher difficulties the only way the game counters your skill is by giving those opposing civilizations bonus resources and units that a normal player would not have. At the highest difficulties the sheer amount of advantages given to these civs can make them darn near unbeatable. This creates a certain niche in your late game experience where either you manage to get extremely lucky with your civ's location and manage to outproduce the other players or you end up getting stomped by an ai that was showered with a ridiculous amount of benefits. Regardless of this "achilles heel" I've found that these benefits are just balanced enough at King and Immortal difficulties that the game still feels like a competition where you have a fighting chance. Playing with friends is a blast. If your not very good at the game you can team up with a friend who may be a veteran and can carry you, or if you wan't to play this with someone new it's easy to set it up on a low difficulty and still be talkative and social. In the end, this game in my opinion has something for just about everyone.
eherna01;-;What can I say? I have played this game off an on for years. I am married with children and have a job, so I do not have quite as much time as some of the marathon civ players (look at some of the hours on record -- 3000 hours of gameplay is the equivatent of 1.5 years of 40 hour work weeks). Although I may not play it as much as others, it is the replay value that always brings me back. Most games are done once you finish the campaign or storyline. This game is fresh and fun every time. Years from now, when you've put the kids in bed and you have a moment to yourself, you'll boot up the computer, look at your games list and see Civ V. You'll say to yourself, "I haven't played that for a while!" As soon as you load the game, it will be like you never left. Trust me, I know.
hastim;-;addictive game. 10/10
Tekno;-;Great way to forget about everything else for a few days. Hope you didn't have plans for your weekend because this game is going to eat every second.
Andre;-;Havent been playing it for long but for the time I did I couldnt stop playing. Soooooo addicting
ryanjames;-;There's a few features that would really improve the game massively, but it still retains addictive and satisfying gameplay. As someone who adores history and strategy, this is a brilliant game. I feel as if it is a true celebration of human history and culture!
RomireOnline;-;Im going to be honest! As a gamer, i will enjoy all aspects of a game depending if its good or not. I got the game from my game shop as a heavy recomendation from Metacrtic, Youtube videos and Google review searches. even the Cashier said, "You will like this" Overall this game is fun for those who like stratagey! 8/10 HOWEVER This is not my game, because i dont get the game or concept of WTF i should be doing!
Markovnikov;-;Great game! I can spend hours on one game.
76561193705059552;-;No story, doesn't matter, you are in control of the earth. It doesn't loose its charm. The old games still hold up really well, but this one is really great. works on my cheap windows 8 tablet, worth it.
Pliz;-;I'm only on turn one but its an okay game.
Opequon;-;I clicky and stuff happens. Sometimes clicky is bad. I learn from bad clicky. Bad clicky leads to good clicky. All in all, I like to clicky.
Colonel McCandless;-;-Played as Siam -Spain attacks ally -SEND IN THE ELEPHANTS!
Matthew_;-;Very good fun with loads of friends, even with the CPU's it can be hilarious. You can nuke them (later game) or even just build a massive army and obliterate early game (quite hard to do). I play this with my friend loads and even some games take up to a whole day and we are yet to finish one but not far off. I would recommended this game a lot but only if you like these kind of games (stratergy). --------------------------------------------------!Civ V RULES!-------------------------------------------------------------- Review By GUNNS4L0AN
zach0558;-;Amazing game, but don't expect to play a "quick" game. I have spent over 50 hours on this game (at the time of writing this review), but have only just finished my first Civ. Simply wonderful strategy game.
Hagrid's Bloody Pickle;-;Throw money at this because it is awesome and i have almost got 200 hours play time on it making it my most played game and for good reason too.
Dirty Harry;-;One of the best turn based strategy game ever made :)
Dan The Rainbow BeeGoat;-;great game
xXx 420 Yoloscope xXx [FaZe];-;Definately buy the complete edition though, it's only a few dollars more and many times better than the vanilla version alone.
Deacon Hobbs;-;I haven't played a CIV game in years and this one makes it extremely easy to get back into the fold. It guides you along step by step to make it fun yet still challenging. Replayability is obviously very high as the game is different with every playthrough.
President Ab;-;This game is very enjoyable and a very fun game... It can be historical with the quotes and stuff at times and I was just talking to my teacher about this game how it deals of what were doing and stuff... Fantastic... You can even make the Religion of Spain 'Soccer'... I also played as America and ended up in the Middle east with Alexander the Great... Im dead... I also ended up in Canada with Britain and Germany forming a alliance... Great game, challenging AI and even works with a TOUCHSCREEN! O.M.G.! lets cross our fingers for a mobile Sid 5!
Ninja;-;This game is great it only took me 100+ hours to beat the game the first time then at 110 total hours I beat the game in 76 turns. My life is complete.
flip its remasterd;-;when you first play this game if you have alot of players can last hours. this is not a bad thoguh becuase those hours will be full of fun if you like manageing citys buildings and an army. this game has replay ability but can get boring in multiplayer becuase you can be deep into a game and people will leave and it just turns into and ai match.
Johnson;-;Not sure if should buy CoC or cs go keys
Tundra;-;Just buy the ing game, you will not regret it.
dont kill the rocket jumper;-;Loved this game. Highly recomended.
biti;-;I just finished my first game after playing another turn. Great game!
PeanutButterOctopus;-;Is good. Do play.
LazyTony;-;As a long time Strategy game fan, I can happily say this is my game of choice in this generations games. This is the game that sucks up most of my play time, right after Kerbal Space Program, and I can easily reccommend it to anyone trying to decide to buy it. Especially right now while it's on sale. 10/10 easy.
LivingLikeLarry;-;good game. wish i had the DLC
DragonFire;-;If you want a lax, turn based strat game with some character with a touch of empire management, look no further. Building on previous titles in the series, Civ5 comes out shining brightly. it has a lovely range of nations to choose from in the base game with plenty of addons putting more in. Furthermore, the steam workshop is partnered with the game allowing for creative mods to be made to enhance or change the game completely. The game engine itself can be run in both DX9 and DX10 so for those with slower systems, it's easier to scale down the requirements. On top of that, if you have a high end tablet (i5 CPU/Windows 8) expect to enjoy the integrated touch screen capabilities inbedded in the game. However, if I had a gripe to give, it would be how the AI doesn't scale well when it comes to difficulty and turn progression. Playing on the harder difficulties gives the AI massive early game boosts which can feel unfair at times but once the game session is half way through, player progression usually grows exponetially. I believe that this is a hard limitation to address and as such much couldn't be done. On the other hand, I've seen mods that have tweaked AI settings to balance this issue out, something to check out. Ultimately, I believe this is a great addition to the Civilization franchise and you won't be disappointed.
Plasma Angel;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a superb game for the strategic gaming community of Steam, involving multiple simmulations of the development of a human civilization through the passage of time with a multitude of victory's and ways to achieve them from influential leaders of humanities past to play as. From leaders such as Catherine the Russians to Napoleon the French you embark on a conquest to subdue humanity through the means of a cultural, economical, technological or domination victory.
Fat_Llama;-;With the brave new world expansion it is near perfect.
D-Kuang-RQ;-;10/10 would get nuked by Ghandi again
ABob71;-;Uh. You get to rule a nation, acting as the driving force to world domination. Choose your settlement, develop some resources, and  IT, I WAS LIKE ONE TURN AWAY FROM BUILDING THAT WONDER YOU PRICK!
Nyasper;-;Epic, must play for Strategy lovers.
Nawrusi;-;One of my favorite games. This game is a strategy game, and it is one of my favorite games of all time. The game is based on a travel through time, and you are against or with other states or countrys. You take controle of a famouse leader, and with that leader you have to either deffeat all the other states on the map, or be the first person to advance to the future. Along the way you have to advance in technolegy, and you can chose what your focus is going to be from the get go. Maybe your people will focus on moeny, maybe on warfare or even religion. The gameplay is very simple, move your pices every single round, or give them a comand such as attack or build. Along the way you have to make sure that your people are happy, you have resources, your tecnoligy is going well, your citys are growing and much more. This can sound complicated, but after some time, you get used to some of the controles and the game becomes much easier. The game is fun when you play singleplayer and multiplayer, but be avare that a game will take a long time. This is not your typical LAN party game, that a normal game can take up to 10 hours. The game is fantastic, and a thumps up is all I can give it, but trust me this thump is as high as it can get. 10 out of 10
(E-z-E)-PreZist;-;is a great startegi game!
Fake [HtD][VmfD];-;This is really good game, where you need to control your civilization like the name tells. There's many "countrys". You can achieve 287 achiements if you have all the dlc's. You start on stone age and end on future.
DeathBlade09;-;TBH i've only played about 59 hours on this game, however this game is insanly addiction! If you are looking to buy this game you should wait till OCT. cause they will release the newest game : Beyond earth, and of course they're gonna make a sale for this game.
akekirkyedi;-;Old, new doesn't matter, so many countries, more you understand this game more fun you will have
SlendyBenJ;-;This game is real gud
Fireking883;-;I have not played much, I know, but dont think that that is a reason not to trust me as I have played many more hours offline. Now, to the review. Pros: -Lots of civilizations to play as +1.5 -In depth +.5 -Multiplayer +1.5 -Each nation has it's own units(Mostly that is) +1 -Put together good +1 -Good graphics +1 -Different difficulty levels +.5 -Pretty easy to learn +.5 -Amazing tech-tree +1.5 -Takes a while to finish game +.5 -Essentialy unlimeted replayability +1 Cons: -Dumbed down from previous versions -1 -Not in as much detail as previous versions -.5 Civilization 5 is an awesome strategy game. It has many more pros than cons and rates a 9.5/10. The only problem I have experienced from this game is that it is dumbed down fromn the previous versions. I would reccomend this game to begginers to the civilization series, but many advanced players will love it as well. Thank you for reading! Game: Civilization 5 Rating out of 10: 9.5
Yelsew;-;This game is awesome. Thats all i got to say...
The Teleturbans;-;Marvellous strategy game,highly addictive and a great way to pass lots of time. P,S I highly recommend everyone to get the DLC,it has a ton of extra features and is worth every penny.
BadBannana;-;I swore it wouldn't happen. I had so much more happy memories of Civ IV. I had played hours of it and when Civ V first came out I laughed in their faces. "Hah!" I said. "They whine about that  game when Civ IV was right there all along!" And then Gods and Kings came out. Spies, Religion, Factions! I had to. I bought the game for about 30 euro and gave it around 70 hours. Then A Brave New World came out and of course I had to buy that. And somehow Civilization grew on me. With the help of a friend who is MUCH better then I am I was able to stop playing in Prince difficulty. Somehow from there the hours slipped away from me. At one point I found myself awake at 2am with a head cold planning to expand my empire on a map I had already dominated. I had won yet I needed all my people to have Public Schools and Stealth Bombers. This game does a very good job of conveying how countries rise and fall. Kind of. It was a surprisingly new idea for me that a country can start in such a  situation and somehow rise out of the ashes thanks to the fall of other countries. Now if you've read this far down down you will have been disappointed to see no may-may about Gandhi and nukes or something bizarre that happened out of context. So here goes: "Gandhi researched nukes but was too far behind so I won a Space Victory. 11/10 would stick my finger in a hot apple pie again"
Franklin D. Boysevelt;-;It is amazing.
richardsonja;-;this game is fantastic! I've played Civilization Revolution on 360 and this is 10 times better than that! well worth the price!
TheSilverBean;-;Civilization V, A classic real time strategy game, this game was a game that I had to try out due to my previous exposure to the Xbox version of Civilization Revolution. At first when I had played this game I had disliked it due to major differences between Civ V and Civ Rev, some examples could be City-States and a larger tech tree, however as I kept trying to understand this game, I found myself owning other Civilizations such as Russia. Key items that I loved about this game was how they had much more Civilizations such as the Inca or Koreans, it really made me happy knowning that I could play as these nations due to those nations not being available for Civ Rev. Another item that I had liked in this game would be small items such as the nation having its actual language being played, it made me happy hearing real English from George Washington rather than hearing random sounds which had happen in Civ Rev. As time progressed I have found myself to enjoy the game. If I had to sell this game to someone who has never been exposed to the Civilization series, I would give them the advice of actually putting a time investment in the game.
Emperor;-;Some features surpass Civ4 but the combat system is still something I sorely miss. However, with the Brave New World DLC, the game became more interesting for me! Trade routes and defending them game my game new life. I still wish Paradox would get a budget like this for their games.
[MLGS]cyberwaffle;-;A very fun game. I highly recommend it. When i first started the game I was like "This is pretty cool." But by the end when i was building giant armies sending out spies and mass building robots of death. I was just blown away. I also got the complete edition for fifteen dollars on 2K publisher's weekend. Which is easily worth it. Even if you buy it at full price I would still recommend it. The only con is it takes a little bit for the game to load up. Anyway I recommend trying it.
LGJA;-;In my opinion, this could be one of the best games ever! It is quite adictive, has detailed graphics and has great multiplayer. I have to also say that the Celtic Empire speaks Welsh! I love that being Welsh myself. I would highly recomend buying this game.
Joe Biden The Terminator;-;Really good game, you should buy it.
Sky Oreya;-;Loved this game. I never played the Civ series before, and I just bought this game because I heard the reviews were great when it came out and boy did I have fun! I would definitely recommend this game if you like strategy games in general (I was an RTS fan before buying this). ah yes, I'll never forget the time I nuked Japan (lol) several times because I was a bored, rich Persian emperor. Or the time that I conquered the entire world as Augustus Caesar in the modern era... or that time I completed my first science victory. Fun stuff I say.
aiouh;-;what do you mean it's already tomorrow
t+pazolite;-;wow so fun and great buy now
Dank Vader;-;Ill just play for half an hour. 10 hours later... Just one more turn.
Squidopus;-;I love this game so much!!! I well recommend it to everyone. it is awesome
Lowvision;-;it is a very good pick if your into strategic games. you can wage war or peace with other nations and peoples and eventually rule the world wether it being by scientific dicovories or just being the best civilization there is. Will YOU rule the world?
Veers;-;It's ok
AgatoN<3;-;I must say this game is awesome,had played civ IV but this is way better its very complex you can control a nation from stone age til present you can choose what kind of style you like to play war or diplomacy(in many cases you will be forced to go war on other nations). Also there are city-states by helping them either destroy another city-state or build a wonder you will have benfit with troops or other useful things. The gameplay is smooth the graphics are fine so its worth of time playing(also to mention if you in a hurry or simply dont have time dont play this game because its too freaking long). You can choose from many difficulty if you are new player and dont know anything about it, the game will guide you and explain every mechanic or should i say what is useful for the type of game you want to play. Overall this game is very fun i highly recommend it.
Barack Obama;-;I like this game and it is fun cause I like it and it is fun.
Capn Redlink;-;I think its a great strategy game! I played this for hours! I highly recommand buying this if you like strategy!
Yusheng ();-;dis is a greet game, to play with friends... if I had any... Oh that's... that's really sad. It has great entertainment for many hours of fun. Great re-playability when you have no mates.
BunnyOverlord;-;With almost 130 hours on record and I haven't experienced a crash/bug. And if I have, it's been minor. I can't believe that's impressive to me, but considering the amount of games rushed out the past few years filled with bugs and crashes, this game is a godsend. With that said, it's a good game. -Tons of civ to choose from, although you're limited to one leader now. -Spying is stronger, but simpler. -There's tons of options to mess with, things seemed to have been balanced well. -Victory conditions are also pretty cool. I usually do conquest, but if I get bored with that, I can move onto other things.
dabomb159;-;If your the type of gamer thats into slow-pace, turn based, strategy games, then I would recommend giving this game a try. It's full of suprises and fun packed battles that will keep you coming back for more.
FoxKicks;-;This game manages to make running a nation really fun by making it really streamlined and well organized. You can be the power-crazed warmonger who rushes nukes in the technology tree, or the peaceful type who just wants to get the highest amount of gold without getting in anyone else's way.
magicalmikaela;-;This is the type of game that you will start playing one afternoon and don't notice how long you've been playing until the sun rises the next morning.
Ender;-;one of the best strategy games ever, really fun especially with friends get ready to give all your free time to this game because its really addicting
Biggs;-;Love this game, thousands of hours played, definitive 4X game...Must have for any PC Gamer!
Foxtrot_V;-;Awesome game!
Cellar Door;-;It shouldn't even be a question. If you haven't already bought Civ V than do it now.
shushismasher;-;this is the best game i have ever played
Daz;-;Don't like strategy games, LOVE this one. Great game, even for newbies in the strategy genre. Really good fun with friends, shame the loading screens take a little while, but it is all worth it to play a relaxing game of civ with mates.
Avery4life;-;This game is great I have played over 100 hours and loved every second. You can Settle, Trade, Fight, Make alliances, Make Enemies, Get ing owned by barbarians, and build nukes. 10/10 WILL build More cities again. Map Editor + Mods + Multiplayer + Single Player ++ AI (Very mean Ghandi declared war on me) +-
Pirate Santa;-;It's like Risk, but about 500% more complicated.
Bobnog;-;Singlehandedly the best game that i have ever bought. It is the type of game which you can play in so many different ways whilst continuing to be exciting. If you have the money to buy this game then snatch it up, it's worth every penny!
Gaunt;-;Are you having a giggle, now you decide to go on sale after spending  oh you mother
SticerAC;-;10/10 So far the best Civ i have played.
hen;-;This game ruins friendships.
riptideMBP;-;Just buy it next time it's on sale, you wont regret it. Well I guess you will regret it when it becomes your second most played game (behind TF2 of course).
Truth;-;Pretty good game. I can't say I'm a huge fan of it as I was of Civ IV, but it's still a pretty solid game. I don't like the huge amount of bugs and graphical issues which caused me and so many others not to be able to play it for months (6+ for me). If you see it on sale, I'd say go for it.
rresuggan;-;being a mainly fps or fps/rpg type games fan, i thought i'd try a different genre so i bought the complete edition on the last steam sale to just see what all the fuss is about. now i know its the most addictive, where did the time go, just one more turn game i have ever played, highly recommended
Unoriginal;-;Very cool strategy game, played it for long time and still playing
The_Bean;-;MidnightKiv
New Acc;-;I have only played Civ V for about 2 hours now, having never played a single game of Sid Meier's, let alone really and turned based strat games in general. So far I can tell and understand why the hype for this game is so big. Yes at first it seems like it has a decently big learning curve, I was kind of overwhelmed at first with what I was supposed to be doing etc. But the nice thing about it is that instead of having to go through a huge tutorial for an explanation, it tells you what you should be doing while you are starting off your country. I like it a lot!
WJMack;-;So... This game, apparently, has nukes, planes, swords, guns, wars, cities, huge maps, and bombs? .. I love it. I really recommend the game to all people who like creating, building, and destroying cities. It's sort of like a simulator, in a sense.
DoubleO7;-;I love this game, It was a little challenging when I firt started, But after this its SO fun!
SMUDGE;-;epic in multiplayer!
Ace Trainer;-;Too Addicting!
Shadowolf;-;What you need to know: This is probably one of the best stratagey games created. If you have the 2 expansions then the game is well balanced to appeal to many different types of play. Whether you want to stick to your one little city on an island and go for a diplomatic victory, or expand your civilization by the might of your military; then this game will appeal to you. I highly suggest playing with a group of friends or even just 1, multiplayer against other humans or even teaming up against comps is what makes this game great. The only flaw is the amount of money you have to spend getting all the expansions so buy the complete edition when its on sale. Other than that I know its worth the value, I have gotten more hours out of this game than any other.
G-sLim;-;Amazing and fun strategy game! ONly the best can win it all!
DMP DemonicPie;-;I personally enjoyed all civ games but this on stands out, idk if people think beyond earth is better but i dont, its a slow pased game that offers a fun experiance as one of its many civalazations starting in the ancient ara ( you can play ancient amerca for some reason)as you progress you will need to establish trade or build a military while trading,i try to stay friendly but its your choice, your civalazation, so control it
Gank the Nerd!;-;This is a very, very addicting game. If you plan on having a social life, do not get this. Make sure you leave the dog several bags of food before you start, because you will forget everything once you start playing. Also, get the expansion packs for the best experience, and try out the mods because they are easy to get. Make sure you use the DirectX 10&11 version, not windows 8 touchscreen version, unless you are on a touchscreen device. You will spend hours on this game and it is very fun, I recommend this game highly.
123adamh;-;Just the intro alone to Brave New World makes it worth it to get this game.
Snuffsy;-;Simply awesome 10/10
Exorideath;-;I never would of thought this game would become one of my favorites of all time.
M1SF0RTUNE;-;It may seem like another re-hash of the old Civilization games of yore, but once you start playing, this game will get its' hooks very, very deep into you, thanks to it's massive amount of improvements, streamlined, but improved experience, and hands down the best Civilization yet.
Playzean;-;Ive Sunk Two Hundred and Fifty Hours into this game and i can say i couldnt be happyer! This is a sold strategy epic well worth the investment. 10/10 Edit: as of 25/01/2015 that be 601 hours hun
Parallel Giraffe;-;Puny Russia I CRUSH YOU! Like little babby... I CRUSH YOU!!!!
TacoTruck ^_^;-;Its a great game. However multiplayer is a mess. I play multiplayer anyway thou. One of my favorite features is that you can see the person you are talking to in singleplayer. Sadly multiplayer takes all of that away. Civ can have its moments most of them in multiplayer but i cant help but feel like I am doing the same thing over and over. thats when u pause your current playthrou and continue later. Dont recommend the single version. Buy the complete pack for maximum value (Alot better with bnv and gak)
choke-let;-;Why does anyone think Gahndi is so bad? He's done absolutely nothing to me. Actually, he's pretty stupid IMHO. Seriously, he builds ALL the cities and tries to go for a domination victory. Like what the ?
Neandershot;-;This is one of the best best-if not the best game I have ever played. It deserves a huge recommendation. It has an absolutely astonishing GUI (especially for this series) and great gameplay. Who doesn't want to dominate the world? Or, if you don't want to do it that way, you can dominate the world just through forming the United Nations, or becoming a huge cultural empire. It's all about your choices. Form a huge empire, their territory, their culture, their religion, etc...
CSCHERME;-;Great game. Will cause you to lose track of time easily, but it's totally worth it. Be careful of Gandhi and Napoleon.
.Puush`;-;Sid Meier never disappoints, Amazing Gameplay. A blast with friends.
[ITA]lock3r;-;A new clothing for the old fashoned Civ. Nice gameplay, maybe a little easier respecting to previous chapters; tons of fun with friends in MP; no evident bugs; you MUST get the version with all DLC, it's kinda having a different game. Recommended! PS i payed 25 and it definitely worth it!
D'Kid;-;u must have this game in ur steam account
James03R713;-;This game is probably the BEST turn based strategy game of all time. Civ 5 has so many victory options and so much replayability. (Though military domination is the most fun in my opinion) There are also many great mods for Civ 5. If purchased i definitely reccommend starting on warlord/ chieftain difficulty to get your bearings.
Dark_Matter;-;I started playing to see what it was. When I saw what time it was, I had suddenly played it for 6 hours straight. Amazing.
Deadredskittle;-;This Game is a total Riot with friends, and when you start learning what you're doing it goes up another notch
[25th] XBaroonX;-;9/10 multiplayer sucks... there should be bans for leavers.... But if you play singleplayer.... endless fun
|29th|Cpl.Dovahkiin=Croatia=[L];-;Engagement Engrosses students with lush graphics and intense historical story lines. Gameplay is quick and yet satisfying, hooking inexperienced gamers and detailed enough to create infinite teaching moments. Learning Approach There is a deep well of in-game social studies information that easily fits in with world history classes. Transfer of game knowledge back to class content will rely on the teacher working through the game experience later with the students. Support It wasn't created with educators in mind, so it doesn't include any teacher curriculum; however, there is a devoted online community, extensive support base, and multiple difficulty levels.
cheapbuster;-;I know I've sid it before but I really admeier the work put into the game
Fifty Shades of Ulysses;-;Where do I begin, Civ V is the one of the BEST games I have ever played in my 9+ years of gaming. I love the strategy aspect and the fact that there are so many things you need to pay attention to in order to win the game other than other games being like "AHHAHA IM JUST GUNA SHOOT AND DEN I WIN HAHA". This game takes thought, intellect, and time. I HIGHLY recommend buying this game.
*Kitty*;-;Great game. I love creating Robo France 9595
twitch.tv/bloxeratorlive;-;The obsession.....unending, unstopable, all three expansions....so addicted....help me......
Nuclear Entity;-;If you want to rule the world,and raise your empire this game is for you
Lucid;-;Super fun war game. Playing with friend is the best way to play this game. But is still reccomendable on single player. Build up cities upon cities of foundation on your civilisation and watch is thrive or be destroyed be superior forces. Great game. Only problem is tabbing out is super laggy and also the steam sever's are of poor qualty on this game, Would reccomend creating own server. 9/10
Lunar Module;-;Fun for hours!
sgteddy1212;-;Having played over 1000 hours on the game since I got it in June 2013, I have decided to write a review. This game is great game. It is slow paced but fun. This game will not be a game that you play for a hours because a game can be over 2 hours+ long because this game is adicting. When you play a game for over 26 hours straight you should know what an adicting game is. And this game's theme is great and it is a key feature in the game, its nice and calm in peace tome but in war, it is loud and....EPIC! The theme alone will keep you playing this game. This game has one flaw... its way to fun and going away from it is hard. This game is such an improvment over Civ 4 and is one that I play with respect and pride. If you get this game...good luck going away from it for times more than a month.
Chinchai;-;Just the best, nothing more
Pl4gu3_D0g;-;Buy the expansion packs. Civ 5 vanilla is okay, but the Expansion packs (Gods & Kings, Brave New World) make this game as amazing as it should have been at launch.
Messy;-;Awesome game. First skirmish was 24 hours of playtime, and I enjoyed every minute.
Anaminus;-;This is a fantastic game, I love games with a variety of routes you can take, which is exactly what this is. You could try to establish trade with other nations or just decimate them and take their land. However, at least on my computer, I find that when loading saved games, the game sometimes becomes riddled with graphical glitches. For example, I will load up a game and within a few turns, the map and all outlines in the game start flashing on and off. For me, this eventually leads to a crash in the game. I'm not sure if that's me, my computer, or the game. It's still a great game though.
PestLock;-;Ok so i have a few hours on this game and I can say this game is one of the best ones out there on steam. the gameplay is endless , you can choose from countless of leaders and play on all diferent kinds of maps. the comunity is great with hundred upon hundreds of mods and something new every week. I mean what game will you find where you can pit the Aztecs the Dutch and the Zulus against eachother. the multiplayer is also very fun if you can mangage to get some of your freinds together it is very fun to play with. even if Beyond Earth was recently released this game is worth getting for sure. i'd like to conclude with a quote from Thomas Jefferson. "Civ 5 is an all around gaming experience also someone rescue me from this guys cave, help" - Thomas Jefferson, March 29th 2015 10/10
Funny meme cat;-;If you like Civilizations, and the roman numural V, then I STRONGLY recomend this game!
Potato;-;I really recommend this game it is just so good. But make sure you get the dlc it turns it into a whole nother game.. Grayson my friend doesnt own it and he wont buy it cause hes a dumbass with aids but its okay he doesnt know what hes missing just make sure you get it!!!!!
lenny;-;It is one of the most addictive, entertaining games I have ever played
Jake Moody;-;great game :)
Dr.Chocolate;-;12 hours a game gr8 with friends but will get mad if they take forever to end their turn 6/9
towleboy;-;I came, I saw, I got nuked by Ghandi then a massive war destroyed my save file 11/10
33High;-;11/10. One of the best games i've ever played, Sid Meier again makes a fabulous game. Smooth gameplay and infinite replay value make it top notch! With more than a dozen awesome civs, and DLC that is very much worth the purchase, its a game i asbolutely love. Can't wait for Civilization: Beyond Earth!
NoxintheBox;-;If you get the DLC/Expansions. This game is almost as good as Civ 4.
Milk Man;-;If I could only play one and only one game for a year, this would be it. You will lose all your time playing this.
XFierceWarriorX;-;Kiss your life goodbye, this game is great....if yo have played any Civ games before you know how awesome they are. Civ 5 does not let you down. Endless amounts of fun, playing with your friends online is awesome as well! who doesn't wanna take over the world? backstab your allies to dominate the world!
Tyrranatar;-;Once you download this game, you'll never go back. Just... one... more... turn...
Beaghan;-;It's all good. Much better than the new Sid Meier games..
plncdr1960;-;Super fun, watch the centuries glide by.
Cakeman22;-;Is rly good
Gone Till Friday~;-;Good game to play alone or with people. Best to play when you have no plans for an entire day, it'll take up the majority of the day. If you take forever deciding on things, maybe it's best to save lots of time for this. It can be fun to play with friends, but it is difficult to agree on things as each civilization must expand and conquor the world.
Mr. Marshmallow Devil;-;One of the best games ever! Recommend getting the DLCs, totally improves the game.
ZippityBoppityGiveMetheFloppity;-;It's like crack but you can quit crack
o;-;Cannot recommend enough. Seriously, I tried hitting the recommend button again. It didn't work.
hello parking meter;-;yes very buy wow much victory
George Bush;-;One of the best games availible on Steam. Greatest strategy game I've ever played, 100% reccomend Civilization V for it's insanely infinite possiblities.
Tecinavah;-;Just one more turn ...
SirDr.Lord Irk;-;One of the best turn based strategies ever. Mods make it even better. 10/10 would Civ again. I wish Beyond Earth didn't suck.
PJPixel;-;1st hour Oooooh, what does this do? 4th hour Make a farm!, make a unit!, make all dem things! 10th hour DIE EVERYONE DIE! 50th hour Ok I got this and this and this and this and that and that and those and those go here and here and here and there and here 141th hour ...........In case you haven't noticed I love this game, highly recommend getting the complete edition.
Gabe Newell;-;I recommend this game. Why? because from my experiances it random on what will happen next within the game ( If you start a new game ) the only thing that does get boring it knowing what will be coming in the eras units etc. Its even more fun with friends.
niculbolas;-;This game is addictive. It uses the same tried and true formula of the other games and will keep you glued to the screen for hours as you just need One More Turn... The game is more balanced than ever if you get the 2 additional DLCS. The first makes religion worthwhile and the 2nd adds more lategame options and a revamp of the cultural victory conditions.
TheSuperSlinky;-;Went on an expidition with my friend everything went smoothly until barbarians were slowly picking off people one by one...................... only two people survived that day. 20/10 Would Feel Again
Wasser;-;This game has the potental to be really fun, you need to find someone who can spend hours upon hours wasting their lives with you, I'm not one for singleplayer on these types of games but playing on the same team with a friend and trying your hand at world domination - amazing fun! Atleast credit this game and try it somehow, I highly recommend.
Batman;-;Fantastic game. 10/10
Hukules;-;It's ok
Mordith;-;I find this as an amazing game, however, I am a little disappointed by the fact that mods are not supported in multiplayer. This game is a bit time consuming, but I have spent quite a bit of time and I have been having fun. I recommend that you play with friends, and have a good game of civ! Enjoy, mein comrades!
Pugmon;-;Easly one of the most time consuming games out there but so fun with friends!
Cuppernicus;-;Most efficient way to waste time without even realizing it. 10/10 would waste entire day again.
Relentless-Chaos;-;A very unique game. Sid Meier's Civilization V (Civ V) is a 4X video game in the Civilization series developed by Firaxis Games, released on Microsoft Windows in September 2010. When it comes down to it, Civ V is a turn based strategy game. The basic idea of a civilization game is to have the best civilization compared to your neighboring civilizations. How you do that can be done in a few ways. My first and favorite method is by complete domination of other civs, what I'll do is grow my civilization, expand my borders, and declare war on anyone that's a threat to me and my borders, or simply to pick on the weak or expand my own territory and civilization. As technology within my civilization progresses, they go through different eras such the ones listed here: Ancient era, Classical era, Medieval era, Renaissance era, Industrial era, Modern era, atomic era, Information era, etc. At first my army will just be a bunch of barbarians with axes, archers, catapaults etc. But then as my technology advances, eventually I'll have modern era soldiers with rifles, tanks, aircraft, and nuclear bombs. I just have to be sure not to fall behind on the tech tree, or else I'll get destoryed by somone with a far more advanced army with guns while I still have axes. Ultimately, I'll have to conquer every civilizations original capital city to beat the game. Although, if I don't conquer them fast enough, then I may lose to another civ by means of other victory types. How? Well other victory methods may not even regard any combat whatsoever, you can have the best civilization with the best culture/tourism, knowledge of science (be the first to launch a spaceship), diplomacy, or overall score if the time runs out etc. I can't speak for these victory types since I always go for the domination path. The maps in Civ V are generated by random and offer plenty of variety every time and even if that's not enough than the modding community has you covered. They'll have you covered with many other things as well such as custom GUIs, unit skins, stastitics, etc. I can't speak for multiplayer, I prefer this time consuming game alone. But speaking of time consuming, Civ V could take as long as a whole day or more just to complete one game, but don't let that scare you off. Just save your game and pick up where you left off next time. Although, there is plenty of customization that can be done in terms of settings to make the game speed faster (or much longer) as well as make the overall difficulty harder or gameplay more interesting. If you're new to civilization games, then this game is not newb friendly, out of my 130+ hours, I've only won about 4 times out of plenty of games. But that goes to show you that even if I lose, Civ is a fun addicting experience. But for all players no matter the skill level, I highly reccomend this site for a guidance. http://www.carlsguides.com/strategy/civilization5/ Also, be sure to pick up Civ V complete and not just Civ V the base game. It's worth it.
Retep_Osranug;-;I've owned this game for about 3 weeks. In that short time, I've concluded that this is one of the best games I've ever played. Ever. It's really fun to play single player and even more fun to play with friends, the only drawback is the sheer cost of the game and its DLC. So if you have the money, get it, if you don't have the money, save up (or not, your choice).
JimmyMcWilly;-;This is where free time goes to die, RIP.
BullDogge_SVK;-;WARNING!!!: This game is really Addictive, you think you can handle one more turn but after 12 hours you realize it wasn`t one turn. I am person who really like strategic games and Civilization V is the best strategic game so... best game EVER made. 11/10
FifteenHours;-;900+ Hours! The only reason I will stop playing this game, is when the next Civ comes out :P
King Bacon;-;Vanilla this game is decent, but with Brave New World and Gods and Kings this game is brilliant! so much fun and so much time to be wasted, i recomend this game to any and all!
kawaii miata;-;13/10 Ruins all friendships
madragon;-;Awsome game, you can just play it for hours and not get bored. Some things are a bit to over powerd but you almost have to play this game. Edit: The dlc are really worth buying. I bought them on sale so if i was you. I would wait for a good sale or something that could drive the price down.
SallySadPants;-;The best way to waste a weekend.
The King In The North;-;>Think it won't be a great game buy it anyway >Love it >Play it all day think about it all night >Stop doing basic things (sleeping, eating, bathing), my civilization is more important >Play all day and all night, do nothing else >Ruined my life 11/10 would play all day and all night again. I without a doubt do not regret playing this game, even though I hated strategy games I was persuaded by friends to buy this and am I glad I did. This is one of the best games I have played it's one of the top 3 which include bioshock infinite and skyrim. Each play through can be different (depending on who you play with... I'm talking about you Alfie). The amount of different ways you can play is amazing I can't get enough of it.
Bugger This;-;this game combines the beautiful playstyle of the other civ games with outstanding dlc and an amazing aray of diversity in a game which at first glance can be repetative, no matter how many campaigns (or whatever you want to call them) this game never gets boring. 8/10
bill.neumeier9;-;Great game!!!! Addicted!!!
Xonikz;-;If only this translated into my real bank account accrual.
ngt;-;This game is hard strategy turn-based game If you don't patient enough, you can't win it But if you are a freakin mind reader or a master of mind I suggest this game would be nice playing with your friends !
g;-;This game is amazing if your the kind of person who likes Stratergy and defence basiclly you can choose from a Leader of history and Change history! you can either go Single player where you compete againsed computers or multiplayer where you find a server or make your own one the only downside is that there are a few bugs that do not let you go on to next turn or attack enemy's when there near your city
Armand;-;Civ v is a great game with lots of adventure and strategy, It's fun to build your own settlement and to discover new techniques and develop your own civ. Civ v does take a lot of time, though. An average game on the "quick" setting takes 4 hours! If you have no patience, I don't think civ v is the game for you. This game will train your strategy skill and will help you with other strategy games.
EdMatta;-;fantastic game. hours of guaranteed fun.
N_gent;-;Great game
Gift from the Gods;-;cool cool, 32/34
keithsboredom;-;Turn based perfection. the house that Sid Meier built does it every time. Creating a civilization and building it through the ages one hex at a time. A+
Lhs80;-;Its actually good and i don't even like strategy games.
MatthewSoup;-;gam is fun, wold reccomind this 2 ppeople out ther. -suggestionz: kim jong-un DLC : adolph hilter DLC if u c dis, show 2 gayben, plis. This gaem is r8 8/8 m8 (i mastrb8)
BurningPokerChips;-;Fun to play with 2 other people. Games can last quite a while but they are never dull and there is always deep strategy involved.
Swader;-;Civ V is the pinnacle of the Civ series - everything before a buildup to this, everything after is just a shadow of it. It's an incredibly addictive and fun game, and even if, at later stages of the game, most of your play time is reduced to just waiting, time still flies. I would absolutely recommend this game. That said, there are several minor gripes I have with it: - turns late in the game last up to 30 minutes of waiting for AI to finish. Good for catching up with reading or doing some work on another monitor if you have such an opportunity, but not for much else - sometimes, internet games get randomly disconnected - when internet games get randomly disconnected, the AI *immediately* takes over for the disconnected player and spends all his remaining moves. If the host then saves, reloads, and re-invites the disconnected people back into the game, their turns have been wasted. - re-inviting disconnected people most often doesn't work if game is already in progress. The host will usually have to reload the game. - no support of inviting steam players over LAN - AI is given cheats on higher difficulty, rather than a better strategy. As such, penalties for unhappiness or lack of gold do not apply to them, and their units *never* get disbanded if they run out of cash. That's just no fun. And then there's my wishful thinking: - it'd be nice if the AI and a player's interaction with it was in any way customizable / replaceable. I would love to write a new AI brain and plug it into the game. I'd add "Make it up to me" options to the dialog when you catch the AI spying on you, I'd add respect and geographical modifiers to an AI's decision to attack you, I'd add persuasion stats and perks to leaders and dialog trees similar to those in Mass Effect or Deus Ex: HR, leading to the optimal outcome in negotiations, and more. - it'd be nice if there was a way to remove the barbarian AI from the game after a while - in later stages of the game, the barbarian AI thinks for up to 5 minutes even though it has no camps or units remaining, or even empty tiles on which to spawn. - I'd love to be able to select which tiles to focus expansion on in the city view - previous Civs supported this I think Anyway... definitely get this. It leaves a lot to be desired, but it offers so much you'll forget about the downsides.
Irodiac;-;Amazing game, really pulls you in once you get the basics. A lot of variation and endless fun with your friends. Definitely a must have.
king20858;-;I used to think this would be to hard for me to play, but when i started its was easy and fun. I recommend this game.
Marshall Lame;-;11hours 1st day. Nothing more
zebaw5;-;really fun game in my opinion it's better with Brave New World but even the base game but for 30 extra dollars its tottaly WORTH your money
SuperFerry53;-;This game is damn good. 10/10
Cardinal_UK;-;Out of all my steam games, this is the one game I keep coming back to. When it was first released, I truly hated it. It was a rushed and broken game. Now, it has become one of my all-time favourite games. The turn based nature of this game means you get the time to plan your empire and diplomatic strategy. Battles can become large chess-like conflicts that require you to look at the bigger picture - simple numbers will not win you a fight (unless on the easiest difficulty of course). The game is engaging with a gigantic tech tree to keep you interested. There are also numerous scenarios to choose from, such as the fall of Rome and the American Civil War. You can also fully customise your game and create your own scenarios for you and your friends to play. The vanilla game is massive, and will keep you occupied for many an hour trying to crush, bribe, sleaze or geek your way to victory. Then there is the added bonus of the workshop turning this already huge game into an endless, life sucking monster from which there is no return. In all, I love this game and if you like Turn Based Strategy games this is definitely one you need in your collection.
Lord Kryos;-;JUST... ONE... MORE... TUUUUUUUUURN
Pookie;-;Ooh, are you thinking about buying this game? I love it, and the reason I love it? Because I can PLAY it. I'm not one for impossible games that you have to do again and again and again and you still die before the checkpoint - you can set the difficulty on this, and the difficulties seem to be pretty wide ranging. Very accessible to newer players, but with progression for those people out there who are just amazing at whatever game they touch! About playing it, though - you have to have the time to devote to it. Those with families or busy social lives will probably start resenting their families or friends because they want to be playing, and those without will never have a reason to stop! You just set yourself targets of, "once I've got to there, I'll stop", but by that time, you're working on something else! "Just. One. More. Turn." And that's just the first game - there's so many variations because there's so much choice of progression throughout the game, and then there's all those trophies (I do love a good trophy collection), that even when you finish the first game, you're already plotting which leader and which strategy you'll be next! I really enjoy the expansion Brave New World - I'm glad they brought religion back, culture victories are much more interesting, and trade routes are a good way to boost income (and partially equalise the science of nations). And if half the words I'm saying make no sense - don't worry; a lot of the game can be automated, the advisors don't steer you too far wrong, and if you've put it on easy enough, you're army will overpower the others soon enough to give you a satisfying first, albeit violent, victory.
DSancho;-;My personal favorite of the Entire Civ Series Civ 5 Civ 4 Civ 2
LoveJelly919;-;Chose 'random leader' for my first game of Civ 5. Rolled Gandhi. Set out to build a nice little empire. Everyone was happy and well fed, cotton and whales were plentiful, and wonders were constructed to inspire my people. Then Montezuma showed up. He wanted my land, my people, my wonders... so I CRUSHED HIM. HIS EMPIRE BURNED BENEATH THE FEET OF MY ARMIES AND HIS CAPITAL CRUMBLED BY THEIR HANDS. BUT IT WOULD NOT STOP THERE, MY BLOODLUST WOULD NOT BE SATISFIED UNTIL EVERY NATION ON THE PLANET MET THEIR BRUTAL DEMISE. AND MEET IT THEY DID, ONE BY ONE UNTIL THE GREEN OF INDIA SPANNED THE GLOBE... It remains the most true to form I have every played a civ leader. 10/10 would be  Gandhi again
joewriter81;-;Makes time disappear. Unsure where time ends up. Sorry for nuking your capital, Attila.
+AkSon+;-;Best game I have ever played! All the extra packets and DLCs make the game even more fantastic. 10/10
Reckless Bundle o' Stickery;-;Amazing game. You can be whatever type of leader you want. From a cold-blooded  to a benevolent, friendly president. However, don't trust Gandhi. He'll get you if you give him the chance. You can make friends with other nations and share riches and borders with. Or you can make enemies like Gandhi that want to nuke you while promoting peace and love. There are 5 victory types You got Diplomatic Victory: Where someone in the game creates the U.N and the nations vote for who should be the true world leader You got Cultural Victory: Where you win based on how many cultural points you have, how many wonders you have built and how much people like your country. In order to win you need to research the Utopia Project. You got Science Victory: Where you beat everyone in a race to space. Just create a spaceship and. before anyone else does. You got Time Victory: A more passive mode where the rules are: let the best leader win. Whoever has the most points by the end of the game wins. And finally you got Domination Victory: Where you get completely destroyed by such a pacifist leader like Gandhi. Stay away from Gandhi. And bandits. Gandhi and Bandits
lilperk;-;As it turns out, I'm really good at getting achievments that nobody else has in this game, and all you have to do is be a . I don't know what that says about me as a person, but I had fun getting it.
rime19;-;Great game
[TA] Rayce;-;"XIMICACAN, XIMICACAN, XIMICACAN!" The last words you hear before you die. Or if you bought the dlc's : A gei" kho "ossos vimba" ngisho nawe bala! "Aiveeveh!" 10/10 would get scared of dead civilazations again.
jktrelow;-;Great game. Spent lots of time playing it.
Mettil;-;Only recommend if you get both expansions with it. The AI may be schizo (and cheat a lot) and the game may not have the depth of a grand strategy title, but it's still a fun time sink. There's a lot of fun to be had with the civ+victory type combos. There are also a lot of great custom maps and mods for this game (though using mods prevents you from getting achievements if that's your thing).
ronron;-;A must own strategy game.
Sapphire;-;So you just downloaded this game last night, got up bright and early, ready to play your new game! Hooray! You started at 9:00 AM A moment later it was 7:35 PM Ghandi just got nukes Elizabeth just declared war on you for the 15th time Darius just built the SS Booster Just... ...one more.... ......turn...
biti;-;I just finished my first game after playing another turn. Great game!
PeanutButterOctopus;-;Is good. Do play.
LazyTony;-;As a long time Strategy game fan, I can happily say this is my game of choice in this generations games. This is the game that sucks up most of my play time, right after Kerbal Space Program, and I can easily reccommend it to anyone trying to decide to buy it. Especially right now while it's on sale. 10/10 easy.
LivingLikeLarry;-;good game. wish i had the DLC
DragonFire;-;If you want a lax, turn based strat game with some character with a touch of empire management, look no further. Building on previous titles in the series, Civ5 comes out shining brightly. it has a lovely range of nations to choose from in the base game with plenty of addons putting more in. Furthermore, the steam workshop is partnered with the game allowing for creative mods to be made to enhance or change the game completely. The game engine itself can be run in both DX9 and DX10 so for those with slower systems, it's easier to scale down the requirements. On top of that, if you have a high end tablet (i5 CPU/Windows 8) expect to enjoy the integrated touch screen capabilities inbedded in the game. However, if I had a gripe to give, it would be how the AI doesn't scale well when it comes to difficulty and turn progression. Playing on the harder difficulties gives the AI massive early game boosts which can feel unfair at times but once the game session is half way through, player progression usually grows exponetially. I believe that this is a hard limitation to address and as such much couldn't be done. On the other hand, I've seen mods that have tweaked AI settings to balance this issue out, something to check out. Ultimately, I believe this is a great addition to the Civilization franchise and you won't be disappointed.
Plasma Angel;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a superb game for the strategic gaming community of Steam, involving multiple simmulations of the development of a human civilization through the passage of time with a multitude of victory's and ways to achieve them from influential leaders of humanities past to play as. From leaders such as Catherine the Russians to Napoleon the French you embark on a conquest to subdue humanity through the means of a cultural, economical, technological or domination victory.
Fat_Llama;-;With the brave new world expansion it is near perfect.
ThatCorner;-;I haven'y played this game for a long time, but I still think it is very fun and addicting. A lot of things can happen, in-game, which makes it all the more harder and more of a simulation game.
Buffalo Prime;-;It's midnight. Don't plan on sleeping. Hours pass. A phone call. Who could it be? It's Washington. He needs help. The french are at it again.  gets real. I march my arms. But there's a knock on the backdoor. Ghengis Khan is here. And he's . 15 turns later, I lose my capital and my cities burn. 10/10. Will get my kids addicted.
Doge;-;Such Time... Many wow... Much Gandi Never trust... wow doge
Owen is a yellow ranger;-;I really enjoyed Civilization V, and always find it to be a good game, there are amny things i love about this gme for example i can rewrite history in whatever way you like, also the many diffrent victory scenarios which make your games endlessly fun overall i rate this game a good 8/10 as the multiplayer is a bit wierd for me personally becasue it jumps between your units, but apart from that good gam. PROS pretty game looks very attractive, endless hours of fun, cool multiplayer mode. easy to grasp concept of the game. CONS not as much micromanagement as i would lik(the details make a big difference) multipalyer a bit wierd (for me not sure about you)
Zulky;-;Attacked France. They did not surrender. 10/10 Would get owned by France again
Name;-;this is my meth
Jevelin;-;Never played any of the previous Civilization games, but everyone kept telling me to give Civilization V a try, so I did. At first I found it kind of confusing. A lot of things to keep an eye on, but after a couple of hours of play I'd figure it all out and I was hooked! Great game! Has provided me with many hours of great fun! Just one more turn...
Murray;-;EVERYONE GET IT NOW
Bradbro;-;This is great game that will suck you in and make you spend hours at a time. Brave New World heavily recommend for full experience.
Finnkip;-;One of my favorite games, never get bored of it! 10/10
d_yermaker;-;game of my life
Most_Evil_Man;-;Awesome gameplay features, truly a game for the strategic mind. A easy game to play, yet difficult to master. The wide array of features and multiplayer possibilities can make one wish they could play all day. All day or for an hour every once in a while the singleplayer mode can be just as challenging and equally as entertaining. A 10 out 10 game!
hwp-lugburz;-;My 2`dn favorite game (beaten by civ.4). Only thing i dislike abouth it is the limitasion of 1 unit pr tile. Easy to avoid with mods, but then ofc. you miss out on achivments. All in all : a greate TBS.
vifillari;-;Amazing game and great to play with your friends.
danielgoodrich;-;once you start, its hard to stop..
supernova;-;All and all a good game for anyone with time to play it of course it has a save option but it is time consuming regardless
confirmed;-;i opened this game and played it for 20 mins before i was going to go out with friends and then after i closed it i checked the time and its been 42 hours. 10/10 would play again
Rergrn;-;Great!!
xXMatthewMaMathaway420BlazeitXx;-;I would recomend this game, but only for those who have friends, it is quite long, and boring if you have no one to play with, but thats just me.
Kaldain;-;Civilization V (w/Gods & Kings Expansion) is the best "just one more turn" game ever!!! There are many mods for the game, as well as a brand new expansion pack coming this summer!
Itsamekoko;-;You know when you say to yourself, in the morning: I'll do a few turns before going to work... 10/10, would never stop again
Cardboard Knight;-;High quality
Hashashin.;-;Trust no one, everyone is out to get you. You have to build an army fast or manipulate the other civilizations. It's an intense game but very well put together.
Mr. T-Bag;-;This game made my skin feel like it was about to explode
DuskyKeaton;-;Got an achievement for nuking an enemy civ. achievement called "I can has nukes?" 10/10 would nuke again
koomorang;-;its really good if you have nothing to do for a few hours
Bledadeva;-;-Start game -Grow Beard -Don't bath for days -Pizza boxes pile up -Flies appear -Lose friends and girlfriend -Just one more turn -Die of old age and don't finish game 10/10 would waste my life again.
LordProxius;-;So, I found myself at war with many countries while playing as japan...Then ghandi contacted me...Told me he was sad to see me such a warmongerer....Its the year 2000, Me and ghandi are nuking everyone as an alliance, Eventually when it was me and ghandi as the final nations... Ghandi continued to stay alliance...But me...Heheh...I betrayed ghandi nuking the hell out of him...Its about time ghandi tasted his own medicine...
sicp;-;Austria's a .
Reptar The Great;-;Exterminate, Expand, Explore,ad Exploit your way through history either be a ruthless warmonger ripping his way through the centuries as an immortal god, or sit back relax and lie you heart out in diplomatic means but if you dont want to do either of those there always is the last opiton be the next Newton or Einstein and completley out science everyone while your people are totting automatic weapons watcha s the opposing masses flee in terror occasionaly throwing a stone however you want YOU GOT IT
Dumbledalf(Elrohir Srion);-;If you were to ask me "is this game good?" it is one of the greatest in my opinion it is a MUST play or try highly , addicting , beautiful, on top with the greatest of games :)
Ser Bastien;-;Four words; "Just one more turn." 9.5/10
Goatlickster;-;Took over Rome and called Gandhi a  all in one turn. 10/10
V-For-Vendetta;-;One of my favourite games to play. There is hardly anything as fun as being able to command your own country and become whatever type of ruler you want. There are hardly any problems with the game and any that are there are so discrete they are not even worth mentioning. There are so many variations in game styles that it becomes impossible to get bored of this game. I recomend however getting as much of the DLC as possible as it improves the game play ten fold. Although if you do not get the DLC you will still get hours of enjoyment out of this. I would put this game up there with my top 5 and would definatly give this game 9.5/10. Awesome game keep up the hard work cant wait for the next one to come out.
The Pugfather;-;great game 10/10
tyleranator;-;Germany esableshed buddisum in BNW 10/10 realism
DarKCroX;-;I hate strategy game... But this game is awesome :D | start new world around 2PM > *200 turns* > 7PM
The_Real_Nomis;-;Best Turn-Based strategy game ever made.
Fake [HtD][VmfD];-;This is really good game, where you need to control your civilization like the name tells. There's many "countrys". You can achieve 287 achiements if you have all the dlc's. You start on stone age and end on future.
DeathBlade09;-;TBH i've only played about 59 hours on this game, however this game is insanly addiction! If you are looking to buy this game you should wait till OCT. cause they will release the newest game : Beyond earth, and of course they're gonna make a sale for this game.
akekirkyedi;-;Old, new doesn't matter, so many countries, more you understand this game more fun you will have
SlendyBenJ;-;This game is real gud
Fireking883;-;I have not played much, I know, but dont think that that is a reason not to trust me as I have played many more hours offline. Now, to the review. Pros: -Lots of civilizations to play as +1.5 -In depth +.5 -Multiplayer +1.5 -Each nation has it's own units(Mostly that is) +1 -Put together good +1 -Good graphics +1 -Different difficulty levels +.5 -Pretty easy to learn +.5 -Amazing tech-tree +1.5 -Takes a while to finish game +.5 -Essentialy unlimeted replayability +1 Cons: -Dumbed down from previous versions -1 -Not in as much detail as previous versions -.5 Civilization 5 is an awesome strategy game. It has many more pros than cons and rates a 9.5/10. The only problem I have experienced from this game is that it is dumbed down fromn the previous versions. I would reccomend this game to begginers to the civilization series, but many advanced players will love it as well. Thank you for reading! Game: Civilization 5 Rating out of 10: 9.5
Yelsew;-;This game is awesome. Thats all i got to say...
The Teleturbans;-;Marvellous strategy game,highly addictive and a great way to pass lots of time. P,S I highly recommend everyone to get the DLC,it has a ton of extra features and is worth every penny.
BadBannana;-;I swore it wouldn't happen. I had so much more happy memories of Civ IV. I had played hours of it and when Civ V first came out I laughed in their faces. "Hah!" I said. "They whine about that  game when Civ IV was right there all along!" And then Gods and Kings came out. Spies, Religion, Factions! I had to. I bought the game for about 30 euro and gave it around 70 hours. Then A Brave New World came out and of course I had to buy that. And somehow Civilization grew on me. With the help of a friend who is MUCH better then I am I was able to stop playing in Prince difficulty. Somehow from there the hours slipped away from me. At one point I found myself awake at 2am with a head cold planning to expand my empire on a map I had already dominated. I had won yet I needed all my people to have Public Schools and Stealth Bombers. This game does a very good job of conveying how countries rise and fall. Kind of. It was a surprisingly new idea for me that a country can start in such a  situation and somehow rise out of the ashes thanks to the fall of other countries. Now if you've read this far down down you will have been disappointed to see no may-may about Gandhi and nukes or something bizarre that happened out of context. So here goes: "Gandhi researched nukes but was too far behind so I won a Space Victory. 11/10 would stick my finger in a hot apple pie again"
Franklin D. Boysevelt;-;It is amazing.
richardsonja;-;this game is fantastic! I've played Civilization Revolution on 360 and this is 10 times better than that! well worth the price!
dont kill the rocket jumper;-;Loved this game. Highly recomended.
Beardo;-;The best loading-simulator game EU!
I <3 COD;-;I buy game. I like game. I love game. You do anything to my game I hate you. I hate you I invade you. You Ghandi. You nuke me. I invade you. You nuke me. Im sad. 10/5 best game
Salsa;-;I was never a big fan of the Civilization series, but this one has made me rethink my concepts about the accoladed turn-based strategy classic.
Kinzell;-;If Ghandi approaches you and asks for a Friendship Treaty, DO NOT SIGN IT. HE WILL BACKSTAB YOU AND DESTROY YOUR HARD EARNED CITIES AND UNITS.  YOU GHANDI.
K4NER88;-;It's a fun game.
Solomon Kane;-;Yep it's Good. I've spent a few hours playing.
[B&R] Friendly Black Woman;-;It's nice bud
coldchillind;-;*recommends game to friends *doesn't see friends for 4 months *cries and goes back to playing civ
Dwain;-;No problems installing, and a fantastic gameplay experience. When is Civ 6 coming out?
Napoleon Borntoparty;-;Found first oil as Arabia, got attacked by America; they pilliged my oil and got out. 10,000/10 for realism
teh_pwn;-;Civ V is amazing. Highly recommended.
Chitoge Kirisaki;-;To like a startegy game is one thing but this, this takes it to another level of strategy especially when you say to yourself one game or ill just finish my research then your head to head with your biggest rival with greece or something like that and realise i think i've been playing for 6 hours
Ya Boi Weezy;-;Its Okay I guess 11/10
BENdOver;-;Pretty great! My first 4X Game and it seems very welcoming to new players. I still have only touched the tip of the iceberg of this game so I don't think I have much more valuable insight on it. It is very enjoyable and satisfying to throw days away on this game.
Im_Da_Wolverine;-;This game is awesome Civilization 5 recreates milatary and graphics throughout the series. The main idea is to create a civilization that will stand the test of time. The diplomatic meetings have also been recreated.
KING OF THE CREED;-;This is a pretty good game for single player. I don't see much value in playing it competitivly, as ALL multiplayer games take 4+ hours to complete even though you can usually tell who the winner is 30-60 minutes into the game. The multiplayer of this game revolves around where your starting settler spawns. Start in a terrible area? Enjoy playing from behind the entire game while the guy that didn't spawn inbetween two hostile AIs in the middle of a desert sits back and builds up a 7+ city empire while you're living in war stricken poverty. Even if you manage to overcome the adversities of your starting spawn you're still going to be anywhere from 15-40 turns behind which is unrecoverable unless you're playing against an idiot or a n00b. Buy the game, play the single player.
Mr Fortune Cookie;-;Stand in line as we march to the drums of the east, Paralyzed and possessed by crusaders deceased, Lost in the silence, the call from the turbulent times. Bound by the science that lives on the lips of the wise. The beating of a million drums. The fire of a million guns. The mother of a million sons. Civilization. Lost in the silence, they bow to the call of the east. Tantalized and seduced by the demons released. Ears to the ground by the name of the merciless guide sky. Onto the fire that burns in the all seeing eye. The beating of a million drums. The fire of a million guns. The mother of a million sons. Civilization. The beating of a million drums. The fire of a million guns. The mother of a million sons. Civilization.
T3k FireFly;-;Spent 50 hours playing this game in hot-seat nearly killed my best friend I give it 10/10! Also Steam didn't record time properly so yea ( since I was offline)
Lemur_mat;-;i Recomend this game if you own atleast one of the Expansion if not it's a pretty good one, but you get more conetent with the Expansions. IF you like World map Strategy games it's the SERIES for you, this game has deep gameplay and mechanics and oh so good Multiplayer if you are a Strategy fan or Civ fan your PROBABLY going to like it.
Secundus Interpares;-;This is very good game that gets boing after like 300-400 hours of play time. biggest drawbacks are: - AI of units - ai can build, win with you by science, but if you have like half a brain you will never lose by militarty conquest, it is most apparent in ai moves accross ocean - even having submarine don't help them, because they dont use them! AI had my battleship on plate, with two submarines in range, and it just moved it, without shotting at my ship. it was like most WTF moment in game, and i understood that unit moving was done by some half wit and not a programmer. other that that game is well balanced, i think it can be very entartaining form multiplayer purposes.
Panda robba;-;Amazing everything: graphics, gameplay you name it and it has it. Win a Peace, Science, Culture, or even a War victory. This is the game for you if you love these command, and strategy games. But the game does require an exceeding amount of patience as one game can last hours and still end up in loss, But it is absolutely one of the funnest things you can do on your devise and i would highley recommend getting it
* ']['ffL;-;a wonderful game since the first release. civ 4 was great. civ 5 is great too but it comes with better graphic and the hex grid with a different combat system. i really enjoy this kind of game ... lets do another turn ... oh another turn ... wait one more turn. to me its a real keeper once started u cant stop lol. it offers so many depth in politics, economy, trading, research etc. which is welcome by old players but it might be hard for new comers.
Aquaman;-;It's allright yeah...
AssBackWardWolf;-;Asked Alexandra for some wool, the whole world declared war on me... Lesson learned don't ask for wool.
Redcoat;-;Just... One... More... Turn... Ah  it, you don't really need sleep, do you?
von manstein;-;do not play this game, it will devour your life. It will pull you away from other games. It will pull you away from your family and friends. IT WILL TEAR YOUR SOUL APART!!!! 10/10
amukid92;-;Not sure how I feel about Gandhi nuking me...
Luxo-o-fuxo;-;Honestly, one of the best games I've ever played. Worth every penny.
jacobattar;-;This is my favorite game i have ever played because it never gets old. You can just switch it up by choosing a different leader or victory type.
xXMLG 420 noscopesXx;-;Absolutely the most addictive, time consuming game I've ever played. I don't even know why.
Ex-InvaderRay;-;This game is ABSOLUTELY a 10/10, 100/100, best game.
Friedrich The Fiend;-;This game is by far the best strategy game I've ever played. Making you think about complicated strategy and civilizations before you start, especially on emperor or higher. I usually go for growth and science wich is good for any victory, If you're thinking of buying it, I advise you to buy "Brave New World" aswell since it makes the game so much better. And when you've started, there's no not clicking next turn...
CameronBiceps;-;Matt ing buy it already
76561193705059552;-;No story, doesn't matter, you are in control of the earth. It doesn't loose its charm. The old games still hold up really well, but this one is really great. works on my cheap windows 8 tablet, worth it.
Neandershot;-;This is one of the best best-if not the best game I have ever played. It deserves a huge recommendation. It has an absolutely astonishing GUI (especially for this series) and great gameplay. Who doesn't want to dominate the world? Or, if you don't want to do it that way, you can dominate the world just through forming the United Nations, or becoming a huge cultural empire. It's all about your choices. Form a huge empire, their territory, their culture, their religion, etc...
CSCHERME;-;Great game. Will cause you to lose track of time easily, but it's totally worth it. Be careful of Gandhi and Napoleon.
.Puush`;-;Sid Meier never disappoints, Amazing Gameplay. A blast with friends.
[ITA]lock3r;-;A new clothing for the old fashoned Civ. Nice gameplay, maybe a little easier respecting to previous chapters; tons of fun with friends in MP; no evident bugs; you MUST get the version with all DLC, it's kinda having a different game. Recommended! PS i payed 25 and it definitely worth it!
Pulkkinen;-;Bought this for 7,49 from summer sale 2014. For that price the games has definitely paid off it's value, It's entertaining, hard, and it takes some time to learn. I'd say there's definitely more replay value in this game than in most of the Total War series' games for example. ( go from Ancient Era to Future when Total War games usually focus on 1 period of time ) Great game with or without friends, but I'd say you get the most out of it with friends. For me this is the best strategy game I've ever played.
Ramsay Bolton;-;If I could have babies with a game this would be the one to have them with.
RootinTootinPootin;-;10/10 would Invade the rest of the world again...
yollomj;-;money, money, money. i just cant get enough
Equiviolent;-;Great turn-based strategy game, although it's boring without the the expansions Gods and Kings & Brave New World. The workshop offers great scenarios like R.E.D WW2 mod and fun mods like the PC Gaming Master Race. It also provides you with many gameplay fixes and improvements. This game surely has its flaws, but I had a lot of fun playing it (even though I didn't play any strategy-games before) and I can recommend this game to anyone willing to spend some money on it.
Megadeath;-;As a Civ, this is really easy to play and a nice game for some time , but not a really long time motivation.
roomcool;-;It is a great strategy game and I highly recommend it.
Puddles;-;fun if you like turn baised games.
Rustust Jevidia "Ranger Rustust";-;I play this game when I want to remember what the settelments of Rustalius was like before the great Rustalion war, And how we destroyed our enemys while we become powerful.
Edenlly;-;Best game since Half-Life 3. Can't wait to play. Jonah is the man with a plan if he buys this. Arma 3 Still sucks donkey furr
Gandhi;-;Did you ever want to be President? Lead your nation to victory by lowering taxes and make sure that the citizens of your nations are happy? Then go play Democracy 3! But on the other hand if you want a more startegic point of view: Sid Meier's Civilization V is an extrodinary game. The game puts the player in the position of a leader of an area the size that the player picks before loading the world. The game features infinetly replayable singleplayer, and multiplayer. When the player first starts playing Sid Meier's Civilization V, it can be very difficult and hard to understand. But, with some practice the game can become very addictive and a very fun game to play. In my final oppinion Sid Meier's Civilization V, is 9.2 out of 10 stars. Sid Meier's Civilization V is not free, it is currently priced at $29.99 (U.S. Dollars). If you have any FREE games you would like me to review please contact me via steam, and I will play the game and give it a review, -DerrickSpy123
Tommy DeVito;-;Tried to recreate World War 2 with Washington, Bismarck, Catherine, Oda Nobunaga, and Elizabeth. It didn't work out, as the AI civilizations were too passive. I had to fool around with the civilization combinations until I got one consisting of Ramkhamhaeng, Montezuma, Alexander, Pachacuti and Gandhi. This combination gave me the desired effect - nukes galore. 11/10 for unpredictability
10-FPS Guy;-;This is an awesome game, I played as Rome and attacked the dutch with helicopters and invaded the swedish with giant mechs 10/10 would squish stockholm with giant robots again also make sure to get the dlc they are awesome (note i dont have anything against the dutch or the swedish i am just joking abouting squishing stockholm)
Sheogorath;-;It was glorious....glorious.
CrimsonCore24;-;Repeat history, or re-create it. As for Ghandi....there was an original bug where the AI for him would reset his "likeness" relations with the player. Throughout the game, Ghandi's fondness for you would scale up & up the more you accepted him. However, once Ghandi had reached his Full "likeness" potential, he would reset back to his oringal state, around the time of the Modern Era (when Nuclear Power wasn't far ahead). This meant that you were more of a complete stranger with a threatening military in your hands, who needed to be eliminated. It's said that the bug was once fixed, but the players pleaded for the ultimate Ghandi back soon after - as a result, the most peaceful man in the world wants to  your mother and children to create the ultimate race...the Ghandi race. 9.8/10 ~ Would suck Ghandi dry for uranium
Damer;-;Put so many hours into this probs my favorite game cant wait for beyond earth
XiongMao;-;If you don't have this game, you're not a true PC gamer (kidding).
clerk;-;Gandhi declared war on the U.S and won. 10/10
Soul Hunter;-;One of the most time consuming and fun games i have ever played, like one match takes about and around 8 hours, on easy
NanduNandu;-;Me and civilization go way back and to be honest, this installation didnt speak to me at once. It is far less advance then the fourth and that can be a disappointment for some old timers like me. But if u give it time you will see that the new battle-system makes this a much more enjoyable combative experience than any in the series. A must buy for everyone, experience players will awe, after some time. New players will find this much more enjoyable then the fourth.
synfull;-;first game 200 turns in kicked gandhi out of Delhi in south scotland have 20ish cities ( next highest is 6) my people are happy followers of blitzkrieg ....... what time is it?
SirBastian;-;Found it very fun, and a great way to have a long campaign wih a friend that worked very well, unlike other games.
=MEAN=Kingpin;-;is a great game
Extra_Random;-;A Brilliant Game that you can easily lose hours to!
Pipishere;-;I've been playing Civilization games for many years and still have the original boxes too! I was very skeptical about moving from Civ VI to Civ V given the bad reviews out there at the time of purchase. After 3/4 years and all the expansions, i've found it to be a great addition. The AI still needs improvements and the multiplayer is horrendous but the game itself is super. I highly recommend the game and if you were to play it with other humans, then i'd say choose friends and via LAN!
Rexokill The Dank Meme;-;THIS GAME IS ING AMAZING! GET IT!!!
Baron Von Hicklepickle;-;Play as Venice, wait until the end of the game, send out 18 trade ships at once, feel the ecstasy.
Mtime6;-;READ THIS http://www.garath.net/Sullla/Civ5/whatwentwrong.html The DLC only fixes some of the problems, when in reality the core of the game is broken. Not convinced? The lead designer, Jon Shafer, has basically criticized the game for being bad http://www.pcgamer.com/2013/02/14/jon-shafer-criticizes-every-decision-he-made-in-designing-civ-v-explains-how-at-the-gates-will-differ/ Overall, this is the weakest game in the CIV series. 7/10. But this game is still "fun".
TG Evan;-;Forgot what the sun looks like 10/10
Bucksgen;-;If you play this, you would not sleep. 10/10
itsanameanyway;-;Addicitive, fun, don't be surprised when "Just a few more minutes" ends up being six hours later.
XoyaL;-;If this game was a potato, then it would be a good potato.
Al'Lan Mandragoran;-;Addiction is an understate as the famous Sid said "One More Turn"
Ypnos;-;The best strategy game I've ever played. It's replayability is its best feature.
Carlnin - Dark Lord of Piatas;-;I can finally nuke North Korea 10/10 would nuke again
Anewbpro;-;Very well done game, Everyone should be playing this!
Friends99;-;this is addicting
Jonny Sniper;-;Literally my entire life is now devoted to this.
butistic;-;one of the best games on the market without question,even if you are new to turn based games civilization 5 is a simple and addictive experience that you will be playing for hours on end. 9/10
piefork;-;Keep your friends close, and your enemies even closer.
I'M DEFUSING THE HOSTAGE;-;It's about time I talked about Civ 5 anyway. To start off, buy this and you will be addicted to it like pot. You shout "one or more turns wouldn't hurt". What seemed like a few minutes turned into hrs and you finally notice that you're dead.... but you still continue to play Civ 5 (just my imagination). Anyway! This game is in fact amazing. It's a great TBS that will keep you thinking about your tactics throughout the whole game save. It will keep you hours on end and can be very unpredictable (unless you've played alot like me). The unique gameplay is very engaging and thus keeps you playing no matter what is happening (sarcasm intended?) So there are still many things I would like to say but I'll try keep this short. Obviously if you are thinking of buying this, you should also buy Civ's many dlcs (in a pack ofc) as it will literally glue you to your computer screen (sarcasm? >.<). The game allows you to play lots of great leaders (infamous and famous) and ultimately crush other civilisations. Got your attention yet? There are some things to note such as after you play civ with dlc you wouldn't want to go back to vanilla civ. Another thing I do want to point out is that for some reason civ's achievements is very glitchy and therefore says like 15% completed and says that some I haven't done even though I have done things like "anex a city state which has been previously puppeted". Just something you might needed to know ^^ So overall, civ 5 had given me many memorable hours of gameplay (believe it or not I play on offline mode too) and you can also smash your friends (or get smashed) in competative multiplayer for more fun. But seriously, this monster of a game should be banned as a drug! But not really because I really like this drug XD 11/10
Not Mr House;-;IM NOT ADDICTED, I CAN STOP WHENEVER I WANT
Screb lord 666;-;I massacred thousends of Russians. It was a ripoff of the third mission of Cod ModWarf2 but i enjoyed it!
Based Anthony;-;if your willing to stay up hours on end to defend your nation and ignore real worrld responsibility, buy this game:}
Aurumlamina;-;I've extensively played every game in this series and this newest entry does not disappoint! The vanilla game itself is incredible with a limitless number of hours to play as every game is an entirely new experience. The number of civilizations that you can choose from (with unique units, buildings, and game changing abilities) is astonishing and the level of detail put into the variety of different victory strategies is incredible. Building your own government (by choosing which policies to put into effect) and forming and spreading your own religion is extremely entertaining to say the least as well. The multiplayer is incredible as well as the game in its entirety is used in multiplayer as well, not just parts of it as so many in-depth games seem to do. This game will never get old for me and I hope the same goes for the rest of you who will be joining me!
JORJE;-;Best Strategy Game To Play
nick.herhusky;-;Has a bit of a learning curve, but once you get past that, you will never want to stop playing. Once, I decided to take a study break and start a game of civ. After 2 hours, I began to promise myself that I would be done at the end of the turn. Each turn. Every time I finished a turn, I would think of all these things I had to do that I might not remember the next time I played.... I was able to force myself to take a shower probably 6 hours later and right when I got out I ran over and uninstalled the game while I still could!
LordProxius;-;So, I found myself at war with many countries while playing as japan...Then ghandi contacted me...Told me he was sad to see me such a warmongerer....Its the year 2000, Me and ghandi are nuking everyone as an alliance, Eventually when it was me and ghandi as the final nations... Ghandi continued to stay alliance...But me...Heheh...I betrayed ghandi nuking the hell out of him...Its about time ghandi tasted his own medicine...
ThatCompany24;-;It is probably one of my favorite games EVER!!! So, with the mods, I can just about do anything with this. This game is super fun, eventhough i play on the easy mode. I love the game b/c of the wonders. I'm a wonder-freak, so this game provides it. The graphics and game-style make it to the point that it isnt the regular boring turn-based game. This game ROCKS!!! 9.99/10
ZeroZeroOne;-;Are you prepared to use Ghandi as your instrument of war against the Genghis Khan and his ally, George Washington, in a race for nuclear weapons? This is a game you play if you have a full month to kill. It's a game where you start at 7pm and then stop playing at 8am because you have to go to work. This is the definition of video game crack.
jamescappello;-;BEST GAME EVER !!!.I wish there was a scenario maker
JobNicK;-;A limitless gaming time. So many possibilities and having fun online or single player(Or LAN). One of the best games in that category!
ChaosLordZX;-;A very good game to spend time, along with friends or with mods will accompany you through many hours and longer. Personally recommend everyone to try it~~
emilie.;-;This game is addicting. When I start I cannot stop. I've been playing Sid Meier's Civilization series since forever and I loved every single one of them. The only flaw imo is the multiplayer. People always leave. I hate that. Anyway 10/10
emeralis00;-;The game is good with Brave New World. Complete edition is recommended.
wichitajake;-;very fun 10/10 would play again
bob1689321;-;While many say its much simpler than Civ 4, that doesn't stop it being an absolutley amazing game.
LVTrish;-;In my opinion, Civ V with the latest DLC's is the best Civ to date. Exceptional re-playability, trophies, entertainment and balance. Of course it has been around long enough to hone itself to near perfection. Easily recommended for any 4X gamer who somehow has never heard of Civ or Sid Meier.
thebloodredjester;-;I love this game, and reccomend it to anyone who is a fan of strategy, 9.5/10
Mr. Brainiac;-;When you play lan battles with friends, DO NOT GO TO THE BATHROOM. Somehow, like magic, almost all of my cities and gold and almost everything somehow came under his control. He claims it was the AI that took my stuff. Still hate Gandhi. 10000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000/10 would reccomend
Constantine Dragonas;-;Playing peacefully the entire game. Becoming a highly technological civilization. Gets invaded by a foreign country. Defends borders agaisnt the invaders. Gets condemned by the world for being a warmongerer. World COngress embargoes me. Builds nukes. Takes over the world. 11/10 Would take over the world cause I was bullied again
Midoman;-;Buy this game if you want to kill any chances of ever having a social life again. 10/10
FIN-XXL-KERROS;-;Civ V, is just amazing. I suggest buying it, coz its just so much fun.
Color Blind Communist;-;This is probably the best strategy based game i have ever played , i have played civilization since civ 2 , and i can personaly tell you that this game is incredible . It requires skill , while still being a game for casual/ easy going players. The dlc are fantastic and are among the greatest i have ever played . Over all it is a well crafted master piece that is a must buy for any gamer looking for a game to test his skills of leadership. over all 10/10 .
Kerbalnaut;-;Played on deity. Montezuma spawns right next to me. Invades me and destroys me in 1 turns 10/10 would watch the destruction of my civ again.
Nik;-;Superbly handled turn based game that spans throughout the ages. Perfectly balanced and requires someone actually thinking about the game to succeed. Easy to understand, but hard to master. It's great seeing how far your civ can come, starting from the very beginning with just farms, to the end with spaceships, giant death robots and nukes. This is how a game of the world should be presented.
Stalin 2.0 Babe Edition;-;You see, I've owned this game for the past couple months. But only in this past week or so I started playing, and let me tell you it is nothing short of addictting.
whacklezz;-;Warning: More addictive than your favorite designer drug.
MC;-;It's ok, played it a couple times
Sarcat;-;I don't know how many times I've said "just one more turn". It's to the point where I can't trust myself... Amazing game!
ErnestHemingbae;-;My most played Steam game, at least when I had a job where I could get away with it. I've spent many enjoyable hours trying in vain to prevet world wars and build an arts culutre based civ. would definitely play again for just one more turn.
Kerbox;-;Worth the money.
Rexer73;-;One of the best
Saint Pepsi;-;The only game in which you will be nuked by Ghandi and wage war on Saudi Arabia for taking ALL YOUR  LAND YOU KNEW YOU WERE GONNA SETTLE THERE! Sorry, I got a little carried away there. It's just that i'm a little bit ABSOLUTELY LIVID. Anyways, here are some pros and cons of Civ V. Pros; -No longer will you sit down and wait for minutes to go by because GMod has nothing for you to play! -Enjoy being a  to everybody around you with almost no consequence because why would you not play on the easiest difficulty? -Nuclear warfare isn't as bad as it should be! -One of your cities just exploded? Make another seven! -Extreme online capabilities -MODS MODS MODS Cons; -Ghandi -Saudi Arabia -Ghandi -GHANDI -ING GHANDI -WHY GHANDI WHY -There's more difficulties than Chieftain?
Sasha Erin Alexain;-;Brilliant gameplay, challenging when you could face off huge armies against many countires countless armies. Strategic tree-advancement depending on how you like winning the game. Love the aspects like creating a religion that would ensure a diplomatic win and such.
AutomaticNarwhal;-;Alaxander the great insulted my culture 10/10 would nuke Greece again
TheSecretCola*Warframe is life;-;This is an incredible game,it allows you to choose your leader and your civ(civilization)and change the flow of time for the civilization.Pros and cons: Pros: +Graphics are excellent +You can change to strategic view which helps alot! +Good in singleplayer and online +Big variety of mods out there +A ton of leaders and Civilizations +Detailed,you can control almost everything in your empire/country/state/republic +Diplomacy with other leaders Cons: -Will reach its full potential with the DLC's -Lack of time in a game(can be changed by changing the victory type) So,basically its a great game,I bought the Collection so I got the DLC's,however,some people may not want to spend that kind of money on the DLC's,so I suggest buying it on a sale.The game itself is incredible,there are so many mods out there.You get the ability to negotiate,trade,demand,discuss policy,declare war on a leader and many more things.I love the game,and I'm sure you will too. P.S:Don't be friends with Gandhi...
pigjosh;-;gandhi is a massive .
Levitate;-;Very nice, especially the quotes!
parallelLynx;-;Most addictive game that I've come across in a while. Each time you play it, you're playing a different game. 10/10
MasterDave;-;This game is emaculate in my opinion, par the ocassional issue with playing with people across the pond... Whether you enjoy smashing the AI or making alliances and betraying your friends.. this game is one of the best strategy games out there for it.
The Zombie Christ.j2;-;Amazingly fun and addictive. Splurge yourself and get Brave New World. It's seriously the best.
Cloud88;-;Very fun and easy to get into stragety game. The only story to speak of is your own. Civ is know for being addictive and having that one more turn moments in gaming and CIV 5 is no different. If you get into a really good game it cane have those moments, but a boring game not so much in my opinion. Managing you nation and interacting with the other nations is the thing i enjoy most about Civ 5. Choosing to eather have peace or got to war with the other nations is what give this game the one more turn moment. The A.I. can also be challanging at times but can be kinda dumb on lower difficultys lucklly this game is easy for new- commers and can be hard for veterans. I'll be honest I suck at Civ before i played Civ 5, now i understand the mechanics that to the advisor systems and also help for some friends, and that the biggest reason to get Civ 5, Multiplayer. Get some of you friends into this game and some fights are aruments are bound to break out along with some great fun moments of working together to solve other issues that you nations are having. My biggest complanit with this game is how old it gets. After about 10 or so games, you have a set stragety for sucess and I find myself doing the same thing over and over agian which can get borning. Also if your with friends expect to wait what can seem like forever for them to finsih there turns and hear them complain about you when your take too long with your turns. Biggest issue is the bugs that can be annoying expetictly when online but there not game breaking. Get this and a couple of friend any you will have some funs times. Like I said, I found it to be repeative at times but still very addicting and fun. 9/10
Samurai Walrus;-;If you want to create a nuclear wasteland, buy this game. If you want to have massive battles, buy this game. If you just want to watch the world burn from your safe empire, buy this game.
ElectricBlue1234;-;ONE WORD EPIC / EPIC WITH MORE EPIC ( i named i city EPICA ) !!!!!
Dragabond;-;:D Goodbye life, hello Civ!
Jadatness;-;Love this game! Takes along time to beat it, make sure you bring lots of water, some food, and about a day to win it or play and take lots of breaks.
SuperRrotta;-;Really great turn based strategy game, 9/10 -IGN
FUCK THIS GAY GUY;-;how do i close this game? plz help
Longrangewolf;-;Wow this is so fun! (15 min in). Awesome, gunpowder! ( 1 hour in.) Nice, military science! (2 hours in.) Wow nanotech... wait, why is it so dark outside? (10 hours in.)
Freedom;-;If you are a fan of RISK you will love civilizations, simple as that. keep in mind when playing with friends set aside the same amount of time you would for a game of RISK...ugh.
jrocker314;-;Excellent Strategy game, Helps your social studies grade too. ;D
Shoemaker;-;It's Saturday and I decided to take a quick jont building up a civilization across Europe. Just scouting around, looking to dominate the continent and all. So there I am, laying seige to Warsaw, and some broad named "Attila" starts texting me. "Hey, want to route Russia with me guy? C'mon, it'll be fun." I just ignored it because I was already busy with this other gal. I figured if I didn't respond, she'll see me out near Vienna and take the hint. Fast forward a few hundred years, and it's deja vu. I'm bringing the thunder to Paris, and AGAIN Attila won't stop blowing up my pocket with "I hear Egypt looks awesome on fire" and "what I wouldn't give to pillage Venice with you." I had enough when she decided she wanted to move some of her stuff into an embassy near my place. "Nope nope nope," I said. I cut all ties, ended all of the trade routes and got my friends to stop talking to her too. "Finally," I thought out loud, "I can be done with this dramatic nonesense and really plow Madrid's v-hole." Turns out Attila is actually a dude, and doesn't take rejection well at all.
Senpai4sale;-;I was going to go to bed early tonight, but then i decided that i had enough of ghandi's . 6 hours later my eyes hurt and his smug face is destroyed... Worth it
Vault Bae;-;Class.
Vaffi;-;this game
The Tenth Planet;-;my most favrouite game ever love it love keep up the good work guys
virman;-;Classic ,but more to that - it's an unending adventure of finding a way to victory and outsmart your competitors.
temeXiii;-;best strategy game 10/10 also you can play with russia so 11/10
dastoupro4you;-;Day 86,still haven't finish my first game.
TetraNomic;-;Possibly the greatest (and most addicting) turn based strategy game ever made. It has great graphics and an amazing soundtrack. I honestly am hardpressed to find anything to complain about, other than the fact that it literally eats my time.
=BADFA=;-;The game is fun u can play with ur friends and conquer the world
PsylockeGaming;-;a very fun and a stratagized game
Name Change;-;this game will ruin your life with its one more turn mechanic. Just last night i was up till 5 in the morning since i just wanted to finish constructing the Eifel tower and win a war against Arabia. This game has taken away much of my life and will continue to do so. This is even without me playing any multiplayer. 467 hrs and counting of world conquest.
TheFuriousCumberbatch;-;Fun strategy game. While there are some minor bugs and glitches, as well as some minor annoyances, there is still that "Just one more turn" play that has been with the Civilization series. The game looks great, and allows many playstyles. Just be aware of sometimes scumbag AI, happiness issues, and most of all, be prepared for the long haul. One game I've been playing accounts for roughly 15 hours of my playtime, and I'm only about 75% done with it. This is on standard time and map size, and normal difficulty. But anyways, great game, highly recommended.
ObsidianTyrant;-;Wonderful 4X strategy game that allows for many different approaches and play styles. Fun to play, difficult to master.
Aka'tesh;-;This game will suck the life out of you; very addictive, very well made. And if you have a moster rig as i do you will enjoy it even more.
Arch;-;oh HAI!!!! I LOVE this game. probably one of the best games I've played. There's a few things from civ 4 that I would put back in... and the expansion is fantastic as well. pick this up if you enjoy strategy, but keep in mind that 1 game can last up to 8 hours if you survive the early to mid game :) I give it 4.5 Meow's out of 5. Wtf does that mean? who knows.....
Yoobin;-;THIS IS AN OVERGLORIFIED BOARD GAME.
Jems;-;Ahh Civ. Time Vampire Extraordinaire... Not much to say about the fifth installment if you already know the series other than: a) get both expansions, they add largely essential systems into the game (religion, tourism etc) You can usually pick them up in a sale somewhere for pretty cheap now. And b) picture the scene...'Its 4am, the curtains are still open...it must be getting light soon. The birds are chirping in the trees. You haven't moved in the last 8 hours, those chores you were going to do, yeah, umm maybe tomorrow...you should probably think about going to bed, but.... EAT MY NUKES GHANDI!!.' Yep. That still happens, so 10/10. Daylight, exercise, proper diet, sleep patterns, they're so overrated anyway.
Arkengate;-;I'll be back to finish this review after my next turn...
wormwalker;-;As a complete noob to the Civ series I got this as a throw in for pre-ordering Xcom enemy unknown, and was surprised to find I spent probably as many hours in Civ as I did in Xcom, a great game if you've got the time (and lots of it)!
Pirate Coldfire;-;This game makes even the most unlikely leaders to become warlords, including capitalists.
Rmil;-;Have sank many hours into this game - a rich world and complex strategy game. Flaws: multiple playthroughs can be repetitive. AI Civilizations are often unpredictable, often declaring war on yours for no tangible reason, despite previous cooperation. I am told that the DLC packs go some way to fixing this.
Monkey;-;I have Been playing this game wiht my frined and it is alot of fun. It is best when you play with your frineds for along time. As you play the game just keeps getting better.
Quarantine;-;Absolutely superb game! I would reccommend this to anyone especially previous CIv players because this game really does bring in additional aspects that have been missing from the fights in previous Civ's. Definitely worth buying the DLC in the sale too!
RandomQD;-;Brilliant. Altough i wouldn't recomend it unless you get the two big DLC's
Ultimate Programmer;-;Civilization V is best enjoyed with the complete edition as it includes several new leaders / countries, religion, and balances to the game. This grand strategy has taken plenty of my hours away in both singleplayer and multiplayer; and is far better than Beyond Earth. This is easily the definitive Civilization game if you want to get a group of friends together to conquer others.
Gabersen;-;This game is probably one of my favorite games of all time. I sit down on a weekend to play for maybe an hour or so. So I start a new game and an hour later a realized that 5 or so hours have passed. So then I tell myself just one more turn and 1 turn later 50 turns have passed! This game is SOOOO addicting and I recomend purchasing the complete edition if you do get this game.
Furgleburgle;-;This game is well worth the price for single-player mode. I have spent a lot of time beating the CPU's. It loses its flavor after about the 10th match, but that is what mods and online play is for. This game is fun and has endless replayability.
[Kind Soul] JohnMarcThePro;-;Life is done as I know it.
Kishibe Rohan;-;>Go into jungle. >Aztecs start ambushing me. >almosttododead.miff >Say hi to Gandhi. >Ganghi starts nuking me. >hiroshimaisatitagain.docx >Babylon wins by going into space. Wonderful game. Very historically accurate.
Your-Neighbor;-;Its really effing great.
Crazywolffy;-;I saw that the full version of the game was on sale for $12 and i was excited because i havent played it before im only about 6 hours in and i already love this master piece. love the game :) plan to play it alot. 10/10
Metseven3;-;Became allies with venice then used them as guinea pigs once I started producing nukes. 10/10 would betray again
Callahan;-;one of my favorite games ever i give it 10/10
bmreed920;-;the game is awesome. i recomnd it to people that like strategy games
BW;-;505 Hours. That is all I got to say.
Zap the Liar;-;Kind of on the fence about this one. It's definately a good game, but in a world where for the same amount of money it asks we can get an amazing game, you have to wonder about it's true worth. Gameplay doesn't really get old, but the game itself becomes predictable. Whether or not you realize it, you start forming plans for every new game and such. The multiplayer is unoptimized, and it lacks a lot of the stuff single player has, so I don't advise trying it. On the positive side, there are hundreds of civilizations to play as, it has decent combat, and some nice smaller things such as a cinematic view when you want it and a strategic view when you need it. Overall 4/5 experience.
MrBladeey;-;In love with this game.
A Wolf Actually;-;Apart from a few crashes here and there (partially my own error) It is an amazing game! For best experience you need the DLC.
Godis;-;This is the game I play the most, nuff said.
Steele Zedslayer;-;You start out trying to be nice to everyone, as they all offer you  deals and denounce you for no reason. As you get further and further ahead, eventually someone declares war and you, having had quite enough of their , bomb them back into the stone age. Then they offer you horses if you'll stop murdering them, while in the midst of the Modern Age. You seize one little capital, and suddenly everyone in the world hates you for 'warmongering'. So you decide to live up to their expectations and conquer the world. Such is life in Civ V. - Anonymous, of FJ
[TAW] Nonmatter;-;Iz teh shiz. Das it. Also. To quote the great Arin "Egoraptor" : TEN ATTA TEN
[SkrubL0rd] Useless Land Fish;-;Japan is of win
Matthew_;-;Very good fun with loads of friends, even with the CPU's it can be hilarious. You can nuke them (later game) or even just build a massive army and obliterate early game (quite hard to do). I play this with my friend loads and even some games take up to a whole day and we are yet to finish one but not far off. I would recommended this game a lot but only if you like these kind of games (stratergy). --------------------------------------------------!Civ V RULES!-------------------------------------------------------------- Review By GUNNS4L0AN
zach0558;-;Amazing game, but don't expect to play a "quick" game. I have spent over 50 hours on this game (at the time of writing this review), but have only just finished my first Civ. Simply wonderful strategy game.
Moon Man Cid;-;Attila tried to conquer my city then proced to slam his face against my wall. Did not work so he gave me a city as an apologize. 10/10 would recommend
Sackbut;-;Always a favorite series of mine. Though each iteration takes some getting used to, the expansions really help to flesh out the game.
zjin;-;Civilization V is a great game that you can play for over 250+ hours and still not know every tactic or strategy and you'll never "beat" it. It's a strategic game where not building that one military unit could be your downfall. Overall a solid game. 8/10
doomdydoomdydoom;-;Highly addictive.
Rantti;-;Ever wondered if you could go back in time and change the past. Ever thought about how did earlier major civilizations rose and fell as soon as they were in power. Or do you just simply enjoy watching paint dry? Then this is the game for you! Choose your favourite civilization over a vast collection and find out why they started sucking so hard before entering medieval age. Witness how an ally decides to stab your back after being best friends for a over centuries just because you didn't answer their demands. This game offers a great opportunity to feel like being in charge of everything inside a civilization. And if the computer AI started making you mad, try out the multiplayer and invite your dearest friends! Soon you'll end up having vicious fights about someone making their decisions for hours. You will love getting revenge on those wasted minutes. This game is A 5/5 and a great pick for some mild LAN parties.
FUCKBOIS;-;Its not as bad as hitler
SultanK;-;Author background Welcome to my first ever review. Have fun reading, and hoping this review can inform and/or enrich you in any way. A short introduction of myself, and then let's start reviewing. I'm a 35 year old, male Civilization-veteran, who has been playing the Civ-franchise since the release of the first Civilization. Married, have two adorable, young sons, onto hopefully my knowledge and enthousiasm might spread. Residing in Belgium, Europe. Important changes towards previous versions The biggest and one of the best changes, in my opinion, are the new hexagonal tiles versus the old square tiles. This concept isn't new and was already being used in other, older strategy/history games/sims. It makes you wonder why it took until Civ5 before using these. Now it feels right when moving units around the map. In older versions of Civ it always felt like a bit of cheating to move a unit diagonally from one square tile to another. Suppose you could not move diagonally, you would need double the movement points to move around squares forming a corner. Now while you can move diagonally, you gain a distinct distance advantage while doing so, 1,4 distance against 1 while moving straight. (diagonal=sqrt(2*length)) (1,414=sqrt(2*1)). In a hexagonal system, movement in all 6 directions measure the same distance. Size does matter! The most pleasant change for me, was the new combat system related to distance units. Just how cool was it to let it rain arrows (and havoc) upon your foes with that newly build archery unit? Besieging cities is much more fun now than it used to be. The fact that hills and/or mountains block range, doesn't only add a bit of unit realism, but is definitely a very important strategic implement. Because of units can't form stacks on tiles anymore, they should be looked at as individual armies. Combine this with the reduced number of tiles (max 6 instead of max 8) coming from the new hex grid, directly surrounding a city, you really have to think twice when positioning units to launch a coordinated city assault. Also bearing in mind, the possibility for units to retreat to safe distance for healing. These changes grant so much more strategic depth than in Civ5's predecessors. In fact, Civ5 is the first version I'm perfectly happy with when it comes to strategy. Like with any other older version of the game, it all looks a bit better. From the maps, cities, units, unit animations, menu's, etc. Everything is visually improved. Content Vanilla version comes with 18 civilizations, with 7 civs available in DLC, and respectively 9 and 9 more with the expansions Gods & Kings and Brave New World. Making a total of 43 civilizations to beat the game with! Each of the civs having their unique leader together with his/her personal traits, and unique units/buildings. Map sizes range from duel (very small) to huge. Not having checked this thoroughly, my guess is that the huge map is much larger than the greatest size in Civ4. And by huge, I do mean HUGE. Steam Hooray, Civilization 5 is affiliated with Steam! This brings the community closer to the gamer. It's a great resource for (free) downloadable mods and guides, discussion forums, etc... Basically all the advantages Steam gives to a gamer can be enjoyed now as well in your favorite strategy game Civ 5 should be. Personally, I just adore the Steam achievements. A welcome addition in a game that can be played over and over again with randomly generated maps. Over time I found it rather hard to keep playing when I've beaten (and lost) the game so often, that no real/ultimate goal remained. Steam achievements solved this motivation problem for me. I also concluded my gaming-style improved due to the variation of games I had to play to unlock achievements. My ultimate goal is to unlock all 287 of them, and be rewarded a perfect game. Hope to do this before Civ 6 is released. At the time I'm writing this review I got 96 unlocked with 203 hours played. Downsides Yes, in a game so developed and grown over even a decade, there are some downsides I have to mention. First of all the AI. You can begin to notice repetitive, predictable AI behavior having played for, let's say over 150 hours. This is not new in comparison to older versions, and I understand this is something that can remain an issue over a longer period of time in the future from now. A computer remains a programmed machine, right?! This may not be a problem to online gamers who play against other humans, but I play Civ against AI for 99% of the time. Also, when playing on higher difficulty levels, the benefits the computer controlled civs get, become too prominent and annoying. Frustrated me especially on the two highest difficulty levels, Immortal and Deity. I recommend King and Emperor levels for experienced players, maybe Immortal on smaller and/or duel-sized maps. Deity simply is too insane to spent (too) much time on. Another minor downside may be the fact Firaxis removed religion from the game, in the vanilla version that is. With the installment of Gods & Kings, religion can be brought back. Although it is implemented differently like it was in Civ4, I must add. Some civ-specific units might be over/underpowered towards other civ-specific units. All in all, if this is all downside I can think of, Firaxis created another great title. Conclusion A truly must-have for every fan of the Civilization franchise, a great recommendation for everyone who loves turn-based strategy games. With the game being released for years now, the Civilization 5 complete pack (all DLC, expansions Gods & Kings and Brave New World) is regularly on sale and can be purchased for less than 15 (USD 12). Having bought the complete pack myself for 13, it's the best 13 ever spent so far! Buy this ASAP and start growing civilized even more! Greetings Have fun!
Neroxen;-;Great strategy game from the Civilization series, the first one I've tried. After getting this though, I've since looked back at what it came from, and it came from the excellent god father of strategy games, Civilization I. Absolutely great. Multiplayer still a little clunky but works very well when it gets going. Oh, and theres a lot of great mods for this thing through steam workshop too, which couldn't make it easier.
Game_inator;-;Great game with lots of hours of gameplay multiplayer and singleplayer. Well done 2K Games for a great strategy. If you want a pack i would recommend getting complete edition as it comes with most DLC's and is worth the money. Great game, Great game. Looking forward to the future of the game!! :)
Raisin Brandon;-;One of the best games I've ever played. Even better with DLC.
GeNyaa;-;Starting the game up saying to yourself gonna play for 1 hour. 25 hours later oh this hour went by quickly.
.fr33d0m;-;It's awesome and enjoyable. Like it so much.
Atomic Flopper;-;This game is amazing. Even though it has been out for a few years, Civilization V is becoming one of my favorite strategy games on steam
ForwardSlash564;-;It is GREAT!! Garenteed to give you hours of amazing gameplay!!!
Noble Duke of Pie;-;Best game ever hands down.
Stevy;-;In my opinion, it's the best Strategy-Game, I ever played! Can't wait for "Beyond Earth"...gonna be great :D 10/10
[XSIA] Leoslake9;-;Very time consuming but very fun as well! 10/10
Moomat;-;Can't believe I've put 750 hours into this game over the years. Think that kind of says enough. I love strategy games, and Sid Meier does them best. Many people didn't like the new mechanics of Civ V compared to other previous Civs, but actually I kind of liked them. In fairness, the AI really isn't all that appealing; it kind of "cheats" to win, and isn't all too bright. But I love building my civs and taking on the world for domination.
Syntek;-;"Oh I'll just play a little to pass some time." Next thing you know it's the next day. 11/10
Tyrantis1991;-;It's a great game. Takes forever and a day to finish a game even though you can save at points. the maps are huge and strategical planning is vital. Its very entertaining. Fun with friends if you plan to have a couple days to play it.
Devilhamster | PawzZi;-;Quite a chill relaxing game which takes alot of thought to it quite fun trying to alter history like having the Pentagon in Russia or having "The Great Pyramids Of England"
Hitlersaurus Christ;-;played 11 hours from 4 p.m. to 3 a.m. and then woke up hen next morning and played it till around 2 p.m. so I guess you could say that it is an okay game...
Step Daddy Goob;-;Very enjoyable gameplay. Intense when other top Civilizations declare war on you, but if you can pick up on things quickly, they can be easy to beat.
Holiday Heavy;-;Look I'm reccomending a game.
WILLIAM AT WIV;-;Great game
Crimson Crisis;-;Good game to play with a some freinds. Better with the dlc
Mincci;-;I've spent so much time in this game that it's not even funny. At least when noting the fact that I've yet to actually finish a game. Seriously, I love this game though it can get a little tiring in the later stages of the games.
LuckyReden;-;This game is great to play with friends and is extremely enjoyable. Its a blast to play with others, as you make alliances, trade with other civs, and race to make the best civilization. Single player mode is also quite fun, though some of the AI's are strange and the diplomacy is awkward. Still though, the higher difficulties can pose quite a challenge. I would definitely reccomend it to someone else as a game they could get sucked into for hours on end.
The Good;-;one of the best strategy games of all time !
AtomicHashtag;-;When I purchased Sid Meier's Civilization V I had no idea what I was getting into. **NOTE** People have said you need the complete edition (DLC's and such) to make the game better, and they're soooo right. Being someone who has played with and without the dlc's I strongly reccomend buying the complete edtion over the standard edition. I played 7 hours in my first real sitting of Civ V, and started out as playing Alexander, Ruler of Greece, which was fun and all, but I didnt really enjoy playng as him. After that I convinced some friends of mine to get the game (since it was on sale) and now I'll mostly play multiplayer with my friends. They all now love Civilization V also and they always thank me for having them buy it. Graphics - 8.5/10 Gameplay - 9/10 Replayability- 9/10 Personal Rating - 10/10 Game! PS Never Trust Ghandi
TURBO;-;Played this for about 8 hours when I first bought it. All night then went to school and work. I accidentally had a 7 hour nap later that day. Then I woke up and played it again. 10/10
Plutonic;-;How to make friends: 1) Be nice 2) Make friends 3) Make more friends 4) Anger your original friends by making new friends 5) Anger your new friends because they're now friends with your old friends 6) Die a vengeful death to your (now ex) friends 7) Profit
Kitsune;-;I have played 259 hours so far I believe no further review is required
Hellhaunt;-;Awesome strategy game that gets very indepth and can be really fun with friends. A lot of unique Civ's to play as with their own special units/abilities. Definitely worth it to buy the game and the DLC.
a432;-;Civ V is perhaps the pinnacle on turned based strategy games. With the gods + kings expansion it rivals the more hardcore civ IV. One unit per tile along with hexagonal tiles makes for interesting and tactically invigorating battles. No longer will the bigger stack of dooms rule the battlefield! Rivers, hills, and line of sight all play factors in combat now. Multiplayer with friends is fun and interesting and the AI will be a good learning tool to get the hang of the game. A game worth buying if you enjoy turn based strategy.
Rags;-;An immersive, slow paced, and very strategic turn based game that is as deep as it is challenging. If you consider yourself a smart gamer or love strategic and turn based games, then you are doing yourself a disservice by not buying this game.
Beardlessdwarf;-;I love strategy games, but not only that I love destroying my friends civ
ItsAngel;-;Great strategy game
Lazzerth;-;Summer 2014, where did you go?
|| Clancinator ||;-;Bit late, but if you haven't, buy it :D
ArrJayBee;-;If you like strategy, this is the game for you. Having piled a lot of hours into this game I find that you really need lots of friends to play this game online, to get a proper solid experience. I find that you can only dominate the bots a few dozen games until you get bored. Also a fantastic thing about it is that it keeps growing and changing, the teams still working on it, and best of all each match can run for several hours (if not days). Add to all of that the fact that you can at any time play with one of the many mods available, and youve got a great experience! 10/10
wLoSkI;-;Good game, Get it if you like strategy.
DoLan;-;The best turn-based history game ever. 10/10 But all the DLCs are a must. Or else it is horrible.
Submarine_Argument;-;Best Civ game yet! The combat is more strategic because units can no longer stack on top of each other, so you must protect your catapults, flank with your horses, etc. The Multiplayer is also really good, you can do co-op multiplayer vs. AI and save the game for multiple playing sessions. Also, the multiplayer lets players who crash rejoin the game, which is pretty nice. Overall, worth the money, you'll play this game for many hours. Get it and play some mp matches with me :p
Allahu Akbar;-;Tons of fun
pscarpa;-;9/10 If you're looking for a strategy game look no further, this is THE STRATEGY GAME. Even with the release of other similar games and even Civilization: Beyond Earth this game still holds out as the best strategy/management game on the market. This game is easy to get into but still has layers and layers of depth and min/maxing to be done if that's your thing. This is my most played game on Steam and I recommend it to any fan of the genre. Be warned though: multiplayer is quite buggy.
Cap'n Chaos;-;Graphically superior to any other turn based strategy game I know, Civ V is my favorite platform for historical inaccuracies. You may not be much for strategy games, but nuking Ghandi never gets old. I give it a 7.8/10 but with Gods and Kings i would give it a 9/10. I might also mention that the max graphics look like an oil painting...
Wellbien;-;An addiction. A lifestyle.
NarcFox;-;Reviews are subjective. Civ is a slow paced, turn based strategy, if you like strategy and don't mind spending an evening playing a single game, then give the game a shot. Civ does have some aspects that cater to players who prefer shorter games but realistically this is for those of us with high attention spans. I enjoy it and think it is a solid game, there are obviously things I dislike and negative aspects but again reviews tend to be too critical of utterly banal things so I will avoid that and just say I like it, if you have the money and you like strategy, try it out. If not, no huge loss :)
lemon4545;-;This game is very interesting. Though Deity level is quite tough.
gcashin42;-;This game if one of the best i have played it continues the legacy of sid mieres and is just great. I reccomend the DLCs it really changes the game in a lot of great ways which range form maps to civs and adds a new kick to the game
tonycasserly;-;An extremely fun and complex strategy game
Cap'n Chaos;-;Graphically superior to any other turn based strategy game I know, Civ V is my favorite platform for historical inaccuracies. You may not be much for strategy games, but nuking Ghandi never gets old. I give it a 7.8/10 but with Gods and Kings i would give it a 9/10. I might also mention that the max graphics look like an oil painting...
Frost;-;this game really packs allot of things to say , its alot of things combined and a really fun game , multiplayer in this game is super and all the elements of this game work great , all thou it gets boring sometimes yet you can always play this with out regreat , its really fun and thanks to Sid Meier for this masterpiece
Rallehop;-;I don't even need security clearances to fire a nuke. 420/10
Eladria;-;For long time fans of the series, this makes some pretty dramatic changes, the ramifications of which may not be obvious at first glance. The removal of unit stacking leads to strategic city placement, and the dramatic increase in the use of Artillery units. For once, even on the easier difficulty levels, bombers and artillery play a part, instead of just stacking 15 tanks in one tile. Purchasing tiles and units feels almost like cheating, in the best of ways. If you enjoy 4X Games, give this an honest shot. It may take a bit of time, but soon, you'll wonder how you ever enjoyed playing the old way.
TheStatic;-;By far one of the best games out today. Still a lot of fun to play.
DinoManDerek;-;I...I dont really remember much about what happened these last two weeks i just... coukdnt stop my self... 15/10 would do it again
The Taco Knight;-;Get this game! It's my first steam game and I love it! There's no two tries that are the same and many ways to win!
Moomat;-;Can't believe I've put 750 hours into this game over the years. Think that kind of says enough. I love strategy games, and Sid Meier does them best. Many people didn't like the new mechanics of Civ V compared to other previous Civs, but actually I kind of liked them. In fairness, the AI really isn't all that appealing; it kind of "cheats" to win, and isn't all too bright. But I love building my civs and taking on the world for domination.
Syntek;-;"Oh I'll just play a little to pass some time." Next thing you know it's the next day. 11/10
Rexokill The Dank Meme;-;THIS GAME IS ING AMAZING! GET IT!!!
Baron Von Hicklepickle;-;Play as Venice, wait until the end of the game, send out 18 trade ships at once, feel the ecstasy.
Night Owl;-;One of the best games going
Boghy;-;it's year 2016 , giant death robot is attacked by english pikeman . 20/10 would play again and get attacked by those medieval pikeman
o;-;Cannot recommend enough. Seriously, I tried hitting the recommend button again. It didn't work.
33High;-;11/10. One of the best games i've ever played, Sid Meier again makes a fabulous game. Smooth gameplay and infinite replay value make it top notch! With more than a dozen awesome civs, and DLC that is very much worth the purchase, its a game i asbolutely love. Can't wait for Civilization: Beyond Earth!
NoxintheBox;-;If you get the DLC/Expansions. This game is almost as good as Civ 4.
Milk Man;-;If I could only play one and only one game for a year, this would be it. You will lose all your time playing this.
egg;-;if you want to play a board game but can't be bothered to set it up, then empire earth is the game for you
SolarCynder;-;Fantastic strategy game, especially with freinds to play a game of politics, backstabbing and war among other things.
MacDHD;-;An exceptional strategy game which can have you playing different styles every game making it a very diverse game. While I wouldn't recommend the base game, it is definitely worth getting the game with the main DLC which overhaul some of the game mechanics.
Rags;-;An immersive, slow paced, and very strategic turn based game that is as deep as it is challenging. If you consider yourself a smart gamer or love strategic and turn based games, then you are doing yourself a disservice by not buying this game.
retrolock;-;Warning: Don't buy this if your intent is to live a normal life. On the other hand, you should definitely buy Civ 5 if you want an awesome game that will make you say, "One more freaking turn!" until it's 3AM.
Akool1970;-;One of the nicer strategy games around! After Civ3, this one is offering enough newer aspects to spend many hours puzzling. A real recommendation for everyone!
BlackEagle;-;Civilization 5 often passes off as a slight downgrade from other civ games. Many of it's initial concepts can steer away previous civ fans who enjoyed features that are now simplified, but what they don't realise is how much more this game offers to make up for it. The hexagon system of tiles is one of the greatest ideas they've ever had - no longer is it more efficient to move diagonally than it is in any other direction, as with hexagons no direction is any more efficient than another. The worlds have grown in size to an astonishing amount when maxed out, and the units now feel much more like true squads or platoons rather than board game pieces with their large visual numbers and more advanced battle animations, not to mention vastly improved graphics. Units also can no longer be stacked on top of one another - each tile is limited to only 1 military and 1 civilian (settler/worker/great person), meaning you can't stack entire armies ready to march on the enemy's capital with certain destruction in a matter of only 1 turn as you could in previous titles. Overall, everything this game does feels so much better than the previous games in the series. They did a fantastic job polishing it to the point of once again holding it's point as the greatest strategy game ever.
Raiden The Rogue;-;this game is so great thought really change the name to life wasting simulator 12/10 settler immedialty got taken by barbarians 10/10 would waste life again
Peruse;-;Lost days in it. Playing it normally or with the DLC is great. You can't lose. It's beyond addiction.
ChimiCherryChanga;-;This game is dope.
Noob;-;Cviliztun fiv sux, Is to slohw, I left teh gaem for an our an nothin' hapened Jk it's awesome ;)
Janathin Joestare;-;The Pyramids were built by the Swedish people... in the ocean... Historically accurate, fun, and is addictive to play.
Noel;-;Epic Turn-based strategy game. Build your civilization from anciet era to modern era. It's not just about war and battle, there are many ways to win through science, culture or diplomacy. Take a long time to finish a game, around a day but that's why it's epic.
cristian.medina03;-;It feels very good to decimate and obliterate the inferior civilizations that stand against your glorious reign.
ScottW;-;SId Meier's Civilization V the current leader in the 4X strategy and with good reason, it is extremely simple to get at least a basic grasp on without paying too much attention to the more 'hardcore' aspects of it by managing resources and cities much more deeply, which are there for those who like more of a challenge. Civ V also features prominant civilizations (who knew?) through time and mixing these all together makes a very compelling experiences where you can mould your own countries' history into something completely different to what happened in real life to this point. It is also worth mentioning that I almost always play with mods from the workshop that really add to the experience, such as my favorites being the real-world maps so I can spread my new English empire across a far more accurate world after being ever so nice to all my neighbours before taking their land away. Civ V also looks pretty nice in 3D, which is rare to come by and I doubt many have attempted it. The game runs quite easilly with the exception of turn changes so most systems should handle it and there is a very fufilling sense of awe in being able to see the details of lighthouses and birds seen in 3D. Overall, Civ V is a great experience to any history nutt or gaming strategist of any sort but make sure you get all the expansions alongside it because you'll kick yourself over your lost civilizations and features that can improve the game and overhaul your approach to it.
Tyy1117;-;Stay Calm and Don't trust Ghandi Or Hiawatha You'll pay for it if you do 10/10 30 mins becomes 4 hours "Just juan more turn" you say, that becomes 2, then 5, then 10, then before you know it 100
THEsmallPRO;-;Civ 5 is one of those "different" games, you know your just bored of playing a fps and you're like "oh!" i feel like i want to play a game that is ACTUALLY not a fps!, and thats were Civ 5 comes in through the door and punches you in the face and is like "what the  man, why does no one like me and everyone only plays fps games" and i'm like "because no one has no ing clue on what the history was for the japanese." THE END
BIZARE;-;To be honest i cant believe i got this amazing game for free! the developers deserve recognision for making such a fun stratergestic game like no other. This provides hours and hours of fun on multiplayer and yes even singleplayer! Before you know it, its bed time and youve got to part with this smooth running, great looking, fantastic game! Its defintley something your guna play often with a group of friends. Great. 7/10
fEDex;-;Its like meth, but you'll lose more friends by using this.
Ackerman;-;civ 5 is a horrible game
Burlap Jesus;-;montezuma scares the  out of me
Hayther;-;Samurai, Nukes, and Giant Death Robots. 10/10
BOT Clippy;-;Much joy. very excite. many long.
redbuck1;-;This is a turn-based settling/fighting game in which you are a random world leader from a random time period and you build an empire and then you kill each other. What more could you want from a game? COMPUTERBOARDGAMEWOOHOO MINE MINE MINE MINE MINE MINE ~seagulls (finding nemo)
BIG FAN OF GAY ROCKS;-;Look, if u don't think being able to wage war on Bismark as Alexander the Great using stealth bombers is literally the raddest thing then get out of my face + i h8 u
therepoocminer;-;10/10 if you love turn baced strage games youll loves civ 5 also i would recmend the DLC/Exsation Packs
Hollytime81;-;Played this rather than study for finals. Flunked them. 10/10 would do it again
SarbiReyiz;-;Great game.
George Bush;-;One of the best games availible on Steam. Greatest strategy game I've ever played, 100% reccomend Civilization V for it's insanely infinite possiblities.
Tecinavah;-;Just one more turn ...
SirDr.Lord Irk;-;One of the best turn based strategies ever. Mods make it even better. 10/10 would Civ again. I wish Beyond Earth didn't suck.
PJPixel;-;1st hour Oooooh, what does this do? 4th hour Make a farm!, make a unit!, make all dem things! 10th hour DIE EVERYONE DIE! 50th hour Ok I got this and this and this and this and that and that and those and those go here and here and here and there and here 141th hour ...........In case you haven't noticed I love this game, highly recommend getting the complete edition.
Gabe Newell;-;I recommend this game. Why? because from my experiances it random on what will happen next within the game ( If you start a new game ) the only thing that does get boring it knowing what will be coming in the eras units etc. Its even more fun with friends.
Lazzerth;-;Summer 2014, where did you go?
|| Clancinator ||;-;Bit late, but if you haven't, buy it :D
ArrJayBee;-;If you like strategy, this is the game for you. Having piled a lot of hours into this game I find that you really need lots of friends to play this game online, to get a proper solid experience. I find that you can only dominate the bots a few dozen games until you get bored. Also a fantastic thing about it is that it keeps growing and changing, the teams still working on it, and best of all each match can run for several hours (if not days). Add to all of that the fact that you can at any time play with one of the many mods available, and youve got a great experience! 10/10
wLoSkI;-;Good game, Get it if you like strategy.
MeZTech;-;Lots of depth to gameplay. It really requires you to think.
Happy;-;Would recomend that you get it!
The Orange;-;This game has great graphics and super fun gameplay. Highly recommended! (5 STARS!)
Sario25;-;If you plan on getting this game, be warned, you will spend hours and hours of your time playing Civilization V. It is so addictive, and has HUGE replayability, with 5 different victory types, and over 20 different civilizations to play as. Definatly of my favorite games ever, 11 out of 10.
etphonehome104;-;Great strategy game that never bores you. Immersive content such as, trade routes, epionage, new civs, world congress, etc, makes the DLC a must have. If you don't have a life, best game ever!! And if you do, prepare not to. I higly recommend!!
GRIMACE;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V (otherwise known as Civ) has been and continues to be one of my favourite games on pc. The first Civ game I ever played lasted about 4 hours and was a magical experience. While the games after that weren't quite as special, the replayability of this game is unprecidented. With all of the features and DLC that exist, it's easy to find a new way to play the game and have fun with it. This brings me to my only complaint about the game. The DLC, while very good, are just too expensive. there are 2 of them that are really worth getting which are Gods & Kings and Brave New World which each cost 30$ on their own which is the price of the original game. Thankfully all the Civ DLC go on sale frequently for about $7.50 so there isn't too much to gripe about so long as you're patient. In conclusion Civ is an addictive Nation Building strategy game that never gets old, has great features and extras, as well as a great multiplayer experience. I would highly reccommend it :) 9.6/10
AlexThePsychopath;-;I have no doubts that this is the best TBS out there. Very addictive, has plenty of replay ability, and gives you something fun to do on those boring, rainy days. And if your not a fan of buying DLC's, or just don't like the DLC for this game in general, you could always get community created in-game civilizations and mods FOR FREE. My only complaint is the bug which occurs sometimes when you get late into a game, that causes the whole thing to crash. As long as you save every 5-10 turns near the end of the game, you should be good :) 9/10
nate.velasco;-;there are so many add ons! get them all! soooo much fun
DarthTerror1994;-;Pretty good Civilization game but you must get the DLC's for it to fully experience what it has.
A recurring occurrence;-;yes is awesome
Osama Bin Pepe;-;Never ending cycle of backstabbing between friends. Only downside is it takes too much time to finish a game. Other than that, it's pretty fun.
Frank the Tank;-;Don't expect to play this game for an hour at a time...
piboy14;-;Best Game on steam- must buy
Triblaze;-;Fantastic if you have a lot of time to burn. Turn based strategy aglore! There is a bit of a learning curve, but after two games it is pretty easy to get a hang of the game the mechanics. Tons of civilizations throughout history have been included. This game is pretty addictivie, and I highly recommend the expansion packs as well. One. More. Turn.
Carlbrett;-;Civilization V (5) is a TBS (Turned based strategy) that lets you play as a famous world leader in history. You must build up your empire with both complicated and simplistic commands. Make your empire flourish and rise. Launch into both Golden Ages and battles. Destroy the other civilizations of the world through military conquest, scientific ingenuity, cultural superiority, peaceful negotiations (Peh, who uses that anyway?), or be the best of the best before time comes to a halt. It's your decision, can your empire stand the test of time?
Reality Gamer;-;If you like turn-based strategy games, then civilization is one of the best out there. You select from a list of historical civilizations, and then you get to play through all of human history, all the while selecting the best path to victory in a variety of ways. The only con I could nitpick is that you will spend almost all your time on this game, it is so compelling. Get it.
Ho-jima;-;You can play weeaboo nippon master race. 10/10
Gelatart;-;One of my favorite games of all time. Great UI, great design, highly addictive gameplay. I spent so many hours on a campaign with Alexander the Great that I still never finished. Great game for hours upon hours of strategic, turn-based fun. Also great as a potential tool for teaching people about new historical aspects they weren't previously aware of.
beetlespin;-;The pinnacle of one of the best strategy game series of all time.
mariuszszkotek;-;Great Game, Really. Thought I recommend buying atleast the Brave New World expansion Before playing
Guglunk;-;One of the best stategy world builder games out there.
WrathofV;-;Possibly one of the most amazing games ever created. Hours of endless fun.
IRRATIONAL VINCE;-;The standard for Turn-Based-Strategic Game. Deep and challening, I suggest to invest a few hours before deciding if it is for you, but you are minimally interested in the genre, just go for it and the day will just go-by! 5/5
Jack Torrence;-;I love this game a hole lot more then my hours put in show but thats because I dont have the time to play it because it takes so long for each match but trust me steam user its worth it.
Korithos;-;Very good but annoying due to SWEATY nerds.
JUST DO IT;-;Good game, Many kingdoms, Game is based on Age of Empires and Heroes series. With 1 word: That game is THE BEST 10/10
The Hudster;-;This game is a brilliant game, with near infinite possibilities and perfectly suited to the tactical mind. There are lots of Dlcs to expand the game, including many new leaders and senarios. Pros- Wonderful graphics self explanatory gameplay for beginners Multiple modes multiplayer Cons- Multiplayer is slightly buggy Overall this game is a brilliant buy, and I definately agree with the metacritics, who gave it a metascore of 90
t4thomas.uk;-;A great, Historically accurate strategy game.
Bolderax;-;You defently wanna buy this great game. Many science. Many Wow. much War doge out
Nightmares [NOR];-;i must say it's a must have! lots of hours in this game and it's cool! buy it!
WelshAssassino;-;A very good stratergy game.
Skynuker;-;Amazing game. I totally recommend it.
Strife;-;The closest I have ever come to playing a game like Civ on the computer is Risk way back when it was probably one of the top games on pc's. Turn based never held my interest before, as I have always preferred RTS to get my battle on, but catching a good sale and having a friend at work who played it quite a lot, recommend this game repeatedly, I decided to take the dive. I have to say I thoroughly enjoy this game now and have bought even other previous versions and even the beyond earth civ. I keep going back to this one though as it feels the most complete of them all and I definately have the "one more turn" addiction that seems to come with these sort of games. Of all the turned based strategy I have tried, I find myself coming back to this title. I did get it with all the DLC, which I have read does make the game quite a lot better, so I would recommend grabbing the complete edition if you are buying this. Great title, better have some time on your hands as this one can be very addictive!
Water;-;Civ 5 is one of those games where you look at the clock, and 6 hours have passed. A game where you will stay on for "One more turn" 10/10 would buy again
Cherif Matticus;-;I played it a bit, its ok.
Lazy Walrus;-;It is really really fun. I got it not really knowing what it truly was. I just wanted to make the 2K sale worth it. But when I started playing, I was immediately entranced. I recomend it to not only fans, but everyone.
[AJSA] ACEPILOT666;-;Playing as Japan and conquering everything. Nuked by Gandi Would play and get nuked again 11/10
ObamaDon'tCare;-;Great game, one of my favorites in my library.
The Illustrious Sean;-;Life lessons learned from civ: 1. Gandhi's a warmongering . 2. Poland can into space. 3. America is the weakest nation on the planet. 4. Genghis Khan was a horrible military tactician. 5. Montezuma is an immortal . Thus concludes the most accurate history lesson you will ever receive.
Mr. McFunbags;-;Make a city. Take them to the moon. Repeat.
Kaiser Sean;-;Best game I've played so far. Bit pricy, so wait until sale.
Y Tho;-;its is a good game super adicting deffinitely worth the buy
pumpkinpieguy;-;I think I have a problem just got the game today already played 11 hours. I have friend, wait correction I had friends 10/10
Shia Labeouf;-;10/10 would foolishly trust gandhi again.
MotherGoose;-;Fairly Dank
HoldMaDik;-;most addictive game ever
Boudicca;-;Just One More Turn...
aven;-;If you like strategy games this is definitely a MUST have. Wonderful gameplay, game development and hours of great fun.
PoohBacca;-;This game expands and expands to no end. It's very time consuming, but much like a good chess game, it's a lot of fun. You have to give it a try! Try getting it on sales, as it goes down to about $7.50 for the whole game with expansion packs.
Mikaelmarin;-;Very nice game, hard to understand at first but you get used to it also lots of guides of this game
Fomalhaut;-;Put your hand on your heart and say you've never physically or mentally said to yourself: One more turn..... 11/10
Obama;-;This is one of the best games i've ever played!
jamesdtj;-;Whenever I watch any - literally ANY - movie or television show not set in the modern area, it makes me want to play Civilization. That's right- any time period before, like, now. That's a lot of time, folks. And there are a LOT of times I abandon whatever I was interested in watching to play Civilization. So join me, won't you? (please note: I don't actually want to play Civilization with you. I prefer to play with the AI opponents who have become my best friends and confidantes- I'm looking at you, Attila)
Didzi;-;It took awhile to understand how everything works, but after that greatness ensures!
Captain Morgan;-;Really good game ;)
Warchild Hagey;-;Nice update as opposed to Civ 4
Bloop;-;"One of my favourites, a fantastically realized world re-imaginer! Make sure to buy the complete edition for the full experience!"
Ninjaneer;-;This game is fantastic. I love the new Hex tiles, it makes if feel like the Settlers of Katan board game.Also the fact there can only be one military and one civilian unit per tile is great. I play coop with my friends all the time.
SUICID4L <NVIDIA>;-;Great fun... but many friendships were ruined.
LoveJelly919;-;Chose 'random leader' for my first game of Civ 5. Rolled Gandhi. Set out to build a nice little empire. Everyone was happy and well fed, cotton and whales were plentiful, and wonders were constructed to inspire my people. Then Montezuma showed up. He wanted my land, my people, my wonders... so I CRUSHED HIM. HIS EMPIRE BURNED BENEATH THE FEET OF MY ARMIES AND HIS CAPITAL CRUMBLED BY THEIR HANDS. BUT IT WOULD NOT STOP THERE, MY BLOODLUST WOULD NOT BE SATISFIED UNTIL EVERY NATION ON THE PLANET MET THEIR BRUTAL DEMISE. AND MEET IT THEY DID, ONE BY ONE UNTIL THE GREEN OF INDIA SPANNED THE GLOBE... It remains the most true to form I have every played a civ leader. 10/10 would be  Gandhi again
Ev!lol!vE;-;Should have stemmed my multi-year impulse to get back into the Civ shiz for...... one week?! LOL
J Y A King of The Behemoth!;-;Extremely fun and relaxing and is great to play with friends. Gaming can last for hours and a time.
xXx_RedMen_xXx;-;the game that reveals gandis true ambishens to rule the world
MyBearGoesRawr;-;Barbarians shot down my fighter jet with clubs. 420/10
Niccy [Tgr];-;Awesome game!!! If you are a leader and if you want to build and lead your own civilization, this game is for you and you will have fun playing it for hours and hours!! Very addicting, careful!! 9/10
Go Away;-;Okay, ti's the big one. Civilization V. My favourite game besides Team Fortress 2. I can't decide which one I like more, they are so different to play, to enjoy, ect. But I can say you this, buy the DLCs, Not only Gods & Kings and Brave New World, but also the DLCs adding new civilizations like Spain, the Inka, Denmark, Korea, Babylon... If you wanna try out this game, wait for a sale. This turn-based strategy game isn't a game for everybody. So when the sale comes, (When this game is on sale it's nearly always -75% on the game and every DLC) buy this game including Gods & Kings and Brave New World. I just love this game and I know many people who do aswell :)
Supergeil;-;Very fun game reminds me of age of empires. I would like to see the Persian immortals look a little like they did back in the day. The game is perfect i love the Scenarios and everything about it. I would love to see a siege weapon that could fire from 3 tiles away before the artillery. It would be much easier to lay siege to a city. 5 stars!
Etimos;-;the music gives you aids
Oranges are K;-;Too busy taking another turn to right a review, but this game is genius.
eggs a cute me;-;I have spent so much time on this game it is sad (almost 1500 more offline)
Chris Brown's Greatest Hit;-;Best damn strategy game I've ever played, no complaints! Money VERY well spent. Game is crisp, no two playthroughs are alike and it's diversity constantly keeps you enthralled in the game. Be a trading civ, cultural civ, science, or liberate others as MURICA, doesn't matter what you do it's a fun game. If a normal game takes too long for your taste, you can even set it go quicker than normal. Definitely amongst my top 5 games ever played. Grab a copy (try to get the complete edition, the expansions add A LOT of features) and add me. I can help you learn the ropes!
Minho Jin;-;it is very interesting game. I love it a lot.
OdyMeister;-;I bought it 10 days ago, It's okay.
CheesyCrackers;-;Love it.
Leg Day;-;this game is amazing...chears !!
JoKOR;-;I'm coming up to 100hrs in Civ 5, so it's probably about time I gave it some praise. Make sure you get the Complete Edition on sale for around 8 in a sale. Civ is a turnbased strategy game in which you build you empire across a randomly generated map. You compete against Friends and AI to win the game, how you win is up to you. The game is at it's best when it's played in a 'boardgame night' fashion with friends. Get in Google Hangouts or Mumble and chill out. The games last forever, so don't expect a quick fix. If you have 2 monitors the game gets even better when you can easily switch between Civ and Whatever- making those late game turns less of a bore. I really enjoy Civ, it's a lovely game for playing with friends and passing time. It's a staple in most people's steam libaries and if It's on sale you should definately pick up the complete edition.
Mc Awesome;-;Brilliant game. Civ 5 has a very good single player experience, although is amazing with friends in multiplayer. The only negative i have for this game is that as of yet, there seems to be no way to make the multiplayer AI any more or less difficult. The only way to change the pace would be to put a handicap on yourself. To get the full experience of the game, i suggest getting both of the expansion packs also, as this doubles the game's content and replay ability. I highly recommend this game to anyone.
[XSIA] Leoslake9;-;Very time consuming but very fun as well! 10/10
Rebite;-;HELP ME I CAN'T STOP!!!! Other then the fact that it's one of the most addicting games out there it also has some very good DLC that adds a lot of variety if you have the extra money.
Duckshit;-;You want to recreate Hitler's regime? Maybe become the next Stalin? How bout bending Queen Elizibeth over and ing her in the  with your nuclear diplomacy? Civ V is for you.
Orange Jam;-;Yellow Jam would like if he learnt how to play 10/10
jc_ie;-;This is Civilisation! Intitally I couldnt get into the Hex grid which was a departure from the earlier games. However after a while I barely noticed it. The expansions have only added to this. If you haven't played this by now and it is your type of game then you need to own this. (And what is wrong with you?) Get it at any price.
Saber is my Goddess;-;Poland can into space from now on.
Walter Senpai;-;Most additive game I have ever played.
Langesen;-;A well made game. Includes tons of fun and opportunity to learn a little about historie while playing.
Sterminator;-;its a great game,but you should get and least Gods and Kings to go with it
BananaGubb;-;I think this game quite enjoyable.
SkyStreak16;-;Good game is all i can say; scratch that: Awesome game!!
Power Hungry Potato;-;This is a very fun adicting game. It has some of the most well known leaders of ancient times. This game brings all cizilaations together.
Tora;-;Nuke everybody as Gandhi
Ninja Tuna;-;Do you want to know what it is like to be addicted? Then buy the game and forget about sleep, life,and friends. To me this game is more fun singleplayer than multiplayer.
DumbledoreTheNazi;-;Definitely worth your money when it is on sale, and even still when not. A wide variety of empires to select, and each one of them have their own abilities! I was playing a match with my friends for over 7 hours. It's super addicting! The games last for a long time, and over time you research different abilities. Like, being able to have your units go into the water, get on boats, and sail along the coast. Also, there is an ability to go into deeper waters to cross the ocean and meet a friend, or take over a civilization! A really good game to spend your money on!
CadillacGypsy;-;Absolutely wonderful and addictive.
BeauMonty;-;10/10 With DLC.
Jbaczkowski46;-;Best Game Franchise I've ever played. Pros: -Hours of Replayability -Not like any other game Con: -ERROR: 404 NOT FOUND With the almost 1000 hours on my record, easily I could say the best casual and competeitive game ever!
Mad King Ryan Haywood;-;Very fun to play either offline or online with friends. Team up with friends and rule the world together or fight your friends and beat them in differents ways. Win Thru World Domination or if you prefer a more peacefull approach, just build the United Nations and Make world peace a dream come thru. No matter what, you will have lots of fun and you can play this game for end on end.
MakeMyDreams;-;Great game, just buy it.
KawaiiFive0h;-;A wonderful strategy game that you can just lose yourself in for hours.
mikekyr23;-;me and my friend bought this game on sales and i have to say it is a lot of fun but time consuming. i know i havent played for that long but i recomend it is awesome and a lot of fun with friends
Frank the Tank;-;Don't expect to play this game for an hour at a time...
piboy14;-;Best Game on steam- must buy
nate.velasco;-;there are so many add ons! get them all! soooo much fun
DarthTerror1994;-;Pretty good Civilization game but you must get the DLC's for it to fully experience what it has.
A recurring occurrence;-;yes is awesome
Ketan;-;It's surprisingly good, never thought I'd like a strategy game but Civ V really did changed my mind. If you are going to buy Civ I recommend buying the complete edition.
SLAVE OF SOVIET UNION;-;Chipotle took over America. 999\10
RUBBISHAway, card farming);-;Killing ur time baby! But as the return, you should have a lot of fun
Crusher;-;legendary game!
Hattoon;-;Yeah is preety good 10/10 would bang
Keristo;-;Very detailed strategy game. I like the multiplayer feature.
Youyourule;-;Really fun game. I bought the the complete edition, which I would recommened. Without Brave New World and Gods and Kings, you really have a bare 4x strategy game. With the dlc, you get a great game but also have the opportunities to help with diplomacy, countries and maps. Lovely music, and is a great game. Watch for gandhi. 9/10
platonicgerm;-;I'll write a full review in a minute, just let me have one more turn...
SlabakBG;-;BEWARE! Serious chances of finding yourself in the "One...more...turn..." mode in 6AM. Great game, can't wait to see the "Beyond Earth" thing.
ur mum;-;It kills me to think about the cumulative human time spent playing this game.
coco260;-;Alone ok game with the dlc's great game its a mass world conquest game and it will take you about forty hours to complete a campain so if you like having a lack of time and mass amounts of fun this is the game for you and im not going to explian what it is because its a commonly known game and if you really need to know watch a lets play of it or AJ reveiw on it that will get the idea of what it is acrossed
COG.OpossumRPG;-;-Starts out with a plan to win by culture -Starts rapidly expanding my borders -Another nation has a cultural advantage over me -F*** it, conquer everyone! 11/10 would conquer again
East;-;gud. but not great :)
mrgage15;-;Abosutely loves this game! totally addicting. I would recommend getting all the DLC as it adds so much to the total experiece from the game.
Misky;-;I've wasted far too many hours on this game, no regrets.
Arrowsmith;-;Brilliant game. A lot of fun!
Bloodcryme;-;Great game with with great expansions
Nefara;-;The only valid reason for any strategy game lover to not have and love this game is the fear for your life. And by that, I don't mean dying, I just mean having it tick away via seconds and minutes and inevitably hours sunk into this game. It's addicting. But luckily, it's a sort of benign addiction in that after you finally *do* wipe the smile from Ramallamadingdong's face and crush the Siamese army with battleships and B2's you can look upon a world uniformly flying your colors and feel satisfied. It might lack some of the finer points of control and systems that games like Europa Universalis or a couple of previous iterations of Civ had, but I feel it was a fair trade for how approachable it is. Civ 5 is extremely easy to learn, but difficult to master. Even after as many hours as I've sunk into it, I'm still learning new strategies and how to deal with challenges and there's no lack of depth here. In vanilla civ 5, yes, but with the expansions? No. It's a great strategy game to dive into that's unintimidating for the newbies and deep enough for the hardcore.
lordofthecrafter;-;After spending 85+ hours on Civ V with all the expansions, I am amazed at the power and magnatude of the things on this game. The possibilities are really endless, and the "one more turn" motif never really gets old. Besides, I can mine salt and nuke things.
Hazardous;-;Definitely my favorite Civilization so far. The new systems for winning, especially culture, and much more streamlined and understandable than previous civ games. The fact that you no longer can stack units on the same space is also definitely a plus. Best strategy game on the market. Not a huge fan of the expansion though.
KHAAAAAAAAAAN!;-;One of the most satisfying turn based strategy games out there. Get the game together with the two expansions!
BLACK888VIPER;-;The only reason I own a PC
Maybeornot;-;Great game, reccomend to anybody who finds themselves interested in 4X strategy games. Able to capture your attention time and time again, due to fantastic modding community and great fun to play with friends. Only downside is that when Firaxis updates the game there are some game breaking bugs for a while when playing multiplayer, but they generally get ironed out fairly quickly.
Reality Gamer;-;If you like turn-based strategy games, then civilization is one of the best out there. You select from a list of historical civilizations, and then you get to play through all of human history, all the while selecting the best path to victory in a variety of ways. The only con I could nitpick is that you will spend almost all your time on this game, it is so compelling. Get it.
Ho-jima;-;You can play weeaboo nippon master race. 10/10
WelshAssassino;-;A very good stratergy game.
Yauboio;-;21 hours in 4 days! I think I'm addicted. This game is incredible, a must play!
Damyel;-;There are whole novels I'm never going to have the time to write because of this damn game 20/10
Rave_Darkmane;-;An excellent strategy game. Fun playing and challenging. Play as some of the historical nations that are in the game or get mods from the workshop and play some other nation that you would like to play as. You can also play with your friends, both multiplayer and hot seat. Play this game = Super fun. Play with friends = double the fun
Drax;-;This is a great game and has good multiplayer
Trazz;-;Okay, I'll just make a water mill in my new city, and it's 5 in the morning already?
oMrToast;-;I have played a number of Civilization games across several platforms, but this one takes the cake. I keep wanting to play it over and over and over again. If you have responsibilities or due dates or anything that is time sensitive, I reccomend you to prioritize and make sure you finish real life things first, because as soon as you start turn 1, there's no going back. Sleepless nights have been spent whispering the shadows of my dark room "Just one more turn..." 10/10
The war chicken;-;Having never palyed a civilization game before, this was quite a foreign concept, I had watched my friend play it a little bit, and understood the basics from general knowledge, either way I bought it on a sale and don't regret it. Played my first game, went total warmonger and fought the world- and won. Pros -Easy to understand -Complex for veterans -Workshop -Unique AI, each posing their own unique threat -Cons -AI is as thick as bricks -Multiplayer is apalling, far less features than single player, and frequent and extremely irritating bugs and connectivity issues-unrelated to the client -Not being updated frequently, and any update is usually a bugfix of some sort -Ridiculously expensive- The DLC is pretty much a requirement to enjoy the game fully, and said DLC is very expensive Overall- an absolutely brilliant game, however it is too expensive, if you have been turned off by the price, I understand, currently, if you choose to buy all the DLC individually, if would cost you 136 euros (however a full edition is available for 45) This number is too big. If you wait for a sale, you can pick up the complete edition for 15 euros, a puurchase you will not regret
[iSuk] arcella12;-;This game taught me more history than my 12 years of public education.
JihanKr;-;really love this turn-based strategy game!
fayekasey;-;Don't buy it if you have an addictive personality! It's good!
Not So Grump;-;I think this would be one of the best strategy games I have ever played, if it was a bit more expanded. Played a few matches w/ a friend and it's good, but gets a bit boring after a little while. Bots are a bit easy once you get the hang of the game. Enjoyable nonetheless. Definitely worth the purchase (I got it for $20, along with Gods & Kings expansion). 8/10
Lerola;-;Game that's easy to grasp compared to other strategy games, yet very deep. The first 10 hours will feel really impossible to understand, but once you get the general concepts the real fun begins. The amount of flexibility , possibilities and mods make it a game you can easily dump hours on.
rychu;-;Spent few hours with this one, had great time.
Squareo;-;A game I recommend to anyone that likes strategy games. It's a must-own! 10/10
Puck;-;11/10 would nuke Berlin as Poland again
Dinosaurus rex;-;A phenomal game that will make you appreciate history. Prepare to spend many hours playing this game.
L.;-;Basicly like this: Become a dictator
Teddybearr;-;This game is awesome. As an Age of Empires player I thought I would have a great basis for this game. Yet it proved wrong. This game is way more complicated then AoE. At first, when I bought it, I thought it was too hard, so I quit. This week, a few months after buying I tried again, and I'm hooked. The game is very hard to understand, there are so much things you have to think of, but that's the attractive part. Finally not a game like CSGO, CoD or GTA where you just run and gun without thinking, but a game that actually makes you think and rethink your actions and challenges you. Only con of this game is that it will eat your time, when you think you have been playing for an hour, you're whole day has gone bye. The one-more-turn-symdrom is very strong in this game. 10/10 would buy again
vE L o cit y;-;fun if you have an entire day to do nothing but play
Shalara;-;Do you see how many hours I have played in this game? 'nuff said ;)
Callumnicus Maximus;-;This is possibly the best game I've ever bought, Period.
Cjak40;-;10/10 would play for another 8 years
[Merc] Boylaska;-;Pro: -great turn-based strategy timeline evolution -very easy to learn -endless replayability -awesome singleplayer -good graphics for its genre -calming soundtrack -many different game setups -fun city management -lots to build, upgrade and research! -game gives suggestions on what to build, upgrade or research -decent diplomaticy system -action -> reaction, for example: expand your territory near other civilizations -> they might get angry -> they might denounce you -> other civilizations might distrust you -> every civilization turns against you -> nukes -> new game -Steam Workshop Con: -Diplomacy system is not perfect, for example: when demanding another civilization to stop spying on you, most of the time (or atleast when they dislike you) they tell you that they're trying to steal research to keep their people safe from you. Whatever the outcome of that conversation, about 1 turn later that civilization contacts you again to tell you that they are sorry. You can then tell them that you forgive them or not. But whatever you choose, they will always try to spy on you again later on. Even if you have a much bigger army than them, it seems that they don't care about risking a war announcement from your side. -Loading time of starting/loading a game takes a bit too long. Verdict: Even though I expected more from the diplomacy system, this is still the best and easiest to learn turn-based strategy game I have ever played. Dlc are a must have to enjoy it to the fullest! Keeps you hooked for many many hours. 9/10! What to buy: I highly recommend getting the full game package! The dlc are a MUST for the full experience, even with Workshop possibilities. P.S. Most players find Civ 5 a better game than the latest Civ: Beyond Earth. I feel the same way about this. Beyond Earth is far from a bad game but it just doesn't keep me hooked the way Civ 5 does. The fact that Civ 5 can be played with all it's DLC, and that Beyond Earth has no big DLC out yet, probably plays a big part in it (overal, BE feels incomplete). Civ 5 has also aged very well. It doesn't look dated at all compared to the latest installment.
CrazyZioCioccolatone|C.F|;-;Nuked everyone. death and destruction everywhere 10/10 you are gonna get addicted to this if you like turn based games
lukaslew;-;When I was a little boy I always wanted to play a game in which I could start on ancient era and go through next eras up to future era. The Civilization series gives me this opportunity. You start as a one of more than 20 civilization with only one city and one warrior and only you can lead it to the prosperity and glory. Will you play as a warrior and destroy other civilizations? Or maybe you prefer play as a pacifist? Will your culture will be interested for other civilization? Will your people will be the first people in the space? You are the leader and you have to choose a correct path for your civilization. Good lock.
hexinitlane;-;AWESOME i think tons mor people should play this amazing game!
chrisk13805;-;I've played alot, and it's fun. Random maps make it replayable.
Cheii017;-;I recommend this game to anyone that has interest in controlling their own nation and taking over the world... There are also many different ways to win and the multiplayer feature is nice to go against friends. Multiple ways to win so anyone can enjoy their own play style. :)
Zeream;-;Way too much of a time sink. Unfortunately, military conflicts are pretty much nonexistent / broken in quck games, and really only viable in marathon. But, nobody plays marathon in multiplayer soooooo.... not to mention multiplayer is buggy as hell (I can't tell you how many times I've encountered corrupted saves or units). Also AI has some pretty stupid glitches that can make them  easy even on the highest difficulties (ex AI doesn't know how to fight a war when there is a body of water between you and them, AI doesn't know how to fight a war when there are chains of mountains between you and them). Its actually kind of funny really, since on higher difficulties barbarians are more of a threat than other civs. You'll quickly realize that relations with other civs lack depth and it gets pretty repetitious fast. Same with the other game, once you figure it out its all pretty simple but strangely addicting. Its really fun to watch your civ grow and nuture it, but after a few games it largely apparent the game is a grindfest for technologies. Basically, this game is not hard, its just LONG and gets old quick. But yeah its a fun game, get it and all the expansions while its on sale you'll have a blast for a good number of hours. Do not recommend full price. I honestly cannot recommend you play this with friends unless you have friends with massive amounts of patience and dedication, because games can be very, VERY long.
Trooper;-;This game is surprisingly enjoyable (AND ADDICTIVE!) I recommend buying the COMPLETE EDITION. IT'S THE BEST WAY TO PLAY CIV 5!
MetalSoul9;-;This game is awesome. I've only played civ 2 and 3 and this is just so much more avanced and expansive compared to those. I really just started and I know that this game will be amazing.
Caffran;-;if u havnt heard of the civ series where have u been, this Turn-based rts game is so hype hours ive spent makin the best empire i can, such a great game... .....just one more turn then ill go bed....
A$AP Kano;-;Pretty good turn based strategy game, but playing the game without the expansions feels incomplete.
Moonlight Traffic;-;Most addictive game ever
LeonDowling;-;This is an amazing game. One of my favourites actually. My friend recommended this game and I'm normally not into these types of games, but i played and I thank him for telling me about this game. Would get this game without a doubt whilst it's on sale. 10/10
Icemann3;-;If only someone were to buy it for me... I'm currently using my friend's family sharing to play it, and it is FUNNNNN!
Train Tracks;-;Probably the BEST game that i have on steam right now in my opinion. If you don't have it, definatly get it, you can play the demo before buying! Also I think the DLC's are also worth it. I love this game, my opinion.
Onii-chan's Cum Dump;-;Hitler founded Judaism. 10/10
purfumy_funk;-;Extremely addicting. I'm not good enough to win on normal difficulty, I'd rather play on easy and feel like a god as a obliterate all the other civs or build everything beyond every civ. the interactions with the others civs has improved. Previous civilzation games made me feel like a twerp to be bullied by every other civilization... either by demanding money and gifts or demanding i go to war with my ally.
Immortan Mark;-;ive havent stopped playing and i am playing the game while i type this and i think the rigor mortis
Puss Nuggets;-;What can I say. Civ 5 is my favorite game! Well... at least for now any way. I am a big strategy game fan and most civ games suit my expectations about what I look for in a turn based strategy games. But civ 5 is the best out of all of them right now in my opinion. So Far I have 122 hours clocked in on this game and that number will be sure to grow. Words cant describe how fun it is to start off as an ancient civilization starting out with nothing and slowly grow over time expanding and conquering your foes. Civ 5 will bring fun to the table for hours. Now there are issues with the game as in any games. Like how I think the diplomacy in this game is horrible compared to civ 4 and the location of rescourses and what kind and how much spawns in any one game, but the combat system is way better. Unlike in previous instalments, in civ 5 you dont have to go attack with dumb death stacks that actually take away from any kind of militaristic strategies. I also noticed that in late game when anti air units come into play they dont always tend to work, the civilopidea doesnt give enough info, and it lacks some basic tips when hovering the cursor over certain things but these issues are very minor and dont detract from the fun of the game at all. Like I said, Ive clocked in countless hours of this game so far and feel I have the right to review the game now and I give it a thumbs up 9 out of 10. If you've never played a civ game and are interested or you just love turn based strategy, Civ 5 s the best place to start for newbies and vets alike (just make sure you buy the complete eddition for the highest extent of fun).
Orbixx;-;This game is life destroying. I love it.
Mad Jew: PAC-MAN Road;-;If you like Civilization, you'll like this game. If you don't like Civilization, get the heck out, or just play Civilization Revolutions on Diety. Best in the series.
Gypto;-;Always have loved Civilization series and this is not exception. I recommend it!
clockwerK;-;One of the best games I have ever gotten my hands on. I've never played a Civilization game or any game of the game type and ended up on a 22 hour spree of "Oh my god I can't stop, this is amazing." Worth every penny.
Kyuujou;-;This game is absolutely amazing! My favorite Civ by far. While the base game can seem alittle underwhelming Gods and Kings makes it a civ classic and with Brave New World it feels like the culmination of Civ games! I can't wait to see whats in store for Civ 6 as I have already been blown away with how great this game is!
Simonilla;-;MUST HAVE. This game is for strategy game fans, history buffs, god game fans, war game fans, tycoon game fans, city building game fans. I have bought many games and this is one of my top three. I tell all of my friends to buy it and all of my friends who do buy this game love it.
janfld40;-;Buy this game. Just do it.
Good Ol' Uncle Joe;-;One of the best strategy games out there. Graphics are quite nice and you really do feel like the master of a nation as you tweak and fine tune your civilization according to your strategy. The base game however is a little bland and although it looks much nicer than Civ 4 it has been dumbed down. Overall, worth picking up if you want a good game.
Krafty_Karl;-;First, just look at my play time. Second, I'm a game design student. So, believe me when I say, THIS IS ONE OF THE MOST WELL DESIGNED GAMES, AND THE MOST WELL DESIGNED STRATEGY GAME IN EXISTENCE. It's incredibly easy to get into for beginers but offers enough in depth control for experinced strategy gamers. Even after THOUSANDS of hours and HUNDREDS of games, it still holds it's place as my go to relaxation game; now that I know the perfect formula, it's still fun to put on a podcast and watch the random generation create an interesting and unique experince. Look at the other reviews; this game makes great stories. It's jam packed with content, and the complete edition regularly goes on sale for 12$. I've been waiting to write this review for awhile, but all I can say is this: BUY IT. Buy the full verison, it's well worth it. If you don't have the cash, wait for it to go on sale. This is (and with infinite replayablity will always remain) one of the greatest games of all time.
Skrublord;-;Great Game
Ares;-;I bought it yesterday and I already have 21 hours on it. In those hours, I've been nuked by Ghandi, nuked Ghandi as Poland, destroyed Korea, was involved in two world wars, and lead the U.N. Best game.
Ephringael;-;I bought this game thinking the reviews, though exaggerated, were positive. 24 hours later, I realized I had to work in the morning. Took one more turn, then another, once more, then went to work. Almost fell asleep at work. Got home, more turns. Perfect distraction on the way to the grave. 10/10
Athenaeum;-;This game is extremely awesome, especially with the DLC.
Ketan;-;It's surprisingly good, never thought I'd like a strategy game but Civ V really did changed my mind. If you are going to buy Civ I recommend buying the complete edition.
Bloodcryme;-;Great game with with great expansions
Nefara;-;The only valid reason for any strategy game lover to not have and love this game is the fear for your life. And by that, I don't mean dying, I just mean having it tick away via seconds and minutes and inevitably hours sunk into this game. It's addicting. But luckily, it's a sort of benign addiction in that after you finally *do* wipe the smile from Ramallamadingdong's face and crush the Siamese army with battleships and B2's you can look upon a world uniformly flying your colors and feel satisfied. It might lack some of the finer points of control and systems that games like Europa Universalis or a couple of previous iterations of Civ had, but I feel it was a fair trade for how approachable it is. Civ 5 is extremely easy to learn, but difficult to master. Even after as many hours as I've sunk into it, I'm still learning new strategies and how to deal with challenges and there's no lack of depth here. In vanilla civ 5, yes, but with the expansions? No. It's a great strategy game to dive into that's unintimidating for the newbies and deep enough for the hardcore.
CadillacGypsy;-;Absolutely wonderful and addictive.
DumbledoreTheNazi;-;Definitely worth your money when it is on sale, and even still when not. A wide variety of empires to select, and each one of them have their own abilities! I was playing a match with my friends for over 7 hours. It's super addicting! The games last for a long time, and over time you research different abilities. Like, being able to have your units go into the water, get on boats, and sail along the coast. Also, there is an ability to go into deeper waters to cross the ocean and meet a friend, or take over a civilization! A really good game to spend your money on!
Gypto;-;Always have loved Civilization series and this is not exception. I recommend it!
Moist Towelette;-;10/10 Would nuke again
Miles Saxton;-;TALK ABOUT A TIME SINK FUUUUUUUUUUCK
Lord108;-;If you like strategy games you must buy it
Pug Wayne;-;Being Indian, ive never ever been afraid of Gandhi until i played this game. 10/10
Gordon;-;This game is phenomenal. It certainly isn't shallow and has a lot of replay value.
HeroofWinds1 HG-A;-;Civ without DLC bad... Civ with DLC? BEST GAME 434343443434344/1 Buy now
Skullivan;-;Still the god emperor of strategy games.
Scortch Alcatraz - Alan;-;10000/10 I love it. Seriously, get this game right now if you haven't already. *EDIT* Alright, so with now over 250 hours played... It is still 10000/10, maybe even better now that i've gotten deeper with mods. It really is a fun/simple strategy game with fun challenges and awesome customization.
Mangoness;-;I could say so many good things about this game. But I am going to keep this fairly short. For any strategy lover or anyone new who want to start trying out new strategy games. This is the best place to start! It's addictive, lot's of DLC, generally just an extremely marvelous game! 10/10 by far!
KawaiiFive0h;-;A wonderful strategy game that you can just lose yourself in for hours.
mikekyr23;-;me and my friend bought this game on sales and i have to say it is a lot of fun but time consuming. i know i havent played for that long but i recomend it is awesome and a lot of fun with friends
Hailstorm Blackhat;-;Suddenly Keshiks/10
MakeMyDreams;-;Great game, just buy it.
Celticforward;-;I love this game and all others like it thank you.
Aether;-;I fizz off this game.... so good!
drteshobby.com;-;My eyes burn and it's 2am, but I keep playing. If this game kills me, it was worth it.
Hu Juan McGregor;-;This game allows you to rule the world... if you have the abiltiy. I say... CHALLENGE ACCEPTED!
Johnny Monsanto;-;Every time I play this game it is like if I entered a space time capsule where time passes really fast. 10/10
The_Dartster;-;I am the Greeks at turn 60, I make a declaration of friendship with Ghandi. turn 61-why are there spearmen at my borders. turn 62-now there's catapults. turn 63-Ghandi has declared war on you. turn 64-I am surrounded. turn 65-Athens is dying. turn 66-Athens is nearly dead. turn 67-I am out the game. 10/10 Ghandi the warmonger
Sir Jammy Boom Boom!;-;A very good stratigy game. Takes lots of brain power to play! Multiplayer works like a charm.
Some Fat Cat;-;Civlization V is one of those games that becomes very addicting once you get the swing of things. Minutes go by like hours, and this game [appears to be] somewhat educational, so I don't feel as bad for playing this game for hours at a time. Looks pretty good on DirectX 11, but will take up a lot of memory on your computer, so having nothing else running in the background is recommended.
shroud;-;This game is so addicting! Too bad I failed a french test for it though.
Drakonic,;-;This game could screw my wife, and I'd be okay with it. 10/10
Heat Legend;-;Great way to spend a few hours
Some Idiot;-;So fun. I love it. Addicting. I really enjoyed challenging the variety of different players and their mindset.
BLACK888VIPER;-;The only reason I own a PC
Evolboon;-;Fantastic game, I have had so many hours into this game before the expansions even came out.
PotatoFighter;-;So I've had a few hours on this game and thought it was time to give my two cents. This is a great game, and in my opinion it is one of the best strategy games out there. There is endless things that you can do in this game. You have the ability to create a civ in your own way. You can be a waemongler, scientific, cultured, and many more. You can shape history how you want to shape history. If your in the market looking for strategy games this is by far your best option. And hey if you dont like it you have 14days to get a refund after your purchase.
Maybeornot;-;Great game, reccomend to anybody who finds themselves interested in 4X strategy games. Able to capture your attention time and time again, due to fantastic modding community and great fun to play with friends. Only downside is that when Firaxis updates the game there are some game breaking bugs for a while when playing multiplayer, but they generally get ironed out fairly quickly.
Greatest_Nightmare;-;If you are a person who has a long attention span then this game is something you would enjoy the games are usally pretty long but full of susspence and choices , with each of your choices leading to peace or war an ally or enemy This is my favorite game on steam and I think everyone would enjoy it as well. I give it a raiting of 9 / 10
Orbixx;-;This game is life destroying. I love it.
tramvaev;-;Be careful! This game can waste your time!
Samerlipopette;-;If you like playing Chess but need something more colorful you will like this game. Far from real time war games, Civilization V is closer to a relaxing game where you have to take decision which will affect the future of your civilization and your ability to fight other empires. Closer to Sim City than Age of Empire, make you choice according to your desires. Enjoy life ;)
Puss Nuggets;-;What can I say. Civ 5 is my favorite game! Well... at least for now any way. I am a big strategy game fan and most civ games suit my expectations about what I look for in a turn based strategy games. But civ 5 is the best out of all of them right now in my opinion. So Far I have 122 hours clocked in on this game and that number will be sure to grow. Words cant describe how fun it is to start off as an ancient civilization starting out with nothing and slowly grow over time expanding and conquering your foes. Civ 5 will bring fun to the table for hours. Now there are issues with the game as in any games. Like how I think the diplomacy in this game is horrible compared to civ 4 and the location of rescourses and what kind and how much spawns in any one game, but the combat system is way better. Unlike in previous instalments, in civ 5 you dont have to go attack with dumb death stacks that actually take away from any kind of militaristic strategies. I also noticed that in late game when anti air units come into play they dont always tend to work, the civilopidea doesnt give enough info, and it lacks some basic tips when hovering the cursor over certain things but these issues are very minor and dont detract from the fun of the game at all. Like I said, Ive clocked in countless hours of this game so far and feel I have the right to review the game now and I give it a thumbs up 9 out of 10. If you've never played a civ game and are interested or you just love turn based strategy, Civ 5 s the best place to start for newbies and vets alike (just make sure you buy the complete eddition for the highest extent of fun).
solarpagoda;-;I've played strategy games my whole life and this is the most complete game out there. Replay value is very high, Pro tip - save often...
sonath;-;the best turn based strategy game out there Unlimited Re-playability
Yauboio;-;21 hours in 4 days! I think I'm addicted. This game is incredible, a must play!
Trazz;-;Okay, I'll just make a water mill in my new city, and it's 5 in the morning already?
oMrToast;-;I have played a number of Civilization games across several platforms, but this one takes the cake. I keep wanting to play it over and over and over again. If you have responsibilities or due dates or anything that is time sensitive, I reccomend you to prioritize and make sure you finish real life things first, because as soon as you start turn 1, there's no going back. Sleepless nights have been spent whispering the shadows of my dark room "Just one more turn..." 10/10
oipoi;-;11 pm Playing as Austria Huge map Everybody loves me and i have allot of trade deals so my income is 1000 per turn Got around 40k in the bank al city states are my allays what next?? lets annex all city states with that gold (ohgodwhyjpg) next turn everybody is denouncing me WTF Fast check on my diplomacy Everybody got butt hurt because i expanded my empire to fast> 11 30 pm i will just gift some stuff to other nations and hope for the best and then go to bed soddenly i see unhappiness over 60 from annexing all those city states Next turn a notification pops out! There is an uprising of your citizens in Vienna because there are unhappy. swipe to my capital and and other city and see 15+ enemy units burning everything to the ground. midnight-need to go to bed, have too go to work at 7 am but first need to resolve that uprising in my capital. 6 am citizen are happy and i can finally go to bed, turn around from my pc and stared at the window Sun shining outside and my alarm goes off, time to wake up FUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUU happened 10 time so far, 10/10 would do again! Great game, really fast so you lose track of time If you have a life and familly never say just one more turn.
Onii-chan's Cum Dump;-;Hitler founded Judaism. 10/10
Lukisfer;-;This game is perfect if you have hours to kill because it is easy to get lost in it. A very rewarding game. And the mods for it are amazing!
lukemount32696;-;The complete version is just amazing
Beasty_BoyXD;-;It's awesome...
add___123;-;This game provides literally hundreds of hours (or more) of fun. The randomness of the maps, the large amount of Civilizations, the multiple different ways to victory, and the many ways to achieve that makes this game so unique that it's impossible for it to feel repetitive. This is well worth the cost and definitely a game to get. Now if you'll excuse me, I have to get back to playing!
Ben;-;Civ 5 took a while to grow on me. on its first release, I was not impressed. the expansion packs have really added a lot, though, and I think with time I also got over the differences as compared to Civ 4. I'm really torn on the game-iness of Civ 5, though. like I still feel like the social policy trees and the city-states don't naturally fit. they're fun, because you're "leveling up" and "questing", but the policy system of Civ 4 seemed like it made more sense from a simulation point of view and gave you some cool flexibility when your needs changed, and the city state quests quickly become stupid, and again feel more like gimmicky game elements rather than a part of history. but again, the policies are rewarding, and the revamped cultural victory introduced in Brave New World moves them from "gimmicks supporting a weird win condition" to "fun ways to customize your game". I could still do without the city states, though. I agree that the diplomatic victory from previous games was poorly done, and I appreciate that city states do fix this, but it seems like a poorer fix than might have been hoped. on a side-note: I'd be curious to play vanilla Civ 5 and see if it still feels weak compared to vanilla Civ 4, or if my resistance to Civ 5 really WAS just "eew, hexes and non-stacked units - weird!" either way, I have since come to really enjoy Civ 5, especially with Brave New World. I look forward to Civ 6, whatever shape it may take. (unless it's online only. thank god Civ isn't owned by EA.)
Doodey;-;this game sucks so bad i never even bothered to download it -14/10
purfumy_funk;-;Extremely addicting. I'm not good enough to win on normal difficulty, I'd rather play on easy and feel like a god as a obliterate all the other civs or build everything beyond every civ. the interactions with the others civs has improved. Previous civilzation games made me feel like a twerp to be bullied by every other civilization... either by demanding money and gifts or demanding i go to war with my ally.
Immortan Mark;-;ive havent stopped playing and i am playing the game while i type this and i think the rigor mortis
YuriDenommus;-;I can't believe how good and addicting this game is. I tried to play Freeciv in the past and never got how people could think that was addicting, but Civ V solved my main issue with it: there's too much to handle, but Civ V forces me to handle everything before ending my turn. And gosh, I'm playing with D. Pedro II!
mithicoron;-;Civ 5 is a really fun turn based strategy game. Great to play with friends.
WifeAggro;-;One of the best games in the history , The only tip that I can give to new players is : -Never trust Ghandi
SteepInKline;-;It's Civ V, so it's dope.
Squishyfish;-;Honestly I don't know how this takes so much of my time Only wish multiplayer was less glitchy and had most of the same features as it does in singleplayer~ Will continue playing hours of this game
Brad the Hand;-;Fantastic game. Like you should buy it just because I say so.
cornet1234;-;Best move I made on steam buying this game, really worth the money, especially in the Steam Sale.
Dream;-;10/10 Would CiV again.
Train Tracks;-;Probably the BEST game that i have on steam right now in my opinion. If you don't have it, definatly get it, you can play the demo before buying! Also I think the DLC's are also worth it. I love this game, my opinion.
fohjoh;-;I need help
The_Ultimate_Ninja|trade.tf;-;i really like this
LighterHook;-;Best strategy game I've ever played.
Sparky_Doge;-;this game is great
Icemann3;-;If only someone were to buy it for me... I'm currently using my friend's family sharing to play it, and it is FUNNNNN!
Rave_Darkmane;-;An excellent strategy game. Fun playing and challenging. Play as some of the historical nations that are in the game or get mods from the workshop and play some other nation that you would like to play as. You can also play with your friends, both multiplayer and hot seat. Play this game = Super fun. Play with friends = double the fun
Drax;-;This is a great game and has good multiplayer
HemulenHD;-;Its nice
Damyel;-;There are whole novels I'm never going to have the time to write because of this damn game 20/10
The war chicken;-;Having never palyed a civilization game before, this was quite a foreign concept, I had watched my friend play it a little bit, and understood the basics from general knowledge, either way I bought it on a sale and don't regret it. Played my first game, went total warmonger and fought the world- and won. Pros -Easy to understand -Complex for veterans -Workshop -Unique AI, each posing their own unique threat -Cons -AI is as thick as bricks -Multiplayer is apalling, far less features than single player, and frequent and extremely irritating bugs and connectivity issues-unrelated to the client -Not being updated frequently, and any update is usually a bugfix of some sort -Ridiculously expensive- The DLC is pretty much a requirement to enjoy the game fully, and said DLC is very expensive Overall- an absolutely brilliant game, however it is too expensive, if you have been turned off by the price, I understand, currently, if you choose to buy all the DLC individually, if would cost you 136 euros (however a full edition is available for 45) This number is too big. If you wait for a sale, you can pick up the complete edition for 15 euros, a puurchase you will not regret
Alex az unott;-;With all the dlc, it's a very good game. Don't try it without them though. Ah, thats it, others write proper ones.
TyranitarLord;-;"plays this game" "5 minutes later" "Why is it 4 am?" But seriously, this is a good epic game, but if your computer sucks, I advise you not to get it cause the graphics are too good.
Schmyk;-;Just wish you could retaliate to the npcs instead of just taking their insults
Rhodeus;-;meh , i don't feel like writing long & detailed review ; The game is great , graphics are pretty good and satisfying for a turn based game , actually this is the best turn based game i've ever played so far ( and i played most of them ) you should definitely give a try ! 10/10 worth every penny
Okarin;-;Having played previous Civilization games, I found this one to be extremely satisfying. Not only can cities defend themselves without a unit inside, which was problematic in some earlier Civ's, but the DLC for this game is actually worth the price. The faith, the spies, the tourism... Such small tweaks turn a good game into an amazing one.
EmilyOrange;-;I've been a Civilization player since I was four or five years old. I can remember sitting next to my dad as a very small child and building Leonardo's Workshop and the Great Library. My brother won the entire first grade a reward when he was seven because he knew from playing Civilization that the capital of the Aztec empire was Tenochtitlan and he told the principal of his school at an assembly. Due to my heavy nostalgia about the Civilization franchise I want every new incarnation of the game to be absolutely spectacular. I want them to loyally follow the top-down turn-based strategy model I know and love, but add to it with the graphics, computing, and complexity that our modern technology can bring. Usually I'm disappointed because many games in the franchise complicate the original formula too much by allowing infinite units scattered everywhere and too many resources to play with. In my mind, Civilization V is the first sequel in the series that really is perfect and Brave New World DLC package adds some polish and new mechanics that will enhance the already spectacular experience. I have played 45 hours of this game in the last three weeks because it is so addicting. The thing that makes Civilization V so spectacular is that every game is different and every decision matters so that when you start up a map, you are in an entirely different situation, which you can conquer only through extremely precise management. The original Civilization V is a great addition to the series because it isn't complicated. It doesn't take long to learn, but after a few games you'll be markedly better for knowing some nuances of strategy. Brave New World also seems to offer this. At face value the trade routes, policy, and culture changes the DLC adds are fairly minor and easy to learn, but after fooling with them for a while I've found they are huge advantages when used correctly. A well-placed caravan can now save a floundering city. The policies in the game are much more desirable than they were in Civilization V sans Brave New World, so you now have to rework old strategies to put more emphasis on culture. Art and writing make culture victories way more interesting. Overall, the DLC adds a lot of complexity without making gameplay more complicated. In single-player games you will have more things to think about if you want to play the higher levels. Where the DLC really shines though is in multiplayer matches. The AI is fun to trade paintings and resources with, but they are extremely predictable. Your friends, family, and even strangers will make deals the AI never would that will help you win more spectacularly than ever before. Caravans and cargo boats are new with Brave New World and they will let you play much more skillfully with players than you could without it. I haven't figured everything out yet and I expect it will take me a few hundred hours and maybe a bit of slogging through the civilopedia to do so, but I highly recommend downloading Brave New World even if you are slower than I am to get the nuance. It's fun to play with friends even if you are only defending against onslaughts of infantry and bombers with your warriors and cavalry. A demo is available right now on the Steam store.
Torque2304;-;Unlike the previous versions, units are not stackable in the same tile :(
The Bungle Hole King;-;Amazing experience: worth the money even now. I started playing Civilization games at Civ:Rev, but this took it to a whole new level. Even with the release of Beyond Earth, I still come back to whoop my friends and the AI in Civ 5
Mr Swaggy Patty;-;took 10 mins to find out how to go to the next turn 11/10 would next turn again
matsku84;-;Even though some features from the previous Civ games didn't make it into this one, the huge new improvements such as city states, hexagon tiles and having only one unit per tile more than make up for it making this the best Civ game so far.
Mr. Glitters;-;You know that feeling when you play Sims and you're in the building mode. That x100
JunkBlader;-;it was a peaceful world until i meet gandy
Shephard;-;I think best turn-based strategy game ever.Once you play you can't quit anymore :)
skienife;-;Just one more turn
Chainsaws;-;A nice evolution of the classic Civ games if a bit simplified. Maybe expansion packs will fill in the gaps as they did with previous versions but I won't be finding out as it will take a lot of persuasion for me to buy another Civ game. My problem? Single player is reliable but multiplayer is atrocious, nearly two years after release it's just about possible to get a 4-player game going but gameplay is laggy regardless of connection speeds involved and as soon as a problem occurs it can take hours to get the game going again from saves if it's not a total loss. All Firaxis/2K seem interested in is churning out countless DLC as more keeps appearing even though the base game still isn't working properly. Such a shame. Edit: After a couple of years and as many expansions this game now has a lot more depth, the multiplayer issues are gone and my ire has subsided. I can wholeheartedly recommend this as a successor to the previous games and it's worth picking up the full edition when there's a sale on. Will I be buying the sequel/spinoff Beyond Earth then? Yes, but not until the full edition is in the sale because by then I can expect any bugs to have been resolved and the game to be filled out to its proper potential.
[NTNN] GrimJack;-;Very fun if you like strategy games (cpu's can be a pain because they refuse to make fair trades). It can be a little confusing at first, but once you get the hang of it you can't stop playing. You can have a lot more fun if you have a friend to play it with.
flynnysmith;-;Ye pretty good aye
Skittles;-;fun game tht can last for hours! Great for when nothings going on and you want to have some fun either alone or with friends!
I am a turtle.;-;Of the 44.3 hours that I've played this game in the last two weeks, 44.3 of them were over the course of the past two days. I think that says something about the quality of this game. Or just my mental condition. Whatever, you should get it. Trust me on this.
Primus;-;Ok, I've had this game for a few years now and I think that its about time that I give it a review. Disclaimer: I do have all the DLC so many things I decribe may not apply to the standard edition. First the pros - Insane replayablilty (I've been playing this game for 3 years now) - Is still a plenty worthy game despite Civilization Beyond Earth - Loads of different civilizations and styles of maps to play on. - Graphics are still very enjoyable - It is really, really addictiing Cons - Public multiplayer blows, if you expect to want to play multiplayer, your going to want a private server with some friends. - It can crash, not to often, but save your game. - Can seem a bit dumbed-down at times. - AI is a bit dull This is a fantastic game, and it is well worth the price (go for the complete edition though, the DLC's are very nice to have) It is simplistic enough for beginneers and has a pretty shallow learning curve, but has the ability for depth and micromanagement if that is more your thing. It has great replayability (can't say this enough) and especially if you have some friends to play with, its a blast.
Ramiro #kewlkidsonly;-;Very enjoyable and addicting game I reccomend buying more than 1 copy for you and your friends to play
Mr.Ruffles;-;You die a hero or you live long enough to become a villain
Hanse;-;Rushed for uranium, all uranium is in Ghandi's territory. 15/10 would invade Ghandi to stop armageddon
BarZi;-;It's pretty good. But don't buy without expansions.
CanadianJack;-;I trusted Gandhi once. Never again.
Lancer;-;Just one more turn....
All Terrain Venomoth;-;Digital version of Crack Cocaine.
silveRRR;-;A strategy game that you will love if you like turn-based games. Just be aware of extremely slow "end turn" time after a few hours into your game, if you have a slow computer.
Thatcivperson;-;Found Gandhi, nuked Gandhi, Gandhi sent 10 nukes to my cities. I sent 11 to his. War won 10/10 would nuke gandhi again.
CalebJallen;-;This game is absolutely fantastic, get it during a sale though, as it's a bit expensive. And make sure to get the complete edition, the vanilla game is quite broken in certain aspects. Great game to play with friends too!
Rekuzatus Riki;-;Would you be interested in a trade agreement with Steam for this game?
Matt Meadows;-;This game is the best game ever made!
ToBadHabits;-;It's the best out there!!!
szwadron;-;Great game.
mingo888;-;An extremely well made strategy game. It's great on its own, but also amazing with expansions. Play it alone or with friends. It's your choice. Highly recommended.
Kitty;-;Buy this.
andrew.zobel;-;One of those games that you say you'll stop playing this at 1 in the morning. All of a sudden, it's 9 in the morning and you've just missed your first class. This game has it all. Gameplay is top notch, graphics are wonderful, the added languages of other leaders is a nice touch, and you may even learn a little something about history along the way. Easily the best strategy game that's out there.
Dank Dick 420;-;First game had no idea what I was doing, got rekt by Ghengis and Atilla by turn 100 10/10 would take the warlord d!3k again
Boomer;-;Great game, so addicting to play
El Grande Jefe;-;World Domination is the best domination. Conquer at will and send all the hippies to hell.
LuckyCrew;-;I bought the complete edition when it was on sale for $12 and until now, it has been amazing. I love the fact that the game is paced according to you and no one yells at you for not keeping your crosshair at head level like CS:GO :). No one cares if you research killing robots or mathmateics, no one cares if you decide to skip your turns without doing anything. Get this game while it's on sale. Get it after the sale is over. GET IT NOW. WORTH EVERY CENT
Seraph;-;When Civ 5 came out, I didn't like it at all. I still wouldn't like it, if not for the exceptional expansions that address pretty much every flaw (except the AI, which I still find a bit silly, but I find almost all AI flawed) It's friendly and fair to the new civ players, and has enough content to keep the veterans occupied. I especially loved the scenarios.
Arnold;-;This game is a really good game. There are a few people that hate on it, but as you can see, the reviews are overwhelmingly positive. The graphics aren't bad. At all. You can see the soldier units move and attack each other, you can see the workers making whatever you're improving, and you can even see the "Wonder" buildings inside of your city. Very cool. I really like how this was made. The only thing I have a problem with is that in late-game, it gets really laggy, but that's probably because I'm on a 5 year old mac laptop. But it still runs really well early game, and I really like it. I feel like the money I paid for Civilization 5 was well spent because I can get a lot of hours of playing from this game. There are many different things you can do, paths you can take, and things you can build. Every game is different, which is why I really like this game. I'd reccomend this game. 11/10.
Zentau;-;One of my all time favorite. Sid Meier's civilization give you the perfect opportunity to play through the ages as one of you favorite countries. and with steam workshope you can customize it as you like. Big thumbs up.
Fatsuma;-;An excellent singleplayer and multiplayer game that needs the DLC to be top notch. The great thing is the sheer variety of game modes, leaders, scenarios, maps, victory conditions etc that mean you never play the game twice. The multiplayer element can sometimes still be a little buggy and if someones joining or leaving a game it may lag out for a bit but otherwise it is a truly excellent game that I would recommend fully. Just a great game!
beare;-;I don't know why I can review this game I dont even have it im 10 and what is this help
Nurgles Socks;-;Civ 5 is proper mint, love it.
arlingtonhatr;-;genius smoother than civ 4.
jkinsella432;-;really good and stuff
Master Potato;-;its awesome and fun to play :D
NampahcLeumas;-;I think the time played above says it all...
BlackieChanFTW;-;Fantastic game and with so much content in terms of playable nations, maps and sizes etc. (especially with both expansion packs added) it still has lots of replay value even after being played for over 100 hours already as no 2 matches are the same!
bleahighmc;-;I've been a fan of the Civ series since the very first one came out and I think this one follows quite well in the footsteps of its predecessors and also makes some nice, if not necessary, changes that make it stand on its own. It took a little getting used to because I've been playing Civ 4 for a very long time and I had become accustomed to that setup. The Civ 5 setup keeps many of the same commands the same but there are some other, smaller, differences that may take a few turns to really get the hang of. One thing that I'm not a huge fan of is the lack of the ability to stack military units as in the older Civs, especially to garrisson a city, but its a relative issue and it just makes you plan a bit more carefully. Overall, a very good game with sharp graphics, good sound, and solid AI.
Sandy Cheese;-;Time... you need time to play this, so far am into approx 13 hours on a single vs AI game and I can never get enough. I guess what I like most about this is its not like most strategy games where the AI mechanics eventually just "give up" and stop doing anything productive at the end-game, they will constantly produce content for you to enjoy for hours on end... also not to mention workshop integration for community made historical battles and events to scale maps of earths countries and continents, if you are a turn based strategy fan or not (I wasn't), this is a franchise you MUST try.
Dan_1357;-;Oh my god... Must I really... Ok, ok. Civ 5 is one of my most favorite games and I always enjoy playing it no matter which leader I play as or what type of world I play in. I absolutely adore the graphics and the game mechanics which makes me unable to wait to play Civ: Beyond Earth. The only issue I have is how long it takes to produce something with new cities. I highly recommend EVERYBODY to play this game so Civ 5 get's the extremely rare 10/10.
The mighty M;-;A nice game for hours of fun and challeging campaigns. You can play as a bunch of civilizations/leader. each leader/civilizations has a special abillity, buildings, units. the game has a lot of maptypes so never know how it's going to look. If you think the game is to hard/easy try changing the difficulty to a lower/higher level. The game also has a couple of scenarios you can play, a lot of mods to try out, great multiplayer to play with your friends or strangers. If you think the game is to long/quik you can change the gamepace to very short games or very long games If you want a game that you can play for hours don't look futher you found it!!!
Dub_y0;-;one more turn
Shikashi;-;Yes. Just yes.
Xbgt1;-;I great game. I love how many ways there are to win and how you can pick what speed you want to play at. Highly recommended.
Dunstan Xenon;-;This Game is Still a Favorite
RUBBISHAway, card farming);-;Killing ur time baby! But as the return, you should have a lot of fun
Arrowsmith;-;Brilliant game. A lot of fun!
Crusher;-;legendary game!
SLAVE OF SOVIET UNION;-;Chipotle took over America. 999\10
BeauMonty;-;10/10 With DLC.
robert;-;the best civ yet
TheCanehdian;-;This game is good, I am addicted. Back to Civ 10/10
AUI80;-;more addicting than heroin
Hail Storm;-;This game will steal your life from you. Single games can last days or longer. You will mod it to hell. You will forget about other games.
Kernowek;-;Awesome game, can be a little annoying to learn but after the initial learning curve it's one of the best games you'll play. Online can be slow with a lot of players but is very fun, Singleplayer is just as good but it can be a little annoying not fighting real people. Over all great game!
That British Guy;-;Great game epic single player and great multiplayer suitible for all ages but may only be fun for 8+ you can play it over and over again and never get bored
ur mum;-;It kills me to think about the cumulative human time spent playing this game.
Moonlight Traffic;-;Most addictive game ever
[Merc] Boylaska;-;Pro: -great turn-based strategy timeline evolution -very easy to learn -endless replayability -awesome singleplayer -good graphics for its genre -calming soundtrack -many different game setups -fun city management -lots to build, upgrade and research! -game gives suggestions on what to build, upgrade or research -decent diplomaticy system -action -> reaction, for example: expand your territory near other civilizations -> they might get angry -> they might denounce you -> other civilizations might distrust you -> every civilization turns against you -> nukes -> new game -Steam Workshop Con: -Diplomacy system is not perfect, for example: when demanding another civilization to stop spying on you, most of the time (or atleast when they dislike you) they tell you that they're trying to steal research to keep their people safe from you. Whatever the outcome of that conversation, about 1 turn later that civilization contacts you again to tell you that they are sorry. You can then tell them that you forgive them or not. But whatever you choose, they will always try to spy on you again later on. Even if you have a much bigger army than them, it seems that they don't care about risking a war announcement from your side. -Loading time of starting/loading a game takes a bit too long. Verdict: Even though I expected more from the diplomacy system, this is still the best and easiest to learn turn-based strategy game I have ever played. Dlc are a must have to enjoy it to the fullest! Keeps you hooked for many many hours. 9/10! What to buy: I highly recommend getting the full game package! The dlc are a MUST for the full experience, even with Workshop possibilities. P.S. Most players find Civ 5 a better game than the latest Civ: Beyond Earth. I feel the same way about this. Beyond Earth is far from a bad game but it just doesn't keep me hooked the way Civ 5 does. The fact that Civ 5 can be played with all it's DLC, and that Beyond Earth has no big DLC out yet, probably plays a big part in it (overal, BE feels incomplete). Civ 5 has also aged very well. It doesn't look dated at all compared to the latest installment.
LeonDowling;-;This is an amazing game. One of my favourites actually. My friend recommended this game and I'm normally not into these types of games, but i played and I thank him for telling me about this game. Would get this game without a doubt whilst it's on sale. 10/10
Caffran;-;if u havnt heard of the civ series where have u been, this Turn-based rts game is so hype hours ive spent makin the best empire i can, such a great game... .....just one more turn then ill go bed....
gentle dialection misconception;-;Genghis Khan survived the modern age and discovered nuclear energy
tasteskrispy;-;This fabulous example of turn based strategy. Senir Meier's Capitalisation V is a game about; open borders, research agreements and unhappiness among the general populus. This game has grown on me and I believe that the price of it is 100% fair and is also worth every monies. Overall I would give this game a carrot out of rice patty and allow it to continue charging modest and fair prices.
Chris;-;This is one of the best games I have ever played. It is surely worth the money. If you are considering between this, and say, call of duty, buy this. It is 100x better and is a lot more fun to lay. It is a game that will not get boring. So much variety in the game. You could choose between about 45 different nations and try to win in different ways. All in all, I highly recommend this game to people who looked to have fun playing by themselves or with a group of friends.
CairoCopper;-;Ladies and Gentlemen, I give you one of my favorite games of all time. This is Sid Meier's Civilization V. A little background with this game. I was never a big fan of the series prior to this game. The only other Civilization I'd played up until this point was with Civilization revolution. Which I enjoyed playing but unfortunately, had some flaws that I could easily point out. Here though, it's a much different story. This game not only changed my view of Civilization, but that of strategy games, Steam, and even PC gaming as a whole. This game had a certain appeal to me as I was a fan of learning or nations history, culture, and warfare. This game has many of histories greatest Civilizations and leaders and has even a small sinopsis of their histories and culture if you want to poke around a little and learn. But who cares about that? I wanna play a game, not learn stupid history. Well, it's no slacker in that department either. Each Civilization has its own unique units, buildings, and buffs that affect their playstyle and you can play a variety of ways to win. Conquer the World with a Domination victory, become a cultural utopia, the first men in space, be the master diplomat, it rolls anyway. The game holds my official favorite video soundtrack ever (yes, I said it). It works much different than other soundtracks, when you'll be playing for hours (unknown to you of course) it's bound to get old. Actually, no. It has that right amount of intensity, calmness, and grandeur to make it really memorable without even trying. My only complaint with it is that the AI has its idiotic moments, but I was having too much fun to care, and it's far from easy but not unacessable to newcomers. Maybe it's not for everyone, but it deserves to be tried for its amazing take on turn based strategy and even elements I haven't mentioned like it SUPPORTING mods and it's amazing DLC that isn't a lazy tack on, or the scenarios if you get bored of regular games! Go out and try it yourself, but for me, It ranks easily into my top 3 favorite video games of all time.
Prenatal Vivisection;-;I fought off barbarians like a herpes outbreak and bribed Korea to attack my friends. 11/5
MILK;-;Its Sids V so you should already know how this is going to go..
Oranges are K;-;Too busy taking another turn to right a review, but this game is genius.
eggs a cute me;-;I have spent so much time on this game it is sad (almost 1500 more offline)
-chan;-;Everyone feared Gandhi
Arnold;-;This game is a really good game. There are a few people that hate on it, but as you can see, the reviews are overwhelmingly positive. The graphics aren't bad. At all. You can see the soldier units move and attack each other, you can see the workers making whatever you're improving, and you can even see the "Wonder" buildings inside of your city. Very cool. I really like how this was made. The only thing I have a problem with is that in late-game, it gets really laggy, but that's probably because I'm on a 5 year old mac laptop. But it still runs really well early game, and I really like it. I feel like the money I paid for Civilization 5 was well spent because I can get a lot of hours of playing from this game. There are many different things you can do, paths you can take, and things you can build. Every game is different, which is why I really like this game. I'd reccomend this game. 11/10.
Rushfor2112;-;Obviously, by the look of my total hours played, you can say that I enjoy this game very much. It's not entirely the main game that I enjoy the most, but the mods for this game are incredible. Given, they aren't nothing like Civ 4's Fall From Heaven 2, but there are some incredible mods out there for Civ 5! This game completely engulfs you into a land of which you're familiar with, or into a whole new style of landscape where you can explore, plan out your next cities, and watch them grow. And when one of your neighboring civs  you off, well war it is. This game pretty much has everything you'd want in a turn based strategy game, and I'd easily recommend this to anyone and everyone that hasn't already played this masterpiece. 10/10
Saltdog;-;This is one of the best classic strategy games ever, though without DLC is kind of bland, if you plan on getting the game DLC is a must! Because the game without GAK and BNW, is a long game with and repeating process, and it's cheaper to get the game and all DLC's then them seperate, I fell victim to this, hopefully you won't do the same.
WhitePower;-;The game is realy interesting ,but you need to pay a lot for DLC.
Seraph;-;When Civ 5 came out, I didn't like it at all. I still wouldn't like it, if not for the exceptional expansions that address pretty much every flaw (except the AI, which I still find a bit silly, but I find almost all AI flawed) It's friendly and fair to the new civ players, and has enough content to keep the veterans occupied. I especially loved the scenarios.
BoxJellyFish;-;Very nice game :)
OfficialLenin;-;I only recommended for fear of Ghandi
=][= Veteran Kodiak;-;It is SO satisfying to just roflstomp your most hated civilization and they will admit that they are inferior compared to your master race o,o
Heinrich Von Sturmalpin;-;love this game first game on steam highly recomend it very fun and very addicting if your a hardcore strategy gmae player
Splodybits;-;This game has invented time travel. It is only forward and skips about 5 hours at a time.
Varakunai;-;If you still don't have Civ V, your life is a waste. Nothing compares to it, get sucked into a 20 hours marathon and let the real world fade away.
CarryBuncle;-;I have 700hrs on this game, doesnt that tell you something?"Your a social outcast!" well no, its just such sophisticated game to point where anything is possible. Im a real fan of turn based games and if you are, buy this game (BTW i have all the dlcs but that was 449hrs in so this review stil makes total sense.)
kennystn1;-;You need to take the deal they have currently! WHAT A STEAL
Morrelli707;-;Well, you know..... only in this game does one try to launch a rocket into space, and end up nuking every other civilization on the planet. Accidental Domination Victories for the win
Daemonisk;-;A really addicting turn-based strategy game on building and expanding your civilization. It offers hours and hours of fun giving you a rise of plans to conquer the world. This game willl keep you saying "just one more turn."
Homeblest;-;Great game!
JunkBlader;-;it was a peaceful world until i meet gandy
Shephard;-;I think best turn-based strategy game ever.Once you play you can't quit anymore :)
skienife;-;Just one more turn
szwadron;-;Great game.
Simonilla;-;MUST HAVE. This game is for strategy game fans, history buffs, god game fans, war game fans, tycoon game fans, city building game fans. I have bought many games and this is one of my top three. I tell all of my friends to buy it and all of my friends who do buy this game love it.
Good Ol' Uncle Joe;-;One of the best strategy games out there. Graphics are quite nice and you really do feel like the master of a nation as you tweak and fine tune your civilization according to your strategy. The base game however is a little bland and although it looks much nicer than Civ 4 it has been dumbed down. Overall, worth picking up if you want a good game.
ChairManMeow;-;gandhi + nukes = rise of india
Mr.Ruffles;-;You die a hero or you live long enough to become a villain
Chainsaws;-;A nice evolution of the classic Civ games if a bit simplified. Maybe expansion packs will fill in the gaps as they did with previous versions but I won't be finding out as it will take a lot of persuasion for me to buy another Civ game. My problem? Single player is reliable but multiplayer is atrocious, nearly two years after release it's just about possible to get a 4-player game going but gameplay is laggy regardless of connection speeds involved and as soon as a problem occurs it can take hours to get the game going again from saves if it's not a total loss. All Firaxis/2K seem interested in is churning out countless DLC as more keeps appearing even though the base game still isn't working properly. Such a shame. Edit: After a couple of years and as many expansions this game now has a lot more depth, the multiplayer issues are gone and my ire has subsided. I can wholeheartedly recommend this as a successor to the previous games and it's worth picking up the full edition when there's a sale on. Will I be buying the sequel/spinoff Beyond Earth then? Yes, but not until the full edition is in the sale because by then I can expect any bugs to have been resolved and the game to be filled out to its proper potential.
Kitty;-;Buy this.
Dank Dick 420;-;First game had no idea what I was doing, got rekt by Ghengis and Atilla by turn 100 10/10 would take the warlord d!3k again
mingo888;-;An extremely well made strategy game. It's great on its own, but also amazing with expansions. Play it alone or with friends. It's your choice. Highly recommended.
robert;-;the best civ yet
Hail Storm;-;This game will steal your life from you. Single games can last days or longer. You will mod it to hell. You will forget about other games.
mist;-;Civilization V is a very fun game for just messing around on or playing with friends. I have played this game for hours on end and keep finding myself coming back for more, I highly recomend this game. 10/10
arlingtonhatr;-;genius smoother than civ 4.
jkinsella432;-;really good and stuff
mcalhoun3266;-;The best strategy game I have ever played. 10/10.
Sir Darkrai;-;This game overall is a great strategy based game thats fun to play with friends or alone.
MrRolci;-;An awsome game that every strategist has to play .
[COLOR_RED] Enderborn;-;Civilization is a fantastic game that i absolutely can't get enough of. Real time strategy games can become overwhelming at some point, which is one reason why i love Civilization 5 so much since it's turned based, the combat system is great, lots of technologys to research, tons of unit's to use to crush your enemies, diplomacy in singleplayer can get a bit annoying, because the ai is so territorial but in multiplayer you can effectively use diplomacy to crush your foes and bring yourself to the top. The spy system is both a asset and a disability, it's a asset since you can get free technologys or convert a city-state to become your ally, however it can be a disability since players can see when you steal a technology and most often demand for the removal of your spy and a lot of times the spy fails to get a new technology and get's killed in the process. Naval combat is insanely fun from trireme rushing your neighbors, to a long range naval invasion using battleships and aircraft carriers. i would recommend this game to anyone who is a huge fan of strategy turn based games.
Kobold Kommando;-;Eunan hates this game, therefore, buy it!
twinCatalysts;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is the first game I received on steam, and although I don't remember most of it, I have just under 300 hours on it, as of writing this. The reason that I do not remember it is not because it is an unmemorable game, but that I don't remember playing it for that long. I am almost 80% sure I have just played this game for a week straight, and didn't notice it. That is how addictive this game is. If you are a fan of any RTS style game, this will be right at home with you, with tons of Civilizations to play as, all with unique bonuses and troops that make the game feel incredibly surreal. I usually do not talk about the soundtrack of a game, but this game has by far one of THE best sound tracks I have ever heard, and a quick search through the game files gives you access to all of the music, even though I would easily pay to have it. The gameplay is excellent, the soundtrack good enough to talk about, and the openness of it gets this game a 9/10. I would play for 300 more hours
ItsMeMario;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is one of the best games I have ever played.
Niccy [Tgr];-;Awesome game!!! If you are a leader and if you want to build and lead your own civilization, this game is for you and you will have fun playing it for hours and hours!! Very addicting, careful!! 9/10
frstrm3k;-;Just...one...more...turn...
Etimos;-;the music gives you aids
Mono;-;CIV 5 is immensely fun with friends. 1 PM... "Time to play some CIV!" 5 AM... *passed out in chair*
Zentau;-;One of my all time favorite. Sid Meier's civilization give you the perfect opportunity to play through the ages as one of you favorite countries. and with steam workshope you can customize it as you like. Big thumbs up.
Nurgles Socks;-;Civ 5 is proper mint, love it.
beare;-;I don't know why I can review this game I dont even have it im 10 and what is this help
Fatsuma;-;An excellent singleplayer and multiplayer game that needs the DLC to be top notch. The great thing is the sheer variety of game modes, leaders, scenarios, maps, victory conditions etc that mean you never play the game twice. The multiplayer element can sometimes still be a little buggy and if someones joining or leaving a game it may lag out for a bit but otherwise it is a truly excellent game that I would recommend fully. Just a great game!
Master Potato;-;its awesome and fun to play :D
Diablo Gato;-;Playing this game a thing I would do is invade a neighboring country, and force my own ideology on them, even if they didn't want it.
Hidden in shade of leaves;-;Played on the Earth map, Ended up with two safe cities free of radiation poisoning. 10/10 would annihilate humanity again
Reidicus;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is an excellent game. I'm both an avid gamer and a history buff, and Civ does a great job of catering to those two aspects of my personality. I mean, who doesn't want to see the Aztecs develop nuclear weapons and annihilate the Europeans who conquered them!? I'm not a fan of turn based games, but Civ just keeps me coming back. One more turn turns into two more turns which turns into three hours of my life spent trying to stop playing the game. It is addicting. I recommend Civ to any strategy fans.
zantjez;-;- bought the game last night - ignored the addictive warnings - started the game - game crash with every video -found out i screwed up the installation - installated it again - game works fine after a few test rounds -starts a serious game - 9 hours later being the biggest  on the map surrounding every other nation. - got something to drink and eat to enjoy a world war - computer crashes due to the heat of my room - didnt save the game - got into rage mode -10/10 that i will do it all over again
Nova Primus;-;One of my favorite civilization games and near the top of my list of favorite RTS games of all time. Only Star Craft being number 1 and Command and Conquer (Tiberium Series) being number 2. I don't consider my self one of the best player as i cant beat the A.I on the hardest settings, especially if Gandhi is dominating the map
car_ch;-;Hello, I bought Sid Meier's Civilization V by mistake. I wanted Sid Meier's Civilization V: Complete Edition. Is there a way to pay the difference $15.5 and get it all?
xECx Phantom;-;A very fun game. So much you can do on it, so many amazing modders. Overall, the vanilla game is a must have!
G2H_Hellbringer;-;Washington picks every ideology except Freedom.
Tiffany Maxwell;-;Its a good game, boring sometimes, but mostly fun!
Teyton1 LEROY JENKINS;-;i will lose my job to this game!!! i cant stop playing the damn thing!!!!
baja16;-;It's little more than ok
Awkward_Clownfish;-;Disconnect Simulator 2010. But seriously, this game is amazing. Buy it. Now.
Mr.OtterMan;-;One of the best, if not the best strategy game I have ever played. It took a lot of hours away from my life.
Go Away;-;Okay, ti's the big one. Civilization V. My favourite game besides Team Fortress 2. I can't decide which one I like more, they are so different to play, to enjoy, ect. But I can say you this, buy the DLCs, Not only Gods & Kings and Brave New World, but also the DLCs adding new civilizations like Spain, the Inka, Denmark, Korea, Babylon... If you wanna try out this game, wait for a sale. This turn-based strategy game isn't a game for everybody. So when the sale comes, (When this game is on sale it's nearly always -75% on the game and every DLC) buy this game including Gods & Kings and Brave New World. I just love this game and I know many people who do aswell :)
Supergeil;-;Very fun game reminds me of age of empires. I would like to see the Persian immortals look a little like they did back in the day. The game is perfect i love the Scenarios and everything about it. I would love to see a siege weapon that could fire from 3 tiles away before the artillery. It would be much easier to lay siege to a city. 5 stars!
HYEPOWER575;-;This is such an amazing game!
Master Stargrave;-;This is a game you can real lose track of time playing lol you'll spend hours on it before you know it!!
Elias1620;-;Now, this is a fringe game for me. I love it, but the hate is just as strong. Pros: Very good looking Once you get it, very easy menus Nice variety Cons: REPETITIVE AS HELL. BE PREPARED FOR HOUR AFTER HOUR DOING NOTHING Music isn't great, can wear on your nerves  AI, but mods help No Actual Tutorial!!! Very same gameplay, no earthchanging elements Remember  AI, yeah, almost always war all in all, 6/10
Dezzillion;-;it's OK
Arran;-;We all know this is a good game, un-matched and un-rivaled this game is unique and runs well
HumanvGames/Nathan;-;One of the best Civilization games out at this time, i am recommend to my friends all the time, 10/10
antarcticruler;-;One of the best games in the category of strategy. You make all decisions on how to win the game, with or without suggestive help. You can make your own history of the world. And the ai are completely unlike what the should be, but I would still conquer the anyways. Ghandi wants to spread the peace, nukes = peace, greece always attacks you, and sucks at defending, while England is terrible at being an empire. My only complaint is that when the AI difficulty increase, pretty much only there bonuses increase, but there intelligence is too "artificial" to be any more of a dumbass when it comes to military strats.
Big P [PENISLORD20XX];-;only ever completed one full match but is rlly fun if you have time to actually play like quit your day job to play this game it takes so long
Gundamseedop;-;Great strategy game!
ADHFMZ7;-;This is a great game. My friend got it for me about a year ago and since then, ive been hooked. Its the most played game in my library.
lab012_25;-;Lots of fun!
Philly1089;-;Great game
DwarfKhan;-;Great Game. Hexes are the future.
Charlie;-;the unoffical handguide to politics
Koodoo25;-;Why wouldn't you want this game?
Mr. McCann;-;Well first of all i want to say that this game sucks. 10/10
The Suspect;-;This game is pretty cool for many reasons. 1. Ghandi is cool 2. Ghandi is cool 3. Ghandi will nuke your family. please buy my game for FaZe fundraiser. this is my leaf. 10/10 would hug ghandi again.
Danker than thou;-;This game killed me irl I have cancer and I can't stop pressing 'Next Turn' over and over again. Havent been to chemotherapy in 4 weeeks body slowly tearing itself apart into grave mortality 10 out of 10 beakers would make horrible life decisions again
Urban;-;this game is so OMG good. buy it
NanDecker69;-;Whent in a game with friends.Got all wonders lol. 10/10 would next turn again
Enforcers;-;This is an epic strategy game allowing to build empires, and get more technologically advanced than your opponents so that your Battleships, Jets, and Tanks can mop the floor with your enemies' musketmen, warriors and dingy little pirate ships. 100% Recommend!
Sir CJ Campalot;-;Just OMG i started playing this game because my friend was like really pumped about it and i was shocked at how amasing it is. Especcialy with the brave new world pack.
moonlit_secrets;-;Amazing game when you have all the expansions, you can play without but the game feels a incomplete if you do. The game is at its best when you play multiplayer with people who will stick around until the end. So if you don't have any friends who play then check the community, you won't regret it ;)
GaiDeath;-;A game with countless hours worth of fun. 10/10
Kneeb561;-;I highly recommend this Civilization V game. I have been playing the series since the beginning since 1st Civ in the early 1990's, and this is the most challenging game of the series on many fronts, especially strategy and tactics. If you like strategy type games where you have to think ahead, this is your type of game, and not get your butt kicked by your enemies and other players, at the same time. The graphics are amazing, especially in closeup, and making money vs. losing money is difficult depending on your level of play as well as keeping your citizens happy is also a brain teaser. It is so re-playable, and the mods are killer! Lots of good talent out there in cyberland bringing in good mods! But most of all - Have fun!
The Governor;-;One of my favorite strategy games of all time.
Jack;-;Great game! Immersive content, and very fulfilling. Games last long sometimes, and are really fun if it's a rainy day and you have nothing to do!
Respect;-;Great game to chuck some of your spare time into and reguraly update. 7.5/10
Charlie;-;the unoffical handguide to politics
Doggy7080;-;In Civilization V the game play is simply amazing. It's short, sweet, and simple graphics allows the player to focus on the strategy aspect of the game and not so much the exploring aspect; yet it still allows the player to see beautiful scenery. 5/5
Koodoo25;-;Why wouldn't you want this game?
Lord MoneyBags;-;So long as you have Brave New World and Gods And Kings this game is worth thousands of hours on, each time developing a new strategy to beat your friends (or A.I) with!
Reek;-;This game taught me to hate Gandhi.
Husky Player;-;The Japanese landed at Boston in 1776.
Shannon;-;With every expansion Civilization V became more of a completed game. I did enjoy the original game, however felt it had lost a lot of depth that Civilization IV had. The music is beautiful and is something I really enjoy. (Probably the only soundtrack ever I bought and actually listen to when not playing the game.) Ghandi and Catherine are nightmares at end game... >:(
supertortie;-;Ghandi will burn your cities to dust.
Raymo1;-;It's so damn cool.
Gore Magala;-;U WOT M8 10/10 ULTIMATE GHANDI 360 NOSCOPE
Jape27;-;Civ 5 is a very fun and challenging game. In it, you get to choose a civilization and leader to play as, each with benefits or drawbacks. Your goal is to win, and even though there are 5 possible routes, you can set your own winning criteria with imagination. For example, in every game I play I like to remove kebab remove kebab you are worst turk. you are the turk idiot you are the turk smell. return to croatioa. to our croatia cousins you may come our contry. you may live in the zoo.ahahahaha ,bosnia we will never forgeve you. cetnik rascal  but   turk stink bosnia sqhipere shqipare..turk genocide best day of my life. take a bath of dead turk..ahahahahahBOSNIA WE WILL GET YOU!! do not forget ww2 .albiania we kill the king , albania return to your precious mongolia.hahahahaha idiot turk and bosnian smell so bad..wow i can smell it. REMOVE KEBAB FROM THE PREMISES. you will get caught. russia+usa+croatia+slovak=kill bosniayou will ww2/ tupac alive in serbia, tupac making album of serbia . fast rap tupac serbia. we are rich and have gold now hahahaha ha because of tupac you are ppoor stink turk you live in a hovel hahahaha, you live in a yurt tupac alive numbr one #1 in serbia . the croatia ,..k ashol turks no good i spit? in the mouth eye of ur flag and contry. 2pac aliv and real strong wizard kill all the turk farm aminal with rap magic now we the serba rule .ape of the zoo presidant georg bush fukc the great satan and lay egg this egg hatch and bosnia wa;s born. stupid baby form the eggn give bak our clay we will crush u lik a skull of pig. serbia greattst countrey
bananaking387;-;its REALLY addicting and fun to play with your friends!
thumbmuscles;-;Prepare to lose track of all time. PROTIP: Do not get this if you want to be productive.
Max;-;i just wanted you guys to see my play time =D
Philly1089;-;Great game
ADHFMZ7;-;This is a great game. My friend got it for me about a year ago and since then, ive been hooked. Its the most played game in my library.
Uknowit;-;You start the game, you play for a bit, then you look at the time. Crap. It's been 4 hours but I'm almost done capturing this. 3 hours later. Game is over. If you have a lot of free time on your hands, here's your stimulus.
DwarfKhan;-;Great Game. Hexes are the future.
CyanideCarrot;-;Civilization V is one of the best PC games I can suggest to anyone who asks! It's a massive time consumer but it's deffinetly worth it! I personly own all the DLCs which T received after purchasing the complete edition, and it just creates a whole new gaming experience! so buy this game,I urge you! you will NOT regret it! 5*s 10/10
KingWeir;-;If youre a Civilization fan, then you'll love this! If your not, then its a game about starting out as cavemen and guide your tribe too World Domination, advancing through the ages too the modern times. It's a great game and totally addictive but it does reach the point of being repetitive and with its top down view, don't expect to feel too involved in the world, apart from your first city, the rest will just be zones of influence nothing to get upset about if you lose, just annoyed and determined to get back under your control. Still hours of game play can be lost playing this, shame they didnt get Leonard Nimoy back for the narration again though
Gundamseedop;-;Great strategy game!
SanicFasthog;-;This game destroyed my sleeping schedule....... but within the same day, it fixed my sleeping schedule. 24/10 Would destroy and fix my sleeping schedule again!
ride124;-;more than 580 hours played, enough said...
lab012_25;-;Lots of fun!
Laticus_the_Thylacine;-;I think this game is absolutely wonderful. In my first week of owning it I played 81 hours. However I would highly recommend the complete edition. The base game is lacking in some crucial aspects and has a greatly deminished roster of civs to play as.
Buceh;-;Play it before going to bed for a couple minute and then realize it was 5 in the morning
Special Fried Rice;-;Civilization V Is not as 'advanced' as titles such as Europa Universalis and such. what it is , though, is perhaps the most accesible 'grand' strategy' games on the market.it has tutorials that will ease you into the game quickly, and it manages to be understandable and extremely fun for even people new to the series. the game allows you to play the game how you want- you can make a game short or long depending on the amount of time you want to sink in. and you'll want to sink in. even though i said it is 'dumbed down' compared to paradox interactive titles, there is still a hell of a lot to do , not even counting the two massive expansions, although i think the game does feel less engaging without the expansions, so i'd highly recommend getting them. The inclusion of the steam workshop is a nice touch , but not especially new since civ games since 2 , have always had the option of user created content. when you dive into the game , after picking a map , a civ (43 with all dlc) , and a speed, (there are also advanced options which allow you to tweak game settings and spice up the experience, like a one-city challenge) you'll experience the building of your empire from 4000BC To the future, you'll declare war on other civs, or you might engage in trading , or maybe you'll enact a research agreement so you can unlock rifling (Or whatever else). with the two expansions added, a whole new element of diversity is added as you spread religion and tourism, spy on your enemies (and friends) , ultilitize trade caravans, vote on world issues and advancements in the world congress , and pick your civilization's ideology . each expansion gameplay system grants benefits to the player and deeply increases the fun of the early and middle-late game periods. city states(small civs in short) are included in vanilla and expanded upon in the expansions, which allow you to use them for your economic, militaristic or cultural benefit. honestly , there is so much to do , i could go on for days. do note that the ai and diplomacy is severely better in the expansions, so i would defintely recommend them too. multiplayer is apparently good too , although i haven't played much of that. Civ 5 is hard to sum up in one word. i could write ten articles , but i'll have to settle with 'fantastic'.
Doctor-X;-;As my army stormed the city after deafting it my nation was filled with joy! But the war was only at its start. The army from my enemy took back the city. I lost many great people that day. I then reserched nukes (finnaly) and BLEW UP ALL THE NATIONS! France then won with a science victory. 10/10 would lose to france again
gentle dialection misconception;-;Genghis Khan survived the modern age and discovered nuclear energy
Mr. McCann;-;Well first of all i want to say that this game sucks. 10/10
Uknowit;-;You start the game, you play for a bit, then you look at the time. Crap. It's been 4 hours but I'm almost done capturing this. 3 hours later. Game is over. If you have a lot of free time on your hands, here's your stimulus.
Max;-;i just wanted you guys to see my play time =D
Respect;-;Great game to chuck some of your spare time into and reguraly update. 7.5/10
KingWeir;-;If youre a Civilization fan, then you'll love this! If your not, then its a game about starting out as cavemen and guide your tribe too World Domination, advancing through the ages too the modern times. It's a great game and totally addictive but it does reach the point of being repetitive and with its top down view, don't expect to feel too involved in the world, apart from your first city, the rest will just be zones of influence nothing to get upset about if you lose, just annoyed and determined to get back under your control. Still hours of game play can be lost playing this, shame they didnt get Leonard Nimoy back for the narration again though
CyanideCarrot;-;Civilization V is one of the best PC games I can suggest to anyone who asks! It's a massive time consumer but it's deffinetly worth it! I personly own all the DLCs which T received after purchasing the complete edition, and it just creates a whole new gaming experience! so buy this game,I urge you! you will NOT regret it! 5*s 10/10
darkthing999;-;Best game ever! The gameplay is simple and easy to get into, it's relatively cheap, and you can play with friends.
jjb100;-;Love this game
Dudeman;-;Great game! Its really satisfying going from the early beginning ages to the futuristic ages. Definitely dont start a new game before bed.
Breakfast221;-;Look, if you like 4X strategy and somehow don't yet own Civ V, just have a look at my play time in this game and make of that what you will. If you plan to buy it, though, pick up the Complete Edition, not the vanilla game.
Dexter Morgan;-;1:Became Korea 2:Built Nukes 3:Killed everyone on the planet would r8 8/8
someinterestingname;-;i have never experienced a nuclear holocaust, but i have a feeling it will be accompanied by the incredible sound of queen elizabeth asking if i would be interested in a trade agreement i ing love this game
EST 19XX;-;I couldn't understand all this hype about this game. Then i started winning. BEST.GAME.EVER.
Covalent Buns;-;ITS THE BEST. BESIDES THE FACT THAT IT TAKES A ING YEAR TO BEAT
TheProDynamicGamerDan;-;Civilization 5 is by far the best game in the civilization series and the best game ever made by Sid Meier with a perfect mix of historical and classical civilizations with various famous monarchs and the perfected advance RTS gameplay with the ability to conquer any civilization if you have the skill of course (which louis doesn't lol) Delve into the ancient era which advances every turn and travel through time in this amazing game all the way to the modern era with nukes and X-com soldiers. This game is the perfect mix of history,RTS and is amazing in multiplayer (but don't ever play against sam beware you will get owned) I highly recommend this game and is highly worth the price.
blueflamingo;-;A very deep and complex game, it'll take you at least 100 hours just to learn all the civs, and you never stop playing. Its even more fun with friends
Oceanview;-;I played it a little and I enjoyed it immensly
Dudeman;-;Great game! Its really satisfying going from the early beginning ages to the futuristic ages. Definitely dont start a new game before bed.
BogusLawyer;-;This is a great game 10/10, bought it for 5 bucks and played 150+ hours, worth it
oliverissupercool;-;An amzing example of arguably the best 4x game. Also in my opinion the best ever civ, and one of the best games ever made, beautifully done, in one of my favourite genres.
James;-;Not enough boobs 6 out of 9
Wolfy;-;Hello! Firaxis Games have really made an amazing game here. Yes, the base non-expanded game wasnt all that great, but it had the capacity to be awesome. Which, with the expansions, it did indeed become one of the greatest Turn Based Strategy games out there. Art is great, the tiles and units are stunningly good, and the overlay HUD fits just right with everything else. Mechanics are perfect, with the complete game (Expansions), and when you have a few friends handy. It makes for hours and hours of enjoyment, laughing at how radioactive Ghandi is, planning wars against that one all-powerful nemesis of yours, choosing religions and then proceeding to annoy the heck out of the other religious nations in the game by converting their cities. Its got everything needed for its genre folks, thats why its my most played game in my library. Price for the base game should drop 5 or so dollars maybe, the expansions as well, and the maps could be another dollar less. But the Complete Edition is almost a steal, that could go up to a 60 and still be good. A great recommendation, for both casual and competitive the game will keep you occupied for a long time. A warning though, you must buy the complete edition to really experience the greatness of the game, the base game feels incomplete without the expansions. ~Wolfy
frost_biten;-;This game ruined my life, its the only thing I ever do. I have no friends now. 10/10
Superarf64plusturboCD;-;Very addictive stay away.
STRIKER_Senpai;-;Such Civ, much recomendation, wow 10/10 doge
blfsh3;-;My favorite game of all time.
Lilqueotie ();-;If you like the idea of being Gandhi and commanding a fleet of stealth bombers to roam the world and leave everyone in absolute ruin, they you would like this game. Does take about half a day to finish a game though, so strap in for the slowest but most entertaining ride of your life
Tarek;-;took 40% of the map, was about to kill my friends, but we stopped since we realized that we have been playing it for 9 hours. 10/10
blueflamingo;-;A very deep and complex game, it'll take you at least 100 hours just to learn all the civs, and you never stop playing. Its even more fun with friends
Shanks the Dinosaur;-;Greatest. Turn-based. Game. Ever. Period. Probably. Maybe?
bilbojr28;-;Most additive and replayable game I've tried :SocialPolicy:
Tarek;-;took 40% of the map, was about to kill my friends, but we stopped since we realized that we have been playing it for 9 hours. 10/10
KimJongDan;-;Three words: Never trust Gandhi
Shanks the Dinosaur;-;Greatest. Turn-based. Game. Ever. Period. Probably. Maybe?
SAoS;-;This game is emensly fun especially if you enjoy being a ego maniacle dictator who only names his cities after houses in game of thrones, hell bent on destroying all who oppose you. P.S. Gandhi. You can suck a fat one my friend.
flamingblaze363;-;Good fun game, although i found it got repetitive after a LOOOOOOOOOOONNNGGGG while, and put together, the 2 DLC required for this game (gods and kings/brave new wold) COST MORE THAN THE GAME ITSELF!!! On the other hand, this game is completely addicting. Your missing out if you dont have it.
dlo_merc;-;excellent game from sid meier, civilization V has alot of addons you can get, the random generator never gets old
=SW=Dravaal;-;The premier multiplayer simultaneous turn based game out there. Rich in variety and options. Late game is the only weakness as games may bog down, however the game is still fantastic.
Nolan the Nerd;-;Civilization V requires more skill and statagy than the previous Civilization IV and thus makes it alot more fun to play! New interface and better graphics make it all the better! Civilization V never loses your interest and is easily the best Civilization game in the series yet!
Dank Lenny;-;My Samurais, one of the greatest warriors in history. Struggled with killing a simple spearman 11/10 such realism
flamingblaze363;-;Good fun game, although i found it got repetitive after a LOOOOOOOOOOONNNGGGG while, and put together, the 2 DLC required for this game (gods and kings/brave new wold) COST MORE THAN THE GAME ITSELF!!! On the other hand, this game is completely addicting. Your missing out if you dont have it.
Poots;-;Extremely fun strategy game. Allows you to take control of a civilization and better the world or raise hell in it. The game is good without the expansion packs but with them the game becomes a masterpiece. Every move counts and you have to really think about what you do far in advance. The game itself isn't very user friendly so if you plan to buy it watch a tutorial here https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=F_YeoZeKtjA. Also the game is much better with friends. A must buy for strategy gamers. 9/10 Hope this helps and have fun with the game. :)
Show N Prove;-;This game is one of, if not the best strategy games of all time. If your looking to buy a great strategy game, this is it.
SAoS;-;This game is emensly fun especially if you enjoy being a ego maniacle dictator who only names his cities after houses in game of thrones, hell bent on destroying all who oppose you. P.S. Gandhi. You can suck a fat one my friend.
dlo_merc;-;excellent game from sid meier, civilization V has alot of addons you can get, the random generator never gets old
=SW=Dravaal;-;The premier multiplayer simultaneous turn based game out there. Rich in variety and options. Late game is the only weakness as games may bog down, however the game is still fantastic.
Tomato Broth;-;Its good to be a computer gamer
Covalent Buns;-;ITS THE BEST. BESIDES THE FACT THAT IT TAKES A ING YEAR TO BEAT
Frosty the Snowman;-;Makes me question the decisions in my life that got me here.
Noah;-;This game definitely takes a little time to get used to if you have played a lot of Civ IV but it grows on you quickly A+
Wizzykidd0 (KS:1);-;Addicting...
TqashPKM;-;Amazing game. <3 Plain and simple.
Tnasol;-;I Really love this game.
Antony Lee;-;It's ok.
Deltadog;-;Civ good as ever. I played Civ IV a lot, it is still fun etc. I don't plan to make a huge review, this time i just say: I wish you would be able to hear the language of the countries like in Civ IV Short review: If u like strategy games and a huuuuuuge choice of countries: thats the right game. You can see how your land, your cities are expanding and you are getting mightier after time and how your country develops. Really great to play, it takes some time to get in the gameplay but I would definately recommend it.
Kunt & The Gang;-;This game is amazing! highly recomend it.
Star Fox;-;I want it.
[BFFs]Guardian;-;Just one more turn.
Depressedfish;-;this a great stragic game that is less stressful than most games
The Corsican;-;A great game that combines strategy and history to form one of the most exciting games I have experienced. The replay value is very high, as you will never get the same experience out of Sid Meier's Civilization V twice. Whether you're playing a solo game, or a Domination match against a handful of friends, you will not regret purchasing this game! That being said, I feel obligated to give a small disclaimer: Even if you devote your life and soul to this strategic masterpiece, you will not always win. Especially in multiplayer. You will have times where barbarians are relentlessly attacking your capital until your scientific utopia turns into Detroit with legalized meth. You will have times where you decide to pick a new civ, and realize that the civ you chose is utterly repugnant. You will have times where you are trying your hardest to keep your citizens from starving, rebelling, being unhappy, being enslaved/captured, up until some warmongering brickhouse beats the living daylight out of you and you watch as everything you have spent the last three days building gets completely #rekt. I have now around 250 hours on Civilization V, and to this day I have never won a multiplayer match against my friends (they're much better than I am at this game lol), and Ghandi still nukes my cities while I flee in terror. But I love the feeling of having an army at my command, having multiple options to win a game, having the choice to form alliances or betrayals, and watching your village grow into a oversized metropolis with giant death robots and nuclear missiles. Civ V has an array of difficulties for different play styles, and one of them is sure to suit you. Almost every time I play this game (multiplayer) , I end up getting completely and utterly destroyed, but I would not trade it for the world. Pros: Giant Death Robots Multiple Victories Many different civilizations to play Near-seamless multiplayer Destroying enemy cities Naming your cities hilarious things Researching techs in your order Overall exciting experiences Variation of difficulties Cons: Ghandi is the ultimate war machine and he will not stop until your empire has been reduced the ash and a handful of starving citizens suffering from radiation and burns. If you see Ghandi in your civ game, it's time to wave the white flag. Haha. 11/10 Would Recommend
Greygor;-;Just One More Turn
Arbor Acernis;-;My favourit game to d8! Just got it and already I played for 8 hours! Probaly going to be playing this all summer!
Planetdune;-;Almost as good as the first :)
Senbonzakura;-;civ 5 is the best strategy game of this century
bilbojr28;-;Most additive and replayable game I've tried :SocialPolicy:
Creamy Speakers;-;10/10. Long games, strategy, multiplayer with friends. Great experience all around.
Nemanja!;-;Everything you read about that  Ghand in the reviews before you purchased the game is true, history books are a lie!
The_zrnig;-;Look man im not gonna take a lot of time explaining this game, i only need to say: If you like RTS, or any game that you control a civilization, you gonna like civilization V. Just dont think that its like age of empires, its not. but it's also good in its own way. in civilization you can destroy the romans as the egypt, its awesome. and one last thing. dont think that you have many historical option like Europa Universalis IV. but it's also pretty good.
Krayzen;-;A great competative game to play against your friends! :D
Vigilante Justice;-;A great game that takes a lot of time but is fun the whole way through and has lots of replay value.
Wa11on;-;I've always enjoyed strategy games, but this game has made a lasting first impression.
Krayzen;-;A great competative game to play against your friends! :D
Vigilante Justice;-;A great game that takes a lot of time but is fun the whole way through and has lots of replay value.
Wa11on;-;I've always enjoyed strategy games, but this game has made a lasting first impression.
A Very Pissed Off Bear;-;One of, if not the best game I have ever played. If you enjoy strategic game play with many many decisions, I highly recommend this game for you. While there have been a few bugs, and some still persist, Fireaxis is doing a good job working those out. In the meantime enjoy this awesome game!!
Pansage14;-;This game is the kind of game I love most. A game with a rich singleplayer experience with loads of charm and beauty. As well as the concept of re-writing history with faces you might ot might not recognize. The game also includes a multiplayer, while a bit buggy at times, leads to constant war and laughs along the way. This game also creates stories, stories of your own that you create, such as chasing the Russians and burining every city they placed across the world, or enjoying mods such as the Glorious PC Master Race, or playing the nation of your heritage. I would recommend this to anyone that likes grand strategy and to anyone in general, can you build a civilization that will stand the test of time?
not enough limes;-;best civ yet
Redalive;-;I should have written a review sooner, I have had this game almost some years now and is the 1st game I purchased on my account. I give it to you at the time I spent most of my chore money and my money for candies in order to buy this game and I couldnt have chosen a greater game to start off steam with. This game was technically the only reason why I keep this account alive. :P
jackoneil333;-;Great game
mattybeejelly;-;Fun and addictive. Every time I go to play this game for a few minutes it turns into an 8 hour play session. I thouroughly enjoy this game.
The Code Pro;-;If you have a big group of steam friends that want to play multiplayer, this is the game. It's a turn-based, build your empire game. There are a variaty of map sizes, gamemodes, and victory types. It's entirely beneficial to buy the compleate pack (dlc) because it makes for a way better experience.
404 Life not found;-;Definetly worth the buy! I played it addictively when I first got it and I have never seemed to get tired of it. I will start playing and just cannot stop. The Brave New World DLC is also definetely worth it and playing with friends makes the game even better. I would recomment buying the DLC on sale though. The DLCs add so much more to the game.
Frizzy Frombe;-;Have a full day open when you start-- hard to step away.
StormingVoid;-;This game is absolutely amazing. Graphics, gameplay, personalities of AI, and people insulting your armies. But before you buy it just check how many hours people have and see if you are really ready to delve that deep into Civ V....There's NO turning back... >:) Mwahahaha! Just kidding. Great game and definetly get it! Great job developers!!!!!!!! :)
Average player;-;Why should you buy this? Well there's 2 different things that get a lot of people hooked up 1. You can make your own religion spread it to other civilization you customize the religon yourself name etc. 2 if you like strategy games with nuclear bombs then this is a game for you if you buy the brave new world pack you won't regret it as it as a lot of cool stuff in it such as Trade with cargo ships or carvanas, World congress everyone gets a vote and you'll decide what things you should vote on. I recommend buying the complete pack it's totally worth it. this game get's a 10/10 from me
ITAY THE NUKE BRON;-;JUST.ONE.MORE.TURN...
Koaladotexe;-;Simple and fun, but can be quite challenging.
Tommi-Bruh;-;Simply great! You won't notice the time fly by while playing it! Suddenly it's 6 in the morning, and you're still stuck with the civ mentality. JUST ONE MORE TURN!
FearZ;-;Alright, even though it's a great game and I want to give a really good review, Stay away from Ghandi, at ALL cost.
BigBossG1;-;it's the best strategy game ever
Gimme Chikken;-;It's ok i guess
Daex;-;WOULD YOU BE INTERESTED IN A TRADE AGREEMENT WITH ENGLAND?
rurika;-;3/10 would not waste my life with
insejn;-;Really like the expansions
jakov.pavlek;-;Great game, rich with content and time consuming but worth every hour of game experience. Warning: Only for patient ones.
Serah;-;Very awesome game, great graphics. I can't wait to try civ 5 beyond earth :D
AveryisWeird;-;I'm not even good at games like Civ, but Civ V has me coming back to it again and again because it's just plain fun. I've lost hours upon hours building empires and they've just flown by. One of the most engrossing games you can buy on Steam, but you probably already knew that; it is Civ, after all.
Incognito;-;So addictive its almost a bad thing... almost.
psy^;-;man what an awesome time waster this game is. civilization is one game that will always have a place in my heart, but honesetly nothing has changed dramatically from #1 to this, apart from things like 1 unit per tile, and hexagonal tiles. You still explore, settle, battle, research, strike flaky treaties only to have them broken when you refuse stupid demands, get into century long military stalemates, etc .. It's like the malibu stacy with a new dress. Simpsons fans will get it.
Alex;-;One more turn...
ZA WORUDO;-;The Flagship Turn-Based Strategy Game Returns Become Ruler of the World by establishing and leading a civilization from the dawn of man into the space age: Wage war, conduct diplomacy, discover new technologies, go head-to-head with some of historys greatest leaders and build the most powerful empire the world has ever known. Or you could just nuke everyone. Same thing.
YOAKIMME;-;Let me just say that Sid Meier's Civilization V is a f*cking masterpiece. You read that right, a f*cking masterpiece. When I first started I was like holy sh*t, this thing more complicated than my English class. But then you get the hang of it and you fall in love. Civ is like a drug. But a good drug. You get addicted. You play endlessly for hours. But are you ashamed? No. You're just proud. F*cking proud. Because you had a good time. The first time you take over a city in this game is just...magical. It's like when you lose your virginity to a magnificient lass. I haven't lost my virginity yet but I'm only hoping it'll be half as good as playing civ. It'll have to be extremely good (and I mean extremely good) if it wants to beat playing civ. If you're on the fence on deciding whether to buy civ or not, get our dumbass off of that fence and buy it already. I have spent over 150 hours on it in just a few months and I'm not even a #HARDKORE gamer. Seriously, buy it. That feeling you have of running the greatest empire in the entire world is unparalleled
SirFaZeIlluminati;-;Great game!
finlach;-;Grate game a side from being a masive time vammpier it you do kind of need brave new world if you wount the full esperance then buy brave new world though all in all a grate game.
Angry Priest;-;Nuke your friends! Trade with your enemies! Spread across the globe like a filthy plague! Grade A game, you will come back with glorious stories.
RoyalGuard;-;why not, lets try it...hopefully i get nukes
Zeph;-;This game taught me what it is to be a huge ucker. Before I had this gem of a gem of a gem, I didn't know what it was to be Yoko Ono. Thanks to Sid Flier's Oregon Trail VIII, I can die a happy man. My only quip would be the inventory system, which is unable to be used because there is not one in the game. It took me about five and a half hours to figure out that Civ 5 was not an on-rails shooter.
KondeClassicSonicFan;-;I like this game because you get to destroy Sweden as many times as you want!
Cara Delevingne;-;How about, U just buy it and play it? Really nice game, 15/10 for this game.
Darthmonk867;-;Bison and Cocoa.
Canti;-;If you've played the previous game, you might be a little disappointed to find that various elements have been dumbed down or removed completely. There is no longer any corporation, religion or espionage, diplomacy has been simplified to the point of being almost broken and stealing enemy territory through superior culture output is gone altogether. Also, while only allowing 1 military unit per tile does eliminate the problem in previous games where you had massive stacks of troops that could mow down everything in their path, it does make it very hard to manage a large army during an invasion, and trying to conquer a city that has no land around it is a nightmare since units suffer huge penalties for attacking from water. The last major blow to this compared to the previous game is the number of bugs and crashes. It was severely unpolished at launch and it still isn't totally finished. There is currently still no Pitboss app, even though it has been promised since before launch.
Wag1;-;i would reccomend this game purely because its a good brain thinking stratagy game that really gets you thinking.
Quan (SERVER UP);-;Knowing I had to be in bed within 1 hour, I opened this game. 5 hours later I went to bed and still made it to work on time the next morning. Success. Would recommend if you don't have a life.
sandstorm 2016;-;You can dance, you can jive, having the time of your life See that girl, watch that scene, digging the Dancing Queen Friday night and the lights are low Looking out for the place to go Where they play the right music, getting in the swing You come in to look for a king Anybody could be that guy Night is young and the music's high With a bit of rock music, everything is fine You're in the mood for a dance And when you get the chance... You are the Dancing Queen, young and sweet, only seventeen Dancing Queen, feel the beat from the tambourine You can dance, you can jive, having the time of your life See that girl, watch that scene, digging the Dancing Queen You're a teaser, you turn 'em on Leave them burning and then you're gone Looking out for another, anyone will do You're in the mood for a dance And when you get the chance... You are the Dancing Queen, young and sweet, only seventeen Dancing Queen, feel the beat from the tambourine You can dance, you can jive, having the time of your life See that girl, watch that scene, digging the Dancing Queen
[SWB] Universal_Taco;-;Like snorting crack off of a computer screen
Tankslayer - Fr das Vaterland;-;Never trust Ghandi. That is all.
Randy Orton;-;>Saw reviews about Ghandi being a warlord >Decided to 1v1 him >On hardest difficulty >Got beat in 100 turns 10/10 Would 1v1 Ghandi again
YodaJames;-;Yo yo yo, I ain't thinkin about this, because it is like a butterfly in the sky. I ain't going to commit to the system.
XX_C0UNT_R@YM0ND_XX;-;10/10 lliek cod pros liek cod kill russians gay cons bad its gay liek cod kill russians
[DRM] Xantheas;-;Good game definitely :p You can build a great civilization and destroy others ! Multiplayer mod is extra tooa nd you can play with friends ! If you wanna try your go with me send me a message and I will try to beat you up :)
MikoFiticus;-;It's super fun, especially coming from someone who doesn't like RTS/Strategy games. It's at it's best when you get your friends involved, but I highly recommend getting the complete edition, it's like a whole new game. 10/10
Valiantttt;-;I'd like to start of this review by stating that this was my first civilization game EVER and that I played most of the hours on the Gold edition version(Gods and kings). First off, I find it very good that the game has workshop support since there are neat little scenarios/civilizations/modes on the workshop and modding for PC gaming should always be encouraged+supported since I often see it ignored by major publishers. Graphics are fine for the type of game, it looks very pretty and the art style is good and clear to see what means what. Turnbased gameplay is nice and expected from a civilization game(from what I had heard), even though sometimes it feels very slow but this is mostly in the early game. This isn't a big problem however considering the turns go quickly since the AI doesn't have to make many calculations in that part. Speaking of the AI, sometimes it feels highly irrational and stupid because Diplomacy in CIV5(god and kings) is pretty useless because they will just invade you anyway even if they cannot beat your armies to seemingly just annoy you. However it does provide a good challenge even if it has to archieve that with cheats(I dislike this since AI should be able to beat you by being smart)so that is an issue if you like playing Singleplayer like I do, however multiplayer doesn't always work like it should because of network issues(with people I could normally play MP games with) The complexity of the game could have been better since it does feel like they dumbed it down a bit(I also play alot of grand strategy games from Paradox Interactive that are way more complex and this might have made my judgement a bit biased)considering what I've heard from previous iterations of the game. I do like the removal of doomstacks because that mechanic sounded very broken if I heard about it and CIV5 has a nice wonder system that makes you feel proud when you build one and annoyed when an enemy steals it from you. City states are nice and amusing because sometimes you can supply them with advanced weapons so you can fight a proxy war.
sn /The Fool;-;Insanely good Linux port, fun gameplay and good multiplayer. Just buy it, it's a must-have... Resistance is futile!
Monty Python's Shopping Force;-;The first game i've ever played for 3 hours striaght 10/10
Frank Footer;-;school this is the only history class you need. no this is the only education you will ever need. Relive, recreate, and experience your own historical timelime, roleplay as Germany as ensure that Poland stays down for good or as the one true Korea and do what Kim Jong-un only wishes he can do to the Westerners. 10/10 if this game was dug up 1000 years from now and was the only surviving artifact from our time, it would be treated with the same respect as if the Jewish and Catholic Bibles were combined along with the Qur'an. Sid Meier himself will hunt you down and physically and emotionally hurt you if you don't buy this.
LM^| Tye;-;One minute you think you are gonna hook up with Wu, the next turn she is attacking your lands. 10/10 Would buy Bipolar Simulator again
bugoosenut;-;It is Awesome people should buy it
Cornhole McGee;-;This game is so sick. I have 170+ hours on this game. Its beautilful to see your own civilization grow and it makes you appreciate the finer things like how other rulers can be backstabing s who will let you have pearls for 30 turns for you wine, bannanas, citrus, copper, iron, and 300 gold then to suddenly launch a preemptive strike on Krakow, you most prized city and the wheat capital for all civs. A word of warning for those who I have convinced to get the game, MONTEZUMA DOES NOT WEAR PANTS. When you meet him, tell him Pat sent ya. And if he tells you to settle your cities elsewhere, tell him to put on some pants.
Retarded Hoovy;-;11/10 would nuke gandhi again
Hitlersaurus_Christ;-;I started playing and then suddenly I had a beard and near on a month had passed My house has been condemned The goverment has registered me as missing or dead totally worth it also  Ghandi 11/10
|NMP|dexstardj;-;easiest way to lose 24 hours of your life
Cat Rider;-;different and challenging
Jtloc;-;Super fun game, very easy to lose yourself in it.
BigDik25;-;It is unbelievable how fun this game is, it has you working through the ages to grow and culture an empire to rule the world with.
MrVinny1113;-;nuked houston to defend houston 10/10
Cowardly;-;My friend always builds the Great Library before me. But sometimes I build it first and he asks for a restart. Everytime he gets it I just try to kill him. I team up with the other friend that plays to kill him. We fail. Our empires get nuked. We rage quit. He always wins and keeps playing by himself just to try to capture all our empires. 200 hours go by. 10/10 Would try to build the Great Library again.
Gamerman Jak;-;A great game for lovers of stratagy, Be warned there is no such thing as a 'quick game' so be prepared to invest alot of hours into it. (Oh and be careful of ghandi, if he can nuke you by god he will.)
Stridens Hus;-;If I've wasted 400 hours of my life on this game, you know its good.
NobodyCreator;-;One of my most favorite strategic games. You can play as most of the countries , like for instance you can conquer the world as Gandhi (Yes like in previous games leaders don't die) The music is really nice, it fits everytime. For instance when you are in war with somebody you have 'Hans Zimmer-ish' music and when everything is fine you can hear piano music. Yes the music can become irritating but there are mods AND THERE'S A LOT OF THEM but i'll write about them later. Now-gameplay wise you won't be needing any of hard working, but you can do whole a lot in the actual game. From changing city name to sending spies to other city. Yes, in mid-game you can unlock spies and send them to other countries either as diplomats or spies. It's always fun to see those country leaders react to you eather you trade with them, start war or befriend they always talk in their native language. Now DLC... It's useless if there won't be leaders as DLC because story isn't the most hardest thing. DLC's contain few leaders and boring stories + maps. Graphics are highly good, just look at the water! And the last but not least MODS! You can do a lot of thing from "smartening" AI to playing as Arsotzka(Papers please) And since steam workshops supports Civilization its easier now. The price is okay for this game. And so with those words i end my review here.
8th Lt. Col Matt Novosad;-;This game is an excellent upgrade from Civilization IV. They removed the SuperStacks of soldiers and limited it to one type of unit per tile and that is a major improvement. The base civilizations are varied and some are from more hidden parts of History, which is a nice change of pace. The new tile design of hexagons is also a nice change, helping with a strategy change. However, one of my gripes are the achievements. You get them by just playing the game. Eliminate another civ, upgrade a unit, find ruins, etc... Even though they have no gameplay impact it is offputting to see supposed "achievements" in the grand scheme of Human Achievement those may be, but in this sort of game setting they are not applicable. Overall, a great upgrade from Civ IV that gets rid of the unnessecary while keeping the fundamentals intact.
Morse;-;Civilization V is probably the best balance of in depth customization mixed with easy accessablility. It can be as hard as you want it to be, or it can be very easy to allow you to learn the mechanics. I've played through a few games, and I'm very impressed with the way this game feels and plays. I know when it comes to civilization games, nostalgia runs wild and everyone always thinks the older ones are superior. But I honestly think, combined with at least the gods and kings expasion, this is the best Civilization game to date. If you're interested in this game, you have to at least get the gold edition. This game feels pretty incomplete without the gods and kings expansion, but with it, it feels perfect. I haven't gotten Brave New World, but I hear it is amazing. Anyway, Civilization V is highly recommended by me, and should be picked up by any strategy/civilization fan.
roostapro;-;If I had to rate "Civilization V" I would give it a 4/5. Very addictive game, you will spend countless hours playing this game and lose track of time. (I once played this game from 4pm to around 6 or 7am...needless to say I slept for 48 hours.) I have only played the base game, or vanilla game (Just "Civilization V and no expansions") so I am pretty sure once you get the expansions as well you will lose more hours having fun (I have also heard good things about "Brave New World" and plan on buying it in the future.) It is true though, that this game holds your hand throughout the game compared to previous Civilizations games, but it doesn't stop you from playing the game. The controls and the UI: - The controls for movement, attack, defend and general scrolling are spot on and easy to use with a great feel towards them. - The UI (User Interface) however is somewhat complex and scattered throughout your screen rather messily, it will take some time to get to know the UI but once you figure it out you will stroll right through it. Gameplay and general: - The "leaders" of the civilizations when in the negotiating screen are just simply amazing to look at, great detail has went into them....the problem with this though is that you will get fed up looking at them from time to time and just end up declaring war on them...just because you can. - "Advisors" in the game are supposed to advise you in what to do next...However...they are completly useless and their advise is rubbish... never trust an advisor, they plan to take over. - AI (Aritificial Intelligence) are somewhat dumb at times, I played a single player game on the hardest difficulty (Deity) and within 2 turns of starting the game, every single civilization declared war on me and within 3 turns destroyed me with triple the amount of units I was able to put out. I tried again, this time Germany and japan declared war on me before the end of my first turn...heh. - "City states" are states that you can trade with or annex/raze, the easiest thng to do with them is to Annex them as after a certain amount of time they tend to get annoying.. but don't capture many of them as they will all become in a permanent state of war with you (But oddly enough hardly ever attack you) - When starting a game, it has alot of options to choose from, and can greatly enhance the experience. - Steam "Workshop" is the best addition to the game...the mods are glorious, the community is glorious, everything is glorious. the sheer amount of mods available is just mind-boggling. Overall: Overall, if I had to rate this game I would give it a 4 out of 5 stars, the sheer enjoyment I got from it is amazing (even though I've only played it for 30 hours, I want to play it more but got other stuff to do as well). I can't rate the multiplayer aspect of this game as I am too "Scared" to get my noobiness owned :) buy it, it is worth it!!!
Kalroth;-;I'll let my 4-digit hours logged speak for themselves.
Gabe;-;So culture Very strategy Wow
Muthuman;-;Briiliant gameplay. A significant improvement from Civilization IV.
MationMac;-;It's a very civilized game.
-IzL-Shark;-;Fantastic game, so many civs you can play as. If you love strategy games then you'll love this one. It's great on it's own but even better with the dlc's. It requires skill, patience and determination as there's many ways to win e.g. domination, culture, science etc.. I highly recommend it.
M00nsp3ll;-;softcore grand strategy, adequate amount of options and gameplay elements to keep you interested, extremely active community and a learning curve that WILL NOT leave you hunging, never overwhelms with info or anything like that. recommended for new players and "veterans" alike 4/5.
Witchking;-;Addicting Game that will get you playing for Hours, dont let the graphics fool you although its not much the gameplay hooks you up into a whole new level
I AM NEVER LAG;-;IT IS LIKE CRACK COCAINE TO ME!
TaB;-;Do not buy before any period of strenuous academic testing.
TaB;-;Do not buy before any period of strenuous academic testing.
Hierachy;-;Great game - buy the DLCs though, they are worth it.
Bifex;-;Como um grande f de jogos de estratgia, eu afirmo sem dvidas que civilization atingiu o pice do gnero nesta verso do game. Recomendo  todos que gostam de pensar e desenvolver estratgias, pois possui quase infinitas possiblidades e mundos diferentes. As a big fan of strategy games, i can say that this game goes further than any other game from this genre. I recommend to all people who like to think about new strategies, because it have like infinite ways to play, possibilities and worlds.
Chairman Kaga;-;Sid Meier's Civilisation V has been said to be more crippling to one's life than a heavy heroin addiction, and I think this could not be more true! The game causes arguments between friends, because, like the Nigerian child slavery business, it is highly competitive, but also fun for all ages 10+. I know my wife left me after I beat her, as a result of her winning a science victory when I was one turn away, ONE ING TURN!!!! . This game can be played alone, or with friends, but I only play alone. The best civilisation is the USA civilisation. When they enter the industrial era, you can use your "McDonalds Farming in Africa" ability to cripple other civilisations such as Ethiopia, with a secondary obesity disadvantage to other 'First-World' civilisations. The one weakness of the American civilisation is only available to exploit after the construction of the monument 'The Twin Towers'. (     ) My other favorite civillisation is the Japanese civilisation. Their special ability is the '' or 'Kamikaze' ability, which destroys your unit in a fiery blaze of glory, while dealing an immense amount of damage to the enemy western devils. My least favorite cilvisation is the Aztec civilisation, because their leader, 'Montecarlo' always decides to attack me, even when I have the stronger army, and while everyone else has firearms, the Aztecs are stuck in leopard suits, using what seems to be a rudimentray scarecrow as a weapon. ING CROWS STEALING MY MAIZE. The game has added many interesting features, such as religion, economics, science...*yawn* Basically Sid has mocked me by introducing every subject I failed dismally at school into the game as some sort of 'message', yeah well... well...  YOU SID. You can found one of 8 different religions, each as tedious as the next! And the science tree isn't much better, in fact its actually quite revealing about the sick minds of the developers. For example, one of the first techs you require is 'Animal Husbandry'. Yes, thats right folks! And if you thought besitality was abhorrent, you will be disgusted to know the game also includes quotes from George Bush Jr. All in all, much like a heroin addict is to heroin, you will find this game addictive and draining, enjoyable to an almost euphoric level, and you won't be able to quit buying more. (ing Sid and his never ending DLC, I mean, the game came out in 2010 for s sake, and they're still milking the market.) 220/214 (OH YISS GOLDEN AGE MOTHER ER)
DDevils.Tensaleader;-;This game is a lot of fun especialy if you have freinds but even as a single player expirence it is very fun and i would recomend it however the peformance is not a amzing but not unplayable.
MF;-;One of the best Strategy games i have ever played
The Defender of Christ;-;You need to have a heavy pair of cujones to handle this game. Fortunately for me, the good lord has blessed me with said pair.
Yifb;-;IF YOU DONT LIKE THIS GAME YOUR SCUM
PurpleSnot;-;This is as good as grandmother's compotts mixed with goat's cheese
Axis;-;Pretty solid game - definitely the best in this genre to date. DLCs are a must buy, especially for multiplayer, so expect to buy the complete edition. Overall a really great game to play while watching TV or drinking heavily.
TiTiWiNiPiTi;-;Good Gameplay, Like This game, i more like AGe Of Empires, but this one is Good tooooo.......................... 9.5/10 RECOMMENDED
MattDar;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is an excellent strategy game for gamers of all ages. It is well-made and entertaining. I would give this masterpiece five stars out of a maximum of five stars.
FnH Bloodshot;-;Civilization V projects a sense of quality that few 4X games can match. That's not to say that the game play is perfect, or there aren't minor issues to solve, however the quality of the game itself is unmatched in the current market. The UI is crisp and intuitive (a pitfall of many 4X games), the menus are clear and precise, and the overall feel of the game is wonderful. The only real complaint that I have is regarding the AI. On higher difficulties, the AI is simply given absurd bonuses of gold and happiness modifies to make them more of a threat. Non-combat victories become extremely more difficult to attain than combat victories (however to be fair, this is a rational process in some ways, and the latest expansion did help with that aspect). Once your borders are touching an AI civ, it's generally going to end in them declaring war on you. However, as far as 4X games though, this is absolutely worth a try.
Emerahl;-;Brave New World makes this incredible!
kpaykev;-;This is a must buy
Custo;-;The best friendship ruiner ever.
Yakuky;-;The best strategy game after Civilization
Bojack Horseman;-;God dang it Japan, that country ain't right.
Amerusi;-;Although this game is 30 dollars, it is very much worth it. Just 1 game and you'll have 160+ hours on record! Hell look at my hours, and thats not even HALF of 1 game. Note: DO NOT PLAY THIS UNLESS YOU HAVE 9-14 HOURS TO SIT ON UR PC STRAIGHT.
tevrikkk;-;I REACHED THE GOLDEN AGE MOTHRERS! 10/10
shadow onion;-;This game is a game for a stragist - it is a adaptive game in which anything you do can change the out come of the game and in my oppinion has been well designed to challange the user
* N0B0dy #rip;-;I got addicted to it
Caladbolg;-;I love this game!
Kernal Chickun Fryd Mc Sanders;-;its a great game till gandhi gets a nuke so make sure hes gondhi before he can do manhattan
Sir Pinkleton;-;I played a lot of Civilization 4 back in the day with my brother and went into this one kind of expecting the same thing, big mistake. - They've streamlined some of the annoying things like limiting your resources instead of having unlimited supplies. - They've improved the combat side by removing the stacking of units on a single tile and steam rolling over everything - They've also removed the need to build transports for continent naval invasion which for me is a major plus point. The downside however: - With the streamlining process is the lack of control over the finer details. - You can't select all your cities on the same content to mass produce units or buildings anymore. - You can't pull up a chart summarizing all the nations power or overall growth. Overall it is definitely a step in right direction but it lost a lot useful things along the way. 8/10
Vaagur;-;Civilization games are brilliant. I've played the second, the third and now the fifth. I liked every single ones of them. They bring a very enjoyable turn by turn experience, which makes it so you can think as long as you wish before you do an action allowing you to think deeply about your next move. I still do not fully understand Civilization, but I like it. There's alot of civilizations and leaders to play around with. You can also play however you prefer, via the strategic view or the normal one. If you're looking for a turn by turn strategy game and you haven't played Civilization games, try ANY of them or watch gameplays, you won't regret it, they're popular and addicting!
James Avery;-;THIS? THIS IS A ING PUDDING MATE!!
Alex;-;One more turn...
mysto;-;i dont know how to play it and i still win
adeigosmith;-;The best game, cant wait for Beyond Earth!
[sKs];-;A nice game all you need is one more turn addict!!
robotakid;-;Very fun game to play with or against your friends! Totally worth it
amaleplatypus;-;The first time I played as Japan they demanded whales and I couldn't stop laughing. 10/10
Ruyan Gusleng;-;this is good game
Caladbolg;-;I love this game!
Kernal Chickun Fryd Mc Sanders;-;its a great game till gandhi gets a nuke so make sure hes gondhi before he can do manhattan
Retarded Hoovy;-;11/10 would nuke gandhi again
Hitlersaurus_Christ;-;I started playing and then suddenly I had a beard and near on a month had passed My house has been condemned The goverment has registered me as missing or dead totally worth it also  Ghandi 11/10
LM^| Tye;-;One minute you think you are gonna hook up with Wu, the next turn she is attacking your lands. 10/10 Would buy Bipolar Simulator again
[SWB] Universal_Taco;-;Like snorting crack off of a computer screen
Tankslayer - Fr das Vaterland;-;Never trust Ghandi. That is all.
Randy Orton;-;>Saw reviews about Ghandi being a warlord >Decided to 1v1 him >On hardest difficulty >Got beat in 100 turns 10/10 Would 1v1 Ghandi again
epicp0tato;-;Insanely addictive, and great for newcomers to the Civilization series and to 4X games in general.
jewelshadow;-;Great turn-based strategy game with beautiful graphics and tons of neat DLCs. If your computer has the power to run this, I would highly recommend it.
adeitz;-;A game about growing cities and giant people and animals that protect them. Gandhi nukes/10
Infuro;-;civ is good
Oxenfloater;-;10/10 would nuke my friends again
Chazahar;-;Like sometimes ytou have to  all over georgew washington but then aids appens and elizabth destroys u
widdiful;-;in this video game sid myers civ 5 you take control of a country of your choosing which, if you'r not a baka gaijin, would be the glorious nation of nippon ((tahts japan for u stupid foreighner)) to defeat the horrible western country called "america" for not understanding the medium of anime which, as i have said 10 oku times, is totally different from your'e stupid childish idiot cartoon!!!! this game is a lot of fun and reminds me somehat of japans' own fire emblem video game series but they forgot the most important part of the japanese culture,, anime!!,, the developers (square enix?) have thankfully added the map of japan as a playable stage which is glorious and also the only map i ever play.. this game is fairly old but the developers (atlus?) added many epic expansions such as the gods and kings expansion which is by far the best as it adds religion and the greatest religion there is!! shinto!! straight from japan!! you can also make your own religions and spread it to other countries and they will, if they understand ANYTHING, accept shinto as their one true religion and then u win the game because uh beliefing in shinto is winning in real life as im shore a smart fellow such as youreself can undersand! i will give this game a full 10/10 for its love for japan, but take that down to a 9 as i cant call my cities  so i just call it tky or east capital instead. buy this game. this is lewis-dono signing out!!!
americ anfootball;-;If you're a fan of this genre of games, Civ 5 is for you. This game really isn't advised for people who like fast paced games, as even on the "quick" mode, matches still tend to last hours. It's still really fun though, going from a small city to a huge empire spanning the entire map. If you have friends to play this game with, you really should do that, as I've played games with a group of friends for hours and we have had a blast. 6/10 bretty good
Sverker;-;nukes and sweden make this game a 10/10 260 noscope must buy, but since denmark is in this game i give this game a 2/10 there are mods that removes denmark from the game, i highly recommend playing with those mods as it makes the game 3000% better.
Pie;-;10/10 would bang
Pie;-;10/10 would bang
ross;-;This.
tiprulez;-;Fun and deep game, endless gameplay and lots of customizable options.
Toynbee;-;Great sitdown in a cafe or rainy day game, It can be casual or can be a full war, and the game gives you a lot of space to choose how you want to play.
Trollkarlen;-;Its a realy fun turnbased strategy game, realy fun to play with 1-3 friends
Pietro II Orseolo;-;I modded this game and destroyed the vanilla version. 0/10 no multiplayer mod support.
Hollowsong;-;Surpassing 250+ hours and counting, Civ V is and will continue to be the greatest strategy game of all time. Nothing I've ever come across can top the attention to detail, the vast number of playable nations, or the replayability of Civilization V and I've played a LOT of strategy games. There's a reason this is #1 on my Steam list for games played. It's outstanding.
Cirkus93;-;this game is terrific and fun to play with friends
Tomzini;-;Brilliant game - one of them games I do not quit ;)
Buggy the Clown;-;If you want to be manly and own one of the most sexy, realistic and educational (no one cares about that) stategy game evvvvvvvvvvverrrrrrrrrrrrrrrr!!!!!!!!! Then don't get Age of Empires get Sid Meiers Civilization 5. Warning! Game is only fun with gods and kings and brave new worlds, I recomend you stay away from babylon because they are the most OP Civ in the game this game cannot protect from doing homework it does the exact opposite of that we are not responsible of friend loss or any finger loss Sid Meier not included
cr;-;This game is super addicting, it's enormous fun. With the Steam Workshop, hundreds of custom content are at your fingertips to control.
GEMINI;-;This is definitely the most strategical game I've ever played. I lost the very first time I played (I "retired") because I went my gold count went negative and someone declared war on me lol! This game is so much fun and very realistic/logical in my opinion. There are an endless number of paths to take to make your civilization the best civilization in its time, or make it crumble to pieces like mine did ^_^ Even thoough the game may be found to be very challenging, there are several different modes to choose from starting from the easiest of easy. The sound tracks are very good and goes perfect with the type of game it is. There is so much to do on this game and it's so addicting! There are a couple of things though that I wish this game had. I wish it had a better tutorial throughout the game. Some of the "tips" can be a bit confusing. However, I am glad there there is a "civilopedia" in which several terms in the game are clearly defined. My tip to you is to make sure that your first city is founded in a place that promises a good amount of resources and gold. Although I was gifted this game :3 I would definitely recommend buying this game, even buying it for full price. 9.5/10
YamoShaggedYerNan;-;One time I pee'd in someones pool while standing on the outside of it. Good game.
SirFaZeIlluminati;-;Great game!
Emperor Dge the Great;-;One of the best strategy games i've ever played, its amazingly quite easy to learn, but still has alot to offer past that, I would reccomend this game to anyone who has played strategy, and who has not, because of the game's ability to teach you fast and suck you in.
Legionaire Mika-Chan;-;soooo addicting, one of the best games :D
TommyT;-;Very fun game for when your bored. Definitly recomended.
Machinae;-;ing great.
Owari;-;my favorite strategy game of all times! my first civ was Sid meier's Civilization Revolution on Xbox, it was just awsome!
Uncle Dan #RipJulesBianchi;-;Here's the concept - You get to be the english empire(other inferior civilizations are available) and take over EVERY other civilization in the world. Also, sometimes you get to have what can losely be called a "war" with the French. This is a must have game, it is genuinely fun with friends and even singleplayer.
holda005;-;Sic game blud. Terrible to play with friends as it takes forever to finish as people always leave. LIKE JOE. YEAH THANKS A BUNCH JOE.
Scarlet of Communism, Jpandaxx~;-;I just created Mulan's alternate ending playing as the Huns. Can't make a man outta you anymore.
SoloMan;-;Just. One. More. Turn.
UKSPARKSMAN;-;if you look closely the V in fact is not a roman numerial, it actually spells out Virginity
Dolly Cat;-;diz gam is like 10.5/10 rly well developed gam wp rito wp
Yossele Rosenblatt;-;Destroy any sympathetic/peaceful bone in your body with Sid Meier's War Simulator V (now with real extinct languages!)
Joe;-;This game is so good, the damn Greeks... too friendly with everyone. I can't invade anywhere without starting a war with them. 10/10 Would play again.
Troy;-;Great game
Wolfgang;-;Great strategy game wether you're playing against friends or AI always learn something new, 10/10
Bear Link;-;This game is one of the best strategy games out there right now, and that's saying something. This is definitely the best gateway into strategy games you can find and it is well worth it. ESSPECIALLY if you have both expansions. The game changes so much even in asthetics between Gods and Kings and Brave New World. BNW definitely completes the game, and I find it only in very specific situations that I play a game without it. Once you get used to the system, I promise you you'll find out what civs you want to always ally or always destroy for personal achievement and not just the sake of progress. Definitely a must-have strategy game.
Zelus;-;this is good
sam;-;Best game ever, the ultimate game to play with 2-infinity friends, although you NEED TO BUY THE DLC in order for the game to really shine.
The Retarted Flu!;-;I'm actually gay.
sparrow-kun;-;iz gud gaim, but costs lots of money money cash to buy all dlc for best x-perience
DADDYF4TS4K;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V please let me sleep! This game is fantastic, i can't stop playing from late evening till 6 am. The game pulls you into a timeless zone, where 8 hours feels like 2. Great replay-ability, super fun game, can't stop playing it. Say goodbye too your social life! 10/10 would play till early morning again.
mdunek;-;Watch out, this is addictive as hell. People be talk bout turns like cigs, always "Just one more..." then they dead.
Bit__Nothing;-;Awsome!
onfire55;-;I really like this game!
Dream;-;i fap to this
Popcorp;-;One of the Best strategy, Turn-Based games i've ever played, but the thing about this game is that it becomes REALLY interesting when you buy 2 DLCs, which are Gods and Kings and Brave New World, without them game looks kinda "Unfinished". But overall: No DLCs - 7/10 With 2 DLCs - 10/10 Would recommend!
Dad;-;Much play, so amaze, very wow.
Blessed thelstan;-;One more turn....One more....another!.....just one more!......please help!......one....more...turn...
Loli John Cena;-;India is op pls nerf
Howz;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a Grand Strategy game that uses a hex based tile system, in basic terms its at heart a really huge board game. The player builds his civilization starting with a single settler and a warrior, builds his capital city and continues to create his own religion(gods and Kings), amass great armies and even construct wonders. CIv 5s gameplay is somewhat simpler to first pick up than its roots and this gives new players a fairly easy time playing it,along with rewarding long time players for their time from a deeper complex metagame. Single player games will last anything from 5 to well literally hundreds of hours every playthrough offering a pretty unique experience. The game also offers a large choice of well balanced civilisations to choose from and also a huge selection of unique maps of many sizes. When this is combined with steamworks modding community the possibilities are close to infinite, from Lord of the rings style maps to mass effect. The games Graphics are clear and well optimised, the game giving you the option to play in Dx9,10,11 and even a windows 8 touch enabled mode. The game also feature an 2D overview mode if the 3D interface becomes too complex.The soundtrack is epic and in those long LONG games it keeps you immersed and it has enough variety that repetition is rarely noticed. The online of Civ5 is really where it shines, although the occasional network bug will desync the game, the majority of the time if your connection is stable you will have a great multiplayer experience. With the Brave new worlds expansion There is now three multiplayer modes to choose from: Standard, Hot Seat and Pit Boss. Hotseat is the most unique of these allowing multiple people to play a game on one machine offline taking turns to play. Pit Boss uses a dedicated server to host the game for those long term games. The games standard mode also features both Lan and online play. A fantastic Grand Strategy game, Be prepared to burn 100's of hours playing games with your friends that you will likely never get to the end of and will keep you entertained with its depth and creativity, its a must have pc title.
Uncle Apsod;-;Yeah, its good.
Nobody;-;this game ruined my life... One.More.Turn. 10/10
John;-;Best strategy game ever i can't stop playing i love it that much because i bought it from retail in box(after 5 years) is my first game in box which is strategy based-game.
Ganjasaurus X;-;Great game!
Zero;-;This game provides hours of multiplayer fun. The computers are kind of annoying and they blatantly cheat at times, which can be frustrating, but for the most part it's a good experience.
inq_techPriest;-;"Crush your enemies. See them driven before you. And hear the lamentation of their women." - Anne Frank
Asapp;-;7/10 It's an okay game. However the game itself has lag and can cause issue during your gameplay, where you'll need to relaunch the game. It has it's bugs for sure. I like strategy games, but the AI need some work and so does the bugs and lag. It's an okay game to play when you're bored.
Aomine Daiki;-;I really like this game D:
SH;-;8PM: I just want try to play; 3AM: What? Is it too late?Oh doesn`t matter let`s keep playing.
EnvyThePhoenix;-;I play this too much...
Bill Clinton;-;so much fun with friends
Baron Zenn;-;Gandhi threatend to nuke me if i didn't recommend this game
C:\Users\LuKah;-;- takes someones worker thats right next to my border at 1600 BC - said person declares war and denounces me then takes out one of my cities - its now 2000 AD - Still at war because of a worker 11/10
Hazy;-;1. You meet Gandhi as you find Uranium shortly after 2. You both become allies after his struggle for food in his civilization 3. Gandhi starts to look suspicious after the local uranium is mined 4. Your halfway through to building your spaceship 5. Gandhi suddenly allies with someone else 6. Gandhi betrays you and declares war 7. You create nukes to nuke him but your realise he has already made nukes 8. Gandhi Nukes your Civlization and every other leader 9. You regret meeting Gandhi 10. Gandhi wins the game by finishing his spaceship and sending it to space 11. You tableflip and throw your PC out the window. 10/10 Would get nuked and rage again.
WolfBane von Lichtenstein;-;Got nuked by ghandi when I was still in the ancient era. 10/10
FaZe AJMaster514;-;Doesn't meet France the whole game and then they declare war on me. 10/10 Would play again.
inahut;-;infinite replayability. interested and worthy modding community. i have now 5 core mods that tend to recreate the newness of the game play after thousands of hours of playtime. also the free maps mad by modders expand the possibilities again beyond the generic game in what seems like an endless parade of newness. extensive forum help in and outside of steam is always at hand. steam dependability is itself a great thing. a great strategy game. to me it is my favorite after a long time playing older non-"civ" strategy titles such as empire earth, and rise of nations (ah, RON in it's day!). if you have a robust pc to play with the visuals and animations are very enjoyable. transition times can be tedious late in game, and one can linger long into the next morning without realizing it because one more turn always begs for one more turn.
Seor David Moyes;-;This is the quintessential game for your ruler in the making. With many different civilizations to choose from, each with their own special abilities you're able to take your civ from it's birth to ruling the world. Also, Ghandi is a .
Megaton;-;Amazing game imo, but only fun for people who are patient and enjoy long strategy games
NevetS;-;One of the best games i have ever bought!
Test 123;-;Very good game, highly recommend, but only if you're going to play in a group of 4+ people. Single player gets very repetitive and boring, but in a group of friends, it can get competitive and will last for hours. Graphics aren't bad, and the view/ controls are simple but more than enough for what you need to do!
YOAKIMME;-;Let me just say that Sid Meier's Civilization V is a f*cking masterpiece. You read that right, a f*cking masterpiece. When I first started I was like holy sh*t, this thing more complicated than my English class. But then you get the hang of it and you fall in love. Civ is like a drug. But a good drug. You get addicted. You play endlessly for hours. But are you ashamed? No. You're just proud. F*cking proud. Because you had a good time. The first time you take over a city in this game is just...magical. It's like when you lose your virginity to a magnificient lass. I haven't lost my virginity yet but I'm only hoping it'll be half as good as playing civ. It'll have to be extremely good (and I mean extremely good) if it wants to beat playing civ. If you're on the fence on deciding whether to buy civ or not, get our dumbass off of that fence and buy it already. I have spent over 150 hours on it in just a few months and I'm not even a #HARDKORE gamer. Seriously, buy it. That feeling you have of running the greatest empire in the entire world is unparalleled
Ze;-;This is where Strategy, tactics and the power of your mind comes into actionm this breathtaking new addtion to the series is the best, most powerful and well done game to hit the PC yet, also reccomend the Civ Revoultion along with teh spectacular new DLC gods and kings which starts to bring a whole new aspect of endurance reations and quick thinking into your own world, your own hero, you are the leader of the revoultion of strategy gaming at its best...
ZA WORUDO;-;The Flagship Turn-Based Strategy Game Returns Become Ruler of the World by establishing and leading a civilization from the dawn of man into the space age: Wage war, conduct diplomacy, discover new technologies, go head-to-head with some of historys greatest leaders and build the most powerful empire the world has ever known. Or you could just nuke everyone. Same thing.
money.;-;Being the fifth in the series, there could be some people that say it's on its last legs. They're wrong. Not only does this game have addicting game elements, from a game design standpoint, its phenomenal. The hexagon grid style is perfect for this type of game, and the jump from the fourth is outrageous. New players can easily get into this game, as it has a plethora of game options to make it unique for the player's skill level. The game uses the concept of technology trees, which means in order to obtain this ability, you must obtain this, in which to obtain this you must research this, etc. There are also time options for how long you want the game to last. Playing a game on quick makes it pretty fast and takes a small amount of turns to complete. Epic on the other hand invloves an all in commitment and I have competeted one epic game, which was possibly the best game of Civilization V I've played... for now. This game also has Steam Workshop, which adds new civilizations and areas. But along with pros, there are cons. Something that I must say is the worst is the way the workers work. They occasionally just stop doing whatever when you set them on automated, and then next thing you know they get captured during a war. Absolutely ridiculous. Another thing is the amount of DLC for the game, it's outrageous, but the Gods and Kings DLC is probably the best, but these could have been just updates for free and I would still love it. Do I recommend it? Absolutely. 9/10, Sucks a lot of time, but it's totally worth it to see the Roman Empire take over the earth.
Deputy Bentley;-;Berry gud
Everybody Doots;-;Fantastic, This game has taken up so much of my life and I love it. 10/10 stars would play again. #HiawathaRocksMySocks
Monkk;-;Good fun for all the family, bar Flow.
ErotiCFluffY;-;. / A must play for the fans of Turn Based Strategy games.
Stevie CockMans;-;A very good game.
Nux;-;Great game, hours of enjoyment :)
KondeClassicSonicFan;-;I like this game because you get to destroy Sweden as many times as you want!
Cara Delevingne;-;How about, U just buy it and play it? Really nice game, 15/10 for this game.
Frank Footer;-;school this is the only history class you need. no this is the only education you will ever need. Relive, recreate, and experience your own historical timelime, roleplay as Germany as ensure that Poland stays down for good or as the one true Korea and do what Kim Jong-un only wishes he can do to the Westerners. 10/10 if this game was dug up 1000 years from now and was the only surviving artifact from our time, it would be treated with the same respect as if the Jewish and Catholic Bibles were combined along with the Qur'an. Sid Meier himself will hunt you down and physically and emotionally hurt you if you don't buy this.
sn /The Fool;-;Insanely good Linux port, fun gameplay and good multiplayer. Just buy it, it's a must-have... Resistance is futile!
Monty Python's Shopping Force;-;The first game i've ever played for 3 hours striaght 10/10
MikoFiticus;-;It's super fun, especially coming from someone who doesn't like RTS/Strategy games. It's at it's best when you get your friends involved, but I highly recommend getting the complete edition, it's like a whole new game. 10/10
Valiantttt;-;I'd like to start of this review by stating that this was my first civilization game EVER and that I played most of the hours on the Gold edition version(Gods and kings). First off, I find it very good that the game has workshop support since there are neat little scenarios/civilizations/modes on the workshop and modding for PC gaming should always be encouraged+supported since I often see it ignored by major publishers. Graphics are fine for the type of game, it looks very pretty and the art style is good and clear to see what means what. Turnbased gameplay is nice and expected from a civilization game(from what I had heard), even though sometimes it feels very slow but this is mostly in the early game. This isn't a big problem however considering the turns go quickly since the AI doesn't have to make many calculations in that part. Speaking of the AI, sometimes it feels highly irrational and stupid because Diplomacy in CIV5(god and kings) is pretty useless because they will just invade you anyway even if they cannot beat your armies to seemingly just annoy you. However it does provide a good challenge even if it has to archieve that with cheats(I dislike this since AI should be able to beat you by being smart)so that is an issue if you like playing Singleplayer like I do, however multiplayer doesn't always work like it should because of network issues(with people I could normally play MP games with) The complexity of the game could have been better since it does feel like they dumbed it down a bit(I also play alot of grand strategy games from Paradox Interactive that are way more complex and this might have made my judgement a bit biased)considering what I've heard from previous iterations of the game. I do like the removal of doomstacks because that mechanic sounded very broken if I heard about it and CIV5 has a nice wonder system that makes you feel proud when you build one and annoyed when an enemy steals it from you. City states are nice and amusing because sometimes you can supply them with advanced weapons so you can fight a proxy war.
Uncle Apsod;-;Yeah, its good.
Road To Silver 1;-;ONE OF THE BEST GAMES OF ALL TIME
Franzmeister;-;I have played this game since it's been out, and I think its one of the best on steam!
mjd;-;Very good game, i love it! 47hours played this, very nice!
fuubian #CS:GO;-;This game changed my life.
Liszt;-;My Iroquois nation, 2000 years in, gets swallowed by a radicalist, nuclear-war seaking Gahndi. 10/10
Killermuffin;-;Ghandi declared war on me and I lost the game. 11/10 would get nuked again.
Road To Silver 1;-;ONE OF THE BEST GAMES OF ALL TIME
Hitler the grand dragon of WBC;-;you gumby. Obama can eat my  -1 out of 10. Make Civ 5 what the  is V? Illiunati approved this game
Hitler the grand dragon of WBC;-;you gumby. Obama can eat my  -1 out of 10. Make Civ 5 what the  is V? Illiunati approved this game
Domhnall of Zena;-;A really great game. Take control of your favorite civilization and compete against others for victory. Amazing multiplayer experience, truly fun to play with friends. I seriously recommend at least the gold edition, as the vanilla game isn't quite good compared to what it is now with all the expansions and DLC. It also goes on sale often, and I think that for the price you pay when it is on sale, it's an experience that cannot be overlooked.
VagueRidge -TPF-;-;"Sir the Civlization V community is too strong, may i recommend we give in and purchase this game" Military advisor "Our game is producing 19.99 with our  copies of the game, now thats efficiency!" Science advisor "consider what our customers might be planning, but not too much. If you did i wouldn't have a job!" Foreign advisor "We are making money! Our current greatest expense is redistributing the game to customers, consider producing more DLC's for our customers if you want to turn an even greater profit" Economic advisor
Casper;-;Very good game, much reccomend, much fun, wow
johnny62798173919918487194888396;-;Played on settler and nuked people living in pueblos. 10/10
kaki -;-;Forced hitler to become jewish 10/10
Rapidiza;-;This game (as you can probably tell by how much I've played it) is quite addicting. It's beginner friendly but still has advanced aspects for more experienced players. The major downside is that if you only buy the base game, it's quite repetitive; I recommend to purchase the complete edition. The game also has a workshop, which adds more variety to the game. I once used a mod which spawned all the civilizations in true geographical areas which actually taught me some true locations of countries which I didn't previously know. Overall, good game, 10/10, could ruin your life :)
Manfa;-;This is Civilization at its best and over time it will ripen like a fine wine and become a masterpiece. 2K Games have outdone themselves in making some massive changes without changing the core gameplay and alienating their fans.
BC;-;Built the Eiffel Tower in Sparta, then found oil and the USA declared war on me. Only 50% accurate. 5/10
Steven Bills;-;The Vatican City wants Islam. 10/10 would Vatican again
BingTittleTittleBong;-;I conquered all of Holland when they stopped trading me citrus. Venice gifted me with silk for being a great and fearsome conqueror. Everything was going fine, really, until Gandhi nuked me for not trading him silk and citrus. 10/10
Keirose;-;Ghandi did nothing wrong. The nuclear devastation of my last civ game didn't happen.
thelred the Unready;-;Great game, but have experienced a few graphical glitches on both the directX9 and directX11 versions, best to buy the complete version
yellowtape;-;I have played it for 4 hours and I still have no idea how to play. Great Game!
Skock;-;It's, in fact, one of the best games I've ever played.
Skaidrojumi;-;This game is very relaxing, and feels like a big long boardgame. But though it's lengthy, you still play it, ten hours straight until you finish it. If you like influetial games, then look no further. Thanks to this game, I no longer trust the French, I wanna nuke Ghandi, and the French suck...Ok it's mostly changed my views of Napoleon and the French haha he's betrayd me too many times. If he asks you for anything or wants to be friends, just walk away.
Gandalf's Granny;-;I've never been good at writing reviews, and couldn't think of anything to put, so heres a recipe for Falafel. INGREDIENTS 1 cup dried chickpeas or 16 oz. can of chickpeas or garbanzo beans. 1 large onion, chopped 2 cloves of garlic, chopped 3 tablespoons of fresh parsley, chopped 1 teaspoon coriander 1 teaspoon cumin 2 tablespoons flour Salt Pepper Oil for frying Prep Time: 15 minutes Cook Time: 105 minutes Total Time: 120 minutes PREPARATION Place dried chickpeas in a bowl, covering with cold water. Allow to soak overnight. Omit this step if using canned beans. Drain chickpeas, and place in pan with fresh water, and bring to a boil. Allow to boil for 5 minutes, then let simmer on low for about an hour. Drain and allow to cool for 15 minutes. Combine chickpeas, garlic, onion, coriander, cumin, salt and pepper (to taste) in medium bowl. Add flour. Mash chickpeas, ensuring to mix ingredients together. You can also combine ingredients in a food processor. You want the result to be a thick paste. Form the mixture into small balls, about the size of a ping pong ball. Slightly flatten. Fry in 2 inches of oil at 350 degrees until golden brown (5-7 minutes). Serve hot. Serving Suggestion Falafel can be served as an appetizer with hummus and tahini, or as a main course. Stuff pita bread with falafel, lettuce, tomatoes, tahini, salt and pepper. As an alternative, falafel can be formed into patties and served like a burger. Thanks for reading my review, I hope it has been helpful.
Zilla;-;Just one more turn...
Thulle;-;One of best strategies I played in last few years, definitely worth it. It's like Europa Universalis for dummies (in a good way), but more focused on the fun-part.
ReTRoBuTioN54;-;This is an awsame strategy game and has alot of variation and make each play unique
Raidio Activia;-;"The pinacle of gaming" -Joe
Canterlot Royal Guard;-;"The pinacle of gaming"- Joe
Gah2;-;"The pinnacle of gaming" -Joe
Strider;-;Great game and i love the game when i play with friend like 3v3gandhi style 10/10
The .50 Caliber Apple;-;Pure perfection in a game
SensualSenpai;-;Like Skyrim, with guns.
finlach;-;Grate game a side from being a masive time vammpier it you do kind of need brave new world if you wount the full esperance then buy brave new world though all in all a grate game.
SuperDupah;-;It is a great game. I suggest buying it.
Giraffe Gaff;-;cool beans
RoyalGuard;-;why not, lets try it...hopefully i get nukes
Zeph;-;This game taught me what it is to be a huge ucker. Before I had this gem of a gem of a gem, I didn't know what it was to be Yoko Ono. Thanks to Sid Flier's Oregon Trail VIII, I can die a happy man. My only quip would be the inventory system, which is unable to be used because there is not one in the game. It took me about five and a half hours to figure out that Civ 5 was not an on-rails shooter.
CinemaFromage;-;The game play of Civ V can be likened to that one party back in the late 80's you went to. You know, that one where your friends ditched you to go party with those hot chicks that worked at the mall and you wound up hanging out with the coke head that used to pick his nose in study hall? He gives you that first bump, it takes a few seconds and you start to feel something tingle, you feel a little bit more a live. Wired you could say. In Civ V, you found your first city, everything feels fresh and exciting, you're braving new ground here. Wired you could say. Pretty soon, Cokie gives you a second bump, your blood beings to flow a little faster, you can see things a little quicker, music starts to take shape in your brain, bringing to life something new! In Civ V, you send your warriors exploring, maybe you start to build a worker. Your adrenalines picking up a bit, you're excited for what's going to happen next. Excited for your future. Pretty soon, a monument pops up in your city, a citizen moves in, you've given life to something new! Now, you and Cokie, you're on a roll. You're rocking and rolling, you're taking your bumps, sustaining the electricty. You're dancing, life springs eternal aroudn you and you are in tune with the world! Your cities are growing, your military is taking shape and becoming formiddable, Your culture is alive and strong, your infrastructure is vast and carries life to all of your cities, like the blood that throbs in your veins! It's about 2am and you and Cokie, you guys are starting to peak. You feel like you can conquer the world with the power that pulses within you! Your kingdom, it's pulsing with power as well. You start to conquer your neighboring city-states, not to right wrongs, not to engulf their resources; simply because you can. Then, it happens. It's 3am and you're starting to crash. Your body feels limp, you are starting to sweat. The weakness starts to spread, tangible and sweet, you can't take much more. Back in Sid Meier land, Alexander the Great, he got tired of your brutal ways and decided to smack you around. He's closing in on your borders, your outlying puppet master cities began to falter, your borders begin to shrink. And then, at both that coke fueled party in the late 80's and in your imaginary kingdom that you've built in Sid Meier's Civ V, you blink and realize it's 6am. You haven't slept, you can't remember what you've done for the last 8 hours, but you vaguely remember having a hell of a time doing whatever it was you did. There's just that one nagging thought that you're afraid Catherine of Russia may call you that last night and you're pretty certain you should feel bad for the way you treated her last night. That's what playign Civ V is like.
TG Eggbeforechicken;-;a first time experience story: -started as france -started exploring around -met morocco and instantly declared war -lost war but we had a peace treaty -met greece -greece has already claimed most of the map -me and morocco declare war on greece at the same time -we both lose our capitals -greece made me lose the game because he was annoying -never even made it to the medieval age and that all happened in about an hour
Vespertilio;-;How to have fun playing this game: 1.conquer a city 2.raze the city 3.hear the people rumbling screaming crying 4.watch the city burn 5.feel it 6.double the feel 7.laugh 8.cover your nipples in peanut butter 9.dryhump a washing machine 10.repeat
Lightshader;-;Best strategy game I have ever played
Jones;-;Pro: Build your civ from the stoneage towards the spaceage. Varied maps and game options. Mostly peacefull gameplay, which can be quite relaxing, if you are looking for something else from the usual. Con: Terrible programming (32 bit LUA). Performance issues, even if you have more then capable hardware (i5 3570k+gtx780) resulting in longer turns then necessary, ultimately forcing you to play small maps. Bad netcode making it hard to join matches and creating lag during the game. The interface could be alot better. Many basic things are simply not present such as unit overview. Instead the computer forcibly leads you along from one unit to the next, but sometimes a few of the units get missed or they wake up from their sleep again. In short: It is an oversight of epic proportions and a major sadness as there are not many nice games such as this, that dont require you to kill. Verdict: 7-8 bucks is definitely fine for the complete edition and you can find it for that price online. If they fix the issues in a new title im also willing to pay more, but not like this.
Mark Nolo;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V ... LOL! This gr8 strategy game is really really time costly ! Like if u get pretty engaged in it, it'll take away from u half of ur life !... Ok maybe that's exaggerating, let's say 1/4 of ur life. But yeah, 'cause the matches can go on for tens of hours, @ the end u can spend in total like entire days on big matches! In fact the ~270 achievements rn't easy to win. Duh. Yep. X-3 Also the units rn't in scale. Also the characters played by the AI r complete *ssholes ! When or not hostile doesn't matter, always morons. X-C I'll slap ur *sses mothaf*ckers! But however all that, this is 1 of the best Strategy games I've ever played, if not the best... Ah no wait, THIS IS THE BEST Strategy game I've ever played, hands down. That's right, I like the gameplay @ turns that makes everything more manageble, I like the gr8 variety of options, I like the personalization of each character, I like the different winning objectives, I like the list of units, I like the Great Wall , I like the Nuclear Submarine , I like the Krakatoa , I Catherine of Russia (best waifu, also if sh*tty temperament like all the others), I like the cows... So in the end I like the game overall! X-D
Dr. NIcotiona Axillaris;-;Very fun, immensley fun alone and with friends. At the same time i have no friends.
rubish 1;-;Broke the game in 13 minutes. 10/10 would break again
The Guy With No Social Life;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME! I sat there for 6 hours and it felt like 15 minutes. Also I'm friends with the "One more turn" logic so I keep saying I'll play one more turn, but that turns into 30 or 40 or 178... MUST BUY THIS!!!!
SixthExile;-;Seriously. Together, me and my dad have played over 1000 hours of this game. You never get bored because of the (almost) infinite possibilities available. You can rule your nation that could be in tundra, the desert, by the coast (big ships :) ), on an island, in forest or all of them, spanning the entire earth!! (Conquest is fun.) You will be pitted against the greatest historical and modern (and future, with a mod. oh yes, mods!) nations ever to have existed, at whatever difficulty you want. You play, how you play. Literally however you want. Evil overlord? Go for it. Best turn-based strategy ever to exist. Ah... unless you don't get the DLC of course (G&K and BNW). Then you might as well get Civ 4, costing a grand total of 5.
Nerokin;-;Making History Overall: 84% (100.2/120) Atmosphere: 9.6/10 Graphics: 7.5/10 Level Design: 9.3/10 Sound: 9.1/10 Balance: 8.2/10 Controls: 7.9/10 Artificial Intelligence: 6.5/10 Animations: 8.7/10 Replay Value: 9.1/10 Story: 8.8/10 Tutorial: 3.5/5 Variety in Items: 9.0/10 Cost-Benefit Ratio: 2/4 System Requirements: 1/1
StokedTrout;-;Thumbs up for historical accuracy. I remember learning about the time Ghandi nuked Napoleon in second grade.
Mormon Freeman;-;I've only played this game for a fraction of the time other's have played. But I plan on spending much more due to the complexity and overall reward of playing this game. Although I remain skeptical of newer Civ versions, this one seems very well developed and has already proven to be lots of fun. If you're having a hard time justifying the large cost of this game, like I was, just have a look at the play time of other people reviewing this (good and bad reviews). There's so much content in this game, especially with the DLC which I recommend.
Your Boy Dr. Pepper;-;Civ V is on of those games that you have heard great things about, but aren't sure if you'll like it. You buy it when its on sale and then immediatley lose your entire day playing it, strategizing on when you should declare war or who should be your ally. It does have some minor flaws but the fun you have both by yourself or with friends outsizes the few flaws I found.
[CJVI];-;Best game on steam, obviously. and i do not get what the  Europa universalis is about. End.
Markipopo;-;I've stolen 28 euros from my parents card to buy this game... it was woth of it
TheCatOfWar // CS <3;-;Amazing stratergy game, only real con is overexpensive DLC
[R4T] Sinuous;-;tried making friends with elizabeth... didn't work, decided to take over her empire... 10/10
cptchainsawman;-;it is amazing and fun get it!!!!
Haiber;-;this game is bad because it ruined my life. I have over 250 hours put solely into this game. I just beat the highest difficulty a couple days ago, and i dont know what to do anymore. ive been nuked countless times by gandhi, and ive played the day long games that everybody talks about. Ive stayed up until 4am on an exam day. I lost that game thanks to  gandhi. i cant take it anymore. multiplayers fun btw
Il Cavaliere;-;Ruined my entire life. 10/10
Doge of Arstotzka;-;At its bare bones without expansions, this game tends to start out boring but when you feel the real general gist of the game it turns out to be quite the gem of the steam store, whether you want to play the peaceful diplomat or the fearsome warrior, i would say a good game for any strategy lover
Captain;-;Continuously made a city with a population of 1 then trading it to people to start a war, then taking it back by force and trading it to someone else for the same deal. What a  game. 10/10
SnowClone;-;1.Allys with Ghandi 2.Ghandi makes nukes 3.Ghandi says nukes are to be used on russia 4.I feel safe and trust him 5.He nukes all of my citys destroying them 6. GG Ghandi 10/10 would play again
Hover;-;I've barely played this game, I can't really comment too much on it. But it is amazing.
ghost;-;Fantastic game, highly recommend for all who like Strategy Games. Drops you in a vast world with total freedom to build your empire. You settle cities, build militaries, and try to make your Civilization the best one. Worth every penny I paid. 10/10
Tsunari;-;Your very own personal time machine. that doesn't let you travel back to where you started your game.
Winded;-;Ruins your life if you lack self-control and have responsibilities. 10/10 will do one more turn again.
Augy;-;if your game doesn't crash you are playing it wrong
Harry Dirks;-;An interesting read for children of all ages, Sid Meier's Fantastic Four V is a twist on the FPS genre with its inclusion of a fully interactional book store. I gotta say though, I thought the lack of Avengers in this game was disappointing. I still have hope for a crossover event come the next game, though. choice/10
SquirrelKing;-;best strategy game that is around now!!!! most definitely a keeper
Bugles;-;meh it was ok i guess jk best game ive ever played
World Abuser;-;This game is like a drug..............Once you start you never stop.
Eddd;-;When this game works it is really fun and enjoyable once you learn the mechanics and don't have a ing troll on the other team taking ages to make their turn. When the game doesn't work (server crashes etc) this game allows you to save and reload your game, but have fun trying to get everyone reconnected and the game running again as it seems that you have to leave one person out for the game to work again.
WeirdOrange;-;Great historical accuracy, with this game I know I can ace my history exam! Who knew Gandhi was a heartless, evil warmonger who would nuke the world into oblivion?
Banana Duck;-;Just one more go.... AND.....it's 5am
About47Pandas;-;Do you have a free weekend or no job? Do you enjoy sitting in a chair beind a screen for extended periods of time? Maybe you are 14? possibly 25 and no job and your mom doesn't bother you much? WELL, Civ 5 is the game for you! Watching small groups of people inhabit a hexigon and watching other people invade other hexigons is a blast. Youll need to beat your wife and kids so they know not to bother you. Order Pizza Turn off your phone and let the magic happen. You cant stop this. This game will end relationships.
woost;-;death to china
BananaSquid;-;As we all know, in 1999, Montezuma and George Washington fought each other with nukes, both at the age of 3000.
Hard Like Heroic;-;Civ5 is kind of like a sandwich. With all the ingredients, it's the best one you've had. Take out the mayo and cheese, and it's still tasty, but you feel no satisfaction.
Bernie;-;When you first play Civ V you wonder... How many times will I need to restart this until jolpe finds a decent spawn place. Then you wonder... Will that guy just hit ing next turn already.... But the true magic of Civilization V is when Barbarian  come and Burn down your horses, so you repair them with a hammer. Only in Sieve Thive
Paszko Pakosawiec Rymbaba;-;Ultra epic, game to play months without getting bored.
Funty McCraiger;-;Did you want to sleep tonight? No? Play this.
Phase;-;Wow. Such good. So time.
The Silent Voice;-;Very nice game. It is based on geological history very mutch. How strong your nation is, depends on all geological factors that are around you combined with the specialisation of the civilization you choose. Fun to play.
Geeko150;-;Civilization V, or Civilisation V if you can spell correctly, is a game that not only destroys both your social life and your daily sleep pattern but it can also lead to the destruction of your sanity after a prolonged exposure to this particular substance. However, this is in my opinion, a small price to pay for some everlasting enjoyment; the euphoria you experience while wheelchair-bound, obese and boss-eyed (or "strabismus" for you budding austists out there) is priceless compared to that  family christmas you have to endure every  year - correct? I know I am. As such, I am happy to recommend this game to anyone who appreciates good smack or has an addiction they wish to devleop into something more hardcore... I can safely say that this game will give you everything; the AI will offer you love, the interface will offer you wisdom, while the gameplay will offer you eternal happiness from the second you prepare your  for this amazing entry (if you'll pardon the pun)!
Rusty Sandusky;-;This game's going to ruin my life. Calling it now.
Hamzaz;-;its ok i guess.
Walker;-;Civ is a game that is really hard to mess up. And Civ V and it's DLC are just plain awesome. Brave New World alone adds so much to the game. Be warned if you have never played before though, the game is a bit of a life suck. I should know as I am close to having 1000 hours in the game.
Tuna Man;-;Why don't you own this yet? The game is it's best when you have both the Brave New World and Gods and Kings expansions.
lilshortkid16;-;If you're not into strategy like I was then this is your game because it taught me things, it made me understand politics more. Sid Meier's Civilation V is a great game and I am looking forward to saving my money just to throw it at GabeN because Steam is Love, Steam is Life. #JustOneMoreTurn
LegacyLlama;-;Civ 5 is an amazing game that is based on history of the world you can either play it out with friends or you can play single-player but either type is just as fun.
Hardline;-;One of the best turn based fps games: good story, use of cover system, no scope, rekt m8.
mlgpixels(racer of arms);-;Great game, solid mechanics with good strategy Nuked by gandi 10/10
Watashi wa Recyasa desu~! |;-;Got nuked by Ghandi ..... Realism 10/10 Would get nuked again ;D
Tp Hl Nepu;-;Its really good TBS game with lots of ways to rule you nation. you can be a passive nation who trade stuff to other nations or you can be a nation who just want to rule whole world and destroy the weak. there is glitches but every game have those Really good game. go and get it
Apocky+Tawok;-;Do you want to argue with your best friend for weeks about who the iron belonged to, who deserved it, who needed it more, who could be most productive with it, and why it's not OK to annex their city they used to steal it? BECAUSE  YOU FLESHWOUND THAT WAS MY IRON, MY CAPITAL WAS RIGHT NEXT TO IT AND YOU SETTLED TOO CLOSE, YOU BISMARK PLAYING  10/10 would destroy childhood friendships again
Maniac :>;-;Ah yes, Civ 5, The game of who can denounce eachother first. >Someone makes huge army >I kill them to save the world >Infinitely hated >Continue to wipe everyone out with nukes >Me gusta
Died!;-;You can have planes in 150 BC!! I'll write the rest of the review because there is a empire out there depending on me!!
yalcton;-;7/7 It was good, but is not as good as COD - IGN
M16A4;-;I'm still waiting for it to load. 10/10
Ted Johansson;-;After initially being impatient to play the Civilization game series when I played III for a bit, I regret that decision, because I was too impatient to play what would of been one of my most favourite strategy games. I got this game from the recent Humble Bundle, and I got to say after playing a good 6 hours on this game, that it is one of my most favourite games to play. There is Ghandi who is an , don't trust him, he lies and nukes you in the back when you least expect it. Nothing else I should say here other than: 10/10 Get it now and ruin your life with this addiction.
xXDamonDXx;-;Was this Review Helpful? Yes 2% No 97% Funny 1%
hPALLY #LF> EXP ArtWorker !;-;Played a bit, like it ! If you want to waste some time, join CiV5 ! Addictive and has a lot things to do !
roxor;-;its ok
Mr. Wrighty;-;ed up Russia, then the Russia like tyrant countries. 11/10 would clear the world of the tyrant countries at this game again!
Ser Jonny Snow;-;No wonder the UK dislikes Polish people. Back stabbing s. 10/10
Grim Patron;-;Can throw the world into nuclear holocaust 10/10
Huntinboy98;-;Probaly the funnest game i have ever played
Clacks;-;"Uh huh, this is my  All the girls stomp your feet like this A few times I've been around that track So it's not just gonna happen like that Because I ain't no hollaback girl I ain't no hollaback girl" -Washington
Peacockle;-;civ 1 was about this kid in a desert racing aliens civ 2 was all about him growing up and meeting a lover civ 3 he went a bit stale and became evil civ 4 was people rebeling and civ 5 is now when they are keep rebeling against the emporer and darth vadr
Esvice;-;0/10 would create a time paradox and change history again
Bryguy - I don't like this game;-;Friendships have been broken over this game however we still play it together. They are now my worst enemies. Ten outta Ten.
korben dallas;-;thanks to this game now I just want to see the world on fire
Seen;-;4 is superior But with the BNW dlc I do enjoy it.
HMS Kaiser;-;Its awesome
Aoun;-;Pretty good game, worth buying, however the DLCs become repetetive.
spacehippo;-;is okay.....but theres no giant evil monsters trying to kill you. i had a dream that mermans were eating my school that was flooded and i tried to swim away but almost got eaten
King Daro;-;One more turn....ONE MORE TURN BEFORE SLEEEEEPP..... Very adicting and is the best stragey game out their combined with Brave New World and Gods and Kings exspanion packs. The only downside is that Steam workshop mods are disabled for Mac users (Why.....it works fine on other games like L4D2...) and the Mac version also dosnt come with the soundtrack....why Fireaxis...why do you hate us Mac users?.....why..........
Faux of Love Egg;-;Press button make city, make buildings, create units, attack city, destroy city, capture city. Repeat and win.
Elidas;-;one more turn...
larmitage8;-;Is a very good game to play with friends that helps the time go by and also allows for a good gaming experience.
Svenni_Moon;-;Great game.
Vargo;-;Have you ever played a Bethesda game where you can "wait X" amount of hours, and just skip time? That is exactly what this game allows you to do.
Habubski;-;It's an old, but still great game. lol jk, it sucks hard  lol jk again. 8/8 would review it again
[TN]Shimesa;-;Its alright
debshot883;-;say goodbye to your life...
Bobyzola;-;Fun turn based strategy game. Single player is good with quite a few difficulty levels but the multiplayer is poorly optomized so crashes and lags a lot.
Atlas;-;classic and great in co-op multiplayer
=TGY=CloudGT4;-;I will write this in a minute " just one more turn " If you know that feeling then this game is definitely for you :D
Worato;-;I strongly recomed this game to any RTS fan.
swisha223;-;7.8/10 Too much water
Solruki, Lord of the Puffins;-;Do not play this game while on the toilet, it's rude hog the bathroom. On another note, stop knocking, I'll be out in a sec.
Andyrew;-;Pretty good so far, only played one game.
ThumbTheRonin;-;Very nice and interresting game
[Green] Irish Willy;-;This is a really fun and great game but I just wanted to say there are many bugs and the game is broken.
[KoL] Balian;-;Well.....what a game. I was worried about getting civ 5 as I'd only ever had civ 3 and clocked a good few hundred hours on that a good few years back until i got civ 4; civ 4 is awful and wouldn't recommend it but civ 5 ye, you've got World Congress (can become United Nations), the units are amazing, so many more buildings, better techs and graphics are quite good. Strategy games may not be your thing but i think civ 5 will be.
Chuckles Laff;-;At this point, if you haven't heard of this game, please quit steam. This game is amazing in everyway, and the variability between games ensures that it never gets old. There are enough features to keep players busy, even when they are not in the middle of a war. Just buy it, and all the dlc, it is worth it no matter what you think of strategy games.
Samuel Desu Jackson;-;Pretty fun game. I am not the best at it, but I love it to pieces. Pros: -Highly strategic turn-based gameplay -Beautiful landscapes -Unique items for each leader -Extra fun(and expensive) DLC Cons: -None that I can think of 10/10
derekhuwe;-;There's a few things that I don't like about the transition from Civilization IV to V but overall it's an incredible improvement. The visual improvements are outstanding! There are a few things I wish were implemented from IV, like trading maps, trading technologys, world editor. But all these things are made available by community workshop mods.
[TBR] lino;-;become the megalomaniac you always wanted to be. Just as good as it always was.
dertwev;-;I've put more time into this game than most so I'd say I'm qualified to write this. I really enjoy the gun attachments and the killstreaks. However, the nudity is VERY excessive and overblown. I'd rather jerk off my grandfather sometimes.
Fnatic Trippie *AussieAss.com;-;the brave new world DLC has boobs 10/10 best art boobs i've seen
Can't See Me, I Am Stealth;-;At first I didn't see many reasons to play online without someone I know so in the back of my mind I was regretting clicking on multiplayer, but after playing as Indonesia in a group of 6 other online players, I saw how intense this turn-based could become. I can assure everyone that the multiplayer is 9000 times more intense than the singleplayer (against AI) and the only way to find that out is by playing multiplayer. FOR THE NUTMEG!!!
Gargoyle;-;Do you think you sleep too much? Do you have too much spare time? Worry no more - the neVest Civ is here! Get started, and after you have played "one more turn"... ...your alarm reminds you that 18 hours have passed and it's time to get to school again. Great game!
FUNDOG_THRILLIONAIRE;-;It took me 104 hours, but I finally won my first Civ 5 game. As George Washington, World Leader, I wiped Ghandi off the map before he could screw me over like usual. Using my Christian Nuclear Arsenal, I erased him from history. When his epitaph played and America immediately immediately began a golden age despite everyone in the world denouncing me, I popped a raging boner making all 104 hours worthwhile.
Kalvin;-;I never realized that this was actually fun.
Varg Skelethor;-;Civilization V is the Great Strategy game You're can make a Big Civilization and social with other civilizations you're can fight with them or be friendly all decision's i yours
Joecus1;-;This game is pretty good. A lot of fun with friends especially.
Etherealism;-;Perfect way to lose about three days of your life, all in one sitting, and it's even better when you lose it with a bunch of friends with about the same motivation to nuke everything as you.
shosuro006;-;Good strategic elements. High amount of replay value. Getting the steam achievements also make for interesting challenges allowing you explore the other leaders and civs.
Johnny;-;Quite addictive, worth it.
fnnako *;-;i didnt get alot of time to try everything in this game ! but i can tell , this game rocks
Kababknife;-;I love this game, it can be really fun to play with friends when you're winning and fun when you're not :3. This game is really cool because you can do so much, and it is also a game that requires you to think, use skill and strategy rather than simply pointing and shooting, and it has so many details and interesting game mechanics while not being overly-complicated.
GaMeRs RoCk!!!;-;once you buy this game and know how to play it your butt will stuck on a chair for a day .. 10/10
TryHarderPanda;-;tfw ghandi declaration of war
Tunnel Snake Jimones;-;With all the DLC, its probably one of the most entertaining games I have played.
ceacorp;-;I dont remember how the sunlight is...
12dot^-^;-;This game is amazing! If you play with friends it is so funny:)
Togr;-;This game is a Turn Based Game where you control a civilization of your choosing and survive the tests of time. It is a ton of fun with friends, the single player NPC civilizations are a bit brain dead but still fun to play with. You never have nothing to do in this game there is always something happening each turn and won't stop throughout the beginning is a bit hard on you but you will get used to it. I totally recommend this game to anyone who wants a nice RTS and has a moderate PC.
A.nill;-;11/10 would recommend
iaidenn;-;Very fun and some nice long games u can have makes this better because if u have a games like AoE tht will last an hour then u play another with this there r the various victorys and different Ai attitudes (besides Gahndi) and with long lasting games its harder to get bored of... get it on sale while u can
Bindestrek;-;Review here.
Pieeer1;-;One of the best strategy games of our time.
Rngo1214;-;I bought this and played it with my friends for a couple hours. They soon left (I think) and then I went into singleplayer. I made "some" progress, then my friends called me up to play again. Then I realized what time it was. 10/10
Garbuttus [KS];-;Brilliant Game - However it requires a patient mind. If you are not willing to play a game which lasts hours to complete this game is not for you. If you are patient enough, this game is among the best games that you will play. Good with or without DLC, though DLC does enhance gameplay greatly
Polkovnik;-;I think there are no doubts only one game what rules them all and thats it. Its the CIV series. Civ 5 is not so complex as CIV 4 but still realy good one , i played it like houndred of hours and now i bought original version from steam :)
Segway Jesus;-;First time ever playing a Civilization game.. I played nonstop for five straight hours. 11/10
Boonem;-;Overall a phenomenal title, albeit the bugs (most common in multiplayer modes), GPU-intensive code (my laptop has shut down due to overheating), and long loading times may agitate impatient minds. The series as a whole being the flagship for the casual RTS genre, this installation should by no means be passed up despite various software difficulties. Both multiplayer and singleplayer modes have proven to be largely enjoyable and full of replay value with features such as 43 unique (and as a result quite unbalanced) playable civilizations with different abilities and units, an extensive collection of maps and map types, and many scenario settings as well. The Brave New World expansion has also proven itself as an exceptional update to the core game rules and numerous other extensions to an already remarkable gameplay experience. This expansion is considered by many a necessary part of the Civilization experience. I would recommend this game to any and all that can appreciate an entertaining afternoon of politics-filled evolution-based strategy gaming with friends.
midjet1 #R.I.P.Bianchi;-;Very fun and addicting, but the Complete Edition really shouldn't be $50, I recommend getting it when it's on sale.
WillMott;-;Very good game, I would recommend this game to anyone who likes strategy genres. The graphics for me are supurb and the little animations when you battle singleplayer! In my first game, my tank anihalated a spearmen and the animation to me very funny. Great Game!
[RGC] Bogus;-;best strategy game ever. don't underestimate it - it's amazing.
hexenszene;-;The Great Lighthouse has been built in a far away land :---DDD Ha-ha! Nice! What can I say? A clear 10/10!
InsaniacDuo;-;This is great for those of you who love strategy games. That's all I'll say. It's that good.
Shakow;-;Fantastic game with amazing depth Not as good as Civ 2 but still absolutely amazing
Rektar;-;It's a good game.
[MiT] BoredGuy;-;well this is fun if youre a huge nerd and im not that huge of a nerd so it wasnt so fun so to sum this up ing nerds k yourselfs
butt bop;-;Accidentally started a world war. Consisted of around three nations (Rome, Byzantium, Ethiopia) on my side and two on the other (Egypt and Germany) with a few neutral bigots watching the mayhem. After around twenty years of fighting Germany was a skeleton of what it used to be and Egypt frantically sending diplomats to reach a peace agreement as I sent my army and navy to enact a full-fledged invasion of the Egyptian mainland. God, I love this game.
ChampThunderDick;-;If you want a game that has tons of replay value a very in depth technology tree and loads of historical people that you've never heard of then this grand strategy is definitely for you. I bought it and haven't regretted it.
[MOM]Fluffy;-;Eveyone declared war 10/10
The L BkeR;-;This game is worth about $30 TOTAL for ALL DLC. $120 is crazy. If you spent $120 on this game, wow... I pity tha foo! EDIT: I feel I should mention a few things specifically that bothered me. 1) A.I. is completely worthless. All they do on higher difficulty is cheat but remain completly  in combat and diplomacy. For example: I can save a civ that i had been trading with and gifting to for centeries, and was conquered by another civ, but just because we have close borders they declare war on me the next turn... The trades are crazy stupid. They rarely are worth it. I can gift a civ resources for 90 turns, then ask for a fair trade and they refuse... 2) Combat with a large army is tedious beyond belief. 3) Gifting units is broken. Sometimes it works, sometimes it doesn't. How the mechanics work(don't work) is never explained and no one on the forums seems to know either. 4) The devs focus on selling DLC instead of fixing the base game. Don't support bad devs. $120 for this broken game is insane. I got Gods & Kings version on sale for $15(base game and previous DLC included). That was a fair price. If BNW drops below $15 I might consider buying it, but not likely. I would hate to give money to these incompitent money grubbing  devs. I recommend this game if you can get if for less than $30 TOTAL(ALL DLC). Otherwise, move along or go back to Civ IV, a much better game.
Pink Guy;-;This game is an awesome strategy game for people who like to play stuff slow paced. In this game you choose a leader for an empire/country and you have to develop it to have military, food for your people, your people's culture, scientific discoveries, gold, and your people's happiness. It may seem overwhelming butbecause of how slow-pace the game is, it is easy to grasp. You can choose to play solo with bots which have many options for their difficulty ranging from just bought the game to pretty much impossible to win because of the bots handicaps. <--- that is just a range of the levels of difficulty, not the actual options. You can also choose to play with actual people. If you do this I'd recommend the people you play with be a group of friends or just 1 friend because you never really complete the game with strangers. Sometimes their connection is janky (Key word: their* The game doesn't have dedicated servers so lag isn't the games fault) or people are just really slow. Plus you sometimes get kicked when you join a lobby. So in my expierence multiplayer isn't worth playing with strangers. Only a group of or one friend. This game really makes the time you invest into it worth it. The games last around 10 hours each so playing by yourself on your own time is awesome. And you can customize your empire and win through many choices of victories. All and all this game is for an avid strategy gamer who likes slow paced games.
Raccoon;-;No better turn-based game out there for beginners. 137 hours and only just scratched the surface. Wonders are OP. 10/10 (forgetting the glitches)
Styx|UnsyNZ;-;10/10 got declared war on by 10 different cities
[BCC]TJ3003, The Penguin | LZ;-;i dont know how this got here
John Cena;-;W O U L D Y O U B E I N T E R E S T E D I N A T R A D E A G R E E M E N T W I T H E N G L A N D ?
aikawarei;-;It's Civ5. What more can I say?
sticky finger sensei;-;Its like the other Civilization games only better.
Walsworth Shekelstein;-;This is a game for someone looking to break into the world of strategy games. Even expierienced players can enjoy having fun with this, I've played plenty of strategy games, starting with Civ 3 and all the way up to Europa Universalis 4. I still enjoy playing this for fun. P.S. NEVER TRUST ANYONE PEACEFUL IN REAL LIFE(e.g GHANDI) ~Remember to never stop slamming! -Probably Space Jam
Xav;-;Insanely fun with the DLCs. Time is nonexistent when playing this game.
Jolyne Kujo;-;I've been confined in my household on a sunny day for FOUR hours, playing this game. That's not like me, I do go outside sometimes, but, just, one, more, turn.... Seriously, it sounds kinda stupid that a low paced strategy game has addiction? Ever wanna take control of a nation's politics? Trading? Resources? Warfare? NUCLEAR WARFARE? Randomly generated maps? Religions, news, and hunting? What about making a city grow? Like simcity? Yeah, you know what I mean. Don't forget tactics to warfare and strategies. Don't forget the sandbox and modding experience for this game. My addiction to this game is settled, I'll be playing this for a long time...
NitroTaker;-;So much fun with friends
The Batmantis;-;It's good, well made and fun. I recommend it.
Dracarys;-;dear Bismark,  you signed, a pacifist
Shakin'MahTurban;-;I love this game. The strategic value to it is perfect. It's indepth enough to pose a challenge yet not so much that it has an insane learning curve. The one problem I can find and it isn't one that bothers me but the length of the games is crazy. It isn't unheard of for a single game to go on for 24+ hours. Now as I previously mentioned this doesnt bother me but for some people that are just looking for a casual strategy game this could cause some time restraints. And for those of you who like the short single-sentence reviews and don't really want to read what I have typed: Nuked Japan, and completed space travel in 1903. 10/10
Juancho;-;This may not be the best installment of these series personally, but is by far the most entertaining one. A lot of detail was cut from the previous game but all in order to make the experience more dynamic. Thanks to this, CIV V has te best multiplayer of the saga. Recommended for the hardcore fans, the casual gamers, the strategy aficionado on anyone with the slightest interest, this game is BRILLIANT in all aspects.
[6te] Duke;-;The damn cutscene at the start is misleading!
Totally A Ninja;-;Can't shank anyone 0/10 game of the year
Blue Delicious;-;good game. dlc not worth it though
Bindestrek;-;Review here.
Pieeer1;-;One of the best strategy games of our time.
Rngo1214;-;I bought this and played it with my friends for a couple hours. They soon left (I think) and then I went into singleplayer. I made "some" progress, then my friends called me up to play again. Then I realized what time it was. 10/10
iaidenn;-;Very fun and some nice long games u can have makes this better because if u have a games like AoE tht will last an hour then u play another with this there r the various victorys and different Ai attitudes (besides Gahndi) and with long lasting games its harder to get bored of... get it on sale while u can
Styx|UnsyNZ;-;10/10 got declared war on by 10 different cities
FUNDOG_THRILLIONAIRE;-;It took me 104 hours, but I finally won my first Civ 5 game. As George Washington, World Leader, I wiped Ghandi off the map before he could screw me over like usual. Using my Christian Nuclear Arsenal, I erased him from history. When his epitaph played and America immediately immediately began a golden age despite everyone in the world denouncing me, I popped a raging boner making all 104 hours worthwhile.
ceacorp;-;I dont remember how the sunlight is...
Chuckles Laff;-;At this point, if you haven't heard of this game, please quit steam. This game is amazing in everyway, and the variability between games ensures that it never gets old. There are enough features to keep players busy, even when they are not in the middle of a war. Just buy it, and all the dlc, it is worth it no matter what you think of strategy games.
Samuel Desu Jackson;-;Pretty fun game. I am not the best at it, but I love it to pieces. Pros: -Highly strategic turn-based gameplay -Beautiful landscapes -Unique items for each leader -Extra fun(and expensive) DLC Cons: -None that I can think of 10/10
derekhuwe;-;There's a few things that I don't like about the transition from Civilization IV to V but overall it's an incredible improvement. The visual improvements are outstanding! There are a few things I wish were implemented from IV, like trading maps, trading technologys, world editor. But all these things are made available by community workshop mods.
[TBR] lino;-;become the megalomaniac you always wanted to be. Just as good as it always was.
Dblg;-;An extremly time consuming game that is just amazing. The DLC for it is well worth it if you have the extra money and overall this game is just simply amazing.
Bobyzola;-;Fun turn based strategy game. Single player is good with quite a few difficulty levels but the multiplayer is poorly optomized so crashes and lags a lot.
Atlas;-;classic and great in co-op multiplayer
mrman98;-;This game is great, just don't be dissapointed when it is impossible to win without a war as the AI seems to have either mood swings or multiple personality disorder. You can shower them with gifts or trade non-stop with them but as soon as your borders are visible from theirs or you have a 'weak' military they will pounce on you without hesitation. They even say 'backstap' in the dialogue box, this annoys me as I want to play the game nicely but very few of my friends have the game and random online matches often have dlc which I do not. I'm sorry about this mini rant, this game is fabulous and the repeatability amazing but seriously if you want to play vs AI peacefully get a mod.
Pancro;-;i took over a friends town and named it dongersrgr8 9/10
iPhoeniix90;-;absolutely love this game. So addictive, endless hours of gameplay!
Sampai;-;"It's Greeeeat" Tony The Tiger - 2014
Jeggy;-;One of the best strategy games I ever played
it's ya boy dalton;-;This my go-to game when I just want to unwind and have fun. Hopefully Civilization: Beyond Earth is just as good as this game is with both G&Ks and BNW.
Greeker;-;Love this game, thumbs up for sure. Played the different versions before purchasing the Steam compilation. Wish I could rotate the loading videos from the original, to G&K, then BNW.
Jake;-;What a game
Nova Bomb;-;Very fun game that requires much strategy
FataLxxProdigY;-;When you decide to play civ 5 dont be surprised when five hours later your still playing in the same game.
jonathanmichaelhanson;-;I love this game. I love the new system without the stacking ability. It allows for players caught off gaurd to be able to put up some form of fight. Unfortunately, when I bought the game, I did not get all the upgrade packages which stinks because I am only missing a few, but they are too expensive for it to make sense to buy them by themselves. Overall good deal though and good game. I'm not excited about the next Civilization so I plan on playing this one for a while.
Sir Clicksalot;-;Sid Meier's Civilization V is a great turn based strategy game with interesting game mechanics and great historical progression. Although the game has a big learning curve it is great to play with friends once you get past the learning curve. Beware if you do get into this game days will pass and it will have only felt like minutes.
The Blizz;-;Game 4 teh ballers.
Cloverking;-;Finally, a game where I can be George Washington and make Oda Nobunaga my bro as we wage nuclear war on Ghandi. Just kidding, I like to make a really silly religion like "buttfaceology" and then force the entire world to adopt it. I'm like a Jehovah's witness but with more butts.
YA BOiiiiiii;-;SAW  FOR THE FIRST TIME AND IM 12 10OUT OF 10
El Pimpador;-;Excellent game, solid 10/10 value, Warning: You'll think 'Oh yeah I'll go to bed after this turn', forget 200 turns later and suddenly realise you've spent 5 hours extra managing workers and crushing Dido.
I Love Socialist Revolutions :D;-;A simple but very well polished game. Infinite scenarios, each unique and enjoyable. Highly advised.
Misaki;-;One more turn!
Papa Wifi;-;I bought this game 20 minutes ago and I already have 35 hours in it.
changyperson||;-;I laughed. I cried I played this game for 20 hours straight. Buy it.
cmcarp;-;So far the worst time sink I have ever encountered. One more turn has become a negative comment in my household, both children and wife threatening me since I started to play this game. Not only is the base game one of the best strategy games I have ever played, the sheer number of mods available make this game an almost infinite time playable game.
GlitterBomb;-;By far the most addicting game on steam. I swear you sit down and turn around not only is your youth gone but so is your innocene. And yes Ghandi is a jerk in the game...
Oryx [new pc i have 2 dl];-;Nuking countrys? k.
Jewejitsu;-;Best game ever played. So very fun. Played Sweeden and destroyed Greece and the Native Americans before Jesus was even born. Oh yeah!!!!
Vamp;-;This is drugs in game form.
gregr27;-;Awesome game, really fun.
Slippy Toad;-;why is the dlc so expensive thanks sid fkn noob
Sanctitty;-;I've been playing this game for like 15 hours now, its actually pretty fun! at first i was like whoa dude everyone is so addicted to this game called civ 5 and thought psshh they probably exaggerating. But then I tried it out myself, there's a lot of stuff to learn about it at first but once you learn all that in like an hour or two. Its all set sail from there. It really reminds me of playing age of empires and red alert 1 back in the day. Brings back nostalgic memories. This game is very deep like miley cyrus's . You can easily sink in many many hours into it. I would definitely rate this game a 9.5/10. Its like Miley Cyrus, Great Visuals and Very Deep.
VinylBlaster;-;Really fun. It just get better with friends online too. Perfect if you have the time for a good marathon game.
Obitler;-;Awesome game! Be aware it's addicting as hell!
